<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20020625165849.txt.gz
TIME:20020625165849
EVENTS:	Changes in registrant's certifying accountant	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Changes in registrant's certifying accountant
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): June 21, 2002 Saul Centers, Inc. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Maryland 1-12254 52-1833074 (State or Other Jurisdiction (Commission (IRS Employer of Incorporation) File Number) Identification Number) 7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500, Bethesda, Maryland 20814 - ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Address of Principal Executive Offices) (Zip Code) (301) 986-6200 --------------------------------------------------------- (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Not Applicable -------------------------------------------------------------------- (Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
Item 4. Changes in Registrant's Certifying Accountant. On June 21, 2002, the Board of Directors of Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company"), upon the unanimous recommendation of its Audit Committee, approved the dismissal of Arthur Andersen LLP ("Andersen") as the Company's principal independent accountant and the engagement of Ernst & Young LLP ("Ernst & Young") to serve as the Company's principal independent accountant to audit the Company's financial statements for the year ending December 31, 2002. Andersen's reports on the Company's consolidated financial statements for each of the two most recent fiscal years ended December 31, 2001 and 2000 did not contain an adverse opinion or disclaimer of opinion, nor were they qualified or modified as to uncertainty, audit scope, or accounting principles. During the Company's two most recent fiscal years and through the date hereof, there were no disagreements with Andersen on any matter of accounting principles or practices, financial statement disclosure, or auditing scope or procedure which, if not resolved to Andersen's satisfaction, would have caused them to make reference to the subject matter in connection with their reports; and there were no "reportable events," as defined in Item 304(a) (1) (v) of Regulation S-K. The Company provided Andersen with a copy of the foregoing disclosures. Attached as Exhibit 16 is a copy of Andersen's letter, dated June 25, 2002, stating its agreement with such statements. During the Company's two most recent fiscal years and through the date hereof, the Company did not consult Ernst & Young with respect to the application of accounting principles to a specified transaction, either completed or proposed, or the type of audit opinion that might be rendered on the Company's consolidated financial statements, or any other matters or reportable events required to be disclosed under Items 304(a) (2) (i) and (ii) of Regulation S-K. Item 7 Financial Statements and Exhibits (c) Exhibits Exhibit 16 Letter from Arthur Andersen LLP to the Securities and Exchange Commission dated June 25, 2002. - 2 -
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. SAUL CENTERS, INC. By: /s/ Scott V. Schneider --------------------------- Scott V. Schneider Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer Dated: June 25, 2002 - 3 -
EXHIBIT INDEX Exhibit No. Description - ----------- ----------- 16 Letter from Arthur Andersen to the Securities and Exchange Commission dated June 25, 2002 - 4 -

Exhibit 16 Office of the Chief Accountant Securities and Exchange Commission 450 Fifth Street, N.W. Washington, D.C. 20549 June 25, 2002 Dear Sir/Madam: We have read the first four paragraphs of Item 4 included in the Form 8-K dated June 21, 2002, of Saul Centers, Inc. to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission and are in agreement with the statements contained therein. Very truly yours, /s/ Arthur Andersen LLP - --------------------------- Arthur Andersen LLP - 5 -


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20021101125259.txt.gz
TIME:20021101125259
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): November 1, 2002 Saul Centers, Inc. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Maryland 1-12254 52-1833074 (State or Other Jurisdiction (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer of Incorporation) Identification Number) 7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500, Bethesda, Maryland 20814-6522 - --------------------------------------------------------- ----------------- (Address of Principal Executive Offices) (Zip Code) (301) 986-6200 ----------------------------------------------------- (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Not Applicable ------------------------------------------------------------- (Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits. (c) Exhibits The exhibits listed in the following index relate to the Registration Statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-85254), of the registrant and are filed herewith for incorporation by reference in such Registration Statement. Exhibit No. Description 99 Form of Authorization Form
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. SAUL CENTERS, INC. By: /s/ Scott V. Schneider ---------------------- Scott V. Schneider Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer Dated: November 1, 2002
EXHIBIT INDEX Exhibit No. Description 99 Form of Authorization Form

EXHIBIT 99 [LETTERHEAD OF SAUL CENTERS, INC.] DIVIDEND REINVESTMENT AND STOCK PURCHASE PLAN AUTHORIZATION FORM STEP # 1: If you wish to enroll your stock dividend, partnership distribution, or both in the Plan, you must check one or both of the boxes below and then proceed to Steps 2 and 3, as appropriate. By checking one or both boxes, you also consent to the authorization statement in the paragraph below. If you do not wish to enroll any dividends or distributions in the Plan, do not check either box and discard this Authorization Form. [_] Common Stock holders: I hereby enroll in the Plan the dividends on my shares of Common Stock as designated below in Step # 2. [_] Partnership Interest holders: I hereby enroll in the Plan the cash distributions on my Partnership Interest as designated below in Step # 3. Pursuant to the Dividend Reinvestment and Stock Purchase Plan of Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Plan"), I hereby authorize Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") to appoint Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company as my agent to receive any cash dividends and/or cash partnership distributions that hereafter become payable to me on the shares of Common Stock and/or the Partnership Interest as specifically designated below. I further authorize Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company to apply such dividends and/or partnership distributions to the purchase of full shares and fractional interests in shares of the Company's Common Stock, as set forth below. Capitalized terms not otherwise defined in this form shall have the same meaning as in the Plan. STEP # 2: If you have elected to enroll your Common Stock, please select one of the following boxes: [_] Full Dividend Reinvestment. I authorize the automatic investment of all the cash dividends on all the shares of Common Stock registered in my name to purchase Common Stock. [_] Partial Dividend Reinvestment. I authorize the automatic investment of all the cash dividends on the following shares of Common Stock registered in my name to purchase Common Stock:
STEP #3: If you have elected to enroll your Partnership Interest, please select one of the following boxes: [_] Full Distribution Investment. I authorize the automatic investment of all the cash distributions on the Partnership Interest registered in my name to purchase Common Stock / Partnership Units (select either stock or units by circling). [_] Partial Distribution Investment. I authorize the automatic investment ________% of the cash distributions on the Partnership Interest registered in my name to purchase Common Stock / Partnership Units (select either stock or units by circling). I understand that, if I select one or both of the investment options, all cash dividends paid on the whole or fractional shares of Common Stock purchased pursuant to the Plan will be reinvested automatically to purchase additional Common Stock or Partnership Units. I further understand that the purchases authorized above will be made under the terms and conditions of the Plan and that I may revoke this authorization at any time by notifying Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, in writing, of my desire to terminate my participation. RETURN THIS FORM ONLY IF YOU WISH TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PLAN _________________________________ _____________________________ Please Print Name (s) as Shown on Signature (s) Stock Certificate or on Exhibit A to the Agreement of Limited Partnership of Saul Holdings Limited Partnership _________________________________ _____________________________ Address Signature (s) _________________________________ ______________ _________________________ City State Zip Date Social Security or Tax Identification Number _________________________________ Telephone Number


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20030425141734.txt.gz
TIME:20030425141734
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): April 23, 2003 Saul Centers, Inc. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Maryland 1-12254 52-1833074 (State or Other Jurisdiction (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer of Incorporation) Identification Number) 7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Bethesda, Maryland 20814 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Address of Principal Executive Offices) (Zip Code) (301) 986-6200 --------------------------------------------------------- (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Not Applicable -------------------------------------------------------------------- (Former name or former address, if changed since last report)
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits. (c) Exhibits *99.1 Press Release, dated April 23, 2003, of Saul Centers, Inc. Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure (Information provided under Item 12-Results of Operations and Financial Condition). The following information is being provided under Item 12-Results of Operations and Financial Condition. It is being furnished under Item 9 of this Form 8-K in accordance with interim guidance issued by the SEC in release No. 33-8216. As a result, the information in this report shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"). On April 23, 2003, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2003. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto. - 2 -
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. SAUL CENTERS, INC. By: /s/ Scott V. Schneider --------------------------- Scott V. Schneider Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer Dated: April 25, 2003 - 3 -
EXHIBIT INDEX Exhibit No. Description ---------- ----------- 99.1 Press Release, dated April 23, 2003, of Saul Centers, Inc. - 4 -

Exhibit 99.1 SAUL CENTERS, INC. 7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500, Bethesda, Maryland 20814-6522 (301) 986-6200 Saul Centers, Inc. Reports First Quarter Earnings April 23, 2003, Bethesda, MD. Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its first quarter operating results. Total revenues for the quarter ended March 31, 2003 increased 2.9% to $23,870,000 compared to $23,191,000 for the 2002 quarter. Operating income before gain on property sold and minority interests decreased 5.6% to $6,539,000 compared to $6,926,000 for the comparable 2002 quarter. The Company reported net income of $4,519,000 or $.29/share for the 2003 quarter, a per share decrease of 32% compared to net income of $6,335,000 or $0.43/share for the 2002 quarter (basic & diluted). In the 2002 quarter, the Company recognized a gain on property sold of $1,426,000 when it received final proceeds from the District of Columbia's condemnation and purchase of the Company's Park Road property. Overall same property net operating income for the total portfolio decreased 2.3% for the 2003 first quarter compared to the same period in 2002. The same property comparisons exclude the Ashburn Village Phase IV development, placed in service during the summer of 2002, as well as Kentlands Square, which was acquired in September 2002. Net operating income is calculated as total revenue less property operating expenses, provision for credit losses and real estate taxes. Same center net operating income in the shopping center portfolio decreased 6.5% for the quarter. The decrease was primarily attributable to increased current year snow removal expenses and decreased tenant termination fees. Same center net operating income in the office portfolio grew 7.3% for the 2003 first quarter primarily due to the Company's Washington Square property, now in its second year of operations. As of March 31, 2003, 93.0% of the portfolio was leased, compared to 94.2% a year earlier. This decrease in leasing percentage is largely due to the 74,000 square feet of space remaining to lease at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue after the expiration of a major tenant lease. Saul Centers www.SaulCenters.com
Funds From Operations (FFO), a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, decreased 4.2% to $10,581,000 in the 2003 first quarter compared to $11,048,000 for the same quarter in 2002. On a fully diluted per share basis, FFO was $0.52 per share for the 2003 quarter, a 7.4% decrease from $0.56 per share for the same quarter last year. The decrease was primarily attributable to three items: o A decrease in lease termination fees, o A decrease in net operating income at the Company's 601 Pennsylvania Avenue office building due to the expiration of a major tenant lease, and o An increase in snow removal expenses, net of tenant recoveries. FFO is presented on a fully converted basis and is defined as net income before minority interests, extraordinary items, gains and losses on property sales and real estate depreciation and amortization. Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 35 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 6.5 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area. Contact: Scott V. Schneider (301) 986-6220 Saul Center www.SaulCenters.com
Saul Centers, Inc. Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets ($ in thousands)
Saul Centers, Inc. Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations (In thousands, except per share amounts)
Saul Centers, Inc. Supplemental Information (In thousands, except per share amounts) (1) FFO is a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance of real estate investment trusts. FFO, as defined by the National Association of Real Estate Investment Trusts (NAREIT), is net income before gains or losses from property sales, extraordinary items, and before real estate depreciation and amortization. FFO does not represent cash generated from operating activities in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and may not be indicative of cash available to fund cash needs, which is disclosed in the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows in the Company's SEC reports for the applicable periods. FFO should not be considered as an alternative to net income, its most directly comparable GAAP measure, as an indicator of the Company's operating performance, or as an alternative to cash flows as a measure of liquidity. Management considers FFO a meaningful, additional measure of operating performance primarily because it excludes the assumption that the value of real estate assets diminishes predictably over time, and because industry analysts have accepted it as a performance measure. Our presentation of FFO, which follows the NAREIT definition, may not be comparable to similarly titled measures employed by other REITs.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20030806113519.txt.gz
TIME:20030806113519
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
 
On August 5, 2003, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2003. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: August 5, 2003
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1 SAUL CENTERS, INC. 7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500, Bethesda, Maryland 20814-6522 (301) 986-6200 Saul Centers, Inc. Reports Second Quarter Operating Results August 5, 2003, Bethesda, MD. Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its second quarter operating results. Total revenues for the quarter ended June 30, 2003 increased 1.9% to $23,226,000 compared to $22,793,000 for the 2002 quarter. Operating income before gain on property sold and minority interests decreased 7.4% to $6,016,000 compared to $6,499,000 for the comparable 2002 quarter. The Company reported net income of $3,996,000 or $.26/share for the 2003 quarter, a per share decrease of 15% compared to net income of $4,482,000 or $0.30/share for the 2002 quarter (basic & diluted). For the six month period ending June 30, 2003, total revenues increased 2.4% to $47,096,000 compared to $45,984,000 for the 2002 period. Operating income before gain on property sold and minority interests decreased 6.5% to $12,555,000 compared to $13,425,000 for the comparable 2002 period. The Company reported net income of $8,515,000 or $.55/share for the 2003 period, a per share decrease of 25% compared to net income of $10,817,000 or $0.73/share for the 2002 period (basic & diluted). In the 2002 period, the Company recognized a gain on property sold of $1,426,000 when it was awarded a final settlement for the condemnation and purchase of the Company's Park Road property by the District of Columbia. Overall same property net operating income for the total portfolio decreased 1.9% for the 2003 second quarter and 2.1% for the 2003 six month period compared to the same periods in 2002. The same property comparisons exclude the Ashburn Village Phase IV development, placed in service during the summer of 2002, as well as Kentlands Square, which was acquired in September 2002. Net operating income is calculated as total revenue less property operating expenses, provision for credit losses and real estate taxes. Same center net operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 3.0% for the 2003 second quarter and decreased 1.9% for the 2003 six month period. The decrease in same center net operating income in the shopping center portfolio for the six month period was primarily attributable to decreased tenant termination fees and increased current year snow removal expenses. Same center net operating income in the office portfolio decreased 11.0% for the 2003 second quarter and 2.4% for the 2003 six month period compared to the same periods in 2002 primarily due to the expiration of a major tenant lease at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue and the down time required to prepare the space for occupancy for new tenants' use. [LOGO] www.SaulCenters.com
As of June 30, 2003, 93.6% of the portfolio was leased, compared to 94.2% a year earlier. This decrease in leasing percentage is primarily due to 25,000 square feet of space remaining to lease at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue after the expiration of a major tenant lease. Funds From Operations (FFO), a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, decreased 3.6% to $10,301,000 in the 2003 second quarter compared to $10,681,000 for the same quarter in 2002. On a fully diluted per share basis, FFO was $0.50 per share for the 2003 quarter, a 7.0% decrease from $0.53 per share for the same quarter last year. For the six month period ending June 30, 2003, FFO decreased 3.9% to $20,882,000 compared to $21,729,000 for the 2002 period. On a fully diluted per share basis, FFO was $1.01 per share for the 2003 six month period, a 7.2% decrease from $1.09 per share for the same period last year. The decrease in the six month FFO was primarily attributable to two items: . A decrease in net operating income at the Company's 601 Pennsylvania Avenue office building due to the expiration of a major tenant lease, and . A decrease in lease termination fees. FFO is presented on a fully converted basis and is defined as net income before minority interests, extraordinary items, gains and losses on property sales and real estate depreciation and amortization. Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 36 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 6.6 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area. Contact: Scott V. Schneider (301) 986-6220 [LOGO] www.SaulCenters.com
Saul Centers, Inc. Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets ($ in thousands)
Saul Centers, Inc. Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations (In thousands, except per share amounts)
Saul Centers, Inc. Supplemental Information (In thousands, except per share amounts) (1) FFO is a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance of real estate investment trusts. FFO, as defined by the National Association of Real Estate Investment Trusts, is net income before gains or losses from property sales, extraordinary items, and before real estate depreciation and amortization. FFO does not represent cash generated from operating activities in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and may not be indicative of cash available to fund cash needs, which is disclosed in the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows in the Company's SEC reports for the applicable periods. FFO should not be considered as an alternative to net income, its most directly comparable GAAP measure, as an indicator of the Company's operating performance, or as an alternative to cash flows as a measure of liquidity. Management considers FFO a supplemental measure of operating performance and along with cash flow from operating activities, financing activities and investing activities, it provides investors with an indication of the ability of the Company to incur and service debt, to make capital expenditures and to fund other cash needs. FFO may not be comparable to similarly titled measures employed by other REITs. (2) Although same property net operating income and property net operating income are GAAP financial measures, the Company has elected to present a reconciliation of the measures to net income.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20031031161717.txt.gz
TIME:20031031161717
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.    Other Events
 
On October 30, 2003, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") entered into an underwriting agreement with Friedman, Billings, Ramsey & Co., Inc. ("FBR"), Ferris, Baker Watts, Incorporated ("FBW") and the several underwriters listed on Schedule I thereto, for whom FBR and FBW are acting as representatives (together, the "Underwriters"), a copy of which is included as Exhibit 1.1 to this Report and incorporated herein by reference. Pursuant to the underwriting agreement, the Underwriters agreed to purchase up to 4,000,000 depositary shares (the "Depositary Shares"), each representing
 1
/
100
th of a share of 8% Series A Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock, $.01 par value per share (the "Series A Preferred Stock" and, together with the Depositary Shares, the "Securities"), of the Company at a price of $25.00 per share, less underwriting discounts and commissions of $0.7875 per share.
 
Item 7.    Financial Statements, Pro Forma Information and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
The exhibits listed in the following index relate to the offering described in Item 5 above pursuant to a prospectus supplement dated October 31, 2003 to the prospectus dated September 30, 2003, which forms a part of the Company's Registration Statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-107083) and are filed herewith for incorporation by reference in such Registration Statement.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 1.1
 
 
 
October 30, 2003
 
FRIEDMAN, BILLINGS, RAMSEY & CO., INC.
FERRIS, BAKER WATTS, INCORPORATED
as Representatives of the several Underwriters
c/o Friedman, Billings, Ramsey & Co., Inc.
1001 19th Street North
Arlington, Virginia 22209
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
Saul Centers, Inc., a real estate investment trust ("REIT") and a corporation organized under the laws of the State of Maryland (the "Company"), confirms its agreement with each of the Underwriters listed on Schedule I hereto (collectively, the "Underwriters"), for whom Friedman, Billings, Ramsey & Co., Inc. and Ferris, Baker Watts, Incorporated are acting as representatives (in such capacity, the "Representatives"), with respect to (i) the sale by the Company of 3,500,000 Depositary Shares (the "Initial Shares"), each representing 1/100
th
of a share of 8% Series A Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock (liquidation preference equivalent to $25.00 per Depositary Share), par value $0.01 per share (the "Preferred Stock"), and the purchase by the Underwriters, acting severally and not jointly, of the respective number of Depositary Shares set forth opposite the names of the Underwriters in Schedule I hereto, and (ii) the grant of the option described in Section 1(b) hereof to purchase all or any part of 500,000 additional Depositary Shares to cover over-allotments, if any, from the Company, to the Underwriters, acting severally and not jointly, in the respective numbers of Depositary Shares set forth opposite the names of the Underwriters in Schedule I hereto. The 3,500,000 Depositary Shares to be purchased by the Underwriters and all or any part of the 500,000 Depositary Shares subject to the option described in Section 1(b) hereof, are hereinafter called, collectively, the "Shares."
 
The Company understands that the Underwriters propose to make a public offering of the Shares as soon as the Underwriters deem advisable after this Agreement has been executed and delivered.
The Company has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission"), a registration statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-107083), and a related preliminary prospectus for the registration of the Shares under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"), and the rules and regulations thereunder (the "Securities Act Regulations"). The Company has prepared and filed such amendments thereto, if any, and such amended preliminary prospectuses, if any, as may have been required to the date hereof, and will file such additional amendments thereto and such amended prospectuses as may hereafter be required. The registration statement has been declared effective under the Securities Act by the Commission. The registration statement as amended at the time it became effective (including all information deemed (whether by incorporation by reference or otherwise) to be a part of the registration statement at the time it became effective pursuant to Rule 430A(b) of the Securities Act Regulations) is hereinafter called the "Registration Statement," except that, if the Company files a post-effective amendment to such registration statement which becomes effective prior to the Closing Time (as defined below), "Registration Statement" shall refer to such registration statement as so amended. Any registration statement filed pursuant to Rule 462(b) of the Securities Act Regulations is hereinafter called the "Rule 462(b) Registration Statement," and after such filing the term "Registration Statement" shall include the 462(b) Registration Statement. The Company proposes to file with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424, under the Securities Act, a supplement to the prospectus dated September 30, 2003, relating to the Shares and the method of distribution thereof. The term "Base Prospectus" means the prospectus included in the Registration Statement; the term "Preliminary Prospectus" means any preliminary form of the Prospectus (as defined herein) specifically relating to the Shares, in the form first filed with, or transmitted for filing to, the Commission pursuant to Rule 424 of the Securities Act Regulations; the term "Prospectus Supplement" means any prospectus supplement specifically relating to the Shares, in the form first filed with, or transmitted for filing to, the Commission pursuant to Rule 424 under the Securities Act; the term "Prospectus" means the Base Prospectus, including, in each case, the Prospectus Supplement. The Commission has not issued any order preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus.
 
The Company and the Underwriters agree as follows:
 
 
(a)    Upon the basis of the warranties and representations and other terms and conditions herein set forth, at the Purchase Price per Depositary Share of $24.2125, the Company agrees to sell to the Underwriters the number of Initial Shares set forth in Schedule I opposite its name, and each Underwriter agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company the number of Initial Shares set forth in Schedule I opposite such Underwriter's name, plus any additional number of Initial Shares which such Underwriter may become obligated to purchase pursuant to the provisions of Section 8 hereof, subject in each case, to such adjustments among the Underwriters as the Representatives in their sole discretion shall make to eliminate any sales or purchases of fractional shares.
    Initial Shares.
 
(b).    In addition, upon the basis of the warranties and representations and other terms and conditions herein set forth, at the purchase price per share set forth in paragraph (a), the Company hereby grants an option to the Underwriters, acting severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, all or any part of the Option Shares, plus any additional number of Option Shares which such Underwriter may become obligated to purchase pursuant to the provisions of Section 8 hereof. The option hereby granted will expire 30 days following the date of delivery of the Initial Shares and may be exercised in whole or in part from time to time only for the purpose of covering over-allotments which may be made in connection with the offering and distribution of the Initial Shares upon notice by the Representatives to the Company setting forth the number of Option Shares as to which the several Underwriters are then exercising the option and the time and date of payment and delivery for such Option Shares. Any such time and date of delivery (a "Date of Delivery") shall be determined by the Representatives, but shall not be later than three full business days (or earlier, without the consent of the Company, than two full business days) after the exercise of such option, nor in any event prior to the Closing Time, as hereinafter defined. If the option is exercised as to all or any portion of the Option Shares, the Company will sell the total number of Option Shares then being purchased, and each of the Underwriters, acting severally and not jointly, will purchase that proportion of the total number of Option Shares then being purchased which the number of Initial Shares set forth in Schedule I opposite the name of such Underwriter bears to the total number of Initial Shares, subject in each case to such adjustments among the Underwriters as the Underwriters in their sole discretion shall make to eliminate any sales or purchases of fractional shares.
    Option Shares
 
 
(a).    The Shares to be purchased by each Underwriter hereunder, in definitive form, and in such authorized denominations and registered in such names as the Representatives may request upon at least forty-eight hours' prior notice to the Company shall be delivered by or on behalf of the Company to the Representatives, including, at the option of the Representatives, through the facilities of The Depository Trust Company ("DTC") for the account of such Underwriter, against payment by or on behalf of such Underwriter of the purchase price therefor by wire transfer of Federal (same-day) funds to the account specified to the Representatives by the Company upon at least forty-eight hours' prior notice. The Company will cause the shares of Preferred Stock represented by the Shares to be deposited against delivery of depositary receipts ("Depositary Receipts") to be issued by Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, as Depositary, under a Deposit Agreement (the "Deposit Agreement") among the Company, the Depositary and the holders from time to time of the Depositary Receipts issued thereunder at least twenty-four hours prior to the Date of Delivery with respect thereto. Each Depositary Receipt will represent one or more Depositary Shares. The time and date of such delivery and payment shall be at the offices of Goodwin Procter LLP, Exchange Place, Boston, Massachusetts 02109 at 9:30 a.m., New York time, on the third (fourth, if pricing occurs after 4:30 p.m., New York time) business day after the date hereof (unless another time and date shall be agreed to by the Representatives and the Company. The time at which
    Initial Shares
 
such payment and delivery are actually made is hereinafter sometimes called the "Closing Time" and the date of delivery of the Shares represented by the Depositary Receipts is hereinafter sometimes called the "Date of Delivery."
 
(b).    Any Option Shares to be purchased by each Underwriter hereunder, in definitive form, and in such authorized denominations and registered in such names as the Representatives may request upon at least forty-eight hours' prior notice to the Company shall be delivered by or on behalf of the Company to the Representatives, including, at the option of the Representatives, through the facilities of DTC for the account of such Underwriter, against payment by or on behalf of such Underwriter of the purchase price therefor by wire transfer of Federal (same-day) funds to the account specified to the Representatives by the Company upon at least forty-eight hours' prior notice. The Company will cause the Shares of Preferred Stock represented by the Option Shares to be deposited against delivery of Depositary Receipts at least twenty-four hours prior to the Date of Delivery with respect thereto. The time and date of such delivery and payment shall be at the offices of Goodwin Procter LLP, Exchange Place, Boston, Massachusetts 02109 at 9:30 a.m., New York City time, on the date specified by the Representatives in the notice given by the Representatives to the Company of the Underwriters' election to purchase such Option Shares or on such other time and date as the Company and the Representatives may agree upon in writing.
    Option Shares
 
 
The Company represents and warrants to, and agrees with, each Underwriter as set forth below in this Section 3 as of the date hereof, the Closing Time and each Date of Delivery that:
 
(a)    the Company has an authorized capitalization as set forth in the Prospectus; the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company and each Subsidiary (as defined below) of the Company, and in the case of Subsidiaries organized as a limited partnership, the outstanding partnership interests, have been duly and validly authorized and issued and are fully paid and non-assessable, and all of the outstanding shares of capital stock and partnership interests of the Subsidiaries are directly or indirectly owned of record and beneficially by the Company except for, as of the date hereof and immediately prior to the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, a 75.21% limited partnership interest in Saul Holdings Limited Partnership (the "Partnership") not held directly or indirectly by the Company or its Subsidiaries which is held by the Saul Organization (as such term is defined in the Prospectus); the deposit of the Preferred Stock in accordance with the Deposit Agreement has been duly authorized, the Shares and the Preferred Stock have been duly and validly authorized, and when issued and delivered pursuant to the Agreement and the Deposit Agreement, and in the case of the Shares, paid for by the Underwriters pursuant to the Agreement, will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable and, to the Company's knowledge, free and clear of any pledge, lien, encumbrance security interest or other claim; the holders of outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company are not entitled to preemptive or other rights to subscribe for the
 
Shares; and, except for (i) units of partnership interest in the Partnership ("Partnership Units"), (ii) common stock, par value $0.01, of the Company ("Common Stock") issuable upon the redemption of outstanding Partnership Units, (iii) Common Stock issuable in connection with the Company's dividend reinvestment and share purchase plan, (iv) 220,000 shares of Common Stock issuable upon the exercise of the options issued under the Company's 1993 Stock Option Plan, or (v) except as set forth in the Prospectus, no options, warrants or other rights to purchase, agreements or other obligations to issue, or rights to convert any obligations into or exchange any securities for, shares of capital stock of or ownership interests in the Company are outstanding.
 
(b)    each of the Company and the Subsidiaries has been duly incorporated or organized and is validly existing as a corporation or limited partnership in good standing under the laws of its respective jurisdiction of incorporation or organization with full corporate power and authority to own its respective properties and to conduct its respective businesses as described in the Registration Statement and Prospectus and, in the case of the Company, to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Deposit Agreement and to consummate the transactions contemplated herein and therein;
 
(c)    the Company and the Partnership, Saul QRS, Inc., Saul Subsidiary I Limited Partnership and Saul Subsidiary II Limited Partnership (each, a "Subsidiary" and collectively the "Subsidiaries") are duly qualified or licensed and are in good standing in each jurisdiction in which they conduct their respective businesses or in which they own or lease real property or otherwise maintain an office and in which the failure, individually or in the aggregate, to be so qualified or licensed could have a material adverse effect on the assets, business, operations, earnings, prospects, properties or condition (financial or otherwise) of the Company and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (any such effect or change, where the context so requires, is hereinafter called a "Material Adverse Effect" or "Material Adverse Change"); except as disclosed in the Prospectus or pursuant to the financing arrangements described under the caption "Debt Structure" in the Prospectus Supplement, no Subsidiary is prohibited or restricted, directly or indirectly, from paying dividends to the Company, or from making any other distribution with respect to such Subsidiary's capital stock or from repaying to the Company or any other Subsidiary any amounts which may from time to time become due under any loans or advances to such Subsidiary from the Company or such other Subsidiary, or from transferring any such Subsidiary's property or assets to the Company or to any other Subsidiary; other than as disclosed in the Prospectus and, except for the Subsidiaries, the Company does not own, directly or indirectly, any capital stock or other equity securities of any other corporation or any ownership interest in any partnership, joint venture or other association;
 
(d)    the Company and the Subsidiaries are in compliance in all material respects with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, orders, decrees and judgments, including those relating to transactions with affiliates;
 
(e)    neither the Company nor any Subsidiary, and to the Company's knowledge, any other party to a document referred to in clause (ii) below, is in breach of or in default
 
under (nor has any event occurred which with notice, lapse of time, or both would constitute a breach of, or default under), (i) its respective organizational documents, or (ii) in the performance or observance of any obligation, agreement, covenant or condition contained in any license, indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan or credit agreement or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party or by which any of them or their respective properties is bound, except for, in the case of this clause (ii), such breaches or defaults which could not have a Material Adverse Effect;
 
(f)    the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the Deposit Agreement, and consummation of the transactions contemplated herein or therein will not (A) conflict with, or result in any breach of, or constitute a default under (nor constitute any event which with notice, lapse of time, or both would constitute a breach of, or default under), (i) any provision of the organizational documents of the Company or any Subsidiary, or (ii) any provision of any license, indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan or credit agreement or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party or by which any of them or their respective properties may be bound or affected, or under any federal, state, local or foreign law, regulation or rule or any decree, judgment or order applicable to the Company or any Subsidiary, except in the case of this clause (ii) for such breaches or defaults which could not have a Material Adverse Effect; or (B) result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge, claim or encumbrance upon any property or asset of the Company or any Subsidiary;
 
(g)    this Agreement and the Deposit Agreement have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and each is a legal, valid and binding agreement of the Company enforceable in accordance with its respective terms, except as may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally, and by general equitable principles, and except to the extent that the indemnification and contribution provisions of Section 9 hereof may be limited by federal or state securities laws and public policy considerations in respect thereof;
 
(h)    upon execution and delivery of the Depositary Receipts pursuant to the terms of the Deposit Agreement, the persons in whose names such Depositary Receipts are registered will be entitled to the rights specified therein and in the Deposit Agreement, except as such enforcement may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws relating to or affecting creditors' rights generally and by general equity principles.
 
(i)    no approval, authorization, consent or order of or filing with any federal, state or local governmental or regulatory commission, board, body, authority or agency is required in connection with the Company's execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement or the Deposit Agreement, its consummation of the transactions contemplated herein and therein, and its sale and delivery of the Shares and the Preferred Stock, other than (A) such as have been obtained, or will have been obtained at the Closing Time or the relevant Date of Delivery, as the case may be, under the Securities Act and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), (B) such approvals as have been obtained, or will have
 
been obtained at the Closing Time or the relevant Date of Delivery, in connection with the approval of the quotation of the Shares on the New York Stock Exchange ("NYSE"), (C) such as may be required by the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. (the "NASD") in connection with the purchase and distribution of the Shares by the Underwriters and (D) any necessary qualification under the securities or blue sky laws of the various jurisdictions in which the Shares are being offered by the Underwriters;
 
(j)    each of the Company and the Subsidiaries has all necessary licenses, authorizations, consents and approvals and has made all necessary filings required under any federal, state or local law, regulation or rule, and has obtained all necessary authorizations, consents and approvals from other persons, required in order to conduct their respective businesses as described in the Prospectus, except to the extent that any failure to have any such licenses, authorizations, consents or approvals, to make any such filings or to obtain any such authorizations, consents or approvals could not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries is in violation of, in default under, or has received any notice regarding a possible violation, default or revocation of any such license, authorization, consent or approval or any federal, state, local or foreign law, regulation or rule or any decree, order or judgment applicable to the Company or any of the Subsidiaries the effect of which could result in a Material Adverse Change;
 
(k)    each of the Registration Statement and any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement has become effective under the Securities Act and no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement has been issued under the Securities Act and no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or are pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, are threatened by the Commission, and the Company has complied to the Commission's satisfaction with any request on the part of the Commission for additional information;
 
(l)    the Preliminary Prospectus and the Registration Statement comply, and the Prospectus and any further amendments or supplements thereto will, when they have become effective or are filed with the Commission, as the case may be, comply, in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities Act and the Securities Act Regulations; the Registration Statement did not, and any amendment thereto will not, in each case as of the applicable effective date, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; and the Preliminary Prospectus does not, and the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto will not, as of the applicable filing date and at the Closing Time and on each Date of Delivery (if any), contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; provided, however, that the Company makes no warranty or representation with respect to any statement contained in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus in reliance upon and in conformity with the information concerning the
 
Underwriters and furnished in writing by or on behalf of the Underwriters through the Representatives to the Company expressly for use in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus (that information being limited to that described in the penultimate sentence of the first paragraph of Section 9(b) hereof);
 
(m)    each document incorporated by reference in the Prospectus, when it became effective or was filed with the Commission, as the case may be, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the Securities Act Regulations and the Exchange Act Regulations, and none of such documents contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; and any further documents so filed and incorporated by reference in the Prospectus or any further amendment or supplement thereto, when such documents become effective or are filed with the Commission, as the case may be, will conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the Securities Act Regulations and the Exchange Act Regulations and will not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, provided, however, that the Company makes no warranty or representation with respect to any statement contained in the Prospectus in reliance upon and in conformity with the information concerning the Underwriters and furnished in writing by or on behalf of the Underwriters through the Representatives to the Company expressly for use in the Prospectus (that information being limited to that described in the penultimate sentence of the first paragraph of Section 9(b) hereof);
 
(n)    the Preliminary Prospectus was and the Prospectus delivered to the Underwriters for use in connection with this offering will be identical to the versions of the Preliminary Prospectus and Prospectus created to be transmitted to the Commission for filing via the Electronic Data Gathering Analysis and Retrieval System ("EDGAR"), except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T;
 
(o)    there are no actions, suits, proceedings, inquiries or investigations pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened at law or in equity, before or by any federal, state, local or foreign governmental or regulatory commission, board, body, authority, arbitral panel or agency involving the Company or any Subsidiary or any of their respective officers and directors or any of their respective properties, assets or rights that, if determined adversely to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, could result in a judgment, decree, award or order having a Material Adverse Effect;
 
(p)    the financial statements, including the notes thereto, included in (or incorporated by reference into) the Registration Statement and the Prospectus present fairly the consolidated financial position of the entities to which such financial statements relate (the "Covered Entities") as of the dates indicated and the consolidated results of operations and changes in financial position and cash flows of the Covered Entities for the periods
 
specified; such financial statements have been prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles as applied in the United States and on a consistent basis during the periods involved and in accordance with Regulation S-X promulgated by the Commission; the financial statement schedules included in the Registration Statement and the amounts in the Prospectus under the caption "Selected Financial Information" fairly present the information shown therein and have been compiled on a basis consistent with the financial statements included in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus; no other financial statements or supporting schedules are required to be included in the Registration Statement; and no pro forma financial information is required to be included in the Registration Statement;
 
(q)    Ernst & Young LLP, whose reports on the consolidated financial statements of the Company and the Subsidiaries are filed with the Commission as part of the Registration Statement and Prospectus or are incorporated by reference therein and any other accounting firm that has certified Company financial statements and delivered its reports with respect thereto, are, and were during the periods covered by their reports, independent public accountants as required by the Securities Act and the Securities Act Regulations;
 
(r)    subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, and except as may be otherwise stated in the Registration Statement or Prospectus, there has not been (A) any Material Adverse Change or, to the knowledge of the Company, any development that could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Change, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, (B) any transaction that is material to the Company and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole, contemplated or entered into by the Company or any of the Subsidiaries, (C) any obligation, contingent or otherwise, directly or indirectly incurred by the Company or any Subsidiary that is material to the Company and Subsidiaries taken as a whole or (D) any dividend or distribution of any kind declared, paid or made by the Company on any class of its capital stock, other than (i) the second quarter 2003 regular dividend on the Common Stock in the amount of $0.39 per share paid on July 31, 2003 to stockholders of record on July 17, 2003 and (ii) the third quarter 2003 regular dividend on the Common Stock in the amount of $0.39 per share declared on September 25, 2003 and payable on October 31, 2003 to stockholders of record on October 17, 2003;
 
(s)    the Shares conform in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus; the statements in the Prospectus Supplement under the caption "Description of Series A Preferred Stock and Depositary Shares" and in the Prospectus under the captions "Description of Preferred Stock" and Description of Depositary Shares" insofar as such statements constitute summaries of the documents referred to therein fairly summarize the matters referred to therein in all material respects;
 
(t)    other than pursuant to the Registration Rights and Lock-Up Agreement dated August 26, 1993, as amended, there are no persons with registration or other similar rights
 
to have any equity or debt securities, including securities which are convertible into or exchangeable for equity securities, registered pursuant to the Registration Statement or otherwise registered by the Company under the Securities Act, except for those registration or similar rights which have been waived with respect to the offering contemplated by this Agreement, all of which registration or similar rights described above are fairly summarized in the Prospectus;
 
(u)    the issuance and sale of the Shares and the Preferred Stock by the Company is not subject to preemptive or other similar rights arising by operation of law, under the organizational documents of the Company or under any agreement to which the Company or any Subsidiary is a party or otherwise;
 
(v)    the Company has not taken, and will not take, directly or indirectly, any action which is designed to or which has constituted or which might reasonably be expected to cause or result in stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of the Shares;
 
(w)    the Company has not relied upon the Representatives or legal counsel for the Representatives for any legal, tax or accounting advice in connection with the offering and sale of the Shares;
 
(x)    the form of Depositary Receipt complies in all material respects with (i) all applicable statutory requirements, (ii) any applicable requirements of the organizational documents of the Company, (iii) the Deposit Agreement and (iv) the requirements of the NYSE;
 
(y)    the Company and the Subsidiaries have good and marketable title in fee simple to all real property, if any, and good title to all personal property owned by them, in each case free and clear of all liens, security interests, pledges, charges, encumbrances, mortgages and defects, except (i) such as are disclosed in the Prospectus or (ii) such as do not materially and adversely affect the value of such property and do not interfere with the use made or proposed to be made of such property by the Company and the Subsidiaries; and any real property and buildings held under lease by the Company or any Subsidiary are held under valid, existing and enforceable leases, with such exceptions as are disclosed in the Prospectus or are not material and do not interfere with the use made or proposed to be made of such property and buildings by the Company or such Subsidiary;
 
(z)    the descriptions in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus of the legal or governmental proceedings, contracts, leases and other legal documents therein described present fairly the information required to be shown, and there are no legal or governmental proceedings, contracts, leases, or other documents of a character required to be described in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or to be filed as exhibits to the Registration Statement which are not described or filed as required; all agreements between the Company or any of the Subsidiaries and third parties expressly referenced in the Prospectus are legal, valid and binding obligations of the Company or one or more of the Subsidiaries, enforceable against the Company or any of the Subsidiaries in accordance
 
with their respective terms, except to the extent enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and by general equitable principles;
 
(aa)    the Company and each of the Subsidiaries maintain a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations; (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles as applied in the United States and to maintain asset accountability; (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (iv) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences;
 
(bb)    each of the Company and the Subsidiaries maintains insurance (issued by insurers of recognized financial responsibility) of the types and in the amounts generally deemed adequate for their respective businesses and consistent with insurance coverage maintained by similar companies in similar businesses, including, but not limited to, insurance covering real and personal property owned or leased by the Company and the Subsidiaries against theft, damage, destruction, acts of vandalism and all other risks customarily insured against, all of which insurance is in full force and effect;
 
(cc)    the Company and each of the Subsidiaries are in compliance in all material respects with all presently applicable provisions of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, including the regulations and published interpretations thereunder ("ERISA"); no "reportable event" (as defined in ERISA) has occurred with respect to any "pension plan" (as defined in ERISA) for which the Company or any of the Subsidiaries would have any liability; the Company and each of the Subsidiaries have not incurred and do not expect to incur liability under (i) Title IV of ERISA with respect to termination of, or withdrawal from, any "pension plan" or (ii) Section 412 or 4971 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, including the regulations and published interpretations thereunder ("Code"); and, except as would not result in a Material Adverse Effect, each "pension plan" for which the Company and each of its Subsidiaries would have any liability that is intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code is so qualified in all material respects and, to the Company's knowledge, nothing has occurred, whether by action or by failure to act, which would cause the loss of such qualification;
 
(dd)    except as otherwise disclosed in the Prospectus, there are no material outstanding loans or advances or material guarantees of indebtedness by the Company or any of the Subsidiaries to or for the benefit of any of the officers or directors of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries or any of the members of the families of any of them;
 
(ee)    neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any employee or agent of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries, has made any payment of funds of the Company or of any Subsidiary or received or retained any
 
funds in violation of any law, rule or regulation or of a character required to be disclosed in the Prospectus;
 
(ff)    all securities issued by the Company or any of the Subsidiaries have been issued and sold in compliance with (i) all applicable federal and state securities laws, and (ii) to the extent applicable to the issuing entity, the requirements of the NYSE;
 
(gg) each of the Properties complies with all applicable zoning laws, ordinances, regulations and deed restrictions or other covenants, except where such failure to comply would not individually or in the aggregate have a Material Adverse Effect; none of the Partnership, the Company nor any Subsidiary has received from any governmental authority any written notice of any condemnation of or and change in the zoning classification affecting the Properties or any part thereof which could have a Material Adverse Effect; none of the Partnership, the Company nor any Subsidiary knows of any such condemnation or change in the zoning classification which is threatened and which if consummated could have a Material Adverse Effect; all liens, charges, encumbrances, claims, or restrictions which are or recorded against the Properties or which the Company, the Partnership or the Subsidiaries have notice of on or affecting the Properties of the Partnership or any of the Subsidiaries that are required to be described in the Prospectus (or, the most recent Preliminary Prospectus) are disclosed therein; except for such defaults that could not have a Material Adverse Effect, no lessee of any portion of any of the Properties is in default under any of the leases governing such properties and there is no event which, but for the passage of time or the giving of notice or both would constitute a default under any of such leases, and no tenant under any lease pursuant to which the Partnership or any of the Subsidiaries leases the Properties has an option or right of first refusal to purchase the premises leased thereunder or the building of which such premises are a part, except as such options or rights of first refusal which, if exercised, could not have a Material Adverse Effect, and except as provided by law;
 
(hh)    none of the Partnership, the Company nor any Subsidiary knows of any violation of any municipal, state or federal law, rule or regulation pertaining to environmental matters and concerning the Properties or any part thereof which could have a Material Adverse Effect;
 
(ii)    except as otherwise disclosed in the Prospectus, the most recent Preliminary Prospectus or in the Phase I Environmental Audits previously delivered to the Underwriter, (i) none of the Partnership, the Company or any of the Subsidiaries nor, to the knowledge of the Partnership and the Company, any other owners of the Property at any time or any other party has at any time, handled, stored, treated, transported, manufactured, spilled, leaked, or discharged, dumped, transferred or otherwise disposed of or dealt with, Hazardous Materials (as hereinafter defined) on, to or from the Properties, other than by any such action taken in material compliance with all applicable Environmental Statutes or by the Partnership, the Company or any of the Subsidiaries in connection with the operation, use or maintenance of the Properties in the ordinary course of business; (ii) the Partnership and the Company do not intend to use the Properties or
 
any subsequently acquired properties for the purpose of handling, storing, treating, transporting, manufacturing, spilling, leaking, discharging, dumping, transferring or otherwise disposing of or dealing with Hazardous Materials other than by any such action taken in material compliance with all applicable Environmental Statues or by the Partnership, the Company, any of the Subsidiaries or any other party in connection with the operation, use or maintenance of the Properties or any subsequently acquired properties in the ordinary course of business; (iii) none of the Partnership, the Company, nor any of the Subsidiaries knows of any seepage, leak, discharge, release, emission, spill, or dumping of Hazardous Materials into waters on or adjacent to the Properties or any other real property adjacent to the Properties, or onto lands or into waters from which Hazardous Materials might seep, flow or drain into adjacent waters or onto adjacent lands; (iv) none of the Partnership, the Company, nor any of the Subsidiaries has received any notice of, or has any knowledge of any occurrence or circumstance which, with notice or passage of time or both, would give rise to a claim under or pursuant to any federal, state or local environmental statute or regulation or under common law, pertaining to Hazardous Materials on or originating from any of the Properties or any assets described in the Prospectus (or, the most recent Preliminary Prospectus) or arising out of the conduct of any such party, including without limitation a claim under or pursuant to any Environmental Statute (hereinafter defined); (v) the Properties are not included or, to the Company's knowledge, proposed for inclusion on the National Priorities List issued pursuant to CERCLA (as hereinafter defined) by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (the "EPA") or, to the Company's knowledge, proposed for inclusion on any similar list or inventory issued pursuant to any other Environmental Statute or issued by any federal, state or local governmental authority having or claiming jurisdiction over the properties and assets described in the Prospectus;
 
As used herein, "Hazardous Material" shall include, without limitation any flammable explosives, radioactive materials, hazardous materials, hazardous wastes, toxic substances, or related materials, asbestos or any hazardous material as defined by any Environmental Statute (as defined below). As used herein, "Environmental Statutes" mean all federal, state and local laws, ordinances, rules, regulations and other governmental requirements relating to Hazardous Materials, pollution or protection of all ambient air, soil, surface or subsurface strata, surface water, groundwater, wetland and other natural resources;
 
(jj)    in connection with this offering, the Company has not offered and will not offer its Depositary Shares or Preferred Stock in a manner in violation of the Securities Act. The Company has not distributed and will not distribute any Prospectus or other offering material in connection with the offer and sale of the Shares;
 
(kk)    the Company has not incurred any liability for any finder's fees or similar payments in connection with the transactions herein contemplated;
 
(ll)    no relationship, direct or indirect, exists between or among the Company or any of the Subsidiaries on the one hand, and the directors, officers, stockholders, customers or
 
suppliers of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries on the other hand, which is required by the Securities Act and the Securities Act Regulations to be described in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus and which is not so described;
 
(mm)    neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries is and, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Shares, will be an "investment company" or an entity "controlled" by an "investment company", as such terms are defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the "Investment Company Act");
 
(nn)    there are no existing or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened labor disputes with the employees of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries which are likely to have individually or in the aggregate a Material Adverse Effect;
 
(oo)    the Company is organized in conformity with the requirements for qualification as a real estate investment trust (a "REIT") under the Code; the Company qualified as a REIT for all taxable years prior to December 31, 2002 and the present and contemplated method of operation of the Company and the Subsidiaries does and will enable the Company to meet the requirements for taxation as a REIT under the Code; and the Company intends to continue to qualify as a REIT for all subsequent years, subject to the good faith determination by the Board of Directors of the Company to the contrary.
 
 
The Company hereby agrees with each Underwriter:
 
(a)    to furnish such information as may be required and otherwise to cooperate in qualifying the Shares for offering and sale under the securities or blue sky laws of such jurisdictions (both domestic and foreign) as the Representatives may designate and to maintain such qualifications in effect as long as requested by the Representatives for the distribution of the Shares, provided that the Company shall not be required to qualify as a foreign corporation or to consent to the service of process under the laws of any such state (except service of process with respect to the offering and sale of the Shares);
 
(b)    if, at the time this Agreement is executed and delivered, it is necessary for a post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement to be declared effective before the offering of the Shares may commence, the Company will endeavor to cause such post-effective amendment to become effective as soon as possible and will advise the Representatives promptly and, if requested by the Representatives, will confirm such advice in writing, when such post-effective amendment has become effective;
 
(c)    to prepare the Prospectus in a form approved by the Underwriters and file such Prospectus (or a term sheet as permitted by Rule 434) with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act not later than 10:00 a.m. (New York City time), on the day following the execution and delivery of this Agreement or on such other day as the parties may mutually agree and to furnish promptly (and with respect to the initial delivery of such Prospectus, not later than 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the day following
 
the execution and delivery of this Agreement or on such other day as the parties may mutually agree to the Underwriters copies of the Prospectus (or of the Prospectus as amended or supplemented if the Company shall have made any amendments or supplements thereto after the effective date of the Registration Statement) in such quantities and at such locations as the Underwriters may reasonably request for the purposes contemplated by the Securities Act Regulations, which Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto furnished to the Underwriters will be identical to the version created to be transmitted to the Commission for filing via EDGAR, except to the extent permitted by Regulation S-T;
 
(d)    to advise the Representatives immediately, confirming such advice in writing, of (i) the receipt of any comments from, or any request by, the Commission for amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement or Prospectus or for additional information with respect thereto, or (ii) the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or of any order preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus, or of the suspension of the qualification of the Shares for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, or of the initiation or threatening of any proceedings for any of such purposes and, if the Commission or any other government agency or authority should issue any such order, to make every reasonable effort to obtain the lifting or removal of such order as soon as possible; to advise the Representatives promptly of any proposal to amend or supplement the Registration Statement or Prospectus and to file no such amendment or supplement to which the Representatives shall reasonably object in writing;
 
(e)    to furnish to the Underwriters for a period of one year from the date of this Agreement, and upon request during the second through fifth years after the date of this Agreement, (i) as soon as available, copies of all annual, quarterly and current reports or other communications supplied to holders of the Shares, (ii) as soon as practicable after the filing thereof, copies of all reports filed by the Company with the Commission, the NASD or any securities exchange and (iii) such other information as the Underwriters may reasonably request regarding the Company and the Subsidiaries;
 
(f)    to advise the Underwriters promptly of the happening of any event known to the Company within the time during which a Prospectus relating to the Shares is required to be delivered under the Securities Act Regulations which, in the judgment of the Company or in the reasonable opinion of the Representatives or counsel for the Underwriters, would require the making of any change in the Prospectus then being used so that the Prospectus would not include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, or if it is necessary at any time to amend or supplement the Prospectus to comply with any law and, during such time, to promptly prepare and furnish to the Underwriters copies of the proposed amendment or supplement before filing any such amendment or supplement with the Commission and thereafter promptly furnish at the Company's own expense to the Underwriters and to dealers, copies in such quantities and at such locations as the
 
Representatives may from time to time reasonably request of an appropriate amendment to the Registration Statement or supplement to the Prospectus so that the Prospectus as so amended or supplemented will not, in the light of the circumstances when it is so delivered, be misleading, or so that the Prospectus will comply with the law;
 
(g)    to file promptly with the Commission any amendment to the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or any supplement to the Prospectus that may, in the judgment of the Company or the Representatives, be required by the Securities Act or requested by the Commission;
 
(h)    prior to filing with the Commission any amendment to the Registration Statement or supplement to the Prospectus or any Prospectus pursuant to Rule 424 under the Securities Act, to furnish a copy thereof to the Representatives and counsel for the Underwriters and obtain the consent, not to be unreasonably withheld, of the Representatives to the filing;
 
(i)    to furnish promptly to each Representative a signed copy of the Registration Statement, as initially filed with the Commission, and of all amendments or supplements thereto (including all exhibits filed therewith or incorporated by reference therein) and such number of conformed copies of the foregoing as the Representatives may reasonably request;
 
(j)    during the period when the Prospectus is required to be delivered under the Securities Act or Exchange Act in connection with the sales of the Shares, to file all such documents required to be filed with the Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act in the manner and within the time periods required by the Exchange Act and the Exchange Act Regulations;
 
(k)    to apply the net proceeds of the sale of the Shares substantially in accordance with its statements under the caption "Use of Proceeds" in the Prospectus;
 
(l)    to make generally available to its security holders and to deliver to the Representatives as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than the end of the fiscal quarter first occurring after the first anniversary of the effective date of the Registration Statement an earnings statement complying with the provisions of Section 11(a) of the Securities Act (in form, at the option of the Company, complying with the provisions of Rule 158 of the Securities Act Regulations,) covering a period of 12 months beginning after the effective date of the Registration Statement;
 
(m)    to use its best efforts to have the Shares listed, subject to notice of issuance, on the NYSE and, subject to the good faith determination by the Board of Directors to the contrary, to use commercially reasonable efforts, to maintain the quotation of the Shares on the NYSE and to file with the NYSE all documents and notices required by the NYSE of companies that have securities that are traded and quotations for which are reported by the NYSE;
 
 
(o)    to refrain during a period of 30 days from the date of the Prospectus, without the prior written consent of the Representatives, from, directly or indirectly, (i) offering, pledging, selling, contracting to sell, selling any option or contract to purchase, purchasing any option or contract to sell, granting any option for the sale of, or otherwise disposing of or transferring, (or entering into any transaction or device which is designed to, or could be expected to, result in the disposition by any person at any time in the future of), any share of Preferred Stock or any securities convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for Preferred Stock, or any publicly traded debt securities issued or guaranteed by the Company, or filing any registration statement under the Securities Act with respect to any of the foregoing, or (ii) entering into any swap or any other agreement or any transaction that transfers, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, the economic consequence of ownership of the Preferred Stock, whether any such swap or transaction described in clause (i) or (ii) above is to be settled by delivery of Preferred Stock or such other securities, in cash or (iii) otherwise or publicly announce an intention to effect any such transactions. The foregoing sentence shall not apply to the Shares to be sold hereunder;
 
(p)    not to, and to use its best efforts to cause its officers, directors and affiliates not to, (i) take, directly or indirectly prior to termination of the underwriting syndicate contemplated by this Agreement, any action designed to stabilize or manipulate the price of any security of the Company, or which may cause or result in, or which might in the future reasonably be expected to cause or result in, the stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company, to facilitate the sale or resale of any of the Shares, (ii) sell, bid for, purchase or pay anyone any compensation for soliciting purchases of the Shares or (iii) pay or agree to pay to any person any compensation for soliciting any order to purchase any other securities of the Company;
 
(q)    that the Company will comply with all of the provisions of any undertakings in the Registration Statement;
 
(r)    subject to the good faith determination by the Board of Directors of the Company to the contrary, the Company will continue to use its best efforts to meet the requirements to qualify as a REIT under the Code.
 
 
(a)    The Company agrees to pay all costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations under this Agreement, whether or not the transactions contemplated hereunder are consummated or this Agreement is terminated, including expenses, fees and taxes in connection with (i) the preparation and filing of the Registration Statement, each Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus, and any amendments or supplements thereto, and the printing and furnishing of copies of each thereof to the Underwriters and to dealers (including costs of mailing and shipment), (ii) the preparation, issuance and delivery of the
 
Depositary Receipts for the Shares to the Underwriters, including any stock or other transfer taxes or duties payable upon the sale of the Shares to the Underwriters, (iii) the printing of this Agreement and any dealer agreements and furnishing of copies of each to the Underwriters and to dealers (including costs of mailing and shipment), (iv) the qualification of the Shares for offering and sale under state laws that the Company and the Representatives have mutually agreed are appropriate and the determination of their eligibility for investment under state law as aforesaid (including the reasonable legal fees and filing fees and other disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters and the printing and furnishing of copies of any blue sky surveys or legal investment surveys to the Underwriters and to dealers, (v) filing for review of the public offering of the Shares by the NASD (including the legal fees and filing fees and other disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters relating thereto), (vi) the fees and expenses of any depositary agent, transfer agent or registrar for the Shares and miscellaneous expenses referred to in the Registration Statement, (vii) the fees and expenses incurred in connection with the inclusion of the Shares in the NYSE, (viii) travel expenses of the Company's officers and employees and other expenses of the Company in connection with attending and making road show presentations with respect to the offering of the Shares, (ix) preparing and distributing two sets of bound volumes of transaction documents for the Representatives and its legal counsel and (x) the performance of the Company's other obligations hereunder. Upon the request of the Representatives, the Company will provide funds in advance for filing fees.
 
(b)    Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Underwriters shall pay all cost and expenses for their out-of-pocket expenses in connection with the performance of their activities under this Agreement, including, but not limited to, costs such as printing, facsimile, courier service, direct computer expenses, accommodations and travel, and the fees and expenses of the Underwriters' outside legal counsel and any other advisors, accountants, appraisers, etc. (other than the fees and expenses of counsel with respect to state securities or blue sky laws and obtaining the filing for review of the public offering of the Shares by the NASD, all of which shall be reimbursed by the Company pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) above).
 
(c)    If this Agreement shall be terminated by the Underwriters, or any of them, because of any failure or refusal on the part of the Company to comply with the terms or to fulfill any of the conditions of this Agreement, or if for any reason the Company shall be unable to perform its obligations under this Agreement, the Company will reimburse the Underwriters or such Underwriters as have so terminated this Agreement with respect to themselves, severally, for all out-of-pocket expenses (such as printing, facsimile, courier service, direct computer expenses, accommodations, travel and the fees and disbursements of Underwriters' counsel and any other advisors, accountants, appraisers, etc.) reasonably incurred by such Underwriters in connection with this Agreement or the transactions contemplated herein. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the sale of the Shares provided for herein is not consummated because of any termination by the Representatives pursuant to Section 7(iii) or 7(v) of this Agreement or because of a default hereunder by any of the Underwriters, the Underwriters will be responsible for all of their out-of-pocket expenses
 
that shall have been incurred by them in connection with the proposed purchase and sale of the Shares.
 
 
(a)    The obligations of the Underwriters hereunder to purchase Shares at the Closing Time or on each Date of Delivery, as applicable, are subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties on the part of the Company hereunder on the date hereof and at the Closing Time and on each Date of Delivery, as applicable, the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder and to the satisfaction of the following further conditions at the Closing Time or on each Date of Delivery, as applicable:
 
(b)    The Company shall furnish to the Underwriters at the Closing Time and on each Date of Delivery an opinion of Shaw Pittman LLP, counsel for the Company and the Subsidiaries, addressed to the Underwriters and dated the Closing Time and each Date of Delivery substantially in the form attached hereto as Exhibit A.
 
(c)    The Representatives shall have received from Ernst & Young LLP, letters dated, respectively, as of the date of this Agreement, the Closing Time and each Date of Delivery, as the case may be, addressed to the Representatives, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives substantially in the form attached hereto as Exhibit B, relating to the financial statements, including any pro forma financial statements, of the Company and the Subsidiaries, and such other matters customarily covered by comfort letters issued in connection with registered public offerings.
 
(d)    The Representatives shall have received at the Closing Time and on each Date of Delivery the favorable opinion of Goodwin Procter LLP, dated the Closing Time or such Date of Delivery, addressed to the Representatives and in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives.
 
(e)    No amendment or supplement to the Registration Statement or Prospectus shall have been filed to which the Underwriters shall have objected in writing.
 
(f)    Prior to the Closing Time and each Date of Delivery (i) no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any order preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or Prospectus has been issued, and no proceedings for such purpose shall have been initiated or threatened, by the Commission, and no suspension of the qualification of the Shares for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, or the initiation or threatening of any proceedings for any of such purposes, has occurred and (ii) the Registration Statement and the Prospectus shall not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
 
(g)    All filings with the Commission required by Rule 424 under the Securities Act to have been filed by the Closing Time shall have been made within the applicable time period prescribed for such filing by such Rule.
 
(h)    Between the time of execution of this Agreement and the Closing Time or the relevant Date of Delivery there shall not have been any Material Adverse Change, which in the Representatives' sole judgment, makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering of the Shares as contemplated by the Registration Statement.
 
(i)    The Shares shall have been approved for inclusion in the NYSE.
 
(j)    The Company will, at the Closing Time and on each Date of Delivery, deliver to the Underwriters a certificate of its Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer or President and its Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer and Secretary, to the effect that:
 
 
 
 
 
(k)    Prior to the Closing Time and each Date of Delivery, the Company shall have furnished to the Representatives such further information, certificates and documents as the Representatives may reasonably request.
 
If any of the conditions specified in this Section 6 shall not have been fulfilled when and as provided in this Agreement, or if any of the opinions and certificates mentioned above or elsewhere in this Agreement shall not be reasonably satisfactory in form and substance to the Representatives and counsel for the Underwriters, this Agreement and all obligations of the Underwriters hereunder may be canceled at, or at any time prior to, the Closing Time by the Representatives. Notice of such cancellation shall be given to the Company in writing or by telephone or facsimile confirmed in writing.
 
 
The obligations of the several Underwriters hereunder shall be subject to termination in the absolute discretion of the Representatives, at any time prior to the Closing Time or any Date of Delivery, (i) if any of the conditions specified in Section 6 shall not have been fulfilled when and as required by this Agreement to be fulfilled, or (ii) if there has been since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement, any Material Adverse Change, or any development involving a prospective Material Adverse Change, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, or (iii) if there has occurred any outbreak or escalation of hostilities or other national or international calamity or crisis or change in economic, political or other conditions the effect of which on the financial markets of the United States is such as to
 
make it, in the judgment of the Representatives, impracticable to market the Shares or enforce contracts for the sale of the Shares, or (iv) if trading in any securities of the Company has been suspended by the Commission or by the NYSE, if trading generally on the NYSE has been suspended (including an automatic halt in trading pursuant to market-decline triggers, other than those in which solely program trading is temporarily halted), or limitations on prices for trading (other than limitations on hours or numbers of days of trading) have been fixed, or maximum ranges for prices for securities have been required, by the NYSE or by order of the Commission or any other governmental authority, or (v) any action has been taken by any federal, state or local government or agency in respect of its monetary or fiscal affairs which, in the reasonable opinion of the Representatives, has a material adverse effect on the securities markets in the United States.
 
If the Representatives elect to terminate this Agreement as provided in this Section 7, the Company and the Underwriters shall be notified promptly by telephone, promptly confirmed by facsimile.
 
If the sale to the Underwriters of the Shares, as contemplated by this Agreement, is not carried out by the Underwriters for any reason permitted under this Agreement or if such sale is not carried out because the Company shall be unable to comply in all material respects with any of the terms of this Agreement, the Company shall not be under any obligation or liability under this Agreement (except to the extent provided in Sections 5 and 9 hereof) and the Underwriters shall be under no obligation or liability to the Company under this Agreement (except to the extent provided in Section 9 hereof) or to one another hereunder.
 
 
If any Underwriter shall default at the Closing Time or on a Date of Delivery in its obligation to take up and pay for the Shares to be purchased by it under this Agreement on such date, the Representatives shall have the right, within 36 hours after such default, to make arrangements for one or more of the non-defaulting Underwriters, or any other underwriters, to purchase all, but not less than all, of the Shares which such Underwriter shall have agreed but failed to take up and pay for (the "Defaulted Shares"). Absent the completion of such arrangements within such 36-hour period, (i) if the total number of Defaulted Shares does not exceed 10% of the total number of Shares to be purchased on such date, each non-defaulting Underwriter shall take up and pay for (in addition to the number of Shares which it is otherwise obligated to purchase on such date pursuant to this Agreement) the portion of the total number of Shares agreed to be purchased by the defaulting Underwriter on such date in the proportion that its underwriting obligations hereunder bears to the underwriting obligations of all non-defaulting Underwriters; and (ii) if the total number of Defaulted Shares exceeds 10% of such total, the Representatives may terminate this Agreement by notice to the Company, without liability of any party to any other party except that the provisions of Sections 5 and 9 hereof shall at all times be effective and shall survive such termination.
 
Without relieving any defaulting Underwriter from its obligations hereunder, the Company agrees with the non-defaulting Underwriters that it will not sell any Shares hereunder on such date unless all of the Shares to be purchased on such date are purchased on such date by the Underwriters (or by substituted Underwriters selected by the Representatives with the approval of the Company or selected by the Company with the approval of the Representatives).
 
If a new Underwriter or Underwriters are substituted for a defaulting Underwriter in accordance with the foregoing provision, the Company or the non-defaulting Underwriters shall have the right to postpone the Closing Time or the relevant Date of Delivery for a period not exceeding five business days in order that any necessary changes in the Registration Statement and Prospectus and other documents may be effected.
 
The term "Underwriter" as used in this Agreement shall refer to and include any Underwriter substituted under this Section 8 with the same effect as if such substituted Underwriter had originally been named in this Agreement.
 
 
(a)    The Company agrees to indemnify, defend and hold harmless each Underwriter and any person who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act, from and against any loss, expense, liability, damage or claim (including the reasonable cost of investigation) which, jointly or severally, any such Underwriter or controlling person may incur under the Securities Act, the Exchange Act or otherwise, insofar as such loss, expense, liability, damage or claim arises out of or is based upon (A) any breach of any representation, warranty or covenant of the Company contained herein, (B) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement (or in the Registration Statement as amended by any post-effective amendment thereof by the Company), the Prospectus (the term Prospectus for the purpose of this Section 9 being deemed to include any Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus and the Prospectus as amended or supplemented by the Company), or (C) any omission or alleged omission to state a material fact required to be stated in any such Registration Statement or Prospectus or necessary to make the statements made therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, or (D) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in any visual materials used in connection with the marketing of the Shares; except insofar as any such loss, expense, liability, damage or claim arises out of or is based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission of a material fact contained in and in conformity with information furnished (i) in writing by the Underwriters through the Representatives to the Company expressly for use in such Registration Statement or Prospectus or (ii) by the Underwriters through the Representatives to the Company for use in any visual materials used in connection with the marketing of the Shares; provided, however, that the indemnity contained in this Section 9(a) with respect to the Prospectus shall not inure to the benefit of any Underwriter with respect to any person asserting any loss, expense, liability, damage or claim to the extent
 
that a court of competent jurisdiction by final and non-appealable judgment determines that (x) the Prospectus or any supplement thereto prepared with the consent of the Underwriters and furnished to the Underwriters prior to the Closing Time corrected any such alleged untrue statement or omission, (y) such correction would have then resulted in no loss, liability, damage or claim and (z) such Underwriter failed to send or give a copy of the corrected Prospectus or supplement thereto to such person at or prior to the written confirmation of the sale of Shares to such person, unless such failure resulted from noncompliance by the Company with Section 4(a) or Section 4(c) above. The indemnity agreement set forth in this Section 9(a) shall be in addition to any liability which the Company may otherwise have.
 
If any action is brought against an Underwriter or controlling person in respect of which indemnity may be sought against the Company pursuant to subsection (a) above, such Underwriter shall promptly notify the Company in writing of the institution of such action, and the Company shall assume the defense of such action, including the employment of counsel and payment of expenses; provided, however, that any failure or delay to so notify the Company, will not relieve the Company of any obligation hereunder, except to the extent that its ability to defend is actually impaired by such failure or delay. Such Underwriter or controlling person shall have the right to employ its or their own counsel in any such case, but the fees and expenses of such counsel shall be at the expense of such Underwriter or such controlling person unless the employment of such counsel shall have been authorized in writing by the Company in connection with the defense of such action, or the Company shall not have employed counsel to have charge of the defense of such action within a reasonable time or such indemnified party or parties shall have reasonably concluded (based on the advice of counsel) that there may be defenses available to it or them which are different from or additional to those available to the Company (in which case the Company shall not have the right to direct the defense of such action on behalf of the indemnified party or parties), in any of which events such fees and expenses shall be borne by the Company and paid as incurred (it being understood, however, that the Company shall not be liable for the expenses of more than one separate firm of attorneys for the Underwriters or controlling persons in any one action or series of related actions in the same jurisdiction (other than local counsel in any such jurisdiction) representing the indemnified parties who are parties to such action). Anything in this paragraph to the contrary notwithstanding, the Company shall not be liable for any settlement of any such claim or action effected without its consent.
 
(b)    Each Underwriter agrees, severally and not jointly, to indemnify, defend and hold harmless the Company, the Company's directors, the Company's officers that signed the Registration Statement, and any person who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act, from and against any loss, expense, liability, damage or claim (including the reasonable cost of investigation) which, jointly or severally, the Company, or any such person may incur under the Securities Act, the Exchange Act or otherwise, but only insofar as such loss, expense, liability, damage or claim arises out of or is based upon (A) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in and in conformity with information
 
furnished in writing by such Underwriter through the Representatives to the Company expressly for use in the Registration Statement (or in the Registration Statement as amended by any post-effective amendment thereof by the Company), the Prospectus, or any Application, or (B) any omission or alleged omission to state a material fact in connection with such information required to be stated either in such Registration Statement, Prospectus or any Application or necessary to make such information, in the light of the circumstances under which made, not misleading. The statements set forth in the paragraphs regarding short sales, covering transactions and stabilizing transactions under the caption "Underwriting" in the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus (to the extent such statements relate to the Underwriters) constitute the only information furnished by or on behalf of any Underwriter through the Representatives to the Company for purposes of Sections 3(l), 3(m) and this Section 9. The indemnity agreement set forth in this Section 9(b) shall be in addition to any liabilities that such Underwriter may otherwise have.
 
If any action is brought against the Company, or any such person in respect of which indemnity may be sought against any Underwriter pursuant to the foregoing paragraph, the Company, or such person shall promptly notify the Representatives in writing of the institution of such action and the Representatives, on behalf of the Underwriters, shall assume the defense of such action, including the employment of counsel and payment of expenses. The Company, or such person shall have the right to employ its own counsel in any such case, but the fees and expenses of such counsel shall be at the expense of the Company, or such person unless the employment of such counsel shall have been authorized in writing by the Representatives in connection with the defense of such action or the Representatives shall not have employed counsel to have charge of the defense of such action within a reasonable time or such indemnified party or parties shall have reasonably concluded (based on the advice of counsel) that there may be defenses available to it or them which are different from or additional to those available to the Underwriters (in which case the Representatives shall not have the right to direct the defense of such action on behalf of the indemnified party or parties), in any of which events such fees and expenses shall be borne by such Underwriter and paid as incurred (it being understood, however, that the Underwriters shall not be liable for the expenses of more than one separate firm of attorneys in any one action or series of related actions in the same jurisdiction (other than local counsel in any such jurisdiction) representing the indemnified parties who are parties to such action). Anything in this paragraph to the contrary notwithstanding, no Underwriter shall be liable for any settlement of any such claim or action effected without the written consent of the Representatives.
 
(c)    If the indemnification provided for in this Section 9 is unavailable or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under subsections (a) and (b) of this Section 9 in respect of any losses, expenses, liabilities, damages or claims referred to therein, then each applicable indemnifying party, in lieu of indemnifying such indemnified party, shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such losses, expenses, liabilities, damages or claims (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company and the Underwriters from the
 
offering of the Shares or (ii) if (but only if) the allocation provided by clause (i) above is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company and of the Underwriters in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, expenses, liabilities, damages or claims, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company, and the Underwriters shall be deemed to be in the same proportion as the total proceeds from the offering (net of underwriting discounts and commissions but before deducting expenses) received by the Company bear to the underwriting discounts and commissions received by the Underwriters, in each case as set forth on the cover page of the Prospectus Supplement. The relative fault of the Company, and of the Underwriters shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or omission or alleged omission relates to information supplied by the Company, or by the Underwriters and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission. The amount paid or payable by a party as a result of the losses, claims, damages and liabilities referred to above shall be deemed to include any legal or other fees or expenses reasonably incurred by such party in connection with investigating or defending any claim or action.
 
(d)    The Company, and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 9 were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to in subsection (c)(i) and, if applicable (ii), above. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 9, no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the underwriting discounts and commissions applicable to the Shares purchased by such Underwriter. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Securities Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The Underwriters' obligations to contribute pursuant to this Section 9 are several in proportion to their respective underwriting commitments and not joint.
 
 
The indemnity and contribution agreements contained in Section 9 and the covenants, warranties and representations of the Company contained in Sections 3, 4 and 5 of this Agreement shall remain in full force and effect regardless of any investigation made by or on behalf of any Underwriter, or any person who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act, or by or on behalf of the Company, its directors and officers, or any person who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act, and shall survive any termination of this Agreement or the sale and delivery of the Shares. The Company, and each Underwriter agree promptly to notify the others of the commencement of any litigation or proceeding against it and, in the case of the Company, against any of the Company's officers and directors, in connection with the sale
 
and delivery of the Shares, or in connection with the Registration Statement or Prospectus.
 
 
Except as otherwise herein provided, all statements, requests, notices and agreements shall be in writing or by telegram and, if to the Underwriters, shall be sufficient in all respects if delivered to Friedman, Billings, Ramsey & Co., Inc., 1001 19th Street North, Arlington, Virginia 22209, Attention: Syndicate Department; if to the Company, shall be sufficient in all respects if delivered to the Company at the offices of the Company at Scott V. Schneider, Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer and Secretary (fax no.: (301) 986-6023) and confirmed to Thomas H. McCormick, Shaw Pittman LLP (fax no.: (202) 663-8007).
 
 
The section headings in this Agreement have been inserted as a matter of convenience of reference and are not a part of this Agreement.
THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF VIRGINIA, WITHOUT REGARD TO CONFLICTS OF LAWS PRINCIPLES.
 
 
The Agreement herein set forth has been and is made solely for the benefit of the Underwriters, the Company, and the controlling persons, directors and officers referred to in Sections 9 and 10 hereof, and their respective successors, assigns, executors and administrators. No other person, partnership, association or corporation (including a purchaser, as such purchaser, from any of the Underwriters) shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement.
 
 
This Agreement may be signed by the parties in counterparts which together shall constitute one and the same agreement among the parties. A facsimile signature shall constitute an original signature for all purposes.
 
If the foregoing correctly sets forth the understanding among the Company, and the Underwriters, please so indicate in the space provided below for the purpose, whereupon this Agreement shall constitute a binding agreement among the Company and the Underwriters.
 
 
 
 
Accepted and agreed to as
of the date first above written:
 
 
 
 
For themselves and as Representatives of the other
Underwriters named on Schedule I hereto.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
 
 
 
 
Saul Centers, Inc.
7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500
Bethesda, Maryland 20814
 
 
 
Dear Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
We have acted as counsel to Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the "Company"), in connection with the filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, of a prospectus supplement dated October 31, 2003 to the prospectus dated September 30, 2003 contained in the registration statement on Form S-3, No. 333-107083 (collectively, the "Registration Statement"), which was declared effective on September 30, 2003. The prospectus supplement and prospectus are together herein referred to as the "Prospectus." The Prospectus relates to the public offering of up to 4,000,000 depositary shares (the "Depositary Shares"), each representing a 1/100
th
fractional interest in a share of 8% Series A Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock (the "Preferred Stock") of the Company, pursuant to the terms of an underwriting agreement dated as of October 30, 2003 by and among the Company and the several underwriters named therein (the "Underwriting Agreement"). The Preferred Stock and the Depositary Shares are together referred to herein as the "Securities."
 
For the purposes of this opinion, we have examined copies of the following documents:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In our examination of the aforesaid documents, we have assumed the legal capacity of all natural persons, the genuineness of all signatures, the completeness and authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals, and the conformity to original documents of all documents submitted to us as certified, telecopied, photostatic or reproduced copies. In connection with the opinions expressed below, we have assumed that, at and prior to the time of the sale and delivery of any of the Depositary Shares or the Preferred Stock pursuant to the Registration Statement, (i) the Resolutions have not been amended, modified or rescinded, (ii) no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued and no proceedings with respect thereto have been commenced or threatened, (iii) the Articles Supplementary have been filed with the Maryland State Department of Assessments and Taxation, and (iv) there has not occurred any change in law materially adversely affecting the power of the Company to offer and sell the Depositary Shares or the Preferred Stock or the validity of the Depositary Shares and the Preferred Stock.
 
To the extent that the obligations of the Company with respect to the Depositary Shares and the Preferred Stock may be dependent upon such matters, we assume for purposes of this opinion that the other parties under the Deposit Agreement for any Depositary Shares are duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of organization; that such other parties are duly qualified to engage in the activities contemplated by such Deposit Agreement; that such Deposit Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the other parties and constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of the other parties enforceable against the other parties in accordance with its terms; that such other parties are in compliance with respect to performance of their obligations under such Deposit
Agreement with all applicable laws and regulations; and that such other parties have the requisite organizational and legal power and authority to perform their obligations under such Deposit Agreement.
 
Based upon, subject to and limited by the foregoing, we are of the opinion that:
 
1.   The Preferred Stock, when sold, issued and delivered by the Company in accordance with the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable.
 
2.   The depositary receipts evidencing the Depositary Shares constitute legally valid and binding obligations of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms when the depositary receipts have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and countersigned by the Depositary against a deposit of the Preferred Stock represented by the depositary receipts in accordance with the Deposit Agreement and delivered to and paid for by the purchasers of the depositary receipts in the manner contemplated by, and in accordance with, the Registration Statement.
 
The opinions expressed above with respect to the enforceability of obligations may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors' rights (including, without limitation, the effect of statutory and other law regarding fraudulent conveyances, fraudulent transfers and preferential transfers) and by the exercise of judicial discretion and the application of principles of equity, including, without limitation, requirements of good faith, fair dealing, conscionability and materiality (regardless of whether the Depositary Shares or the Preferred Stock are considered in a proceeding in equity or at law). Such opinions shall be understood to mean only that if there is a default in performance of an obligation, (i) if a failure to pay or other damage can be shown and (ii) if the defaulting party can be brought into a court which will hear the case and apply the governing law, then, subject to the availability of defenses and to the exceptions set forth in the previous sentence, the court will provide a money damage (or perhaps injunctive or specific performance) remedy.
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and to the use of our name in the Prospectus under the caption "Legal Matters." The giving of this consent, however, does not constitute an admission that we are "experts" within the meaning of Section 11 of the Securities Act of 1933 (the "Act"), as amended, or within the category of persons whose consent is required by Section 7 of the Act.
 
 

Exhibit 8.1
 
 
 
Saul Centers, Inc.
7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500
Bethesda, Maryland 20814
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
You have requested certain opinions regarding the application of U.S. federal income tax laws to Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") in connection with the Company's underwritten public offering of up to 4,000,000 depositary shares, each representing a 1/100
th
fractional interest in a share of 8% Series A Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock of the Company (the "Series A Preferred Stock"), as more fully described in the Company's prospectus supplement dated October 31, 2003 (the "Prospectus Supplement") to the Company's prospectus dated September 30, 2003 (the "Prospectus") included as part of the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-107083) (the "Registration Statement").
 
In rendering the following opinions, we have examined such statutes, regulations, records, certificates and other documents as we have considered necessary or appropriate as a basis for such opinions, including the following: (1) the Registration Statement, (2) the Prospectus, (3) the Prospectus Supplement, (4) the Articles of Incorporation of the Company, as amended, restated or supplemented, including the Articles Supplementary setting the terms of the Series A Preferred Stock (the "Articles of Incorporation"), (5) certain written representations of the Company contained in a letter to us dated as of the date hereof, (6) copies of the leases entered into by the Company as of the date hereof, and (7) such other documents or information as we have deemed necessary to render the opinions set forth in this letter. In our review, we have assumed, with your consent, that the documents listed above that we reviewed in proposed form will be executed in substantially the same form, all of the representations and statements set forth in such documents are true and correct, and all of the obligations imposed by any such documents on the parties thereto, including obligations imposed under the Articles of Incorporation have been or will be performed or satisfied in accordance with their terms. We also have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the proper execution of all documents, the authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals, the conformity to originals of documents submitted to us as copies, and the authenticity of the originals from which any copies were made.
 
Unless facts material to the opinions expressed herein are specifically stated to have been independently established or verified by us, we have relied as to such facts solely upon the representations made by the Company. To the extent that the representations of the Company are with respect to matters set forth in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code") or the regulations promulgated thereunder (the "Treasury Regulations"), we have reviewed with the individuals making such representations the relevant provisions of the Code, the applicable Treasury Regulations and published administrative interpretations thereof, and we are satisfied that such individuals understand such Code
Saul Centers, Inc.
October 31, 2003
Page 2
 
 
provisions, Treasury Regulations and administrative interpretations. We assume that each representation made by the Company is and will be true, correct and complete, and that all representations that speak in the future, or to the intention, or to the best of belief and knowledge of any person(s) or party(ies) are and will be true, correct and complete as if made without such qualification. Nothing has come to our attention which would cause us to believe that any of such representations are untrue, incorrect or incomplete.
 
Based upon and subject to the foregoing and to the qualifications below, we are of the opinion that:
 
1.   The Company qualified as a REIT under the Code for each of its taxable years ending through December 31, 2002.
 
2.   The Company is organized in conformity with the requirements for qualification as a REIT under the Code, and its current method of operation and ownership will enable it to meet the requirements for qualification as a REIT for the current taxable year and for future taxable years.
 
3.   The statements in the Registration Statement set forth under the caption "Federal Income Tax Consequences" and in the Prospectus Supplement under the caption "Additional Federal Income Tax Consequences," insofar as they purport to describe or summarize certain provisions of the agreements, statutes or regulations referred to therein, are accurate descriptions or summaries in all material respects, and the discussion thereunder expresses the opinion of Shaw Pittman LLP insofar as it relates to matters of United States federal income tax law and legal conclusions with regard to those matters.
 
The opinions set forth in this letter are based on existing law as contained in the Code, Treasury Regulations (including any Temporary and Proposed Regulations), and interpretations of the foregoing by the Internal Revenue Service ("IRS") and by the courts in effect (or, in case of certain Proposed Regulations, proposed) as of the date hereof, all of which are subject to change, both retroactively or prospectively, and to possibly different interpretations. Moreover, the Company's ability to achieve and maintain qualification as a REIT depends upon its ability to achieve and maintain certain diversity of stock ownership requirements and, through actual annual operating results, certain requirements under the Code regarding its income, assets and distribution levels. No assurance can be given as to whether, for any given taxable year, the actual ownership of the Company's shares and its actual operating results and distributions satisfy the tests necessary to achieve and maintain its status as a REIT. We assume no obligation to update the opinions set forth in this letter. We believe that the conclusions expressed herein, if challenged by the IRS, would be sustained in court. Because our positions are not binding upon the IRS or the courts, however, there can be no assurance that contrary positions may not be successfully asserted by the IRS.
 
The foregoing opinions are limited to the specific matters covered thereby and should not be interpreted to imply the undersigned has offered its opinion on any other matter.
Saul Centers, Inc.
October 31, 2003
Page 3
 
 
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to the Registration Statement. The giving of this consent, however does not constitute an admission that we are "experts," within the meaning of Section 11 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Act"), or within the category of persons whose consent is required by Section 7 of the Act.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20031105173315.txt.gz
TIME:20031105173315
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):    November 4, 2003
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
*99.1 Press Release, dated November 4, 2003, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Item 12.    Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On November 4, 2003, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2003. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated:    November 5, 2003
 
 
 

 
 
November 4, 2003, Bethesda, MD.
 
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its third quarter operating results. Total revenues for the quarter ended September 30, 2003 increased 5.1% to $24,659,000 compared to $23,471,000 for the 2002 quarter. Operating income before gain on property sold and minority interests increased 27.8% to $7,035,000 compared to $5,503,000 for the comparable 2002 quarter. The Company reported net income of $5,012,000 or $.32/share for the 2003 quarter, a per share increase of 33.3% compared to net income of $3,486,000 or $0.24/share for the 2002 quarter (basic & diluted).
 
For the nine month period ending September 30, 2003, total revenues increased 3.3% to $71,755,000 compared to $69,455,000 for the 2002 period. Operating income before gain on property sold and minority interests increased 3.5% to $19,590,000 compared to $18,928,000 for the comparable 2002 period. The Company reported net income of $13,527,000 or $.87/share for the 2003 period, a per share decrease of 10.3% compared to net income of $14,303,000 or $0.97/share for the 2002 period (basic & diluted). Net income in the 2002 nine month period included recognition of a gain on property sold of $1,426,000 when it was awarded a final settlement for the condemnation and purchase of the Company's Park Road property by the District of Columbia.
 
Overall same property net operating income for the total portfolio increased 0.6% for the 2003 third quarter and decreased 1.2% for the 2003 nine month period compared to the same periods in 2002. Net operating income is calculated as total revenue less property operating expenses, provision for credit losses and real estate taxes. The same property comparisons exclude Ashburn Village Phase IV, placed in service during the summer of 2002, Kentlands Square acquired in September 2002 and Old Forte Village acquired July 2003. Same center net operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 0.5% for the 2003 third quarter and decreased 1.1% for the 2003 nine month period. The decrease in same center net operating income in the shopping center portfolio for the nine month period was primarily attributable to increased current year snow removal expenses. Same center net operating income in the office portfolio increased 0.8% for the 2003 third quarter and decreased 1.3% for the 2003 nine month period compared to the same period in 2002. Net operating income in the office portfolio
 
during the quarter and nine month periods ended September 30, 2003 was adversely impacted by the February 2003 expiration of a major tenant lease (120,000 square feet, 53% of the leasable area) at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue. As of September 30, 2003, 601 Pennsylvania Avenue was 91.4% leased.
 
As of September 30, 2003, 93.8% of the portfolio was leased, compared to 94.3% a year earlier. This decrease in the percentage of space leased is primarily due to approximately 50,000 square feet of redevelopment space at the recently acquired Old Forte Village shopping center.
 
Funds From Operations (FFO), a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, increased 4.5% to $11,584,000 in the 2003 third quarter compared to $11,081,000 for the same quarter in 2002. FFO is defined as net income, plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales. On a fully diluted per share basis, FFO was $0.55 per share for both of the 2003 and 2002 third quarters. For the nine month period ending September 30, 2003, FFO decreased 1.0% to $32,466,000 compared to $32,810,000 for the 2002 period. On a fully diluted per share basis, FFO was $1.57 per share for the 2003 nine month period, a 4.3% decrease from $1.64 per share for the same period last year. The decrease in the nine month FFO was primarily attributable to decreased net operating income at the Company's 601 Pennsylvania Avenue office building.
 
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 36 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 6.6 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
Contact:    Scott V. Schneider
                  (301) 986-6220
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(1)    FFO is a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance of real estate investment trusts ("RETs"). FFO is defined by the National Association of Real Estate Investment Trusts as net income, computed in accordance with GAAP, plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains or losses from property sales. FFO does not represent cash generated from operating activities in accordance with GAAP and is not necessarily indicative of cash available to fund cash needs, which is disclosed in the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows in the Company's SEC reports for the applicable periods. FFO should not be considered as an alternative to net income, its most directly comparable GAAP measure, as an indicator of the Company's operating performance, or as an alternative to cash flows as a measure of liquidity. Management considers FFO a supplemental measure of operating performance and along with cash flow from operating activities, financing activities and investing activities, it provides investors with an indication of the ability of the Company to incur and service debt, to make capital expenditures and to fund other cash needs. FFO may not be comparable to similarly titled measures employed by other REITs.
(2)    Although same property net operating income and property net operating income are GAAP financial measures, the Company has elected to present a reconciliation of the measures to net income.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20040205130330.txt.gz
TIME:20040205130330
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
*99.1 Press Release, dated February 3, 2004, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On February 3, 2003, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2003. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: February 5, 2003
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
February 3, 2004, Bethesda, MD.
 
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2003. Total revenues for the quarter ended December 31, 2003 increased 6.6% to $26,129,000 compared to $24,508,000 for the 2002 quarter. Operating income before gain on property sold, minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 3.8% to $7,556,000 compared to $7,282,000 for the comparable 2002 quarter. The Company reported net income of $5,715,000 compared to net income of $5,263,000 for the 2002 quarter. The Company reported a 20.0% per share decrease in net income available to common stockholders (after deducting dividends resulting from the November 2003 issue of $100 million of perpetual preferred stock) of $4,471,000 or $.28/share for the 2003 quarter, compared to net income available to common stockholders of $5,263,000 or $0.35/share for the 2002 quarter (basic & diluted).
 
For the year ending December 31, 2003, total revenues increased 4.2% to $97,884,000 compared to $93,963,000 for the 2002 period. Operating income before gain on property sold, minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 3.6% to $27,146,000 compared to $26,210,000 for the comparable 2002 period. The Company reported net income of $19,242,000 compared to net income of $19,566,000 for the 2002 year. The Company reported a 12.2% per share decrease in net income available to common stockholders (after deducting dividends resulting from the November 2003 issue of $100 million of perpetual preferred stock) of $17,998,000 or $1.15/share for the 2003 year, compared to net income available to common stockholders of $19,566,000 or $1.31/share for the 2002 year (fully diluted). Net income in the 2002 year included recognition of a gain on property sold of $1,426,000 when it was awarded a final settlement for the condemnation and purchase of the Company's Park Road property by the District of Columbia.
 
Overall same property net operating income for the total portfolio increased 2.1% for the 2003 fourth quarter and decreased 0.4% for the 2003 year compared to the same periods in 2002. Net operating income is calculated as total revenue less property operating expenses, provision for credit losses and real estate taxes. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of development and acquisition properties not in operation for each of the quarterly and annual periods. Same center net operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 5.1% for the 2003 fourth quarter and 0.5% for the 2003 year. Same property net operating income in the office portfolio decreased 4.3% for the 2003 fourth quarter and 2.1% for the 2003 year compared to the same periods in 2002. Net operating income in the office portfolio during
the quarter and years ended December 31, 2003 was adversely impacted by the February 2003 expiration of a major tenant lease (120,000 square feet, 53% of the leasable area) at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue. As of December 31, 2003, 601 Pennsylvania Avenue was 100% leased.
 
As of December 31, 2003, 94.4% of the portfolio was leased, compared to 93.7% a year earlier.
 
Funds From Operations (FFO), a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, increased 0.5% to $11,274,000 in the 2003 fourth quarter compared to $11,221,000 for the same quarter in 2002. FFO is defined as net income available to common stockholders, plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales. On a fully diluted per share basis, FFO was $0.54 per share for the 2003 quarter and $0.55 for the 2002 fourth quarter. For the year ending December 31, 2003, FFO decreased 0.7% to $43,740,000 compared to $44,031,000 for the 2002 year. The decrease in FFO was primarily attributable to decreased net operating income at the Company's 601 Pennsylvania Avenue office building as a result of the expiration of a major tenant lease described above and the initial impact of the Company's November 2003 preferred stock offering. On a fully diluted per share basis, FFO was $2.10 per share for the 2003 year, a 4.5% decrease from $2.20 per share for the prior year.
 
In November 2003, the Company issued $100 million of series A perpetual preferred stock. Net proceeds from the issuance were approximately $96.3 million and initially were used to repay all of the outstanding borrowings under the Company's revolving credit facility and invested temporarily in cash and marketable securities. This cash and line availability will be used to fund acquisitions and developments as the Company identifies investment opportunities.
 
Also in November 2003, the Company acquired a 13 acre site in Frederick, Maryland and commenced construction of a 102,000 square foot shopping center to be anchored by a 57,210 square foot Giant Food store. The Company expects development costs to total approximately $21.3 million and projects substantial completion of the center in the fall of 2004. The property is currently 61% pre-leased.
 
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 36 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 6.6 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20040423162732.txt.gz
TIME:20040423162732
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On April 22, 2004, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2004. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: April 23, 2004
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
April 22, 2004, Bethesda, MD.
 
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its first quarter operating results. Total revenues for the quarter ended March 31, 2004 increased 10.4% to $26,341,000 compared to $23,870,000 for the 2003 quarter. Operating income before minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 27.4% to $8,329,000 compared to $6,539,000 for the comparable 2003 quarter. The Company reported net income available to common stockholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) of $4,305,000 or $.27 per share for the 2004 quarter, a per share decrease of 6.9% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $4,519,000 or $0.29 per share for the 2003 quarter (basic & diluted).
 
Overall same property operating income for the total portfolio increased 5.0% for the 2004 first quarter compared to the same period in 2003. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of development and acquisition properties not in operation for each of the quarterly. Operating income is calculated as total revenue less property operating expenses, provision for credit losses and real estate taxes. Same center operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 4.9% for the 2004 first quarter. Same property operating income in the office portfolio grew 5.3% for the 2004 quarter.
 
As of March 31, 2004, 94.2% of the portfolio was leased, compared to 93.0% a year earlier. The comparative increase in the 2004 leasing percentage is largely attributable to the leasing of approximately 75,000 square feet of space at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, which was vacant at the end of the 2003 quarter, following the expiration of a major lease.
 
Funds From Operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends), increased 3.6% to $10,967,000 in the 2004 first quarter compared to $10,581,000 for the same quarter in 2003. While FFO available to common shareholders increased by only $386,000, the 2004 results include payment of $2,000,000 in preferred dividends relating to the November 2003 offering. Property operating income from retail acquisitions and development, reduced interest expense, and successful leasing efforts which contributed to same center operating income growth have exceeded the effect of these preferred dividend payments. On a fully diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders was $0.52 per share for both of
 
the 2004 and 2003 quarters. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, is defined as net income, plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales.
 
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 38 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 6.9 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20040507085937.txt.gz
TIME:20040507085937
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5. Other Events
 
In February 2004, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") acquired two shopping center properties. The initial purchase price of each of these acquisitions individually, as provided below, did not exceed 10% of the Company's total assets as of December 31, 2003, but the aggregate purchase price for both properties did exceed such amount.
 
On February 13, 2004, the Company acquired Boca Valley Plaza, a 121,000 square foot neighborhood shopping center, located on U.S. Highway 1 in Boca Raton, Florida. The center, constructed in 1988, is approximately 90% leased and is anchored by a 42,000 square foot Publix supermarket. The property was acquired for $17.5 million, subject to the assumption of a $9.2 million mortgage with an interest rate of 6.82%, maturing in 2007. The Company has no material renovation, improvement and development plans for this property.
 
On February 17, 2004, the Company acquired Countryside Shopping Center, a 130,000 square foot neighborhood shopping center, in Loudoun County, Virginia. The center is approximately 95% leased, anchored by a 47,000 square foot Safeway supermarket and was acquired for a purchase price of $29.7 million. The Company has no material renovation, improvement and development plans for this property.
 
The acquisitions were made pursuant to separate acquisition agreements, the sellers of which were unrelated to the Company or each other. The purchase price of each property was funded from the Company's line of credit and cash on hand. In acquiring both properties, the Company evaluated the following factors:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Company is not aware of any material factors relating to the properties other than those discussed above that would cause the financial information included in Item 7 below not to be necessarily indicative of future operating results.
 
Item 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: May 7, 2004
 
 
Board of Directors and Stockholders
Saul Centers, Inc.
 
We have audited the accompanying statement of revenues over certain expenses of Boca Valley Plaza (the "Property") for the year ended December 31, 2003. This statement is the responsibility of the Property's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on this statement based on our audit.
 
We conducted our audit in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the statement of certain revenues over certain expenses is free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the statement of revenues over certain expenses. An audit also includes assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the statement of revenues over certain expenses. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
The accompanying statement of revenues over certain expenses was prepared for the purpose of complying with the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission, as described in Note 2, and is not intended to be a complete presentation of the Property's revenues and expenses.
 
In our opinion, the statement of revenues over certain expenses referred to above presents fairly, in all material respects, the revenues and certain expenses described in Note 2 of Boca Valley Plaza for the year ended December 31, 2003, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States.
 
/s/ ERNST & YOUNG LLP
 
McLean, Virginia
April 23, 2004
 
 
 
See accompanying notes.
 
Boca Valley Plaza
Notes to Statement of Revenues Over Certain Expenses
For the year ended December 31, 2003
 
 
On February 13, 2004 Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") acquired the 121,000 square foot, grocery anchored, Boca Valley Plaza shopping center (the "Property") located in Boca Raton, Florida for a purchase price of $17.5 million, subject to the assumption of a $9.2 million mortgage from CH Realty II/Boca L.P. The center was constructed in 1988 and was approximately 90% leased at the date of the acquisition. The Company is organized as a real estate investment trust and engages in ownership operation, management, leasing, acquisition, renovation, expansion, development and financing of community and neighborhood shopping centers and office properties primarily in the Washington, D.C./Baltimore metropolitan area.
 
 
The accompanying statement of revenues over certain expenses is presented in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States and in accordance with the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission for the real estate acquired. Accordingly, the statement excludes certain historical expenses that are not comparable to the proposed future operations of the property such as amortization, depreciation and corporate expenses. Therefore, the statement will not be comparable to the statement of operations of CH Realty II/Boca L.P. after its acquisition by the Company.
 
 
Rental revenues
 
Rental revenue is recognized on a straight-line basis over the terms of the related leases. The excess of recognized rental income over amounts due pursuant to lease terms is recorded as straight-line rent receivable. The impact of the straight-line adjustment increased revenue by approximately $90,000 for the year ended December 31, 2003.
 
Use of estimates
 
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the Unites States requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
 
 
The retail space in the property is leased to tenants under leases with terms that vary in length and conditions. Most leases contain operating expense and real estate tax recovery clauses and certain leases contain renewal options. CH Realty II/Boca L.P.'s interest in all lease agreements was assigned to the Company upon its acquisition of the property.
 
Boca Valley Plaza
Notes to Statement of Revenues Over Certain Expenses
For the year ended December 31, 2003
 
 
Future minimum gross rental commitments for the years ended December 31 are as follows:
 
 
 
The property was acquired subject to the assumption of a $9.2 million mortgage note. The mortgage note, which matures on April 5, 2007, bears interest at 6.82%. The note calls for monthly interest only payments of $52,287 with the entire principal amount due at maturity.
 
 
Board of Directors and Stockholders
Saul Centers, Inc.
 
We have audited the accompanying statement of revenues over certain operating expenses of Countryside Shopping Center (the "Property") for the year ended December 31, 2003. This statement is the responsibility of the Property's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on this statement based on our audit.
 
We conducted our audit in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the statement of certain revenues over certain operating expenses is free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the statement of revenues over certain operating expenses. An audit also includes assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the statement of revenues over certain operating expenses. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
The accompanying statement of revenues over certain operating expenses was prepared for the purpose of complying with the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission, as described in Note 2, and is not intended to be a complete presentation of the Property's revenues and expenses.
 
In our opinion, the statement of revenues over certain operating expenses referred to above presents fairly, in all material respects, the revenues and certain operating expenses described in Note 2 of Countryside Shopping Center for the year ended December 31, 2003, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States.
 
/s/ ERNST & YOUNG LLP
 
McLean, Virginia
April 23, 2004
 
 
 
See accompanying notes.
 
Countryside Shopping Center
Notes to Statement of Revenues Over Certain Operating Expenses
For the year ended December 31, 2003
 
 
On February 17, 2004 Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") acquired the 130,000 square foot, grocery anchored, Countryside Shopping Center (the "Property") located in Loudoun County, Virginia for a purchase price of $29.7 million from TCI Countryside L.P. The center was approximately 95% leased at the date of the acquisition. The Company is organized as a real estate investment trust and engages in ownership operation, management, leasing, acquisition, renovation, expansion, development and financing of community and neighborhood shopping centers and office properties primarily in the Washington, D.C./Baltimore metropolitan area.
 
 
The accompanying statement of revenues over certain operating expenses is presented in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States and in accordance with the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission for the real estate acquired. Accordingly, the statement excludes certain historical expenses that are not comparable to the proposed future operations of the property such as amortization, depreciation, interest and corporate expenses. Therefore, the statement will not be comparable to the statement of operations of TCI Countryside L.P. after its acquisition by the Company.
 
 
Rental revenues
 
Rental revenue is recognized on a straight-line basis over the terms of the related leases. The excess of recognized rental income over amounts due pursuant to lease terms is recorded as straight-line rent receivable. The impact of the straight-line adjustment increased revenue by approximately $15,000 for the year ended December 31, 2003.
 
Use of estimates
 
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the Unites States requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
 
 
The retail space in the property is leased to tenants under leases with terms that vary in length and conditions. Most leases contain operating expense and real estate tax recovery clauses and certain leases contain renewal options. TCI Countryside L.P.'s interest in all lease agreements was assigned to the Company upon its acquisition of the property.
 
Countryside Shopping Center
Notes to Statement of Revenues Over Certain Operating Expenses
For the year ended December 31, 2003
 
 
Future minimum gross rental commitments for the years ended December 31 are as follows:
 
 
 
The pro forma balance sheet as of December 31, 2003 presents consolidated information as if the acquisitions had taken place on December 31, 2003. The pro forma statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2003 present pro forma results of operations as of the acquisitions had taken place as of the beginning of the reporting period.
 
The Company purchased Boca Valley Plaza on February 13, 2004 and the Countryside Shopping Center on February 17, 2004.
 
The unaudited consolidated pro forma financial information is not necessarily indicative of what the Company's actual results of operations or financial position would have been had these transactions been consummated on the dates indicated, nor does it purport to represent the Company's results of operations or financial position for any future period. The pro forma results of operations for the period ended December 31, 2003 is not necessarily indicative of the actual operating results for that period.
 
The unaudited consolidated pro forma financial statements should be read in conjunction with the Company's consolidated financial statements and notes thereto included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003 and the Statements of Revenues Over Certain Expenses and Notes included elsewhere in this Form 8-K. In management's opinion, all adjustments necessary to reflect these transactions have been made.
 
 
 
Saul Centers, Inc.
Unaudited Pro Forma Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet
December 31, 2003
(In thousands)
 
 
 
Real estate
 
 
 
Acquisition of properties
 
 
 
Notes to Pro Forma Statement of Operations
 
 
The line of credit was repaid from proceeds from the Company's $100 million Preferred Debt offering, on or about November 15, 2003. The weighted average interest rate for the line of credit during the year ended December 31, 2003 was 2.979%, based on LIBOR plus a spread of 1.625% to 1.875%.
 
 

Exhibit 23
 
 
We consent to the incorporation by reference in the Registration Statement (Form S-3D No. 333-85254, Form S-3 No. 333-60064, Form S-8 No. 333-59962, Form S-3D No. 333-54232, Form S-3 No. 333-41436, Form S-3 No. 333-88127, Form S-3D No. 333-71323 and Form S-8 No. 333-77890) of Saul Centers, Inc. and the related Prospectuses of our reports dated April 23, 2004 with respect to the Statement of Revenues over Certain Expenses for the year ended December 31, 2003 of Boca Valley Plaza and Statement of Revenues over Certain Operating Expenses for the year ended December 31, 2003 of Countryside Shopping Center included in this Form 8-K dated May 7, 2004.
 
/s/ ERNST & YOUNG LLP
 
McLean, Virginia
May 5, 2004


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20040806155607.txt.gz
TIME:20040806155607
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
*99.1    Press Release, dated August 3, 2004, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On August 3, 2004, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter and six months ended June 30, 2004. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: August 5, 2004
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
August 3, 2004, Bethesda, MD.
 
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its second quarter operating results. Total revenues for the quarter ended June 30, 2004 increased 20.1% to $27,888,000 compared to $23,226,000 for the 2003 quarter. Operating income before minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 38.4% to $8,329,000 compared to $6,016,000 for the comparable 2003 quarter. After preferred stock dividends, the Company reported net income available to common stockholders of $4,286,000 or $.27 per share for the 2004 quarter, a per share increase of 3.8% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $3,996,000 or $0.26 per share for the 2003 quarter (basic & diluted).
 
Overall same property revenues for the total portfolio increased 6.3% for the 2004 second quarter compared to the same quarter in 2003 and same property operating income increased 7.3%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of development and acquisition properties not in operation for each of the quarters. Operating income is calculated as total revenue less property operating expenses, provision for credit losses and real estate taxes. Same center operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 3.6% for the 2004 second quarter, due primarily to successful re-leasing activity. Same property operating income in the office portfolio grew 15.7% for the 2004 quarter, due to the completion of lease-up of space, vacant during 2003, at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue. Excluding the impact of 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, overall portfolio same property growth was 1.6% for the 2004 quarter.
 
For the six month period ended June 30, 2004, total revenues increased 15.1% to $54,229,000 compared to $47,096,000 for the 2003 period. Operating income before minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 32.7% to $16,658,000 compared to $12,555,000 for the comparable 2003 period. Net income available to common stockholders was $8,591,000 or $.54 per share for the 2004 period, a per share decrease of 1.8% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $8,515,000 or $0.55 per share for the 2003 period (basic & diluted). Overall same property revenues for the total portfolio increased 4.6% for the 2004 six month period compared to the same period in 2003 and same property operating income increased
 
6.2%. The shopping center portfolio same center operating income increased 4.2% and the office portfolio grew 10.3%. Excluding the impact of 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, overall portfolio same property operating income growth was 2.1% for the 2004 period.
 
As of June 30, 2004, 94.0% of the portfolio was leased, compared to 93.6% a year earlier. On a same property basis, 94.6% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 93.6%. The comparative increase in the 2004 total portfolio, same property leasing percentage is largely attributable to the leasing of approximately 30,000 square feet of office space at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, 24,000 square feet of space at Southdale and 21,000 square feet of space at Thruway shopping centers.
 
Funds From Operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends), increased 13.3% to $11,676,000 in the 2004 second quarter compared to $10,301,000 for the same quarter in 2003. The $1,375,000 increase in FFO available to common shareholders in the 2004 quarter resulted from retail acquisition and development property operating income and successful leasing efforts, primarily at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, offset in part by the payment of $2,000,000 in preferred dividends relating to the November 2003 offering. On a fully diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 10.0% to $.55 per share in 2004 compared to $.50 for the 2003 quarter. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2004 six month period increased $1,761,000 (8.4%) to $22,643,000 from $20,882,000 during the 2003 period. Fully diluted per share FFO available to common shareholders increased 5.9% to $1.07 per share in 2004 compared to $1.01 for the 2003 period. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, is defined as net income, plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales.
 
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 39 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 7.1 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20041103161353.txt.gz
TIME:20041103161353
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On November 2, 2004, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter and nine months ended September 30, 2004. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: November 3, 2004
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
November 2, 2004, Bethesda, MD.
 
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its third quarter operating results. Total revenues for the quarter ended September 30, 2004 increased 17.8% to $29,044,000 compared to $24,659,000 for the 2003 quarter. Operating income before gain on property sale, minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 25.0% to $8,793,000 compared to $7,035,000 for the comparable 2003 quarter. After preferred stock dividends and a $572,000 property sale gain resulting from the State of Maryland's condemnation of a small strip of unimproved land for a road widening project at White Oak shopping center, the Company reported net income available to common stockholders of $5,355,000 or $0.33 per share for the 2004 quarter, a per share increase of 3.1% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $5,012,000 or $0.32 per share for the 2003 quarter (basic & diluted).
 
Overall same property revenues for the total portfolio increased 5.5% for the 2004 third quarter compared to the same quarter in 2003 and same property operating income increased 5.6%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting periods. Operating income is calculated as total revenue less property operating expenses, provision for credit losses and real estate taxes. Same center operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 3.8% for the 2004 third quarter, due primarily to new leasing resulting from minor redevelopments at Thruway and Southdale. Same property operating income in the office portfolio grew 9.3% for the 2004 quarter, due primarily to the completion of lease-up of space, vacant during a portion of 2003, at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue. Excluding the impact of 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, overall portfolio same property growth was 3.5% for the 2004 quarter.
 
For the nine month period ended September 30, 2004, total revenues increased 16.1% to $83,273,000 compared to $71,755,000 for the 2003 period. Operating income before gain on property sale, minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 29.9% to $25,451,000 compared to $19,590,000 for the comparable 2003 period. After preferred stock dividends and
 
the third quarter property sale gain, net income available to common stockholders was $13,946,000 or $.86 per fully diluted share for the 2004 period, a per share decrease of 1.1% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $13,527,000 or $0.87 per fully diluted share for the 2003 period. Overall same property revenues for the total portfolio increased 4.9% for the 2004 nine month period compared to the same period in 2003 and same property operating income increased 5.8%. The shopping center portfolio same center operating income increased 3.9% and the office portfolio grew 10.0%. Excluding the impact of 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, overall portfolio same property operating income growth was 2.7% for the 2004 period.
 
As of September 30, 2004, 94.2% of the portfolio was leased, compared to 93.8% a year earlier. On a same property basis, 94.8% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 94.4%. The comparative increase in the 2004 same property leasing percentage is largely attributable to the leasing of approximately 31,000 square feet of office space at two Washington DC office properties, 601 Pennsylvania Avenue (20,000 square feet) and Van Ness Square (11,000 square feet).
 
Funds From Operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends), increased 6.2% to $12,304,000 in the 2004 third quarter compared to $11,584,000 for the same quarter in 2003. The $720,000 increase in FFO available to common shareholders in the 2004 quarter resulted from the combination of (1) increased operating income from retail acquisition and development properties and (2) successful leasing efforts in the core portfolio, primarily at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue; offset in part by the payment of $2,000,000 in preferred dividends relating to the November 2003 offering. On a fully diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 3.6% to $.57 per share in 2004 compared to $.55 for the 2003 quarter. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2004 nine month period increased by $2,481,000 (7.6%) to $34,947,000. Fully diluted per share FFO available to common shareholders increased 4.5% to $1.64 per share in 2004 compared to $1.57 for the 2003 period. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, is defined as net income, plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales.
 
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 39 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 7.1 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20050127102110.txt.gz
TIME:20050127102110
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 8.01. Other Events
 
On April 23, 2004, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") acquired the 197,000 square foot Safeway-anchored Briggs Chaney Plaza shopping center located in Silver Spring, Maryland. The center, constructed in 1983, is 93% leased and was acquired for a purchase price of $27.3 million. The Company has substantially completed interior construction to reconfigure a portion of the vacant space totaling approximately 11,000 square feet and is completing plans for a substantial faade renovation of the shopping center. The faade renovation is projected to be substantially completed in mid 2005. The initial purchase price of this acquisition exceeded 5% of the Company's total assets as of December 31, 2003. The Company previously filed a Form 8-K, dated May 7, 2004, reporting the acquisition of two shopping centers, both purchased in February 2004, where the aggregate purchase price of the properties exceeded 10% of the Company's total assets as of December 31, 2003.
 
The April 2004 acquisition was made pursuant to an acquisition agreement, the seller of which was unrelated to the Company. The purchase price of the property was funded from the Company's line of credit and cash on hand. In acquiring the property, the Company evaluated the following factors:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Company is not aware of any material factors relating to the property other than those discussed above that would cause the financial information included in Item 9.01 below not to be necessarily indicative of future operating results.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: January 27, 2005
 
 
Board of Directors and Stockholders
Saul Centers, Inc.
 
We have audited the accompanying statement of revenues over certain operating expenses of Briggs Chaney Plaza (the "Property") for the year ended December 31, 2003. This statement is the responsibility of the Property's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on this statement based on our audit.
 
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States). Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the statement of certain revenues over certain operating expenses is free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the statement of revenues over certain operating expenses. An audit also includes assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the statement of revenues over certain operating expenses. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
The accompanying statement of revenues over certain operating expenses was prepared for the purpose of complying with the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission, as described in Note 2, and is not intended to be a complete presentation of the Property's revenues and expenses.
 
In our opinion, the statement of revenues over certain operating expenses referred to above presents fairly in all material respects, the revenues and certain operating expenses described in Note 2 of Briggs Chaney Plaza for the year ended December 31, 2003, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
 
January 17, 2005
 
 
 
See accompanying notes.
 
Briggs Chaney Plaza
Notes to Statement of Revenues Over Certain Operating Expenses
For the year ended December 31, 2003 and the three months ended March 31, 2004 (unaudited)
 
 
On April 23, 2004 Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") acquired the 197,000 square foot, Safeway-anchored, Briggs Chaney Plaza shopping center (the "Property") located in Silver Spring, Maryland for a purchase price of $27.3 million. The center was constructed in 1983 and was 93% leased at the date of the acquisition. The Company is organized as a real estate investment trust and engages in ownership operation, management, leasing, acquisition, renovation, expansion, development and financing of community and neighborhood shopping centers and office properties primarily in the Washington, D.C./Baltimore metropolitan area.
 
 
The accompanying statement of revenues over certain operating expenses is prepared for the purpose of complying with Rule 3-14 of Regulation S-X promulgated under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. Accordingly, the statement excludes certain historical expenses that are not comparable to the proposed future operations of the property such as amortization, interest, depreciation and corporate expenses. Therefore, the statement will not be comparable to the statement of operations of Acquiport Briggs Chaney, Inc. (the "Seller") after the Property's acquisition by the Company.
 
 
Rental revenues
 
Rental revenue is recognized on a straight-line basis over the terms of the related leases. The excess of recognized rental income over amounts due pursuant to lease terms is recorded as straight-line rent receivable. The impact of the straight-line adjustment decreased revenue by approximately $41,000 for the year ended December 31, 2003 and approximately $15,000 for the three months ended March 31, 2004 (unaudited).
 
Recoveries from tenants for real estate taxes and other operating expenses are recognized as revenue in the period the applicable costs are incurred.
 
Repairs and maintenance
 
Expenditures for ordinary maintenance and repairs are expensed to operations as they are incurred. Significant renovations and improvements, which extend the useful life of the underlying assets, are capitalized.
 
Use of estimates
 
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
 
 
The retail space in the property is leased to tenants under leases with terms that vary in length and conditions. Most leases contain operating expense and real estate tax recovery clauses and certain leases contain renewal options. The Seller's interest in all lease agreements was assigned to the Company upon its acquisition of the property.
 
Briggs Chaney Plaza
Notes to Statement of Revenues Over Certain Operating Expenses
For the year ended December 31, 2003 and the three months ended March 31, 2004 (unaudited)
 
 
Future minimum gross rental commitments under non-cancellable operating leases at December 31, 2003 are as follows:
 
 
 
The Property is managed by RREEF, a related party to the owner of the Property. Management fees charged to operate the Property were approximately $88,000 for the year ended December 31, 2003 and approximately $26,000 for the three months ended March 31, 2004 (unaudited).
 
 
The statement of revenues over certain operating expenses for the three months ended March 31, 2004 is unaudited. In the opinion of management all significant adjustments for a fair presentation of the statement of revenues over certain operating expenses have been included. The results of operations for the interim period are not necessarily indicative of the results to be expected for a full year of operations for the property.
 
 
The unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated balance sheet as of March 31, 2004 presents consolidated information as if the April 2004 acquisition of Briggs Chaney Plaza had taken place on March 31, 2004. The unaudited pro forma condensed consolidated statement of operations for the three months ended March 31, 2004 and the year ended December 31, 2003 present pro forma results of operations as if the acquisition had taken place as of the beginning of the reporting period.
 
The Company purchased Briggs Chaney Plaza on April 23, 2004.
 
The unaudited consolidated pro forma financial information is not necessarily indicative of what the Company's actual results of operations or financial position would have been had these transactions been consummated on the dates indicated, nor does it purport to represent the Company's results of operations or financial position for any future period. The pro forma results of operations for the periods ended March 31, 2004 and December 31, 2003 are not necessarily indicative of the actual operating results for those periods.
 
The unaudited consolidated pro forma financial statements should be read in conjunction with the Company's consolidated financial statements and notes thereto included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003, Form 10-Q for the three months ended March 31, 2004 and the Statements of Revenues Over Certain Expenses and Notes included elsewhere in this Form 8-K. In management's opinion, all adjustments necessary to reflect these transactions have been made.
 
Saul Centers, Inc.
 
 
 
Saul Centers, Inc.
Unaudited Pro Forma Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheet
March 31, 2004
(In thousands)
 
 
 
Real estate
 
 
 
Property acquisition
 
 
Saul Centers, Inc.
 
 
Notes to Pro Forma Statement of Operations
 
Saul Centers, Inc.
 
 
Notes to Pro Forma Statement of Operations
 

Exhibit 23
 
 
We consent to the incorporation by reference in the Registration Statement (Form S-3D No. 333-85254, Form S-3 No. 333-60064, Form S-8 No. 333-59962, Form S-3D No. 333-54232, Form S-3 No. 333-41436, Form S-3 No. 333-88127, Form S-3D No. 333-71323 and Form S-8 No. 333-77890) of Saul Centers, Inc. and the related Prospectuses of our report dated January 17, 2005, with respect to the Statement of Revenues over Certain Operating Expenses for the year ended December 31, 2003 of Briggs Chaney Plaza included in this Form 8-K dated January 27, 2005.
 
January 24, 2005
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20050209172216.txt.gz
TIME:20050209172216
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
On February 3, 2005, Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, the operating partnership for Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company"), entered into a new $150,000,000 unsecured revolving credit facility, effective as of January 28, 2005 (the "Facility"), with a syndicate of lenders led by U.S. Bank National Association. The Facility replaces the Company's existing unsecured revolving credit facility. U.S. Bank National Association acts as Administrative Agent and Sole Lead Arranger for the Facility, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, acts as Syndication Agent.
 
The Facility provides for a $150,000,000 revolving credit facility maturing on January 27, 2008, which term may be extended by the Company for one additional year subject to the Company's satisfaction of certain conditions. Until January 27, 2007, certain or all of the lenders may, upon request by the Company, increase the revolving credit facility line by $50,000,000. Letters of credit may be issued under the revolving credit facility. The Facility requires monthly interest payments, if applicable, at a rate of LIBOR plus a spread of 1.400% to 1.625% (determined by certain leverage tests) or upon the bank's reference rate at the Company's option.
 
Loan availability under the Facility is determined by operating income from the Company's existing unencumbered properties. As of February 3, 2005, the unencumbered properties support line availability of $86,500,000, of which $2,100,000 has been issued under a letter of credit, leaving $84,400,000 available for working capital uses. An additional $63,500,000 is available for funding working capital and operating property acquisitions supported by the unencumbered properties' internal cash flow growth and operating income of future acquisitions.
 
The Facility requires the Company and its subsidiaries to satisfy certain financial covenants. The material covenants require the Company, on a consolidated basis, to:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Each of U.S. Bank National Association, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, Compass Bank, Sovereign Bank and First Horizon Bank, is a lender under the Facility. Some of the lenders or their affiliates from time to time have provided in the past and may provide in the future commercial lending services to the Company and its affiliates in the ordinary course of business.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: February 9, 2005
 

Exhibit 10(q)
 
 
(the ) is made and entered into as of the 28th day of January, 2005, by and between (i) , a Maryland limited partnership (hereinafter called ); (ii) , a national banking association, as administrative agent and sole lead arranger (""); (iii), as syndication agent (""), and (iv) , and any other lenders who are now or who may hereafter become parties to this Agreement (collectively, the "").
THIS REVOLVING CREDIT AGREEMENT
"
Agreement
"
SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
"Borrower"
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
Agent
WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
Syndication Agent
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
COMPASS BANK, SOVEREIGN BANK, FIRST HORIZON BANK
Lenders
 
, in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements hereinafter set forth, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
WITNESSETH THAT
 
 
For the purposes of this Agreement, the following terms shall have the following respective meanings, unless the context hereof clearly requires otherwise:
 
Any federal, state or local law, statute, code, ordinance, rule, regulation or requirement relating to accessibility to facilities or properties for disabled, handicapped and/or physically challenged persons, including, without limitation, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1991, as amended.
:
Accessibility Regulation
 
: Up to $50,000,000.00.
Accordion Amount
 
: January 27, 2007.
Accordion Expiration Date
 
: All costs of acquiring Real Estate Assets, including purchase price and reasonable and customary closing costs, as determined by Agent.
Acquisition Costs
 
: An amount equal to ninety seven percent (97%) of EBITDA.
Adjusted EBITDA
 
: Any portion of the Loan (or a Swing Loan) advanced to or for the benefit of Borrower in accordance with the terms hereof and as to which Borrower has elected or is deemed to have elected one (1) of the available interest rate options and, if applicable, a LIBOR Rate Period. An Advance may be a LIBOR Rate Advance or a Loan Rate Advance; provided, however, that if Borrower has made no election of an interest rate option with respect to any Advance (other than for a Swing Loan), Borrower shall be deemed to have elected that it be a Loan Rate Advance. Swing Loans shall be deemed to be Loan Rate Advances.
Advance
 
: The date on which an Advance of Loan (or Swing Loan) proceeds requested by Borrower hereunder is funded.
Advance Date
 
: This Revolving Credit Agreement, including any amendments hereof and supplements hereto executed by Borrower and Agent on behalf of Lenders.
Agreement
 
: With respect to:
Applicable Margin
 
(a) Loan Rate Advances  0.00%.
 
(b) LIBOR Rate Advances  shall be equal to 1.625% unless the Leverage Ratio requirement set forth below is satisfied in which event the Applicable Margin for LIBOR Rate Advances shall be reduced as follows:
 
 
: An Unencumbered Asset (including, without limitation, a Proposed Acquisition that would constitute an Unencumbered Asset upon the acquisition thereof by Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary) which has been approved by all Lenders pursuant to . A schedule identifying the Approved Assets as of the date hereof is attached hereto as .
Approved Asset
Section 2.B.2
Exhibit E
 
: A Subsidiary that (x) is wholly and directly owned and controlled by Borrower, Guarantor or a combination thereof, (y) has delivered a Subsidiary Guaranty pursuant to hereof that remains in full force and effect, and (z) holds fee simple title to an Approved Asset.
Approved Subsidiary
Section 5.09.E
 
: As defined in hereof.
Assignee Lender
Section 8.8.A
 
: The Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System or any successor thereto.
Board
 
: As defined in the preamble to this Agreement.
Borrower
 
: Any day, other than a Saturday, a Sunday, or a Legal Holiday on which Agent is not open for business.
Business Day
 
: The date upon which Borrower submits a Draw Request, the date upon which Borrower requests that Agent issue a Letter of Credit, the date upon which Borrower requests that an Approved Asset be added to or removed from the pool of Unencumbered Assets, the date upon which a Capital Event occurs, or the date upon which there exists an Event of Default under the Loan, as applicable.
Calculation Date
 
: The occurrence from time to time of an equity or debt offering by Borrower (which shall specifically exclude stock issued in connection with a dividend reinvestment plan), a Disqualifying Environmental Event, or if an Encumbrance, Imposition or Lien arises against an Approved Asset.
Capital Event
 
: For any period of determination, an amount equal to the sum of (a) the aggregate Adjusted EBITDA for the previous four calendar quarters, divided by eight and three-quarters percent (8.75%) (provided that, with respect to Real Estate Assets which Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary has owned for more than three (3) months but less than one (1) year, as of the Calculation Date, Adjusted EBITDA shall be annualized based upon the period of time Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary has owned them); (b) 100% of the value of Unrestricted Cash and Cash Equivalents; (c) with respect to Real Estate Assets Under Development, including those projects which have been operating for less than one year, the greater of (x) 100% of the aggregate costs incurred and paid to the Calculation Date by the Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary or (y) Adjusted EBITDA (provided that, with respect to Real Estate Assets which have been in operation for less than one (1) year, as of the Calculation Date, Adjusted EBITDA shall be annualized based upon the most recent three-month period) divided by eight and three-quarters percent (8.75%); (d) 60% of the Acquisition Costs with respect to Real Estate Assets which, as of the date of calculation, Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary has owned for less than three (3) months and (e) contractual purchase price of any property subject to a purchase obligation, repurchase obligation or forward commitment, which obligation at such time could be specifically enforced by the seller, but only to the extent such obligations are included in the definition of Total Adjusted Outstanding Indebtedness or Total Adjusted Committed Indebtedness, as appropriate.
Capitalization Value
 
: The date of this Agreement.
Closing Date
 
: The Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
Code
 
Each Lender's share of all right, title, and interest in the Loan and the Loan Documents, as set forth on attached hereto, as amended and modified by unilateral action of Agent from time to time to reflect the sale or assignment of a portion or portions of the Loan.
Commitment Percentage
:
Schedule 1
 
: For any period of determination, the following amount incurred by Borrower during the previous four (4) fiscal quarters, as determined by Agent in its sole discretion: (a) Interest Expense (b) the aggregate amount of scheduled principal payments of indebtedness of the Borrower (excluding optional prepayments but expressly including scheduled principal payments in respect of any indebtedness which is not amortized through equal periodic installments of principal and interest over the term of such indebtedness, including, without limitation, balloon payments at maturity that are not refinanced or paid off on or before the maturity date thereof) required to be made during such time period by the Borrower (c) the aggregate amount of capitalized interest required in accordance with GAAP to be paid or accrued by the Borrower during such time period, (d) expenses attributable to preferred stock (including preferred stock dividends whether the preferred stock is classified upon the obligor's balance sheet as equity or liability) or a similar type of investment.
Debt Service
plus
plus
plus
 
: As defined in hereof.
Declining Bank
Section 3.6(a)
 
: As defined in hereof.
Default Rate
Section 1.12
 
: Any Lender who for any reason shall fail or refuse to abide by its obligations under the Loan Documents or this Agreement within the time periods specified for performance of such obligation or, if no time frame is specified, if such failure or refusal continues for a period of five (5) Business Days after notice from Agent.
Defaulting Lender
 
: Any release or threatened release of Hazardous Substances, any violation of Environmental Laws or any other similar environmental event with respect to a Real Estate Asset which is not cured within sixty (60) days or that would cause, in Agent's determination, such Real Estate Asset to no longer be financeable on a non-recourse (with customary exceptions) debt basis under the then generally accepted underwriting standards of national insurance company or pension fund real estate institutional lenders. In the event that such release or threatened release, violation or similar environmental event is susceptible of cure but is not cured within said sixty (60) days, so long as Borrower is diligently and continuously pursuing such cure, as evidenced to Agent's satisfaction, Agent shall permit Borrower an additional one hundred twenty (120) days to effectuate such cure; provided, however that such additional one hundred twenty (120) days shall not apply where such release or threatened release, violation or similar environmental event results, in Agent's judgment, in a matter which is of an emergency nature.
Disqualifying Environmental Event
 
. With respect to:
Distribution
 
(i) the Borrower, any distribution of cash or other cash equivalent, directly or indirectly, to the partners of the Borrower; or any other distribution on or in respect of any partnership interests of the Borrower excluding distributions reinvested pursuant to Borrower's distribution reinvestment program; and
 
(ii) the Guarantor, the declaration or payment of any dividend on or in respect of any shares of any class of capital stock of Guarantor, excluding dividends payable solely in shares of common stock by Guarantor and dividends reinvested pursuant to Guarantor's dividend reinvestment program; the purchase, redemption, or other retirement of any shares of any class of capital stock of Guarantor, directly or indirectly through a subsidiary of Guarantor, or otherwise; the return of capital by Guarantor to its shareholders as such; or any other distribution on or in respect of any shares of any class of capital stock of Guarantor (except as excluded above).
 
: A written request by Borrower for an Advance of Loan proceeds under this Agreement, in the form and with the certifications included within attached hereto and hereby made a part hereof.
Draw Request
Exhibit A
 
: For any period of determination, an amount equal to the net income of Borrower and Guarantor on a consolidated basis and their pro rata share of earnings of unconsolidated subsidiaries, the unconsolidated subsidiaries of the general partners of
EBITDA
 
Borrower, and joint ventures in which Borrower, Guarantor and/or Borrower's general partners is a party, and before interest, taxes, depreciation, amortization and gains and losses on property sales, extraordinary items and other non-recurring gains or losses, all as calculated in accordance with GAAP, as determined by Agent.
 
: As defined in .
Encumbrance
Section 5.6
 
: Any judgment, decree, order, law, license, rule or regulation pertaining to environmental matters, including without limitation, those arising under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (""), the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980 as amended (""), the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 (""), the Federal Clean Water Act, the Federal Clean Air Act, the Toxic Substances Control Act, or any state or local statute, regulation, ordinance, order or decree relating to health, safety or the environment.
Environmental Law
RCRA
CERCLA
SARA
 
: A Business Day which is also a day on which commercial banks are open for international business (including dealings in dollar deposits) in London, England.
Euro Day
 
: Any event set forth in .
Event of Default
Section 6.1
 
: As defined in .
Existing Lenders
Section 3.6(c)
 
: As defined in .
Extension Period
Section 1.4
 
: As defined in .
Extension Request
Section 1.4
 
: As of any date of determination, the rate set forth in the weekly statistical release designated as H.15(519), or any successor publication, published by the Federal Reserve Board (including any such successor, "H.15(519)") for such date opposite the caption "Federal Funds (Effective)". If for any relevant date such rate is not yet published in H.15(519), the rate for such date will be the rate set forth in the daily statistical release designated as the Composite 3:30 p.m. Quotations for U.S. Government Securities, or any successor publication, published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York (including any such successor, the "Composite 3:30 p.m. Quotation") for such date under the caption "Federal Funds Effective Rate". If on any relevant date the appropriate rate for such date is not yet published in either H.15(519) or the Composite 3:30 p.m. Quotation, the rate for such date will be the arithmetic mean of the rates for the last transaction in overnight Federal funds arranged prior to 9:00 a.m. (New York City time) on that date by each of three leading brokers of Federal funds transactions in New York City selected by Agent.
Federal Funds Rate
 
. That certain fee letter of even date herewith, between the Borrower and Agent.
Fee Letter
 
: As defined in .
First Solicitation
Section 3.6(a)
 
. A purchase agreement entered into by the Borrower for the fee or leasehold purchase of a retail, office or industrial real estate property to be constructed.
Forward Purchase Contract
 
. Net income, computed in accordance with GAAP, excluding minority interests, gains, or losses from debt restructuring and sales of property (inclusive of non-recurring items such as asset sales or property valuation adjustments), plus depreciation and amortization, and after adjustments for unconsolidated partnerships and joint ventures. Adjustments for unconsolidated partnerships and joint ventures will be calculated to reflect Funds From Operations on the same basis.
Funds from Operations
 
: Generally accepted accounting principles set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or in such other statements by such other entity as may be approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession, which are applicable to the circumstances as of any date of determination. Except as may be expressly provided to the contrary herein, all accounting terms used herein shall be interpreted, and all accounting determinations hereunder shall be made, in accordance with GAAP. To the extent any change in GAAP affects any computation or determination required to be made pursuant to this Agreement, such computation or determination shall be made as if such change in GAAP had not occurred, unless Borrower and Majority Lenders agree in writing on an adjustment to said computation or determination to account for such change in GAAP.
GAAP
 
: All laws, statutes, codes, ordinances, and governmental rules, regulations and requirements applicable to Borrower, Guarantor, Agent, any Lender and/or the Approved Assets.
Governmental Requirements
 
: Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation.
Guarantor
 
: That certain Guaranty of even date herewith, executed by Guarantor to Agent on behalf of the Lenders to guaranty the Loan, as the same may be amended, modified or replaced from time to time.
Guaranty
 
: Any hazardous waste, as defined by 42 U.S.C.  9601(5), any hazardous substances as defined by 42 U.S.C.  9601(14), any pollutant or contaminant as defined by 42 U.S.C. 9601(33) or any toxic substances, oil or hazardous materials or other chemicals or substances regulated by any Environmental Laws.
Hazardous Substances
 
: Funds with good value on the day and in the city in which payment is received.
Immediately Available Funds
 
: As defined in .
Imposition
Section 5.6
 
: That sum equal to the greater of zero (0) or the financial loss incurred by the Lenders resulting from prepayment of a LIBOR Rate Advance, calculated as the difference between the amount of interest the Lenders would have earned (from like investments in the Money Markets as of the first day of the LIBOR Rate
Interest Differential
 
Advance) had prepayment not occurred and the interest the Lenders will actually earn (from like investments in the Money Markets as of the date of prepayment) as a result of the redeployment of funds from the prepayment.
 
: For any period of determination, an amount determined by Agent in its sole discretion equal to the aggregate amount of interest required in accordance with GAAP to be paid or accrued (but excluding interest reserves funded from the proceeds of any construction loan) by the Borrower during such time period on: (i) all indebtedness of the Borrower (including the Loan and including original issue discount and amortization of prepaid interest, if any) (ii) all amounts available for borrowing, or for drawing under letters of credit, if any, issued for the account of the Borrower, but only if such interest was or is required to be reflected as an item of expense, excluding commitment fees, agency fees, facility fees, balance deficiency fees and similar fees and expenses in connection with the borrowing of money and (iii) preferred stock or a similar type of investment.
Interest Expense
 
New Year's Day, Martin Luther King's Birthday, President's Day, Memorial Day, Fourth of July, Labor Day, Columbus Day, Veteran's Day, Thanksgiving Day and Christmas Day.
Legal Holiday:
 
: Each Lender that is a party to this Agreement and which hereafter becomes party to this Credit Agreement, collectively, and each of their respective permitted successors and assigns.
Lenders
 
: An irrevocable letter of credit issued by Agent pursuant to this Agreement for the account of Borrower.
Letter of Credit
 
: As defined in .
Letter of Credit Fee
Section 2.A.7
 
: As defined in .
Letter of Credit Participation
Section 2.A.9
 
: The ratio of Total Adjusted Outstanding Indebtedness to Capitalization Value.
Leverage Ratio
 
: With respect to each LIBOR Rate Period applicable to any requested LIBOR Rate Advance, the rate per annum (rounded up to the next whole multiple of 1/100th of 1%) equal to the rate obtained by dividing (a) the LIBOR rate quoted by Agent from Telerate Page 3750 or any successor thereto, at approximately 5:00 o'clock a.m., Central time, on the second Euro Day prior to the first day of such LIBOR Rate Period for delivery in Immediately Available Funds on the first day of such LIBOR Rate Period for the approximate number of days as are in such LIBOR Rate Period and in an amount comparable to the principal amount of such LIBOR Rate Advance being made by the Lenders for which LIBOR is being determined, by (b) a percentage equal to 100% minus the maximum rate in effect on the first day of such LIBOR Rate Period at which reserves (including any marginal, supplemental or emergency reserves) are required to be maintained by the Lenders under Regulation D against "Eurocurrency liabilities" (as such term is defined in Regulation D). LIBOR shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in such reserve requirements.
LIBOR
 
: A rate of interest equal to LIBOR plus the Applicable Margin.
LIBOR Rate
 
: Any portion of the Principal Balance which bears interest at a LIBOR Rate; provided, however, that any LIBOR Rate Advance must be in the aggregate principal amount of at least $1,000,000.00.
LIBOR Rate Advance
 
: A telephonic notice from Borrower to Agent, received by Agent prior to 10:00 o'clock a.m. (Central time) on a Euro Day at least three (3) Euro Days prior to the date the LIBOR Rate is to be applicable with respect to such portion of the Principal Balance referred to therein, in which Borrower elects to have said portion of the Principal Balance, or a portion thereof as specified in said notice, be a LIBOR Rate Advance.
LIBOR Rate Notice
 
: The period commencing on the date any LIBOR Rate Advance is made and ending one (1) month, two (2) months, three (3) months or six (6) months thereafter as selected by Borrower in the applicable LIBOR Rate Notice; provided, however, that (a) if any LIBOR Rate Period would end on a day that is not a Euro Day, such LIBOR Rate Period shall extend to the next Euro Day, unless, in the case of said LIBOR Rate Advance, such Euro Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which event such LIBOR Rate Period shall end on the immediately preceding Euro Day, and (b) no LIBOR Rate Period shall end later than the then applicable Maturity Date.
LIBOR Rate Period
 
: The loan evidenced by the Note.
Loan
 
: That portion of the Revolving Commitment Amount determined by Agent to be available to be advanced as more particularly described in .
Loan Availability
Section 2.B.3
 
: The documents described in , which evidence, secure or otherwise relate to the Loan, including but not limited to the Note, this Agreement, the Fee Letter, the Letter of Credit applications, the Letters of Credit, the Closing Certification, the Sworn Statement, the Guaranty, each Subsidiary Guaranty and including any amendments thereof and supplements thereto executed by Agent and Borrower (and/or any other party thereto).
Loan Documents
Section 2.B.1
 
: A rate of interest equal to the Prime Rate. Changes in the Loan Rate shall become effective on the same day as the date of any change in the Prime Rate and shall apply to all advances made hereunder (other than LIBOR Rate Advances), whether such advances are made prior to, the same day as, or subsequent to any particular change in the Loan Rate. In no event shall the Loan Rate ever exceed the maximum rate permitted by applicable law (if any such maximum rate is established by applicable law), and such maximum rate shall change if and when applicable law changes to permit a higher maximum rate.
Loan Rate
 
: Any portion of the Principal Balance which bears interest at the Loan Rate.
Loan Rate Advance
 
: The Unencumbered Assets known as Beacon, French Market and Southdale, and such other Approved Assets as Borrower and all Lenders may agree to designate as a Major Asset from time to time.
Major Asset
 
: Lenders holding not less than sixty-six and two-thirds of one percent (66
Majority Lenders
 2
/
3
%) of the then aggregate outstanding unpaid principal amount of the Loan or, if no such principal amount is then outstanding, not less than sixty-six and two-thirds of one percent (66
 2
/
3
%) of the Revolving Commitment.
 
: January 27, 2008, unless extended pursuant to the terms of .
Maturity Date
Section 1.4
 
: The maximum aggregate amount that the beneficiaries may at any time draw under outstanding Letters of Credit, as such maximum aggregate amount may be reduced from time to time pursuant to the terms of the Letters of Credit.
Maximum Drawing Amount
 
: For any period of determination, an amount equal to Capitalization Value less Total Adjusted Outstanding Indebtedness.
Minimum Equity Value
 
: The requirement that any Real Estate Asset that on any date of determination has been improved with a building or buildings has been leased to third party tenants and has an aggregate average occupancy of all building(s) in such Real Estate Asset of not less than seventy five percent (75%) for the fiscal quarter most recently ended, other than Lexington and West Park, and except as otherwise approved by Majority Lenders; provided, however, in the event that the occupancy rate with respect to any Approved Asset meeting the Minimum Lease Up Requirement as of the date hereof falls below seventy-five percent (75%), Borrower shall have a period of eight (8) months thereafter to re-lease such asset in order to satisfy the Minimum Lease Up Requirement before such property shall no longer be deemed an Approved Asset. If, at any time thereafter, such former Approved Asset again meets the Minimum Lease-Up Requirement, it shall, as of the date it meets such requirement, again be deemed an Approved Asset. For purposes of this definition, a tenant shall be deemed to be in "occupancy" if such tenant or its subtenant(s) is in possession of the leased premises and such tenant is paying stipulated rent, if any; provided, however, when determining whether the Minimum Lease Up Requirement has been satisfied pursuant to hereof, a tenant shall be deemed to be in occupancy if, within six (6) months prior to the date of determination, such tenant entered into a lease for space in the Real Estate Asset which such tenant previously did not occupy and there exists no default under such lease and no material contingencies to such tenant's occupancy under the lease other than completion of tenant improvement work.
Minimum Lease Up Requirement
Section 2.B.2
 
: One or more wholesale funding markets available to Agent, including negotiable certificates of deposit, commercial paper, eurodollar deposits, bank notes, federal funds and others.
Money Markets
 
: The proceeds of a sale of an equity interest in the Borrower or the Guarantor (including those attributable to a dividend reinvestment program), net of usual and customary closing costs and expenses.
Net Equity Proceeds
 
: As defined in .
New Lenders
Section 3.6(b)
 
: As defined in .
New Notes
Section 3.6(b)
 
: Individually or collectively as the context may require, the Unsecured Revolving Promissory Note(s) of even date herewith executed and delivered by Borrower to Lenders to evidence the Loan, together with (a) any New Notes and/or Supplemental Notes issued pursuant to hereof, and (b) any Swing Loan Note executed and delivered by Borrower to the Swing Lender to evidence a Swing Loan, in the aggregate maximum principal amount of up to One Hundred Fifty Million and 00/100ths Dollars ($150,000,000.00) plus the Accordion Amount, if applicable, as any or all of the foregoing may be amended, modified or replaced from time to time.
Note
Section 3.6
 
: All indebtedness, obligations and liabilities of the Borrower to any of the Lenders, the Swing Lender and the Agent, individually or collectively, under this Agreement, any of the other Loan Documents, or in respect to the Loan, the Note or Reimbursement Obligations incurred or the Letter of Credit applications or the Letters of Credit, any Swing Loan or other instruments at any time evidencing any thereof, whether existing on the date of this Agreement or arising or incurred hereafter, direct or indirect, joint or several, absolute or contingent, matured or unmatured, liquidated or unliquidated, secured or unsecured, arising by contract, operation of law or otherwise.
Obligations
 
: As defined in hereof.
Outstanding Percentage
Section 3.6(c)
 
: For any period of determination, a determination by Agent of a hypothetical principal amount of indebtedness which Borrower could incur assuming (i) payments of annual debt service equal to Unencumbered Adjusted EBITDA measured with respect to the Approved Assets divided by 1.35, (ii) an interest rate equal to the greater of (a) two and one-quarter percent (2.25%) in excess of the then-current annual yield on ten-year United States Treasury obligations issued most recently prior to such date and (b) seven and three-quarters percent (7.75%), and (iii) a twenty five (25) year principal amortization schedule.
Permanent Loan Estimate
 
: Any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, partnership (general or limited), limited liability partnership, joint venture, firm, association, trust, unincorporated organization, government or governmental agency or political subdivision or any other entity, whether acting in an individual, fiduciary or other capacity.
Person
 
: The rate publicly announced by Agent from time to time as its prime rate, as and when such rate changes; provided, however, that Agent may lend to its customers at interest rates that are at, above or below the Prime Rate.
Prime Rate
 
: One Hundred Fifty Million and 00/100ths Dollars ($150,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may have been advanced to or for the benefit of Borrower (including, without limitation, under any Swing Loan) and remains unpaid from time to time, as such amount may be increased pursuant to hereof.
Principal Balance
Section 3.6
 
: A Real Estate Asset that would constitute an Unencumbered Asset at the time of its acquisition.
Proposed Acquisition
 
: The fixed and tangible properties consisting of land, buildings and/or other improvements owned or ground leased (subject to the following proviso) by the Borrower or by an Approved Subsidiary at the relevant time of reference thereto, provided however that with the exception of the Unencumbered Assets known as Beacon, Olney and Southdale, a ground leased property shall not be deemed a Real Estate Asset (and thus shall not be eligible as an Approved Asset) unless unanimously approved as such by the Lenders.
Real Estate Assets
 
Any Real Estate Assets for which the Borrower (or Approved Subsidiary) is actively pursuing construction and for which construction is proceeding to completion without undue delay from permit denial, construction delays or otherwise, all pursuant to such Person's ordinary course of business; provided that such Real Estate Asset will no longer be considered a Real Estate Asset Under Development on the date which is twelve (12) months after the Borrower (or Approved Subsidiary) obtains the necessary governmental approvals to permit occupancy of the building. Notwithstanding the foregoing, tenant improvements to previously constructed and/or leased Real Estate Assets shall not be considered Real Estate Assets Under Development.
Real Estate Assets Under Development
:
 
: As defined in .
Refunding Date
Section 3.5(c)
 
: Regulations D and U, respectively (or any substitute regulations), of the Board, together with all amendments from time to time thereto.
Regulation D; Regulation U
 
: Any change, after the date hereof in United States Federal, state or foreign laws, regulations or treaties or the adoption or making after such date of any interpretations, directives or requests applying to Agent and/or the Lenders under any federal, state or foreign laws or regulations (whether or not having the force of law) by any court or governmental or monetary authority charged with the interpretation or administration thereof.
Regulatory Change
 
: The Borrower's obligation to reimburse the Lenders and the Agent on account of any drawing under any Letter of Credit as provided in . Notwithstanding the foregoing, unless Borrower shall notify Agent of its intention to repay the Reimbursement Obligations on the date of the related drawing under any Letter of Credit, as set forth in , such Reimbursement Obligation shall simultaneously with such drawing be converted to and become a Loan Rate Advance.
Reimbursement Obligations
Section 2.A.4
Section 2.A.4
 
: As defined in .
Requested Increase
Section 3.6(a)
 
: The obligation of the Lenders to make Advances to Borrower and to participate in the issuance, extension and renewal of Letters of Credit and the obligation of Agent to issue, extend and renew Letters of Credit, in an aggregate principal amount at any time not to exceed the Revolving Commitment Amount upon the terms and subject to the conditions and limitations set forth in this Agreement.
Revolving Commitment
 
: One Hundred Fifty Million and 00/100ths Dollars ($150,000,000.00), as such amount may be increased in accordance with the provisions of hereof.
Revolving Commitment Amount
Section 3.6(a)
 
: As defined in .
Shortfall
Section 3.6(a)
 
: For any entity, any corporation, partnership or other entity of which at least a majority of the securities or other ownership interests having by the terms thereof ordinary voting power to elect a majority of the board of directors or other persons performing similar functions of such corporation, partnership or other entity (without regard to the occurrence of any contingency) which is at the time directly or indirectly owned or controlled by such entity or one or more subsidiaries of such entity or by such entity and one or more subsidiaries of such entity.
Subsidiary
 
: As defined in .
Subsidiary Guaranty
Section 5.09.E
 
: As defined in .
Supplemental Notes
Section 3.6(b)
 
: U.S. Bank National Association, in its capacity as the lender under the Swing Loan facility described in , and its successors in such capacity.
Swing Lender
Section 3.5
 
: A loan made by the Swing Lender pursuant to .
Swing Loan
Section 3.5
 
: $20,000,000.
Swing Loan Commitment
 
: A written request by Borrower for an Advance of Swing Loan proceeds under this Agreement, in the form and with the certifications included within attached hereto and hereby made a part hereof.
Swing Loan Draw Request
Exhibit A-2
 
: As defined in .
Swing Loan Maturity Date
Section 3.5
 
: As defined in .
Swing Loan Note
Section 3.5
 
: As defined in .
Swing Loan Refund Amount
Section 3.5
 
: The earlier of (a) the Maturity Date, or (b) the date on which the Note is declared to be immediately due and payable pursuant to the terms hereof or of the Note.
Termination Date
 
: As of any date of determination, the sum as determined by Agent of all committed obligations, contingent and otherwise of the Borrower and Borrower's pro rata share of all committed obligations of Borrower's
Total Adjusted Committed Indebtedness
 
unconsolidated subsidiaries, the unconsolidated subsidiaries of the general partners of Borrower, and joint ventures in which Borrower and/or Borrower's general partners is a party, whether secured or unsecured, that in accordance with GAAP should be classified upon the obligor's balance sheet as liabilities, or to which reference should be made by footnotes thereto, including in any event and whether or not so classified: (a) the committed amount of all debt and similar monetary obligations, whether direct or indirect (excluding trade payables and other operating expenses paid by Borrower within sixty days); (b) the committed amount of all liabilities secured by any mortgage, pledge, security interest, lien, charge, or other encumbrance existing on property owned or acquired subject thereto, whether or not the liability secured thereby shall have been assumed; (c) the maximum liability which Borrower could incur under all guarantees for borrowed money, endorsements and other contingent obligations, whether direct or indirect, in respect of indebtedness or obligations of others, including any obligation to supply funds (including partnership obligations and capital requirements) to or in any manner to invest in, directly or indirectly, the debtor, to purchase indebtedness, or to assure the owner of indebtedness against loss, through an agreement to purchase goods, supplies, or services for the purpose of enabling the debtor to make payment of the indebtedness held by such owner or otherwise, and the obligations to reimburse the issuer in respect of any letters of credit; (d) preferred stock outstanding or a similar type of investment; and (e) all liability under forward equity arrangements and Forward Purchase Contracts which at such time could be specifically enforced by the seller thereunder. For the avoidance of doubt, preferred stock outstanding or a similar type of investment that in accordance with GAAP is classified upon the obligor's balance sheet as equity shall not be included in the definition of "
Total Adjusted Committed Indebtedness."
 
: As of any date of determination, the sum as determined by Agent of all advanced and outstanding obligations, contingent and otherwise of the Borrower and Borrower's pro rata share of all advanced and outstanding obligations of Borrower's unconsolidated subsidiaries, the unconsolidated subsidiaries of the general partners of Borrower, and joint ventures in which Borrower and/or Borrower's general partners is a party, whether secured or unsecured, that in accordance with GAAP should be classified upon the obligor's balance sheet as liabilities, or to which reference should be made by footnotes thereto, including in any event and whether or not so classified: (a) all debt and similar monetary obligations, whether direct or indirect (excluding trade payables and other operating expenses paid by Borrower within sixty days); (b) all liabilities secured by any mortgage, pledge, security interest, lien, charge, or other encumbrance existing on property owned or acquired subject thereto, whether or not the liability secured thereby shall have been assumed; (c) all guarantees for borrowed money, endorsements and other contingent obligations, whether direct or indirect, in respect of advanced and outstanding indebtedness or obligations of others, including any obligation to supply funds (including partnership obligations and capital requirements) to or in any manner to invest in, directly or indirectly, the debtor, to purchase indebtedness, or to assure the owner of indebtedness against loss, through an agreement to purchase goods, supplies, or services for the purpose of enabling the debtor to make payment of the indebtedness held by such owner or otherwise, and the obligations to reimburse the issuer in respect of any letters of credit; (d) preferred stock outstanding or a similar type of investment; and (e) all liability under forward equity arrangements and Forward Purchase Contracts which at such time could be specifically enforced by the seller thereunder. For
Total Adjusted Outstanding Indebtedness
 
the avoidance of doubt, preferred stock outstanding or a similar type of investment that in accordance with GAAP is classified upon the obligor's balance sheet as equity shall not be included in the definition of "
Total Adjusted Outstanding Indebtedness."
 
: As of any date of determination, the aggregate unpaid principal balance of Advances outstanding on such date.
Total Revolving Outstandings
 
: Adjusted EBITDA calculated only with respect to the Approved Assets.
Unencumbered Adjusted EBITDA
 
. Any Real Estate Asset that on any date of determination: (a) is not subject to any material liens (including any such lien imposed by the organizational documents of the owner of such asset), (b) is not the subject of any matter that materially adversely affects the value of such Real Estate Asset, (c) is not the subject of a Disqualifying Environmental Event, (d) has been improved with a building or buildings which (1) have been issued a certificate of occupancy (where available) or is otherwise lawfully occupied for its intended use, and (2) are fully operational, (e) is wholly owned or ground-leased (to the extent permitted hereunder) by the Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary and (f) has not been designated by the Borrower in writing to the Agent as a Real Estate Asset that is not an Unencumbered Asset, which designation shall not be permitted during the continuance of an Event of Default and shall be accompanied by a compliance certificate in the form of attached hereto.
Unencumbered Asset
Exhibit B-6
 
: With respect to any Letter of Credit, the Uniform Customs and Practice for Documentary Credits (1993 Revision), International Chamber of Commerce Publication No. 500, or any successor version thereof adopted by the Agent in the ordinary course of its business as a letter of credit issuer and in effect at the time of issuance of such Letter of Credit.
Uniform Customs
 
: As of any date of determination, the sum of (a) the aggregate amount of unrestricted cash then held by the Borrower and (b) the aggregate amount of unrestricted cash equivalents (valued at fair market value) then held by the Borrower. As used in this definition, (i) "unrestricted" means the specified asset is not subject to any liens in favor of any Person and (ii) "cash equivalents" include overnight deposits and also means that such asset has a liquid, par value in cash and is convertible to cash on demand. Notwithstanding anything contained herein to the contrary, the term Unrestricted Cash and Cash Equivalents shall not include the commitments of the Lenders to make Advances under this Agreement or any other commitments from which the access to such cash or cash equivalents would create indebtedness or tenant security and other restricted deposits, until forfeited or otherwise entitled to be retained by the Borrower.
Unrestricted Cash and Cash Equivalents
 
 
1.1
Principal Advances
 
Upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, each Lender severally, but not jointly, agrees to lend to Borrower, pro rata in accordance with
 
its Commitment Percentage, and Borrower agrees to borrow from Lenders, on a revolving basis, at any time and from time to time, in accordance with the terms hereof, from the Closing Date to the Termination Date, during which period Borrower may borrow, repay and reborrow in accordance with the terms hereof, for the purpose of acquisitions, pre-development, development, and renovations/expansions, entitled land (not to exceed 20% of the Revolving Commitment Amount in the aggregate at any one time), short-term working capital (including Distributions not to exceed $10,000,000.00 in the aggregate at any one time), principal amortization requirements and letters of credit issued for the account of Borrower (not to exceed $10,000,000.00 in the aggregate at any one time); provided, however, that (A) at no time shall any Lender be obligated to lend to Borrower more than its Commitment Percentage of the total amount of proceeds of the Loan which Borrower is then qualified to receive hereunder, and (B) the amount of the Total Revolving Outstandings shall never exceed the lesser of (x) the Revolving Commitment Amount and (y) the Loan Availability. In no event shall Borrower use Loan proceeds in connection with the acquisition of unentitled land (., land with none of the following: (i) existing or approved infrastructure, (ii) access or entitlement to utilities or (iii) plan for development), mortgages or public or private securities (other than the purchase of shares in Saul Centers, Inc. not to exceed $5,000,000.00 in the aggregate at any one time), without in each instance obtaining Agent's prior written consent.
i.e
 
All Advances by each Lender shall be evidenced by a Note. Each Note executed by the Borrower shall be in the aggregate principal amount equal to such Lender's Commitment Percentage of the Revolving Commitment Amount. Each Lender shall enter in its ledgers and records the amount of each such Advance, and of each payment made upon the Loan, and each Lender is authorized by Borrower to enter on a schedule attached to the Note a record of such Advances and payments; provided, however, that the failure by any Lender to make any such entry or any error by such Lender in making such entry shall not limit or otherwise affect the Obligations. Notwithstanding the express principal amount of the Note, Borrower shall not at any time be obligated to repay more or less than the total of all Advances made by each Lender pursuant hereto and to the other Loan Documents, together with interest thereon at the rates specified below and in the Note, computed on each Advance from the date it is so made by such Lender, and all other advances made by such Lender pursuant to the terms of the Loan Documents, with interest thereon as therein provided, less all payments of principal of and interest on the Note, and of such advances and interest thereon, made by Borrower. The entire unpaid principal amount of the Loan shall be due and payable on the Termination Date.
 
. Interest shall accrue on the Principal Balance from and after the date hereof. All interest payable hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a 360 day year, but shall be charged for the actual number of days principal is unpaid. Interest accruing in accordance herewith shall be payable, in arrears, on the first Business Day of each calendar month, commencing with the first Business Day of the next calendar month following the calendar month in which the initial advance is made to Borrower, and continuing on the first Business Day of each and every calendar month thereafter until the Principal Balance (as advanced and readvanced) and all accrued interest thereon are paid in full. Agent shall provide a monthly notice to Borrower setting forth the amount of interest due and the due date thereof, which notice shall be mailed on or prior to the tenth (10th) day preceding the first day of each month; provided, however,
1.2
Payment of Interest and Principal
 
that Borrower shall be obligated to pay interest on the Loan (and any Swing Loan) when due regardless of the date Borrower receives such notice. All unpaid, accrued interest shall be paid in full on the Termination Date.
 
In the event that the interest and/or charges in the nature of interest, if any, provided for by this Agreement or by any other Loan Document, shall contravene a legal or statutory limitation applicable to the Loan (or any Swing Loan), if any, Borrower shall pay only such amounts as would legally be permitted; provided, however, that if the defense of usury and all similar defenses are unavailable to Borrower, Borrower shall pay all amounts provided for herein. If, for any reason, amounts in excess of the amounts permitted in the foregoing sentence shall have been paid, received, collected or applied hereunder, whether by reason of acceleration or otherwise, then, and in that event, any such excess amounts shall be applied to principal, unless principal has been fully paid, in which event such excess amount shall be refunded to Borrower.
 
. The Principal Balance and accrued interest thereon may be prepaid in full or in part at any time, without premium or penalty (other than as set forth in with respect to prepayments of any LIBOR Rate Advances), after a minimum of one (1) Business Day prior written notice from Borrower to Agent of the date of prepayment. Upon any such prepayment in full, Borrower may terminate this Agreement, without fee or penalty, pursuant to written notice to Agent. Each prepayment shall be in an amount not less than the lesser of $100,000.00 or the Principal Balance.
1.3
Prepayment
Section 1.11
 
. If not sooner paid in accordance with the terms hereof, the Principal Balance, together with all unpaid interest accrued thereon, shall be due and payable, in full, on the Maturity Date; provided, however, the Maturity Date may be extended for one (1) additional period of one (1) year (the ") upon the written request (the ) of Borrower given not less than thirty (30) days nor more than one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the Maturity Date, such extension being subject to satisfaction of all of the following conditions:
1.4
Maturity Date; Extension
Extension Period
"Extension Request"
 
A. Payment on or before the first day of the Extension Period of the Extension Fee set forth in the Fee Letter;
 
B. At the time of the Extension Request and on the first day of the Extension Period, there shall exist no uncured Event of Default (as hereinafter defined) or event which, with the giving of notice or passage of time, or both, could become an Event of Default;
 
C. Borrower shall deliver to Agent all financial information relating to Borrower and Guarantor required hereunder, and such information shall reflect that no material adverse change, financial or otherwise, as determined by Agent, in its sole discretion, shall have occurred with respect to Borrower or Guarantor;
 
Notwithstanding Borrower's right to extend the Maturity Date of the Loan as set forth above, Borrower hereby agrees that Agent and the Lenders shall have no commitment or obligation to extend the Maturity Date beyond January 27, 2008 unless each of the foregoing conditions shall have been satisfied.
 
. From and after the date hereof, and until the date on which the Note is paid in full, Borrower shall pay interest on the Principal Balance at the Loan Rate, as the same may fluctuate from time to time; provided, however, subject to the limitations stated herein, Borrower may elect in accordance with the procedures set forth herein to have interest accrue and be paid on all or a portion of the outstanding Principal Balance (other than with respect to a Swing Loan) at a rate per annum equal to the LIBOR Rate.
1.5
Calculation of Interest
 
. Borrower may elect to fix the rate of interest payable upon the Principal Balance (other than with respect to a Swing Loan) or any portion thereof pursuant to the provisions of this Section. The provisions of this shall govern the computation, accrual and payment of interest with respect to the Principal Balance or any portion thereof for which Borrower properly makes such an election. If no Event of Default has occurred and is continuing under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents, Borrower may from time to time elect, by a LIBOR Rate Notice, to pay interest on the LIBOR Rate Advance described in said LIBOR Rate Notice at a LIBOR Rate during the LIBOR Rate Period specified in said LIBOR Rate Notice; provided, however, Borrower may not elect to have more than five (5) LIBOR Rate Advances outstanding at any one time. Upon request by Borrower, prior to the submission by Borrower to Agent of any LIBOR Rate Notice, Agent shall by telephone advise Borrower from time to time of the then applicable LIBOR Rate with respect to any LIBOR Rate Period promptly after the same is determined by Agent, which determination shall be final, conclusive and binding on Borrower. All interest accruing hereunder at a LIBOR Rate shall accrue and be computed and charged in the same manner as interest at the Loan Rate. From and after the end of each LIBOR Rate Period, in the event Borrower does not timely select another interest rate option at least three (3) Euro Days before a particular LIBOR Rate Advance expires, Agent may, at any time thereafter convert such LIBOR Rate Advance to a Loan Rate Advance, but until such conversion, the funds advanced under the expired LIBOR Rate Advance shall continue to accrue interest at the same rate as the interest rate under such expired LIBOR Rate Advance. Agent's internal records of applicable interest rates shall be determinative in the absence of manifest error. Notwithstanding the foregoing, all LIBOR Rate Periods at any one time outstanding shall end on not more than five (5) different dates, and the duration of any LIBOR Rate Periods which would exceed such limitation shall be adjusted to coincide with the remaining term of such other shorter LIBOR Rate Period(s) as Borrower shall notify Agent of in writing, or absent such notice, as Agent may elect. Except as hereinafter expressly provided, no LIBOR Rate Advance may be repaid or prepaid on any day other than the last day of the LIBOR Rate Period applicable thereto; provided, however, that if Agent is required by any applicable law, statute, rule, regulation or requirement to accept any such prepayment, Borrower shall also pay to Agent for the benefit of the Lenders, from time to time, on demand, any sums necessary to compensate the Lenders for all costs, expenses, claims, penalties and liabilities incurred by the Lenders by virtue of the repayment or prepayment of funds, or the inability of the Lenders to repay or prepay funds borrowed by the Lenders in the London interbank market to advance to Borrower.
1.6
LIBOR Pricing Options
Section 1.6
 
. Notwithstanding any other provision herein, if any Regulatory Change shall change the basis of taxation of payments to the Lenders of the principal of or
1.7
Regulatory Costs
 
interest on any LIBOR Rate Advance or any other fees or amounts payable hereunder (other than taxes imposed on the overall net income of the Lenders by the jurisdiction in which the Lenders have their principal offices or by any political subdivision or taxing authority therein), or shall subject the Lenders to any new or additional charge, fee, withholding or tax of any kind with respect to the Loan hereunder or change the method of taxation of the Loan or impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit or loan commitments extended by, the Lenders (except any such reserve requirement which is reflected in LIBOR) or shall impose on a Lender or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement, the Note or the LIBOR Rate Advances made by the Lenders, and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to the Lenders of making or maintaining any LIBOR Rate Advance or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by a Lender hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise) in respect thereof, by an amount deemed by such Lender to be material, then Borrower shall pay to Agent for the benefit of such Lender upon demand, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender for such additional costs or reduction, including lost income resulting therefrom as reasonably determined by such Lender. A statement from such Lender setting forth such amount or amounts as shall be necessary to so compensate such Lender shall be delivered to Borrower and shall, in the absence of manifest error, be conclusive and binding upon Borrower. Borrower shall pay Agent on behalf of such Lender the amount shown as due on any such statement within ten (10) Business Days after its receipt of the same. Failure on the part of any Lender to demand compensation for any increased costs, lost income or reduction in amounts received or receivable shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's rights to demand compensation for any increased costs or reduction in amounts received or receivable. The protection under this section shall be available to the Lenders regardless of any possible contention of the invalidity or inapplicability of any law, regulation or directive which shall give rise to any demand by the Lenders.
 
. In the event that on the date for determining LIBOR in respect of the LIBOR Rate Period for any LIBOR Rate Advance, Agent shall determine (which determination shall be conclusive in the absence of manifest error) that, by reason of circumstances affecting the London interbank market, adequate and fair means do not exist for ascertaining LIBOR for such LIBOR Rate Period, Agent shall promptly give to Borrower telephonic notice (confirmed as soon as practicable in writing) of the nature and effect of such circumstances. After receipt of such notice and during the existence of such circumstances, Borrower shall have no right to elect a LIBOR Rate with respect to advances hereunder; provided that nothing in this Section shall affect the LIBOR Rate then in effect on any LIBOR Rate Advance outstanding at the time of receipt by Borrower of such notice until the expiration of the LIBOR Rate Period in effect with respect to such LIBOR Rate Advance at such time.
1.8
Inability to Determine LIBOR
 
. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein contained, if any Regulatory Change shall make it unlawful for any Lender to make or maintain any LIBOR Rate Advance or to give effect to its obligations as contemplated hereby, then, by written notice to Borrower, Agent may:
1.9
Illegality
 
A. Declare that LIBOR Rate Advances will not thereafter be made hereunder, in which event Borrower shall be prohibited from requesting LIBOR Rate Advances, and the Lenders shall not be required to make LIBOR Rate Advances to Borrower, hereunder unless such declaration is subsequently withdrawn; and
 
B. Require, but only to the extent the Regulatory Change affects outstanding LIBOR Rate Advances, that all outstanding LIBOR Rate Advances made by the Lenders be added to, and become a part of, the Loan Rate Advance hereunder, in which event all such LIBOR Rate Advances shall automatically be added to, and become a part of, the Loan Rate Advance as of the effective date of such notice as is hereinafter provided for (notwithstanding any provisions of the Note or this Agreement to the contrary), and interest shall accrue thereon, from and after said date, at the Loan Rate or the Default Rate, whichever is then applicable. For purposes of this Section, a notice to Borrower by Agent shall be effective on the date of receipt by Borrower.
 
. Borrower shall also pay to the applicable Lenders from time to time on demand such amounts as such Lender may determine to be necessary to compensate such Lender for any costs which such Lender determines are attributable to the extension of credit hereunder in respect of any amount of capital maintained by such Lender or any of its affiliates pursuant to any law, guideline or regulation of any jurisdiction or any interpretation, directive or request (whether or not having the force of law) of any court or governmental or monetary authority enacted, whether proposed on the date of this Agreement or enacted, promulgated or issued after the date of this Agreement. Without limiting the foregoing, such compensation shall include an amount equal to any reduction in return on assets or return on equity to a level below that which the Lenders could have achieved absent their extension of credit hereunder and but for such law, regulation, interpretation, directive or request.
1.10
Capital Adequacy
 
. If a LIBOR Rate Advance is prepaid, whether by the Borrower as a result of acceleration upon default or otherwise, the Borrower agrees to pay all of the losses, costs, expenses and Interest Differential (as determined by the Agent) of Agent and the Lenders incurred or sustained as a result of such prepayment. Because of the short-term nature of this facility, the Borrower agrees that the Interest Differential shall not be discounted to its present value. Any prepayment of a LIBOR Rate Advance shall be in an amount equal to the remaining entire principal balance of such advance. Agent shall provide to Borrower a statement, signed by an officer of Agent, explaining any such loss or expense and setting forth, if applicable, the computations used to determine such loss or expense which shall be conclusive and binding on Borrower, absent manifest error.
1.11
Indemnification of Agent and the Lenders
 
. If a default shall occur and continue beyond any applicable notice, cure or grace period under the Note, this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents or the entire Principal Balance, all interest accrued thereon, and all other amounts payable under the Loan have not been repaid on or before the Maturity Date, then the entire Principal Balance shall (without notice to or demand upon Borrower) become due and payable on said date, together with all unpaid, accrued interest thereon and all other amounts payable under the Loan, and with interest computed thereon from and after that date at a rate which is four percent (4%) per annum in excess of the Loan Rate or the
1.12
Default Rate
 
LIBOR Rate, as applicable, or at the maximum lawful rate of interest which may be charged thereon by Agent, if any, whichever is less (hereinafter called ""), until all such amounts are paid in full.
Default Rate
 
. In the event that any required payment of principal and/or interest hereunder (other than full payment at maturity) is not made within five (5) days of the due date thereof, Borrower shall pay to Agent an additional payment of a late payment charge to compensate for Lenders' loss of use of funds and for the expenses of handling the delinquent payment, in an amount equal to five percent (5.0%) of such delinquent payment. In the event the maturity of the indebtedness hereunder is accelerated by Agent, this section shall apply only to payments overdue prior to the time of such acceleration.
1.13
Late Payment Charge
 
. Borrower, Agent and the Lenders agree that no payment of interest or other consideration made or agreed to be made by Borrower to Agent and/or the Lenders pursuant to this Agreement, the Note or any other instrument referring to or securing the Note shall, at any time, be deemed to have been computed at an interest rate in excess of the maximum rate of interest permissible by law, if any. In the event such payments of interest or other consideration provided for in this Agreement, the Note or any other instrument referring to or securing the Note shall result in payment of an effective rate of interest which, for any period of time, is in excess of the limit of the usury law or any other law applicable to the Loan evidenced by the Note, all sums in excess of those lawfully collectible as interest for the period in question shall, without further agreement or notice between or by any party or parties hereto, be applied to the Principal Balance immediately upon receipt of such monies by Agent with the same force and effect as though Borrower had specifically designated, and Agent had agreed to accept, such extra payments as a principal payment, without premium or penalty. If principal has been fully paid, any such excess amount shall be refunded to Borrower. This provision shall control over every other obligation of Borrower, Agent and the Lenders hereunder and under the Note and any other instrument which secures the Note.
1.14
Effective Rate
 
. All payments made under the Note shall be applied to any late payment charge then due, to accrued interest, to the Principal Balance and, if Agent and the Lenders have advanced any sums under the terms of any instrument which secures the Note, to repayment of the funds so advanced, even though the same have become part of the Principal Balance, together with interest thereon at the Default Rate, in such order as Agent, at its option, may elect. All payments made under the Loan shall be made in Immediately Available Funds, without counterclaim or set off and free and clear of, and without any deduction or withholding for, any taxes or other payments.
1.15
Payments
 
. On the date hereof and on or before the dates set forth therein, Borrower shall pay Agent all fees, costs and expenses referenced in the Fee Letter. The agency fee set forth in the Fee Letter is for the services to be performed by Agent in acting as Agent and is fully earned on the date paid. The agency fee paid to the Agent is solely for its own account and is nonrefundable.
1.16
Fees
 
1.17
Non-Usage Fees
 
In addition to any other fees set forth in this Agreement, Borrower shall pay to Agent on behalf of Lenders in Immediately Available Funds a non-usage fee equal to the percentage set forth below per annum multiplied by the unadvanced portion of the Revolving Commitment Amount (after deducting the undrawn amount of any Letters of Credit outstanding hereunder), payable on the first day of each calendar quarter, calculated in arrears based on the average daily balance of the unadvanced portion of the Revolving Commitment Amount during the prior calendar quarter; the first payment of such fee shall be due and payable on April 1, 2005 and shall be pro rated based upon that portion of the calendar quarter during which the Revolving Commitment is outstanding. The non-usage fee shall be shared among the Lenders in accordance with the daily average Commitment Percentages of the Lenders during such calendar quarter.
 
The non-usage fee shall be equal to 0.15%; provided, however, in the event that Agent determines in its sole discretion (and to the extent that such determination is in reliance upon documentation provided by Borrower, copies shall be provided to each Lender by Agent) that the average daily balance of the unadvanced portion of the Revolving Commitment Amount during the prior calendar quarter shall have been greater than or equal to fifty percent (50%) of the Revolving Commitment Amount, then the non-usage fee as to such quarter shall be equal to 0.20% per annum.
 
 
2.A
Terms of the Letter of Credit Facility
 
2.A.1. . Upon the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement, Agent agrees, in its individual capacity, to issue, extend and renew Letters of Credit for the account of Borrower from time to time between the Closing Date and the Termination Date in such form as may be requested by Borrower and reasonably agreed to by Agent and in such amounts as the Borrower shall request up to an aggregate amount at any time outstanding not exceeding the Revolving Commitment Amount; , , that, after giving effect to such issuance, (a) the Maximum Drawing Amount shall not exceed $10,000,000.00 at any time, (b) the sum of (i) the Maximum Drawing Amount on all Letters of Credit and (ii) Total Revolving Outstandings shall not exceed the Loan Availability in effect at any time, and (c) the total number of Letters of Credit outstanding shall not exceed five (5).
Letters of Credit
provided
however
 
2.A.2. . Each request for a Letter of Credit shall be made by the Borrower, in writing, by telex, facsimile transmission or electronic conveyance received by the Agent by 2:00 p.m. (Central time) on a Business Day which is not less than five (5) Business Days preceding the requested date of issuance (which shall also be a Business Day) and shall be accompanied by a certificate executed by the Borrower in the form of . Each request for a Letter of Credit shall specify (i) the date of issuance of the requested Letter of Credit, (ii) the amount of the requested Letter of Credit, (iii) the name of the account party on such Letter of Credit, and (iv) the beneficiary of such Letter of Credit. The Agent may require that such request be made on such letter of credit application and reimbursement agreement form as the Agent may from time to time specify, along with satisfactory evidence of the authority and incumbency of the
Procedures for Letters of Credit
Exhibit B-7
 
representative of the Borrower making such request. Each request for a Letter of Credit shall be deemed a representation by the Borrower that, on the date of issuance of such Letter of Credit and after giving effect thereto, the applicable conditions specified in have been and will be satisfied. Unless the Agent determines that any applicable condition specified in has not been satisfied, the Agent will issue the requested Letter of Credit at its principal office in Minneapolis, Minnesota not later than 3:00 p.m. on the requested date of issuance.
Article III
Article III
 
2.A.3. . Letters of Credit shall be issued in support of obligations of the Borrower. All Letters of Credit must expire not later than thirty (30) days prior to the Maturity Date. Each Letter of Credit so issued, extended or renewed shall be subject to the Uniform Customs.
Terms of Letters of Credit
 
2.A.4. . If the Agent has received documents purporting to draw under a Letter of Credit that the Agent believes conform to the requirements of the Letter of Credit, or if the Agent has decided that it will comply with the Borrower's written request or authorization to pay a drawing on any Letter of Credit that the Agent does not believe conforms to the requirements of the Letter of Credit, it will notify Borrower, of that fact. Except as contemplated in below, the Borrower shall reimburse the Agent for the account of the Agent or (as the case may be) the Lenders by 9:30 a.m. (Central time) on the day on which such drawing is to be paid in Immediately Available Funds in an amount equal to the amount of such drawing. In addition, Borrower agrees to reimburse or pay to Agent for the account of the Agent or (as the case may be) the Lenders with respect to each Letter of Credit issued, extended or renewed by Agent hereunder:
Agreement to Repay Letter of Credit Drawing
Section 2.A.10
 
A. Upon reduction (but not termination) of the Revolving Commitment Amount to an amount less than the then Maximum Drawing Amount, an amount equal to such difference, which amount shall be held by the Agent in a non-interest bearing account as cash collateral for the benefit of Lenders and the Agent for all Reimbursement Obligations, and
 
B. Upon the termination of the Revolving Commitment, or the acceleration of the Reimbursement Obligations with respect to all Letters of Credit in accordance with , an amount equal to the then Maximum Drawing Amount on all Letters of Credit, which amount shall be held by Agent in a non-interest bearing account as cash collateral for the benefit of Lenders and Agent for all Reimbursement Obligations.
Section 6.2(C)
 
2.A.5. . The obligation of the Borrower under to repay the Agent for any amount drawn on any Letter of Credit shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, shall continue for so long as any Letter of Credit is outstanding, notwithstanding any termination of this Agreement, and shall be paid strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, under all circumstances whatsoever, including without limitation the following circumstances:
Obligations Absolute
Section 2.A.4.
 
A. Any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit;
 
B. The existence of any claim, setoff, defense or other right which the Borrower may have or claim at any time against any beneficiary, transferee or holder of any Letter of Credit (or any Person for whom any such beneficiary, transferee or holder may be acting), the Agent or any other Person, whether in connection with a Letter of Credit, this Agreement, the transactions contemplated hereby, or any unrelated transaction; or
 
C. Any statement or any other document presented under any Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent, invalid or insufficient in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect whatsoever.
 
Neither the Agent nor its officers, directors or employees shall be liable or responsible for, and the Obligations of the Borrower shall not be impaired by:
 
(i) The use which may be made of any Letter of Credit or any acts or omissions of any beneficiary, transferee or holder thereof in connection therewith;
 
(ii) The validity, sufficiency or genuineness of documents, or of any endorsements thereon, even if such documents or endorsements should, in fact, prove to be in any or all respects invalid, insufficient, fraudulent or forged;
 
(iii) The acceptance by the Agent of documents that appear on their face to be in order, without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary; or
 
(iv) Any other action of the Agent in making or failing to make payment under any Letter of Credit if in good faith and in conformity with U.S. or foreign laws, regulations or customs applicable thereto.
 
2.A.6. . If any Regulatory Change shall either (a) impose, modify or make applicable any reserve, deposit, capital adequacy or similar requirement against Letters of Credit issued by the Agent, or (b) shall impose on the Agent any other conditions affecting this Agreement or any Letter of Credit; and the result of any of the foregoing is to increase the cost to the Agent of issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit, or reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by the Agent hereunder, then, upon written demand (which demand shall be given by the Agent promptly after it determines such increased cost or reduction), the Borrower shall pay to the Agent the additional amount or amounts as will compensate the Agent for such actual or imputed increased cost or reduction. A certificate submitted to the Borrower by the Agent setting forth the basis for the determination of such additional amount or amounts necessary to compensate the Agent as aforesaid, and stating in reasonable detail the basis for the charge and the method of computation, shall be conclusive and binding on the Borrower absent error.
Increased Cost for Letters of Credit
 
2.A.7. . For each Letter of Credit issued, the Borrower shall pay to the Agent (a) a fee equal to the higher of (a) $1,000.00, or (b) 12.5 basis points on each Letter of Credit face amount, payable upon issuance of each such Letter of Credit, and (b) a fee (a ) in an amount equal to the Applicable Margin per
Letter of Credit Fees
"Letter of Credit Fee"
 
annum multiplied by the face amount of each outstanding Letter of Credit, which Letter of Credit Fee (i) shall be payable quarterly in arrears on the first day of each calendar quarter for the immediately preceding calendar quarter (which Letter of Credit Fee shall be pro-rated for any calendar quarter in which such Letter of Credit is issued, drawn upon or otherwise reduced or terminated) and (ii) shall be for the account of the Lenders pro rata in accordance with their respective Commitment Percentages. In addition to the Letter of Credit Fee, the Borrower shall pay to the Agent, on demand, all amendment, drawing and other fees regularly charged by the Agent to its letter of credit customers and all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Agent in connection with the issuance, amendment, administration or payment of any Letter of Credit.
 
2.A.8 . No portion of any Letter of Credit is to be obtained for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any "margin security" or "margin stock" as such terms are used in Regulations U and X of the Board, 12 C.F.R. Parts 221 and 224.
Regulations U and X
 
2.A.9 . Each Lender severally agrees that it shall be absolutely liable, without regard to the occurrence of any default or Event of Default or any other condition precedent whatsoever, to the extent of such Lender's Commitment Percentage, to reimburse Agent on demand pursuant to for the amount of each draft paid by Agent under each Letter of Credit to the extent that such amount is not reimbursed by the Borrower pursuant to (such agreement for a Lender being called herein the "" of such Lender).
Letter of Credit Participation
Section 2.A.10
Section 2.A.4
Letter of Credit Participation
 
2.A.10 . Notwithstanding anything contained in above to the contrary, unless Borrower shall have notified the Agent prior to 11:00 a.m. (Central time) on the Business Day immediately prior to the date of such drawing that Borrower intends to reimburse Agent for the amount of such drawing, Borrower shall be deemed to have requested a Loan Rate Advance on the date on which such drawing is honored and in an amount equal to the amount of such drawing. The Borrower may thereafter convert any such Loan Rate Advance to a LIBOR Rate Advance in accordance with . Each Lender shall, in accordance with , make available such Lender's Commitment Percentage of such Advance to Agent, the proceeds of which shall be applied directly by Agent to reimburse Agent and/or Lenders for the amount of such draw. Agent is irrevocably authorized by the Borrower and each of the Lenders to honor draws on each Letter of Credit by the beneficiary thereof in accordance with the terms of the Letter of Credit. The responsibility of the Agent to the Borrower and the Lenders shall be only to determine that the documents (including each draft) delivered under each Letter of Credit in connection with such presentment shall be in conformity in all material respects with such Letter of Credit.
Letter of Credit Payments; Advance of Loan
Section 2.A.4
Section 1.6
Section 1.1
 
2.A.11 . The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that that certain Letter of Credit No. SLCMMSP03477 in the face amount of $2,100,000.00, issued by Agent for the benefit of Teachers Insurance and Annuity Association of America on behalf of Borrower, shall be deemed to have been issued pursuant to this Agreement, in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in this Article IIA.
Existing Letter of Credit
 
 
Lenders shall not be required to make any Advances hereunder until the pre-closing requirements, conditions and other requirements set forth below have been completed and fulfilled to the satisfaction of Agent, with respect to said Advance, at Borrower's sole cost and expense.
 
2.B.1
Prerequisites to Effectiveness of Agreement
 
The obligations of Lenders to make Advances and the effectiveness of this Agreement are subject to the following documents, certificates and opinions, each in form and substance acceptable to Agent and its counsel, having been delivered to and approved by Agent. It is agreed, however, that Lenders may, in their discretion, make such Advances prior to completion and fulfillment of any or all of such pre-closing requirements, conditions and other requirements, without waiving its right to require such completion and fulfillment before any additional Advances are made.
 
A. This Agreement duly executed by Borrower, Agent, Swing Lender and Lenders; the Note duly executed by Borrower; the Fee Letter; and the Guaranty duly executed by Guarantor;
 
B. A copy of the Certificate of Limited Partnership of Borrower and all amendments thereto, and a Certificate of Good Standing for Borrower, currently certified by the Secretary of State of its state of organization; Borrower's Agreement of Limited Partnership, and any necessary consents and resolutions authorizing the transactions described herein, all currently certified by Borrower's general partner, and upon which Agent and Lenders may rely until revoked by written notice to Agent;
 
C. A copy of the Articles of Incorporation of Guarantor and all amendments thereto, and a Certificate of Good Standing for Guarantor, each currently certified by the Secretary of State of its state of incorporation; Guarantor's By-Laws, Resolutions of Guarantor's Board of Directors authorizing the transactions described herein, and an incumbency certificate for Guarantor (including the names, titles and specimen signatures of officers thereof authorized to execute Loan Documents), all currently certified by Guarantor's corporate secretary or assistant secretary, as appropriate, and upon which Agent and Lenders may rely until revoked by written notice to Agent;
 
D. A Certificate from the general partner of Borrower and from a duly authorized officer of Guarantor, setting forth the names, titles, specimen signatures and telephone numbers of all persons authorized to (i) sign Draw Requests and/or other documents, instruments, certificates and agreements to be delivered by Borrower and/or Guarantor to Agent, and/or (ii) to give instructions to Agent hereunder, each of which Certificates shall be deemed to be in full force and effect until forty-eight (48) hours after receipt by Agent of an amendment thereof duly executed by a duly authorized officer or Guarantor;
 
E. A signed, written opinion from counsel to Borrower and Guarantor, addressed to Agent and currently dated, as to the due organization, existence, qualification and good standing of Borrower and Guarantor; as to the due authorization, validity, legality, binding nature and enforceability of the Loan Documents listed in , without the consent or approval of any other Person; that, to such counsel's knowledge, the execution, delivery and performance by Borrower and Guarantor of the Loan Documents to which each is a party will not violate any contracts or agreements of Borrower or Guarantor or any applicable Governmental Requirements; as to the absence, to such counsel's knowledge, of litigation or governmental proceedings which could materially, adversely affect Borrower or Guarantor; and such other matters as may be required by Agent on behalf of Lenders;
Section 2.B.1.A
 
F. The most current available annual financial statements for Borrower and Guarantor on a consolidated basis, as well as financial statements on a consolidated basis for each of the three (3) full fiscal years immediately preceding the time period covered by said current financial statements; and
 
G. A sworn statement from and agreement by Borrower and Guarantor listing all guarantees and contingent liabilities to which Borrower and Guarantor are a party or for which Borrower or Guarantor may be liable and agreeing to periodically update said listing, to which sworn statement shall be attached (or in which sworn statement shall be described) current financial statements of Borrower and of Guarantor, which shall be, in such sworn statement, certified and sworn to by Borrower and Guarantor as being true, correct, complete and not misleading in any material respect, and Borrower and Guarantor shall also, in such sworn statement, certify that there has been no material change in the financial status of Borrower or of Guarantor since the dates thereof.
 
H. With respect to each Unencumbered Asset which is to become an Approved Asset on the Closing Date, (i) a written description of the Unencumbered Asset, including the size, legal description and location of the Unencumbered Asset; (ii) a title report, dated within thirty (30) days of the date on which such Unencumbered Asset is included as an Approved Asset, running in favor of the Agent on behalf of the Lenders, together with a copy of each document referred to therein (collectively ""), evidencing that such Real Estate Asset is an Unencumbered Asset; (iii) a current, certified rent roll for such Unencumbered Asset; (iv) operating statements for the prior three (3) years, if available (but in no event less than the prior twelve (12) months); (v) market, location and demographic information; (vi) pro forma operating and capital budgets and (vii) such other information as may be reasonably requested by Agent.
Title Evidence
 
I. Receipt of a Closing Certificate and a Compliance Certificate in the form attached hereto as (if Borrower has requested that an Advance be funded on the Closing Date).
Exhibit B-1
 
J. The Borrower agrees that at the request of Agent it will furnish supplements of all materials described in this to Agent after the Closing Date, updating such material.
Section 2.B.1
 
K. All proceedings in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, the other Loan Documents and all other documents incident thereto shall be satisfactory in form and substance to Agent and to the Agent's counsel, and the Agent and such counsel shall have received all information and such counterpart originals or certified or other copies of such documents as the Agent may request.
 
L. The Borrower shall have paid to the Agent, for the account of the Lenders or for its own account, as applicable, all of the fees and expenses that are due and payable as of the Closing Date in accordance with this Agreement.
 
M. The obligation of the Agent to issue any Letter of Credit shall be subject to the fulfillment of the following conditions:
 
(1) . The representations and warranties contained in shall be true and correct on and as of the date upon which Borrower requests that Agent issue the Letter of Credit and on the date of issuance of each Letter of Credit with the same force and effect as if made on such date.
Representations and Warranties
Article IV
 
(2) . No default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing on the date upon which Borrower requests that Agent issue the Letter of Credit and on the date of issuance of each Letter of Credit or will exist upon issuance of the Letter of Credit.
No Default
 
(3) . The Agent shall have received the Borrower's application for such Letter of Credit specified under .
Notices and Requests
Section 2.A.2
 
(4) . No change shall have occurred in any law or regulations thereunder or interpretations thereof that in the reasonable opinion of the Agent or Majority Lenders would make it illegal for Agent or Lenders to participate in the issuance, extension or renewal of such Letter of Credit or, in the reasonable opinion of the Agent, would make it illegal to issue, extend or renew such Letter of Credit.
No Legal Impediment
 
2.B.2
Conditions Precedent to Approval of an Asset as an Approved Asset
 
If and when Borrower wishes to have Lenders approve an Unencumbered Asset or Proposed Acquisition for inclusion as an Approved Asset, Borrower shall submit to Agent a written request for such approval, together with a certificate, signed by Borrower in the form attached hereto as , that the Real Estate Asset or Proposed Acquisition complies with all of the terms, provisions and conditions of this Agreement (with respect to a Proposed Acquisition, subject only to the acquisition of the asset), and the following conditions must be satisfied in the sole discretion of Agent (in reliance upon documentation provided by Borrower, copies of which shall be provided to each Lender by Agent within two (2) Business Days after receipt by Agent):
Exhibit B-3
 
A. Borrower shall provide, at the time of its request for approval, (i) a written description of the Real Estate Asset or Proposed Acquisition, including its size, legal description and location; (ii) Title Evidence evidencing that such asset is an Unencumbered Asset (or in the case of a Proposed Acquisition, would be an Unencumbered Asset upon
 
acquisition by Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary; (iii) a current, certified rent roll for such asset; (iv) operating statements for the prior three (3) years, if available (but in no event less than the prior twelve (12) months); (v) market, location and demographic information; (vi) pro forma operating and capital budgets; (vii) evidence that such Unencumbered Asset or such Proposed Acquisition meets the Minimum Lease Up Requirement; and (viii) such other information as may be reasonably requested by Agent.
 
B. Agent shall have completed to its satisfaction, and at the Borrower's expense, an inspection of the Unencumbered Asset or Proposed Acquisition, if it elects to do so.
 
C. All proceedings in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, the other Loan Documents and all other documents incident thereto shall be satisfactory in form and substance to Agent and to the Agent's counsel, and the Agent, such counsel and the Lenders shall have received all information and such counterpart originals or certified or other copies of such documents as the Agent may request.
 
Upon receipt of the above-mentioned written request, certificate and other items (""), Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders, engage legal counsel to review the deliveries, all at Borrower's sole cost and expense. If the Approval Prerequisites are satisfied as determined by Agent, whose approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, and if the proposed Unencumbered Asset or Proposed Acquisition complies with the terms, provisions, requirements and conditions of this Agreement, also in Agent's reasonable determination, Agent shall, after receiving approval from all Lenders, approve (x) the proposed Unencumbered Asset as an Approved Asset, or (y) the Proposed Acquisition as an Approved Asset subject to the consummation of the acquisition thereof by Borrower (or Approved Subsidiary), in writing, which approval shall be given or withheld within ten (10) business days of receipt of the Approval Prerequisites.
Approval Prerequisites
 
Nothing set forth herein or in any other Loan Document shall be read, deemed, construed or interpreted to impose any explicit or implicit obligation of any kind upon the Lenders to approve any Unencumbered Asset or Proposed Acquisition so that it is thereafter included as an Approved Asset, such approval to be, in each instance, subject to the sole discretion of the Lenders in all respects; provided, however, that if the Approval Prerequisites with respect to a property constituting a Proposed Acquisition are satisfactory to all Lenders, the Lenders will not unreasonably withhold their consent to such Proposed Acquisition becoming an Approved Asset.
 
In no event shall the Lenders be obligated to make advances for a Proposed Acquisition unless such property is acquired by Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary and approved as an Approved Asset by all Lenders (pursuant to the provisions of this Agreement).
 
2.B.3
Determination of Loan Availability
 
A. Loan Availability shall be calculated by Agent on behalf of the Lenders on the first day of each calendar quarter and on each Calculation Date.
 
B. For any period of determination, Loan Availability shall equal the lesser of the following amounts:
 
1. Unencumbered Adjusted EBITDA for the previous four (4) quarters (x) multiplied by sixty percent (60%) and (y) divided by eight and three-quarters percent (8.75%) or
 
2. The Permanent Loan Estimate (using Unencumbered Adjusted EBITDA for the previous four (4) quarters) for such Approved Assets.
 
provided, however, Loan Availability shall be reduced on a dollar for dollar basis by (x) the face amount of any Letters of Credit issued by Agent and outstanding hereunder, (y) the aggregate balance of any Swing Loans made by the Swing Lender and outstanding hereunder, and (z) one and one-half (1.5) times the amount of any Imposition, Lien or Encumbrance arising with respect to any Approved Asset until same is paid in full, discharged or bonded over to the satisfaction of the Agent (provided that such Imposition, Lien or Encumbrance is less than one percent (1%) of the Capitalization Value of the Approved Asset, it being acknowledged that for so long as any Imposition, Lien or Encumbrance in excess of such amount encumbers an Approved Asset, such Real Estate Asset shall not be an Approved Asset) and (z) any other unsecured indebtedness of Borrower or Guarantor.
 
C. In no event shall Lenders be obligated to make Advances which in the aggregate exceed Loan Availability as determined by Agent from time to time. If at any time Loan Availability is less than the Total Revolving Outstandings, Borrower shall, within thirty (30) days of such determination by Agent, either (i) cure the cause of such reduction in Loan Availability, or (ii) pay the excess to Agent on behalf of the Lenders. No additional Advances shall be made hereunder and no additional Letters of Credit shall be issued hereunder until such time as Agent determines that Loan Availability exceeds the Total Revolving Outstandings. It shall be an Event of Default if Borrower fails to cure the cause of the reduction in Loan Availability or make the required payment within such thirty (30) day period.
 
 
3.1
General
 
Subject to the limitations on Advances contained elsewhere in this Agreement, the Loan proceeds shall be advanced by Agent, to or for the benefit of Borrower, in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in this . All monies advanced by Agent and each Lender (including amounts payable to such Lender and advanced by such Lender to itself pursuant to the terms hereof) shall constitute loans made to Borrower under this Agreement, evidenced by the Note and secured by the other Loan Documents, and interest shall be computed thereon as prescribed by this Agreement and the Note, from the date advanced to or for the benefit of Borrower.
Article III
 
No Advance shall constitute a waiver of any condition precedent to the obligation of any Lender to make any further Advance or preclude Agent from thereafter requiring Borrower to satisfy any such condition precedent with respect to any prior or further Advance. No Advance shall constitute a waiver of any default or Event of Default hereunder which may exist at the time of said Advance, whether or not the same is known to such Lender. All conditions precedent to the obligation of Agent to make any Advance on behalf of Lenders are imposed hereby solely for the benefit of Agent and Lenders, and no other party may require satisfaction of any such condition precedent or shall be entitled to assume that Agent will make or refuse to make any Advance in the absence of strict compliance with such condition precedent. All requirements of this Agreement may be waived by Agent, in whole or in part, at any time.
 
Each Lender may, but shall not be obligated to, advance to itself, when due, from the proceeds of the Loan, without further order or request from Borrower, all interest payable to such Lender under the terms hereof or of the Note, and may, at such Lender's option, without any obligation to do so, advance to itself all other sums due or to become due to such Lender under this Agreement or under any of the other Loan Documents, including but not limited to its fees, administration fees, attorneys' fees, other consultants' fees and all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by such Lender in connection with this Agreement and with the Loan. Each Lender shall also have the right, but not the obligation, after the occurrence of an Event of Default, to advance to Agent the proceeds of the Loan for application by Agent to the satisfaction of any of Borrower's other obligations hereunder or under any of the other Loan Documents.
 
3.2
Inspections
 
Agent shall have access to each Real Estate Asset at all reasonable times and shall have the right to enter each Real Estate Asset and to conduct such inspections thereof as it shall deem necessary or desirable for the protection of the Lenders' interests; provided that Agent gives reasonable prior notice thereof to Borrower. Borrower may elect to accompany Agent on any such inspections. No Lender shall be obligated to conduct any inspection of any Real Estate Asset.
 
Neither Borrower nor any third party shall have the right to use or rely upon any reports generated by Agent for any purpose whatsoever. Borrower shall be responsible for making its own inspections of each Approved Asset.
 
3.3
Agent and Lender Responsibility
 
It is expressly understood and agreed that neither Agent nor any Lender assumes liability or responsibility for any representations made by Borrower or for any acts on the part of Borrower.
 
3.4
Procedure for Advances
 
A. At the time of each Advance, there shall exist no default or Event of Default hereunder, and all representations and warranties made herein shall be true and correct
 
on and as of each Advance Date with the same effect as if made on that date. Each Advance (other than under a Swing Loan) shall be made pursuant to a Draw Request submitted by Borrower to Agent on behalf of the Lenders. Each Advance under a Swing Loan shall be made pursuant to a Swing Loan Draw Request submitted by Borrower to Agent and Swing Lender (if a party other than Agent).
 
B. With respect to each Draw Request:
 
(I) Not later than 10:00 A.M. (Central time) three (3) Euro Business Days prior to the Advance Date if any portion of the requested Advance is desired by Borrower to be a LIBOR Rate Advance, and one Business Day prior to the Advance Date if any portion of the requested Advance is to be a Loan Rate Advance, Borrower shall deliver to Agent a request, in writing, designating the amount of such portion (in the minimum amount of $1,000,000.00 and in integral multiples of $100,000.00 in excess thereof) and designating the initial LIBOR Rate Period applicable thereto. If no such request is made by Borrower with respect to any Advance, the entire Advance shall be deemed to be a Loan Rate Advance.
 
(II) On each Advance Date, if all the terms and conditions of this Agreement have been complied with by Borrower, to the satisfaction of Agent, if no default or Event of Default exists hereunder, and if Agent has approved the Draw Request, each Lender shall advance to Agent its Commitment Percentage of the principal amount of the requested Advance by delivering to Agent a wire transfer of funds. Agent shall then forward the Advance to Borrower. All Advances actually so made shall be deemed to be loans to Borrower, shall reduce the available amount of the Revolving Loan Commitment, and shall bear interest at the rates provided herein from the date so advanced.
 
C. With respect to each Swing Loan Draw Request, Borrower shall deliver any such request no later than 10:00 A.M. (Central time) on the requested Advance Date. On each such Advance Date, if all the terms and conditions of this Agreement have been complied with by Borrower, to the satisfaction of Agent and Swing Lender (if a party other than Agent), if no default or Event of Default exists hereunder, and if Agent and Swing Lender (if a party other than Agent) have approved the Swing Loan Draw Request, the Swing Lender shall advance to Agent the amount of the approved Advance. Agent shall then forward the Advance to Borrower. All Advances actually so made shall be deemed to be loans to Borrower, shall reduce the available amount of the Swing Loan Commitment, and shall bear interest at the rates provided herein from the date so advanced.
 
D. Each Lender shall also have the right, but not the obligation, so long as an Event of Default exists hereunder, to advance to Agent the proceeds of any Advance for application to the satisfaction of any of Borrower's Obligations. Any Advance by a Lender for such purpose shall be part of the Loan and shall be evidenced and secured by the Loan Documents from the date made. Borrower hereby authorizes each Lender, so long as an Event of Default exists hereunder, to hold, use, advance and apply Loan proceeds for the payment or performance of any obligation of Borrower hereunder, including but not limited to the obligation to pay interest on the Loan.
 
E. In the event that Agent (and/or the Swing Lender (if a party other than Agent) in the case of a Swing Loan Request) shall determine, in its sole judgment, that proper documentation to support a requested Advance, as required by this Agreement, has not been furnished, it may withhold payment of such Advance, or of such portion of such Advance as shall not be so supported by proper documentation, and shall promptly notify Borrower of the discrepancy in or omission of such documentation. Until such time as such discrepancy or omission is corrected to the satisfaction of such Agent (and/or the Swing Lender, as applicable), it may withhold such funds.
 
F. Borrower shall provide notice to Agent in the Draw Request of the proposed use of the requested Advance. If Borrower anticipates using the Advance for purposes of financing construction on a Real Estate Asset Under Development, Borrower shall provide evidence to Agent at the time of each such Draw Request that Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary has entered into leases for not less than fifty percent (50%) of the rentable square footage of such Real Estate Asset Under Development (which leases must be on arms-length terms and conditions if with an affiliate of Borrower). If Borrower fails to provide the foregoing evidence, Agent shall have no obligation to make the requested Advance for such construction.
 
3.5
.
Swing Loans
 
(a) During the term of this Agreement, the Lenders agree, on the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, to make advances to Borrower pursuant to this Section from time to time in amounts such that (i) the aggregate of such advance and amount of Swing Loans theretofore advanced and still outstanding does not at any time exceed the Swing Loan Commitment and (ii) the amount of such advance does not exceed the Loan Availability. Each advance under this Section shall be in an aggregate principal amount of $1,000,000 or a larger multiple of $100,000 (except that any such advance may be in the aggregate available amount of Swing Loans determined in accordance with the immediately preceding sentence). With the foregoing limits, Borrower may borrow under this Section, repay or, to the extent permitted by , prepay Swing Loans and reborrow under this Section at any time during the term of this Agreement.
Section 1.3
 
(b) The Agent shall, on behalf of Borrower (which hereby irrevocably directs the Agent to act on its behalf), on notice given by Agent no later than 1:00 p.m. (Central time) on the Business Day immediately following the funding of any Swing Loan, request each Lender to make, and each Lender hereby agrees to make, an advance, in an amount (with respect to each Lender, its "") equal to such Lender's Commitment Percentage of the aggregate principal amount of the Swing Loans (the "") outstanding on the date of such notice, to repay the Swing Lender. Unless any of the events described in Section 6.1(J) with respect to Borrower shall have occurred and be continuing (in which case the procedures of shall apply), each shall make such advance of available to Agent at Agent's office in immediately available funds, not later than 1:00 p.m. (Central time), on the fifth Business Day immediately following the date of such notice. Agent shall immediately apply such proceeds to repay Refunded Swing Loans. Effective on the day such advances are made, the portion of the Swing Loans so paid shall no longer be outstanding as Swing Loans, shall no longer be due as Swing Loans under the Swing Loan Note held by the Swing
Swing Loan Refund Amount
Refunded Swing Loans
Section 3.5(c)
Lender
 
Lender, and shall be due as Advances under the respective Notes issued to the Lenders. Borrower authorizes the Agent to charge Borrower's accounts with Agent (up to the amount available in each such accounts) in order to immediately pay the amount of such Refunded Swing Loans to the extent amounts received from the Lenders are not sufficient to repay in full such Refunded Swing Loans.
 
(c) If, prior to the time advances would have otherwise been made by Lenders pursuant to , one of the events described in with respect to the Borrower shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender shall, on the date such advances were to have been made pursuant to the notice referred to in (the ""), purchase an undivided participating interest in the Swing Loans in an amount equal to such Lender's Swing Loan Refund Amount. On the Refunding Date, each Lender shall transfer to the Agent, in immediately available funds, such Lender's Swing Loan Refund Amount, and upon receipt thereof, the Agent shall deliver to such Lender a Swing Loan participation certificate dated the date of Agent's receipt of such funds and in the Swing Loan Refund Amount of such Lender.
Section 3.5(b)
Section 6.1(J)
Section 3.5(b)
Refunding Date
 
(d) Whenever, at any time after the Agent has received from any Lender such Lender's Swing Loan Refund Amount pursuant to , the Agent receives any payment on account of the Swing Loans in which the Lenders have purchased participations pursuant to said , the Agent will promptly distribute to each such Lender its ratable share (determined on the basis of the Swing Loan Refund Amounts of all of the Lenders) of such payment (appropriately adjusted, in the case of interest payments, to reflect the period of time during which such Lender's participating interest was outstanding and funded); provided, however, that in the event that such payment received by the Agent is required to be returned, such Lender will return to the Agent any portion thereof previously distributed to it by the Agent.
Section 3.5(c)
Section 3.5(c)
 
(e) Each Lender's obligation to make an advance under its Revolving Commitment as provided in or to purchase a participating interest pursuant to shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance, including, without limitation, (i) any set-off, counterclaim, recoupment, defense or other right which such Lender, Borrower or any other Person may have against the Agent or any other Person, (ii) the occurrence or continuance of an Event of Default, the termination or reduction of the Revolving Commitments or the non-satisfaction of any condition precedent to the making of any advance of the Loans, (iii) any adverse change in the condition (financial or otherwise) of Borrower or any other Person, (iv) any breach of this Agreement by Borrower, any other Lender or any other Person or (v) any other circumstance, happening or event whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing.
Section 3.5(b)
Section 3.5(c)
 
(f) For purposes of Article III, Advances of Swing Loans shall be deemed to be Loan Rate Advances.
 
(g) If not sooner paid in accordance with the terms hereof, Swing Loans shall be due and payable, in full, at the earlier of five (5) Business Days after said amounts are advanced or the Maturity Date (the "").
Swing Loan Maturity Date
 
(h) Any Swing Loan made by the Swing Lender shall be evidenced by, and repaid with interest in accordance with, a promissory note of Borrower in the form of duly completed and executed by Borrower, payable to the Swing Lender (such note, as the same may hereafter be amended, modified, extended, severed, assigned, substituted, renewed or restated from time to time, the "").
Exhibit G
Swing Loan Note
 
3.6
.
Additional Loan Commitments
 
(a) Borrower may, from time to time, up to a maximum of three (3) requests, request the Lenders to increase their Revolving Commitments, so as to increase the Revolving Commitment Amount to an amount no greater than the sum of (1) the Accordion Amount plus (2) $150,000,000. The increase in the Revolving Commitment Amount pursuant to any such particular request shall be at least an amount (the "") equal to the lesser of (x) $10,000,000 or (y) the Accordion Amount less all previous increases in the Revolving Commitment Amount pursuant to this Section. Borrower shall make each such request by giving notice to Agent no later than forty-five (45) days prior to the Accordion Expiration Date, which notice shall set forth the amount (which shall be no less than the Minimum Request) of the requested increase in the Revolving Commitment Amount (the "") and such other details with respect to such increase as Agent shall reasonably request. Agent will use commercially reasonable efforts, with the assistance of Borrower, to arrange a syndicate of Lenders with Revolving Commitments (including the then-existing Revolving Commitments) aggregating the then existing Revolving Commitment Amount plus the Requested Increase. Upon receipt of notice as aforesaid from Borrower, Agent shall promptly send a copy of such notice to each Lender and shall request that each Lender increase its Revolving Commitment by an amount equal to its Commitment Percentage of the Requested Increase (the ""). Each Lender shall have the right, but not the obligation, to increase its Revolving Commitment by an amount equal to its Commitment Percentage of the Requested Increase, and shall have a period of fifteen (15) days from the First Solicitation to notify Agent whether or not such Lender elects so to increase its Revolving Commitment. Any Lender that fails to respond to the First Solicitation in writing within such fifteen (15)-day period will be deemed to have elected not to increase its Revolving Commitment. If all Lenders elect to increase their respective Revolving Commitments by amounts equal to their respective Commitment Percentages of the Requested Increase, Agent shall so notify Borrower, Agent and each of the Lenders, and Borrower shall proceed in accordance with below. If any Lender (any such Lender, a "") shall not elect or shall be deemed to have elected not to increase its Revolving Commitment as aforesaid, (i) the amount of such Declining Lender's Revolving Commitment shall be unchanged, (ii) Agent shall notify Borrower and each of the Lenders as to which Lenders have elected to increase their Revolving Commitments and by what amounts and (iii) if Borrower so requests, Agent shall use commercially reasonable efforts to either (A) solicit from the Lenders that elected to increase their respective Revolving Commitments a further increase in their Revolving Commitments in an aggregate amount equal to all or any portion of the aggregate amount of the Declining Lenders' Commitment Percentage of the Requested Increase (the "") or (B) submit a list of proposed syndicate members that are not then a party to this Agreement to Borrower for its review and approval (such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) in order to obtain additional commitments in an amount equal to the Shortfall. From and after the
Minimum Request
Requested Increase
First Solicitation
Section 3.6(b)
Declining Bank
Shortfall
 
Accordion Expiration Date, Agent shall have no further obligation to syndicate the Facility or to obtain or accept any additional Revolving Commitments except to the extent that Agent may be continuing to use commercially reasonable efforts to satisfy any Requested Increase that is timely given in accordance with this .
Section 3.6(a)
 
(b) In connection with increases to the Revolving Commitments of some or all of the Lenders as provided in above, Borrower shall execute supplemental Notes (the "") evidencing such increases, as well as such other confirmatory modifications to this Agreement as Agent shall reasonably request. In connection with the addition of lenders as a result of solicitations by Agent pursuant to clause (B) of above (""), Borrower, Agent and each New Lender shall execute an acceptance letter in the form of (""). Borrower shall execute a Note payable to each New Lender in the amount of the New Lender's Revolving Commitment (a "") and Borrower and Agent (with the consent of only the New Lenders and those Lenders increasing their Revolving Commitments) shall execute such confirmatory modifications to this Agreement as Agent shall reasonably request, whereupon the New Lender shall become, and have the rights and obligations of, a "Lender", with a Revolving Commitment in the amount set forth in such Acceptance Letter. The Lenders shall have no right of approval with respect to a New Lender's becoming a Lender or the amount of its Revolving Commitment. Each Supplemental Note and New Note shall constitute one of the Unsecured Revolving Promissory Notes constituting the "Note" for all purposes of this Agreement.
Section 3.6(a)
Supplemental Notes
Section 3.6(a)
New Lenders
Exhibit F
Acceptance Letter
New Note
 
(c) If at the time a New Lender becomes a Lender (or a Lender increases its Revolving Commitment) pursuant to this Section there is any principal outstanding under the Note of the previously admitted Lenders (the ""), such New Lender (or Lender increasing its Revolving Commitment) shall remit to Agent an amount equal to the Outstanding Percentage (as defined below) multiplied by the Revolving Commitment of the New Lender (or the amount of the increase in the Revolving Commitment of a Lender increasing its Revolving Commitment), which amount shall be deemed advanced under the Revolving Commitment of the New Lender (or the Lender increasing its Revolving Commitment). Agent shall pay such amount to the Existing Lenders in accordance with the Existing Lenders' respective Commitment Percentages (as calculated immediately prior to the admission of the New Lender (or the increase in a Lender's Revolving Commitment)), and such payment shall effect an automatic reduction of the outstanding principal balance under the respective Notes of the Existing Lenders. For purposes of this Section, the term "" means the ratio of (i) the aggregate outstanding principal amount under all of the Notes of the Existing Lenders, immediately prior to the admission of the New Lender (or the increase in the Revolving Commitment of a Lender), to (ii) the aggregate of the Revolving Commitments of the Existing Lenders (as increased pursuant to this Section, if applicable) and the New Lenders.
Existing Lenders
Outstanding Percentage
 
(d) The fees payable by the Borrower upon any increase of the Revolving Commitments shall be as set forth in the Fee Letter and agreed upon by the Borrower, the Agent, the New Lenders and those Lenders increasing their Revolving Commitments. Nothing in this shall constitute or be deemed to constitute an agreement or commitment by any Lender to increase its Revolving Commitment hereunder.
Section 3.6
 
 
Borrower represents and warrants to Agent and Lenders that:
 
4.1
Legal Status of Borrower
 
Borrower is a limited partnership, duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Maryland and is duly authorized to transact business in the jurisdictions in which the Approved Assets owned by it are located, and has all power, authority, permits, consents, authorizations and licenses necessary to carry on its business, to acquire, develop, demolish, construct, renovate, expand, equip, own and operate each Approved Asset owned by Borrower and to execute, deliver and perform this Agreement and the other Loan Documents; and this Agreement and the other Loan Documents executed to date by Borrower have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by and on behalf of Borrower so as to constitute this Agreement and said other Loan Documents the valid and binding obligations of Borrower, enforceable in accordance with their terms.
 
4.2
No Breach of Applicable Agreements or Laws
 
The consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and the execution, delivery and/or performance of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents will not result in any breach of or constitute a default under the organizational documents of Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary, any mortgage, deed of trust, lease, bank loan, credit agreement, guaranty or other instrument or violate any Governmental Requirements, to which Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary is a party, or by which Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary may be bound or affected.
 
4.3
No Litigation or Defaults
 
There are no actions, suits or proceedings pending or, to the knowledge of Borrower, threatened, in writing, against or affecting Borrower, Guarantor, any Approved Subsidiary or the Approved Assets, in which an adverse result would have a material adverse effect upon Borrower, Guarantor, any Approved Subsidiary or the Approved Assets, except as listed on attached hereto and hereby made a part hereof, or involving the validity or enforceability of the Loan Documents or the priority of the lien thereof, at law or in equity; and, to the best knowledge of Borrower, Guarantor and any Approved Subsidiary, none of Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary is in default under any order, writ, injunction, decree or demand of any court or any administrative body having jurisdiction over Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary.
Schedule 4.3
 
4.4
Financial and Other Information
 
The financial statements of, and other financial and cash flow information for, Borrower, Guarantor and all Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis previously or hereafter delivered to Agent fairly and accurately present, or will, in all material respects, fairly and accurately present, the financial condition of Borrower, Guarantor and such Subsidiaries
 
on a consolidated basis as of the dates of such statements and information, and the cash flows of Borrower, Guarantor and such Subsidiaries for the periods covered by such information, and neither this Agreement nor any document, financial statement, financial, cash flow or credit information, certificate or statement referred to herein or furnished to Agent by Borrower, Guarantor and such Subsidiaries contains, or will contain, any untrue statement of a material fact or omits, or will omit, a material fact, or is or will be misleading in any material respect.
 
4.5
No Defaults under Loan Documents or Other Agreements
 
There is no default or Event of Default on the part of Borrower under the Loan Documents and none of Borrower, Guarantor nor any Approved Subsidiary is in default beyond applicable notice, grace or cure periods under any instrument or agreement under and subject to which any recourse indebtedness in excess of $100,000.00 in the aggregate or any nonrecourse indebtedness in excess of $10,000,000.00 in the aggregate for borrowed money has been issued or is secured.
 
4.6
Fiscal Years
 
The fiscal year of Borrower, Guarantor and all Subsidiaries ends on December 31.
 
4.7
Guarantor
 
Guarantor is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Maryland, and has all power, authority, permits, consents, authorizations and licenses necessary to carry on its business in the State of Maryland and to execute, deliver and perform the Guaranty and the other Loan Documents to which it is or will be a party, and all actions required to authorize the execution, delivery and performance by it of the Guaranty and such other Loan Documents have been duly taken and are in full force and effect; and the Guaranty and such other Loan Documents have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by and on behalf of Guarantor so as to constitute the Guaranty and such other Loan Documents, when executed by Guarantor, to be the valid and binding obligations of Guarantor, enforceable in accordance with their terms.
 
4.8
No Brokers
 
Borrower has not (nor has any Approved Subsidiary) dealt with any brokers in connection with this Loan and no brokerage fees or commissions are payable by or to any person in connection with this Agreement or the Advances. Neither Agent nor any Lender shall be responsible for the payment of any fees or commissions to any broker and Borrower shall indemnify, defend and hold Agent and Lenders harmless from and against any claims, liabilities, obligations, damages, costs and expenses (including attorneys' fees and disbursements) made against or incurred by Agent and Lenders as a result of claims made by any broker or person claiming by, through or under Borrower, Guarantor or their affiliates in connection with the Loan.
 
4.9
No Violation of Usury Laws
 
The undersigned represents and warrants that the Loan and this Note are made exclusively for business purposes in connection with holding, developing, and managing real estate for profit, within the meaning and intent of Maryland Code Annotated, Commercial Law Section 12-103(e), as amended, and that none of the proceeds of the Loan or the Note will be used for personal, family or household purposes of any person.
 
4.10
Subsidiaries
 
Except for Saul Subsidiary I Limited Partnership, Saul Subsidiary II Limited Partnership, Guarantor, Saul QRS, Inc., Avenel VI, Inc., Briggs Chaney Plaza, LLC, Kentlands Lot 1, LLC and Saul Monocacy, LLC, there are no entities which are required under GAAP to be consolidated with Borrower for financial reporting purposes, except as otherwise disclosed to Agent in writing from time to time. Each Approved Subsidiary is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing in the state of its organization and is duly authorized to transact business in the jurisdictions in which the Approved Assets owned by it are located, and has all power, authority, permits, consents, authorizations and licenses necessary to carry on its business, to acquire, develop, demolish, construct, renovate, expand, equip, own and operate each Approved Asset owned by it and to execute, deliver and perform the Subsidiary Guaranty required under hereof, and such Subsidiary Guaranty and any other Loan Documents executed to date by such Approved Subsidiary have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by and on behalf of such Approved Subsidiary so as to constitute such Subsidiary Guaranty and said other Loan Documents the valid and binding obligations of said Approved Subsidiary, enforceable in accordance with their terms.
Section 5.09.E
 
4.11
Miscellaneous
 
Borrower is not (nor is any Approved Subsidiary),
 
A. Engaged principally or as one of its important activities in the business of extending credit for the purpose of purchasing or carrying margin stock (as defined in Regulation U of the Board), and the value of all margin stock owned by Borrower does not constitute more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the value of the assets of Borrower. No portion of any Advance is to be used, and no portion of any Letter of Credit is to be obtained, for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any "margin security" or "margin stock" as such terms are used in Regulations U and X of the Board, 12 C.F.R. Parts 221 and 224.
 
B. An "investment company" or a company "controlled" by an investment company within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
 
C. A "holding company" or a "subsidiary company" of a holding company or an "affiliate" of a holding company or a subsidiary company of a holding company within the meaning of the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935, as amended.
 
4.12
REIT Status
 
Guarantor has not taken any action that would prevent it from maintaining its existence as a qualified real estate investment trust within the meaning of the Internal Revenue Code or from maintaining such qualification at all times during the term of the Revolving Commitment and for so long as any Letter of Credit remains outstanding.
 
4.13
Title to Properties
 
The Borrower (or an Approved Subsidiary) has good title as of the Closing Date to the Approved Assets (with respect to Approved Assets designated as such on the Closing Date, as identified on hereto) or the date of designation as an Approved Asset (with respect to Approved Assets acquired and/or designated as such after the Closing Date), and in each case to the best of its knowledge thereafter; the Borrower (or an Approved Subsidiary) holds good and clear record and marketable fee simple title thereto, subject to no mortgages, conditional sales agreements, title retention agreements, liens or, except as otherwise set forth in the title reports delivered by Borrower, encumbrances.
Exhibit E
 
. Borrower, and each Approved Subsidiary as to Real Estate Assets owned by it, hereby represents and warrants that as of the date hereof, no Disqualifying Environmental Event, release or, to Borrower's (and such Approved Subsidiary's, as applicable) knowledge, threatened release of Hazardous Substances, violation of Environmental Laws or similar environmental event with respect to any Approved Asset that could become a Disqualifying Environmental Event has occurred with respect to the Approved Assets which remains uncured.
4.14
Representation as to Environmental Matters
 
THE WARRANTIES AND REPRESENTATIONS IN THIS , AND ANY ADDITIONAL REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES CONTAINED HEREIN AND IN THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS, SHALL BE DEEMED TO HAVE BEEN RENEWED AND RESTATED BY BORROWER AND GUARANTOR AT THE TIME OF EACH REQUEST BY BORROWER FOR AN ADVANCE.
ARTICLE IV
 
 
While this Agreement is in effect, and until Agent and Lenders have been paid in full the principal of and interest on all Advances made by Lenders hereunder and all other amounts payable hereunder and under the other Loan Documents and so long as any Letter of Credit is outstanding:
 
5.1
Paying Costs of Loan
 
Borrower shall pay all reasonable costs and expenses of Agent and all costs and expenses of Borrower (and any Approved Subsidiary) in connection with each Approved Asset and the Loan, the preparation and review of the Loan Documents and the evaluation, making, closing, funding, administration, transfer and/or repayment of the Loan and the review of Unencumbered Assets, including but not limited to the attorneys' fees, consultants' fees, administration fees, and all other costs and expenses payable to third parties incurred by Agent or Borrower in connection with the Loan. Such costs and expenses shall be so paid by Borrower whether or not the Loan is fully advanced.
 
5.2
Maintenance of Ownership Structure
 
B.F. Saul II or B.F. Saul III, members of their respective families and trusts for the benefit of any of the same and companies or other entities controlled directly or indirectly, by any of the same, shall at all times own, directly or indirectly, at least ten percent (10%), in the aggregate, of (x) the limited partnership units of Borrower, and (y) the common stock of Guarantor on a fully diluted basis.
 
5.3
Keeping of Records
 
Borrower shall set up and maintain accurate and complete books, accounts and records pertaining to each Approved Asset in a manner reasonably acceptable to Agent. Borrower will permit representatives of Agent to have free access to and to inspect and copy all books, records and contracts of Borrower relating to each Approved Asset, and will permit representatives of Agent to have free access to and to inspect and copy all other books, records and contracts of Borrower at all reasonable times and upon reasonable prior notice to Borrower. Any such inspection shall be for the sole benefit and protection of Agent, and neither Agent nor any Lender shall have any obligation to disclose the results thereof to Borrower or to any third party.
 
5.4
Providing Financial Information
 
Borrower shall furnish to Agent such financial information concerning Borrower and Guarantor, and Borrower's and Guarantor's other assets and investments, as Agent may reasonably request, and shall furnish to Agent, at Borrower's sole cost and expense the following:
 
A. . Not later than one hundred ten (110) days after the end of each fiscal year, a consolidated balance sheet, a consolidated statement of profit and loss and consolidated statement of cash flows, as of the end of such fiscal year, for the Borrower and Guarantor, on a consolidated basis certified by independent accountants satisfactory to Agent as being complete and correct and fairly presenting the financial condition and results of operations as of the end of such year and for that fiscal year for Borrower and Guarantor together with a statement from the chief financial officer for Borrower and the Guarantor, in the forms attached hereto as and .
Fiscal Year
Exhibits B-4
B-5
 
B.
.
Fiscal Quarter
 
(i) Not later than forty five (45) days after the end of each fiscal quarter, ending March 31, June 30 and September 30, a balance sheet, statement of profit and loss and statement of cash flows for such fiscal quarter, for the Guarantor and its consolidated subsidiaries, to be prepared on an accrual basis and certified as complete and correct by the chief financial officer of such entities; and
 
(ii) Not later than forty five (45) days after the end of each fiscal quarter, a statement from the chief financial officer for the Borrower and the Guarantor, in the forms attached hereto as and , together with documentation showing all calculations necessary to support such statement.
Exhibits B-4
B-5
 
C. Copies of all 8Ks, 10Ks and 10Qs filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, the Maryland State Securities Commission, and any other state regulators regarding the Guarantor, which shall be delivered to Agent as and when filed or distributed; and
 
D. Not later than sixty (60) days after the end of each fiscal year, a copy of the pro forma operating and capital budgets for each of the Approved Assets for the succeeding fiscal year, which Budget shall be in form satisfactory to the Agent, in its reasonable discretion.
 
E. Not later than forty-five (45) days after the end of each fiscal quarter, a copy of the rent roll for each of the Approved Assets as of the end of such quarter in form satisfactory to the Agent, and a tenant lease expiration summary, each certified as being true, correct and complete by the chief financial officer of the Borrower.
 
F. Such other statements or reports as the Lenders may through Agent reasonably request in form and detail satisfactory to such Lenders.
 
All such financial statements shall be in reasonable detail, shall be prepared in general accordance with GAAP (except that assets may be valued based on market value), or in accordance with another accounting method acceptable to Agent, and shall be certified as true, correct and complete by Borrower (by its chief financial officer) or Guarantor. In addition, Borrower shall permit Agent and each Lender to examine all of Borrower's and Guarantor's books and records pertaining thereto.
 
5.5
Maintaining Insurance Coverage
 
Borrower shall, at all times until Agent and Lenders have been fully repaid all indebtedness evidenced by the Note, maintain, or cause to be maintained, in effect, adequate insurance with respect to each Approved Asset, including casualty insurance on a 100% replacement cost basis.
 
5.6
Transferring, Conveying or Encumbering Approved Assets; Payment of Impositions and Liens; Maintenance of Existence
 
Borrower shall not voluntarily or involuntarily agree to, cause, suffer or permit (A) any sale, transfer or conveyance of any interest of Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary, legal or equitable, in any Approved Asset or any part or portion thereof; or (B) any mortgage, pledge, encumbrance or lien to be imposed or remain outstanding against any Approved Asset, or any security interest to exist therein (hereinafter each called an ""), except as created by the Loan Documents (if any). In the event that any Encumbrance arises against any Approved Asset, Borrower shall give written notice thereof to Agent within five (5) days after the imposition of such Encumbrance. Agent shall thereupon recalculate Loan Availability taking into account such Encumbrance. If necessary, Borrower shall make a payment as required pursuant to if Loan Availability is then less than Total Revolving Outstandings.
Encumbrance
Section 2.B.3
 
Borrower shall, before any penalty or interest attaches thereto because of delinquency in payment, pay and discharge, or cause to be paid and discharged, all taxes, assessments, levies and governmental charges imposed upon or against each Approved Asset or upon or against the Note or the indebtedness evidenced hereby (hereinafter referred to as ""). In the event any Impositions are payable in installments, Borrower shall have the right to pay the same in such installments, even though such Impositions then bear interest, so long as Borrower pays each such installment prior to delinquency. Borrower shall not suffer to exist and shall promptly pay and discharge (or cause to be paid and discharged) any mechanic's, statutory or other lien or Encumbrance on the Approved Asset or any part thereof (hereinafter collectively referred to as ""). In the event that any Imposition or Lien arises against any Approved Asset, Borrower shall give written notice thereof to Agent within five (5) days after the occurrence of such Imposition or Lien. Agent shall thereupon recalculate Loan Availability taking into account such Imposition or Lien. If necessary, Borrower shall make a payment as required pursuant to if Loan Availability is then less than Total Revolving Outstandings.
Impositions
Liens
Section 2.B.3
 
Borrower shall maintain (and shall cause any Approved Subsidiary to maintain) its existence as a duly organized and qualified limited partnership (or such other entity, in the case of any Approved Subsidiary), in good standing under the laws of the state of its formation and the laws of each state in which any Approved Asset owned by it is located, and none of Borrower, Guarantor nor any such Approved Subsidiary shall be dissolved, merged, wound-up or terminated. Borrower shall cause Guarantor at all times to (x) maintain its existence as a qualified real estate investment trust (a "") within the meaning of the Internal Revenue Code and not to take any action which could lead to its disqualification as a REIT, (y) except with the prior written consent of Agent, not to be unreasonably withheld, cause its shares to be listed and admitted to trading on the New York Stock Exchange or a successor stock exchange and (z) maintain its existence as a Maryland corporation. Within thirty (30) days after request by Agent from time to time, Guarantor shall provide evidence that Guarantor continues to qualify as a REIT.
REIT
 
5.7
Complying with the Loan Documents, Contracts and Laws
 
Borrower shall cause all of the representations, warranties and covenants herein to remain true and correct during the term of the Loan, shall comply with and perform all of its agreements and obligations under the Loan Documents, and shall comply with all
 
requests by Agent which are consistent with the terms thereof. Borrower shall promptly provide Agent with copies of any notices of default or deficiency received from any creditor under loans with a principal balance in excess of $100,000.00 and shall promptly cure the same. Borrower shall comply in all material respects with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, orders and directions of any governmental authority having jurisdiction over it or its business.
 
5.8
Financial Covenants
 
Borrower hereby covenants and agrees that so long as the Revolving Commitment remains outstanding, as of the end of each fiscal quarter and on each Calculation Date:
 
A. . Borrower shall have Minimum Equity Value of not less than the sum of $400,000,000.00 plus ninety percent (90%) of Net Equity Proceeds.
Minimum Equity Value
 
B. . The ratio of Total Adjusted Outstanding Indebtedness to Capitalization Value does not exceed sixty percent (60%).
Portfolio Loan to Value
 
C. . The ratio of Adjusted EBITDA to Interest Expense is not less than 2.10 to 1.
Interest Expense Coverage
 
D. . The ratio of Adjusted EBITDA to Debt Service is not less than 1.55 to 1.
Debt Service Coverage
 
E. . Not less than sixty percent (60%) of Total Adjusted Committed Indebtedness (other than the Loan, with respect to which only the principal outstanding on the date of calculation shall be included) shall (x) accrue interest at a fixed rate of interest and (y) have an initial term of not less than five (5) years. Absent Majority Lenders' prior written approval, the Revolving Commitment shall constitute the only unsecured indebtedness incurred by Borrower. In addition, Borrower hereby agrees that to the extent Borrower would like to incur secured indebtedness accruing interest at a floating rate of interest from time to time, Borrower shall provide prior written notice to Agent. In the event that at any time Borrower intends to receive advances under indebtedness accruing interest at a floating rate of interest (including the Revolving Commitment), which advances aggregate in excess of the Revolving Commitment Amount, then Borrower shall provide prior written notice thereof to Agent and Agent may thereupon require that the Borrower make interest rate protection arrangements satisfactory to Borrower and Agent with respect to all advances of floating rate indebtedness (including the Revolving Commitment) exceeding in the aggregate the Revolving Commitment Amount. The Borrower shall thereafter maintain such arrangements in full force and effect, and shall not, without the approval of the Majority Lenders, modify, terminate, or transfer such arrangements.
Minimum Fixed Rate Debt
 
F. . Distributions shall not exceed ninety percent (90%) of Funds from Operations with respect to the Borrower and the Guarantor on a consolidated basis (or, if greater, the amount required to be distributed under Section 857(a) of the Code).
Payout Ratio
 
5.9
Miscellaneous
 
Borrower shall, and shall cause each Approved Subsidiary, if applicable, to, also:
 
A. Maintain its qualification to transact business in its state of organization, in each state in which an Approved Asset owned by it is located, and in each jurisdiction where failure so to qualify would permanently preclude Borrower (or such Approved Subsidiary) from enforcing its rights with respect to any material asset or would expose Borrower (or such Approved Subsidiary) to any material liability.
 
B. File all tax returns and reports which are required by law to be filed by it and pay before they become delinquent all taxes, assessments and governmental charges and levies imposed upon it and all claims or demands of any kind which, if unpaid, might result in the creation of a lien upon its property.
 
C. Give prompt written notice to Agent of (i) the breach of any representation, warranty or covenant contained in this Agreement or in any of the Loan Documents (which notice shall be accompanied by a certificate from Borrower in the form of attached hereto); (ii) the creation of any Encumbrance, Lien or Imposition in excess of $50,000.00 against any Approved Asset; (iii) the occurrence of any Capital Event (which notice shall be accompanied by a certificate from Borrower in the form of attached hereto) and any release or threatened release of Hazardous Substances, any violation of Environmental Laws or similar environmental event with respect to a Real Estate Asset that could become a Disqualifying Environmental Event; and (iv) the commencement of any action, suit or proceeding before any court or arbitrator or any governmental department, board, agency or other instrumentality affecting Borrower or Guarantor or any property of Borrower or Guarantor or to which Borrower or Guarantor is a party in which an adverse determination or result could have a material adverse effect on the business, operations, property or condition (financial or otherwise) of Borrower or Guarantor or on the ability of any of them to perform its respective obligations under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, stating the nature and status of such action, suit or proceeding. The Borrower will and will cause the Guarantor to give notice to the Agent in form and detail reasonably satisfactory to the Agent, within ten (10) days of any judgment not covered by insurance, final or otherwise, against the Borrower the Guarantor in an amount in excess of $100,000.
Exhibit B-8
Exhibit B-6
 
D. Maintain, preserve, protect and keep the Real Estate Assets in good repair, working order and condition and make all necessary and proper repairs, renewals and replacements, normal wear and tear excepted. Borrower further covenants and agrees to continue (and cause each Approved Subsidiary to continue) to operate its business in substantially the same fashion as currently in effect, including, without limitation, acquiring Real Estate Assets of the same quality as the Real Estate Assets currently owned by Borrower and operating and maintaining such Real Estate Assets in substantially the same manner and with the same standard of care and quality as is currently employed by Borrower.
 
E. Within thirty (30) days of any entity becoming a Subsidiary of Borrower, Borrower shall deliver to Agent each of the following in form and substance satisfactory to
 
the Agent: (a) a guaranty executed by such Subsidiary in substantially the same form as the guaranty provided by Guaranty of even date herewith (each, a ""), pursuant to which the Subsidiary guaranties the full and prompt payment and performance of all of the Obligations of Borrower under the Loan and (b) the items listed in with respect to such Subsidiary; provided, however, (i) if such Subsidiary is expressly prohibited from becoming a guarantor of the Loan pursuant to a written agreement with a third party financial institution making a loan to such Subsidiary (the ""), then, such Subsidiary shall not be required to enter into a Subsidiary Guaranty of the Loan until such time as the Third Party Loan has been repaid in full or the documents evidencing such Third Party Loan no longer contain such a restriction, or (ii) if such Subsidiary is created solely for administrative purposes and holds no interest in real property, then, such Subsidiary shall not be required to enter into a Subsidiary Guaranty. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event shall (x) an Unencumbered Asset owned by a Subsidiary qualify as an Approved Asset or (y) a Subsidiary qualify as an Approved Subsidiary, unless such Subsidiary shall have provided a Subsidiary Guaranty pursuant to this that remains in full force and effect.
Subsidiary Guaranty
Sections 2.B.1.C through G
Third Party Loan
Section 5.9.E
 
.
5.10
Covenants relating to Environmental Law
 
Borrower covenants and agrees as follows:
 
A. Except for substances of a quantity normally used for maintenance or operation of a commercial office building or retail shopping center, as applicable, which are used, stored and disposed of in accordance with all applicable Environmental Laws (as hereinafter defined), Borrower shall not (and shall not permit any Approved Subsidiary to) place, store, locate, generate, produce, create, process, treat, handle, transport, incorporate, discharge, emit, spill, release, deposit or dispose of any Hazardous Substance (as hereinafter defined) in, upon, under, over or from the Approved Assets, and shall not permit any Hazardous Substance to be placed, stored, located, generated, produced, created, processed, treated, handled, transported, incorporated, discharged, emitted, spilled, released, deposited, disposed of or to escape therein, thereupon, thereunder, thereover or therefrom. Borrower shall cause all Hazardous Substances found on or under the Approved Assets to be properly removed therefrom and properly disposed of at Borrower's sole cost and expense in accordance with all applicable Environmental Laws. Borrower shall not (and shall not permit any Approved Subsidiary to) install or permit to be installed any underground storage tank therein or thereunder, and shall comply (and cause each Approved Subsidiary to comply) with all Environmental Laws which are applicable to the Approved Assets. At any time, and from time to time, in the event Agent determines, in its sole discretion, that there may be an issue with respect to Hazardous Substances or compliance with Environmental Laws with respect to the Approved Assets or if an Event of Default exists hereunder, if Agent so requests, Borrower shall provide to Agent an environmental review, audit, assessment and/or report relating to the Approved Assets, at Borrower's sole cost and expense, by an engineer or scientist acceptable to Agent.
 
B. Borrower shall comply (and shall cause each Approved Subsidiary to comply) with all Accessibility Regulations which are applicable to the Approved Assets.
 
C. Borrower shall, promptly after obtaining knowledge thereof, advise Agent in writing of (i) any activity in violation of any applicable Environmental Law relating to the Approved Assets, (ii) any governmental or regulatory actions (including, without limitation, information requests) instituted or threatened in writing under any Environmental Law or any Accessibility Regulation affecting the Approved Assets, including, without limitation, any notice of inspection, abatement, noncompliance or potential liability, (iii) all claims made or threatened in writing by any third party against Borrower or the Approved Assets relating to any Hazardous Substance or a violation of any Environmental Law or any Accessibility Regulation and (iv) discovery by Borrower of any occurrence or condition on or under the Approved Assets or on or under any real property adjoining or in the vicinity of the Approved Assets which could subject Borrower, Agent, the Lenders or the Approved Assets to a claim under any Environmental Law or Accessibility Regulation or to any restrictions on ownership, occupancy, transferability or use of the Approved Assets under any Environmental Law or Accessibility Regulation. Borrower shall promptly deliver to Agent copies of all orders, notices, permits, applications, or other communications and reports, and of such other documentation or records as Agent may reasonably request, relating to any such activity, Environmental Law, Accessibility Regulation, violations, actions, claims, discovery or event which Borrower receives or which are susceptible of being obtained by Borrower without undue cost or expense and without the necessity for initiating legal proceedings to obtain the same.
 
D. If Borrower or any other Person (including, without limitation, any Approved Subsidiary) undertakes any investigation or corrective action, including, without limitation, any response, removal, detoxification or other remedial action, pursuant to any requirement of any Environmental Law or Accessibility Regulation, Borrower shall obtain and deliver to Agent a written report, in form and substance acceptable to Agent, from a consultant acceptable to Agent, stating that all required action has been properly taken and that, upon completion of said action, the Approved Assets is in compliance with such Environmental Law and/or Accessibility Regulation.
 
 
6.1
Events of Default
 
Each of the following events shall constitute an Event of Default under this Agreement:
 
A. Borrower shall default in the payment of principal due according to the terms hereof or of the Note and shall fail to cure said default within five (5) days after the due date thereof, provided, however, in no event shall such grace period apply with respect to payments due on the Termination Date;
 
B. Borrower shall default in the payment of interest on Advances made by Lenders, or in the payment of any fees, including any Letter of Credit Fee, or any other amounts payable hereunder, under the Note or under any of the other Loan Documents and shall fail to cure said default within five (5) days after the due date thereof;
 
C. Borrower or any Approved Subsidiary shall default in the performance of or fail to observe any of the covenants contained in of this Agreement and such default, if curable, as determined by Agent, is not cured within ten (10) days;
Section 5.8
 
D. Borrower or any Approved Subsidiary shall default in the performance or observance of any other agreement, covenant or condition required to be performed or observed by Borrower under the terms of this Agreement or the Loan Documents, which default, if curable, is not cured within thirty (30) days after Agent gives Borrower written notice thereof other than a default under hereof or any other event, circumstance or omission as to which another notice and/or cure period is provided for hereunder or which otherwise is separately addressed in this .
Section 5.10
Section 6.1
 
E. Borrower or any Approved Subsidiary shall default in the performance of any covenant contained in hereof which is not cured within sixty (60) days; provided, however, in the event that such breach is susceptible of cure but is not cured within said sixty (60) days, so long as Borrower or such Approved Subsidiary is diligently and continuously pursuing such cure, as evidenced to Agent's reasonable satisfaction, Agent shall permit Borrower or such Approved Subsidiary an additional one hundred twenty (120) days to effectuate such cure;
Section 5.10
 
F. Any representation or warranty made by Borrower or Guarantor in this Agreement or in any of the other Loan Documents, or in any certificate or document furnished under the terms of this Agreement or in connection with the Loan, shall be untrue or incomplete in any material respect;
 
G. Any other event or occurrence herein expressly stated to be an Event of Default occurs or exists;
 
H. Any Loan Document is not in full force and effect or a default has occurred and is continuing thereunder after giving effect to any cure or grace period in any such document;
 
I. Any mortgaging, conveyance or other voluntary transfer or encumbrance of any of the Approved Assets or any portion thereof occurs without the prior consent of Agent; provided, however, the prior written consent of all Lenders shall be required with respect to any mortgaging, conveyance or other voluntary transfer or encumbrance of any of the Major Assets or any portion thereof;
 
J. Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary shall commit an act of bankruptcy, shall file a voluntary petition in a bankruptcy, reorganization, composition, readjustment, arrangement, insolvency, liquidation, dissolution or similar proceeding under any present or future statute, law or regulation, shall consent to voluntary or involuntary adjudication in bankruptcy or to reorganization, or shall be adjudicated bankrupt or insolvent under any applicable law or laws pursuant to a voluntary proceeding, or admits, in writing, to having become insolvent or to be unable to pay its debts as they become due, or becomes unable to pay its debts as they mature, or makes an assignment for the benefit of its creditors, or is dissolved, liquidated, terminated or merged, or if it applies for, or if it consents to, the appointment of a trustee, custodian or receiver for it or a substantial portion of its assets;
 
K. A custodian, trustee or receiver is appointed for any portion of the assets of Borrower, Guarantor, or any Approved Subsidiary, or an involuntary petition in bankruptcy or insolvency is filed against Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary and is not discharged within ninety (90) days after such appointment or filing;
 
L. Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary, permits the attachment or judicial seizure of any of its assets with a value in excess of One Hundred Thousand and No/100ths Dollars ($100,000.00);
 
M. Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary, shall be dissolved, liquidated, terminated or merged without Agent's prior written consent or Guarantor shall amend its articles of incorporation without the prior written consent of Agent (except as may be expressly required by law or regulation) or Guarantor shall fail to (x) maintain its existence as a qualified REIT within the meaning of the Internal Revenue Code, (y) except with the prior written consent of Agent, not to be unreasonably withheld, cause its shares to be listed and admitted to trading on the New York Stock Exchange or a successor stock exchange at any time or (z) maintain its existence as a Maryland corporation;
 
N. Guarantor shall be terminated, dissolved, liquidated or wound-up, or shall contest, repudiate or purport to revoke the Guaranty, or the Guaranty for any reason (except pursuant to the express terms thereof) shall cease to be in full force and effect as to Guarantor or shall be judicially declared unenforceable or null and void, or any Approved Subsidiary shall contest, repudiate or purport to revoke its Subsidiary Guaranty given pursuant to , or its Subsidiary Guaranty for any reason (except pursuant to the express terms thereof or pursuant to the dissolution or merger of such subsidiary and consequent distribution of assets to Borrower) shall cease to be in full force and effect as to such Approved Subsidiary or shall be judicially declared unenforceable or null and void;
Section 5.09.E
 
O. Any entity comprising the Borrower or Guarantor is enjoined, restrained or in any way prevented by any court order or judgment or if a notice of lien, levy, or assessment is filed of record with respect to all or any part of the Approved Assets by any governmental department, office or agency which could materially adversely affect the performance of the obligations of such parties hereunder or under the Loan Documents, or if any proceeding is filed or commenced seeking to enjoin, restrain or in any way prevent the foregoing parties from conducting all or a substantial part of their respective business affairs and failure to vacate, stay, dismiss, set aside or remedy any of the foregoing within sixty (60) days after the occurrence thereof;
 
P. The default (after the expiration of any notice or cure periods) under any recourse indebtedness in excess of $100,000.00 in the aggregate or any nonrecourse indebtedness in excess of $10,000,000.00 in the aggregate of Borrower or Guarantor, or the maturity of any recourse indebtedness in excess of $100,000.00 in the aggregate or any nonrecourse indebtedness in excess of $10,000,000.00 in the aggregate of Borrower or Guarantor (other than indebtedness under this Agreement) shall be accelerated, or Borrower or Guarantor shall fail to pay any such recourse indebtedness in excess of $100,000.00 in the aggregate or any nonrecourse indebtedness in excess of
 
$10,000,000.00 in the aggregate, in each case when due (after the lapse of any applicable grace period) or, in the case of such indebtedness payable on demand, when demanded (after the lapse of any applicable grace period), or any event shall occur or condition shall exist and shall continue for more than the period of grace, if any, applicable thereto and shall have the effect of causing, or permitting the holder of any such indebtedness or any trustee or other person, party or entity acting on behalf of such holder to cause, such recourse indebtedness in excess of $100,000.00 in the aggregate or any nonrecourse indebtedness in excess of $10,000,000.00 in the aggregate to become due prior to its stated maturity or to realize upon any collateral given as security therefor;
 
Q. There shall occur a material adverse change of any kind, financial or otherwise with respect to Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary, as determined by Agent in its sole discretion;
 
R. There shall occur any default (after the expiration of any notice or cure periods) under any other loans from one or more Lenders to Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary.
 
6.2
Rights and Remedies
 
Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default, unless such Event of Default is subsequently waived in writing by Agent on behalf of Lenders, Agent, acting on behalf of the Lenders, or Lenders, as the case may be, in each case subject to Section 8.4.C, shall be entitled to exercise any or all of the following rights and remedies, consecutively or simultaneously, and in any order:
 
A. Agent may make one (1) or more further Advances, without liability on the part of the Lenders to make any subsequent Advances.
 
B. Agent may suspend the obligation of the Lenders to make Advances under this Agreement, without notice to Borrower.
 
C. Subject to the provisions of and , Agent may terminate the obligation of the Lenders to make Advances under this Agreement, and declare the entire unpaid principal balance of the Advances made under this Agreement and all Reimbursement Obligations to be immediately due and payable, together with accrued and unpaid interest on such Advances, without notice to or demand on Borrower.
Sections 2.A.9
2.A.10
 
D. Agent may terminate its obligation to issue, extend or renew Letters of Credit.
 
E. Agent may exercise any or all remedies specified herein and/or in the other Loan Documents, and/or any other remedies available at law, in equity or under statute.
 
F. Agent may take action on behalf of Borrower to correct the circumstances which are the subject of the Event of Default, which action shall not be deemed to cure the Event of Default.
 
G. Borrower hereby irrevocably authorizes Lenders to set off any sum due to or incurred by Lenders against all deposits and credits of Borrower with, and any and all claims of Borrower against, Lenders. Such right shall exist whether or not Agent shall have made any demand hereunder or under any other Loan Document, whether or not said sums, or any part thereof, or deposits and credits held for the account of Borrower is or are matured or unmatured, and regardless of the existence or adequacy of any collateral, guaranty or any other security, right or remedy available to Agent. Agent agrees that, as promptly as is reasonably possible after the exercise of any such setoff right, Agent shall notify Borrower of the exercise of such setoff right; provided, however, that the failure of Agent to provide such notice shall not affect the validity of the exercise of such setoff rights. Nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed a waiver or prohibition of or restriction on Lenders to all rights of banker's lien, setoff and counterclaim available pursuant to law.
 
 
7.1
Binding Effect; Waivers; Cumulative Rights and Remedies
 
The provisions of this Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, personal representatives, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the provisions of ; provided, however, that neither this Agreement nor the proceeds of the Loan may be assigned by Borrower voluntarily, by operation of law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of Agent (it being agreed that the prior written consent of all Lenders shall be required if Borrower desires to assign this Agreement). No delay on the part of Agent or Lenders in exercising any right, remedy, power or privilege hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any right, remedy, power or privilege hereunder constitute such a waiver or exhaust the same, all of which shall be continuing. The rights and remedies of Agent and Lenders specified in this Agreement shall be in addition to, and not exclusive of, any other rights and remedies which Agent would otherwise have at law, in equity or by statute, and all such rights and remedies, together with Agent's rights and remedies under the other Loan Documents, are cumulative and may be exercised individually, concurrently, successively and in any order.
Section 5.6
 
7.2
Survival
 
All agreements, representations and warranties made in this Agreement shall survive the execution of this Agreement, the making of the Advances by Lenders, and the execution of the other Loan Documents, and shall continue until Lenders receive payment in full of all indebtedness of Borrower incurred under this Agreement and under the other Loan Documents and for so long as any Letter of Credit remains outstanding.
 
7.3
Governing Law; Waiver of Jury Trial
 
THIS AGREEMENT, THE RIGHTS OF THE PARTIES HEREUNDER, AND THE CONSTRUCTION, INTERPRETATION, VALIDITY AND ENFORCEABILITY HEREOF AND OF ALL OF THE LOAN DOCUMENTS SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND
 
CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE INTERNAL LAWS OF THE STATE OF MARYLAND, WITHOUT GIVING EFFECT TO CONFLICT OF LAWS PRINCIPLES THEREOF, BUT GIVING EFFECT TO FEDERAL LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES RELATING TO NATIONAL BANKS. BORROWER, AGENT AND LENDERS HEREBY WAIVE ANY RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING RELATING TO THE LOAN, THE LOAN DOCUMENTS AND/OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED THEREBY. AT THE OPTION OF LENDERS, THIS AGREEMENT MAY BE ENFORCED IN ANY FEDERAL COURT SITTING IN THE STATE OF MARYLAND OR MARYLAND STATE COURT; AND BORROWER CONSENTS TO THE JURISDICTION AND VENUE OF ANY SUCH COURT AND WAIVES ANY ARGUMENT THAT VENUE IN SUCH FORUM IS NOT CONVENIENT. IN THE EVENT BORROWER COMMENCES ANY ACTION IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION OR VENUE UNDER ANY TORT OR CONTRACT THEORY ARISING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY FROM THE RELATIONSHIP CREATED BY THIS AGREEMENT, AGENT, AT ITS OPTION, SHALL BE ENTITLED TO HAVE THE CASE TRANSFERRED TO ONE OF THE JURISDICTIONS AND VENUES ABOVE-DESCRIBED, OR IF SUCH TRANSFER CANNOT BE ACCOMPLISHED UNDER APPLICABLE LAW, TO HAVE SUCH CASE DISMISSED WITHOUT PREJUDICE.
 
7.4
Counterparts
 
This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, all of which shall constitute a single agreement.
 
7.5
Notices
 
Any notice required or permitted to be given by either Borrower to Agent on behalf of the Banks or by Agent on behalf of the Banks to Borrower under the terms of this Agreement, or documents related hereto, shall be in writing and shall be sent by manual delivery, telegram, facsimile transmission, overnight courier, or United States registered or certified mail, return receipt requested (postage prepaid), addressed to such party at the address specified on the signature page hereof, or at such other address in the United States of America as such party shall have specified to the other party hereto in writing, at least ten (10) days prior to the effective date of said change of address. All periods of notice shall be measured from the date of delivery thereof if manually delivered, from the date of sending thereof if sent by telegram or facsimile transmission, from the first Business Day after the date of sending if sent by overnight courier, or from four (4) days after the date of mailing if so mailed; provided, however, that any notice to Lenders designating, continuing or converting any Advance as or into a LIBOR Rate Advance shall be deemed to have been given upon telephonic notice from Borrower to Agent, as more particularly set forth herein.
 
7.6
No Third Party Reliance
 
No third party shall be entitled to rely upon this Agreement or to have any of the benefits of any Lender's interest hereunder, unless such third party is an express assignee of all or a portion of Lenders' interest hereunder.
 
7.7 []
Intentionally Omitted.
 
7.8
Time of the Essence
 
Time is of the essence hereof with respect to the dates, terms and conditions of this Agreement.
 
7.9
Entire Agreement; No Oral Modifications
 
This Agreement, the Guaranty, the other Loan Documents and the other documents mentioned herein set forth the entire agreement of the parties with respect to the Loan and supersede all prior written or oral understandings and agreements between them with respect thereto. No modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement shall be effective unless set forth in writing and signed by the parties hereto.
 
7.10
Captions
 
The headings or captions of the Articles and Sections set forth herein are for convenience only, are not a part of this Agreement and are not to be considered in interpreting this Agreement.
 
7.11
Borrower-Lender Relationship
 
The relationship between Borrower, Agent and Lenders created hereby and by the other Loan Documents shall be that of a borrower and a lender only, and in no event shall Agent or any Lender be deemed to be a partner of, or a joint venturer with, Borrower.
 
7.12
Rules of Interpretation
 
In this Agreement, in the computation of a period of time from a specified date to a later specified date, unless otherwise stated, the word "from" means "from and including" and the word "to" or "until" each means "to but excluding". The words "hereof", "herein" and "hereunder" and words of similar import when used in this Agreement shall refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular provision of this Agreement. References to Sections, Subsections, Exhibits, schedules and like references are to this Agreement unless otherwise expressly provided. The words "include", "includes" and "including" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation". Unless the context in which used herein otherwise clearly requires, "or" has the inclusive meaning represented by the phrase "and/or" where permitted by the context.
 
7.13
Expenses
 
Borrower agrees to pay (a) the costs of producing and reproducing this Agreement, the other Loan Documents and the other agreements and instruments mentioned herein, (b) the reasonable fees, expenses and disbursements of the Agent's outside counsel or any local counsel to the Agent incurred in connection with the preparation, administration or interpretation of the Loan Documents and other instruments mentioned herein, each closing hereunder, and amendments, modifications, approvals, consents or waivers hereto or hereunder, (c) the fees, expenses and disbursements of the Agent incurred by the Agent
 
in connection with the preparation, administration or interpretation of the Loan Documents and other instruments mentioned herein, including, without limitation, the costs incurred by the Agent in connection with its inspection of the Unencumbered Assets, and the fees and disbursements of the Agent's counsel in preparing the documentation, (d) [intentionally omitted], (e) all expenses (including attorneys' fees and costs, which attorneys may be employees of any Lender or the Agent, and the fees and costs of appraisers, engineers, investment bankers, surveyors or other experts retained by the Lender or Agent in connection with any such enforcement proceedings) incurred by any Lender or the Agent in connection with (i) the enforcement of or preservation of rights under any of the Loan Documents against the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries or any Guarantor or the administration thereof after the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default (including, without limitation, expenses incurred in any restructuring and/or "workout" of the Loan), and (ii) any litigation, proceeding or dispute whether arising hereunder or otherwise, in any way related to any Lender's or the Agent's relationship with the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries or any Guarantor, (f) all reasonable fees, expenses and disbursements of the Agent incurred in connection with title searches, and (g) all costs incurred by the Agent in the future in connection with its inspection(s) of the Unencumbered Assets. The covenants of this Section shall survive payment or satisfaction of payment of amounts owing with respect to the Note.
 
 
.
8.1
Agency
 
A. . Each Lender hereby appoints and authorizes Agent to act as sole agent under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, authorizes and directs Agent to enter into the Loan Documents other than this Agreement for the benefit of the Lenders, and authorizes the Agent to take such action on its behalf under the provisions of this Agreement and the Loan Documents and to exercise such powers as are set forth herein or therein, together with such other powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. In furtherance thereof, Lenders hereby ratify the execution and delivery by Agent of this Agreement, the acceptance by Agent of all of the other Loan Documents and the terms and conditions of the Loan Documents. The Agent hereby accepts such appointment. Agent shall exercise all rights and powers of Agent under this Agreement, including the administration of the Loan and disbursement of Advances, except as otherwise expressly provided in this Agreement. The Borrower, without further inquiry or investigation, shall, and is hereby authorized by the Lenders to, assume that all actions taken by the Agent hereunder and in connection with or under the Loan Documents are duly authorized by the Lenders.
Appointment and Authorization
 
B. .
Non-Liability of Agent and Indemnity
 
(1) Agent shall have no duties or responsibilities except those expressly set forth in this Agreement or in the other Loan Documents. Agent shall administer the Loan in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement in the same manner as it customarily does for similar loans for its own account. The duties of the Agent shall be mechanical and administrative in nature; the Agent shall not have by reason of this
 
Agreement a fiduciary relationship in respect of any Lender; and nothing in this Agreement or any Loan Document, expressed or implied, is intended to or shall be so construed as to impose upon the Agent any obligations in respect of this Agreement or any Loan Document except as expressly set forth herein or therein. Neither Agent nor any of its respective directors, officers, agents or employees shall be liable to any Lender for any action taken or not taken by them under or in connection with this Agreement or under any of the other Loan Documents other than Agent's gross negligence and willful misconduct. In this regard, Agent may consult with independent legal counsel, accountants and other professionals or experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it or them in good faith in accordance with the advice of such legal counsel, accountants or other professionals or experts. In the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, Agent shall not be liable for any apportionment or distribution of payments made by it in good faith pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, and if any such apportionment or distribution is subsequently determined to have been made in error, the sole recourse of any person to whom payment was due, but not made, shall be to recover from the recipients of such payments any payment in excess of the amount to which they are determined to have been entitled.
 
(2) In the event the Agent is not reimbursed and indemnified by the Borrower, within ten (10) Business Days of demand therefor by Agent, each Lender will reimburse and indemnify the Agent, and its directors, officers, agents and employees, in proportion to its respective Commitment Percentage of the Loan, for and against any claims, actions, judgments, costs, expenses or disbursements of whatsoever kind or nature which may be imposed on, asserted against or incurred by the Agent, or its directors, officers, agents, or employees in performing its duties hereunder or under any Loan Document; provided, however, that no Lender shall be liable for any of the foregoing to the extent that they arise from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the party to be indemnified. The obligations of the Lenders under this shall survive the payment in full of all obligations of Borrower and the termination of this Agreement.
Section 8.1.B(2)
 
.
8.2
Resignation of Agent; Removal
 
A. U.S. Bank National Association or any successor agent may resign as Agent at any time by written notice delivered to the Borrower and the Lenders (if any). Such resignation shall be effective upon the earlier to occur of thirty (30) days following such notice or a successor's acceptance of appointment as the Agent. In addition, in the event of Agent's gross negligence or willful misconduct (as determined by all Lenders) or for cause duly shown (as determined by the Majority Lenders), Agent may be removed by giving thirty (30) days prior written notice to Agent and Borrower; provided, however, for purposes of calculating such approval in this context, Agent shall be deemed a Defaulting Lender and its Commitment Percentage shall therefore be disregarded and excluded for voting purposes only.
 
B. In the case of any of the events described in , (A) the Majority Lenders shall appoint a successor Agent from among the Lenders so long as such successor meets the requirements described in and hereof; provided, however, that the resigning Agent shall be entitled to appoint a successor agent who, so long as no Event of Default exists hereunder, has been approved by Borrower, which
Section 8.2.A
Sections 8.8.A(2)
8.8.A(3)
 
approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed, and who meets the requirements of and as Agent, if the Majority Lenders have not appointed a successor within thirty (30) days after the date the resigning Agent gave notice of resignation; (B) upon a successor's acceptance of appointment (and assumption of the Agent's obligations hereunder arising after the date of such appointment), the successor will thereupon succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the resigning or removed Agent; (C) upon the effectiveness of any resignation or removal, the resigning or removed Agent will thereupon be discharged from the duties and obligations of Agent which thereafter arise under the Credit Agreement; and (D) any resigning Agent shall have the benefit of any indemnities provided in the Loan Documents and this Agreement.
Sections 8.8.A(2)
8.8.A(3)
 
.
8.3
Administration
 
A. . Each Lender shall reimburse the Agent for its Commitment Percentage of any expenses with respect to the administration, enforcement or collection of the Loan which are not reimbursed by the Borrower pursuant to and within the period required by the Loan Documents, or if not specified in the Loan Documents, promptly after the date of demand therefor made by the Agent, other than those resulting directly from Agent's gross negligence or willful misconduct. The Agent shall have the right, but not the obligation, to incur such expenditures prior to reimbursement therefor by the Lenders.
Expenses
 
B. . Except for the Note executed in favor of each Lender and for Loan Documents sent for filing or recording (which are not returned following recording), Agent shall hold and maintain a duplicate set of all original Loan Documents. The Agent shall promptly deliver to each Lender a copy or counterpart of execution copy of each Loan Document. The Agent shall forward, within four (4) Business Days after receipt, to each Lender a copy of each financial statement of Borrower or rent roll or other financial statement for the Real Estate Assets received from Borrower. Upon request of any Lender, the Agent shall promptly forward to such Lender each financial statement of Borrower received by Agent. The Lenders may, upon reasonable prior notice and during the Agent's normal business hours, inspect and make copies of such books and records of Agent that relate to this Loan.
Documents; Information; Inspection
 
.
8.4
Actions by Agent; Required Consents
 
A. Except as specified below, Agent shall exercise its sole discretion to act or not to act under the Loan Documents and the appropriate action with respect thereto. Such discretion may be exercised with respect to the granting of approvals, consents, and modifications under the Loan Documents and with respect to the exercise or refraining from exercise of rights under the Loan Documents.
 
B. Notwithstanding , the following matters shall require the prior consent of all of the Lenders:
Section 8.4.A
 
(1) any change (other than as currently contemplated in the Loan Documents) in the interest rate under the Loan;
 
(2) any reduction in the amount of any payment of any fees other than fees paid solely to the Agent;
 
(3) release of any guarantor;
 
(4) any change (other than by operation of the Loan Documents) in the Maturity Date of the Loan or in the conditions for extension of the Maturity Date;
 
(5) any release, termination, modification or amendment of any indemnity provided in the Loan Documents;
 
(6) any forgiveness of principal, interest or other amounts payable under the Loan (other than late fees) or any extension of time for payment of principal or interest;
 
(7) any increase in the Revolving Commitment Amount (as such may be increased in accordance with the provisions of Section 3.6(a) hereof) or the Loan;
 
(8) any amendment to the covenants contained in hereof;
Section 5.8
 
(9) any amendment to this or ; and
Section 8.4.B
Section 8.2
 
(10) any change in the definition of "Majority Lenders."
 
C. Notwithstanding , the prior consent of the Majority Lenders shall be required for the acceleration of any indebtedness under the Loan Documents, or the pursuit of remedies against the Borrower;
Section 8.4.B
 
D. In case one or more Events of Default have occurred and shall be continuing, and whether or not acceleration of the Loan shall have occurred, the Agent shall, if (a) so requested by the Majority Lenders and (b) the Lenders have provided to the Agent such additional indemnities and assurances against expenses and liabilities as the Agent may reasonably request, proceed to enforce the provisions of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and exercise all or any such other legal and equitable and other rights or remedies as it may have in respect of enforcement of the Lenders' rights against the Borrower under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents. The Majority Lenders may direct the Agent in writing as to the method and the extent of any such enforcement, the Lenders (including any Lender which is not one of the Majority Lenders so directing the Agent in writing) hereby agreeing to ratably and severally indemnify and hold the Agent harmless from all liabilities incurred in respect of all actions taken or omitted in accordance with such directions, provided that the Agent need not comply with any such direction to the extent that the Agent reasonably believes the Agent's compliance with such direction to be unlawful or commercially unreasonable in any applicable jurisdiction.
 
.
8.5
Payments
 
A. . Lenders and Agent specifically agree to the following operational and administrative procedures as between themselves:
Interest Rates and Disbursement Matters
 
(1) The Prime Rate (as established from time to time) shall in each instance be the rate established from time to time by Agent.
 
(2) Agent shall notify each Lender by telephone or facsimile of the election by the Borrower (A) to apply the Loan Rate one (1) Business Day prior to the date on which the Loan Rate shall be effective and (B) to apply the LIBOR Rate two (2) Business Days prior to the date on which the LIBOR Rate shall be effective. Agent shall notify each Lender by telephone or facsimile of its Commitment Percentage of a proposed Advance of the Loan and the date of such disbursement two (2) Business Days prior to such disbursement with respect to disbursements which are to bear interest at the Loan Rate or the LIBOR Rate, such notice to be delivered by facsimile. All notices from Agent to the Lenders shall also include: (i) the amount of such Advance requested by Borrower, (ii) the amount approved for advance by Agent, (iii) each Lender's Commitment Percentage of such proposed Advance, and (iv) the date such Advance is scheduled to be made to Borrower. Each Lender may request copies of any additional materials submitted to Agent by Borrower after Agent and the Lenders have made any Advance. Each Lender shall deposit by wire transfer of Immediately Available Funds to Agent's account as specified on hereto the amount of such Commitment Percentage no later than 11:00 a.m. (Central time) on the date of such disbursement.
Exhibit D
 
Unless Agent shall have been notified by any Lender not later than the close of business (Central time) on the Business Day immediately preceding the date for funding in respect of any Advance that such Lender does not intend to make available to Agent such Lender's Commitment Percentage of such Advance, Agent may assume that such Lender has made such amount available to Agent. In any case where a Lender does not for any reason make available to Agent such Lender's Commitment Percentage of such Advance, Agent, in its sole discretion, may, but shall not be obligated to, fund to Borrower such Lender's Commitment Percentage of such Advance. If the amount so funded by Agent is not in fact made available to Agent by the responsible Lender, then such Lender hereby assigns to Agent any payments received by Agent from Borrower in repayment of such amount, together with interest thereon at the rate applicable to such Advance.
 
(3) If any Lender fails to deliver funds to Agent for a disbursement by the time required by above, such Lender shall pay to Agent interest on such funds at the Federal Funds Rate, as announced by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, for each day (or portion thereof) until such funds are delivered. Any interest paid pursuant to this section shall be divided among the Lenders which funded the applicable disbursement.
subsection (2)
 
(4) Agent shall wire transfer to each Lender at such Lender's account as designated on hereto its Commitment Percentage of any payments (to the extent payable pursuant to ) within one (1) Business Day of Agent's receipt of such
Exhibit D
Section 8.5.B)
 
payment. Agent shall pay to the Lenders interest thereon, at the Federal Funds Rate from the Business Day following receipt of such funds by Agent until such funds are paid in Immediately Available Funds to the Lender.
 
(5) Any Lender desiring to make a claim for costs or taxes payable by Borrower shall deliver a certificate to Agent setting forth the basis and calculation thereof and the Agent shall forward such certificate to the Borrower. Except as provided in the Loan Documents, each Lender shall be responsible for any taxes payable in respect of amounts paid hereunder. All payments made by Agent to Lenders shall be made without withholding for taxes, charges, or levies, except as may be required by law. Each Lender shall on demand from Agent provide completed and signed copies of certificates required to show exemption of such Lender from United States withholding taxes.
 
B. . Lenders and Agent agree that all payments made and actually received by the Agent in respect of the Loan (from any person or source) shall be applied in the following order of priority (based on Commitment Percentages thereof):
Application of Recoveries
 
(1) to the reimbursement of any costs incurred by the Agent to administer, enforce, collect or deal with the Loan (including payments made pursuant to hereof (or to reimbursement of the Lenders to the extent such costs have been paid by the Lenders);
Sections 8.5.A(2) and (3)
 
(2) to the payment of all interest (including interest calculated at the Default Rate) due and payable on the Note;
 
(3) to the payment of fees payable under the Loan Documents;
 
(4) to the payment of principal of the Note; and
 
(5) to the Borrower.
 
C. . If any Lender shall obtain any payment (whether voluntary, involuntary, through the exercise of any right of set-off or otherwise) on account of its interest in the Loan in excess of its Commitment Percentage in the Loan, such Lender will pay the excess to Agent and Agent shall pay to the other Lenders their respective proportionate share thereof; provided, however, that if all or any portion of such excess payment is thereafter recovered by the Borrower or other party entitled thereto through legal action or otherwise, each Lender shall reimburse the party returning such excess payment in an amount equal to such Lender's Commitment Percentage of the excess payment.
Excess Payments
 
D. . If in the reasonable opinion of the Agent the distribution of any amount received by it in such capacity hereunder or under any of the other Loan Documents might involve it in material liability, it may refrain from making distribution until its right to make distribution shall have been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction, provided that the Agent shall invest any such undistributed amounts in overnight obligations on behalf of the Lenders and interest thereon shall be
Liability for Advances
 
paid pro rata to the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitment Percentages. If a court of competent jurisdiction shall adjudge that any amount received and distributed by the Agent is to be repaid, each Person to whom any such distribution shall have been made shall either repay to the Agent its proportionate share of the amount so adjudged to be repaid or shall pay over the same in such manner and to such Persons as shall be determined by such court.
 
.
8.6
Defaulting Lender
 
A. . If for any reason any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then in addition to the rights and remedies that may be available to the Agent and the other Lenders at law and in equity, such Defaulting Lender's right to participate in the administration of the Loan and the Loan Documents, including, without limitation, any rights to consent to or direct any action or inaction of the Agent, shall be suspended during the pendency of such failure or refusal. Borrower acknowledges and agrees that (a) the obligations of the Lenders under this Agreement are several, (b) no Lender is or will be obligated to lend Borrower more than the amount set forth in hereto for such Lender, nor to fund any part of any advance except upon fulfillment of all applicable conditions precedent provided herein and in the other Loan Documents, (c) except to the extent expressly provided in this Agreement, Borrower shall have no recourse or claim against a non-defaulting Lender nor against Agent (so long as the same have otherwise complied with their obligations under this Agreement), for any deficiency or any liability, loss, damage or expense resulting from the default of a Defaulting Lender, and (d) the Commitment Percentage of the Revolving Commitment Amount of any Lender shall not be increased or decreased as a result of the failure by any other Lender to perform its obligation to make an advance.
Defaults
Schedule 1
 
B. . If for any reason the Defaulting Lender fails to make timely payment to any other party to this Agreement of any amount required to be paid to it hereunder, in addition to other rights and remedies which such other party may have under or otherwise, such other party shall be entitled (1) to collect interest from the Defaulting Lender for the period from the date on which the payment was due until the date on which the payment is made for each day during such period at the Federal Funds Rate, (2) to withhold or set off, and to apply to the payment of the defaulted amount and any related interest, any amounts to be paid to the Defaulting Lender under this Agreement, (3) to bring an action or suit against the Defaulting Lender in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover the defaulted amount and any related interest, (4) to arrange for the purchase of the Commitment Percentage of the Defaulting Lender as provided in , and (5) to advance funds on behalf of the Defaulting Lender as provided in .
Remedies
Section 8.6.A
Section 8.6.D
Section 8.6.E
 
C. . The Defaulting Lender shall indemnify, defend, and hold Agent and each of the other Lenders harmless from and against any and all losses, damages, liabilities, and expense (including attorneys' fees) which they may actually sustain or incur by reason of or in consequence of the Defaulting Lender's failure or refusal to abide by the terms of this Agreement.
Indemnity
 
D. . If a Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, the other Lenders who are not Defaulting Lenders shall have the right, but not the obligation, in their sole discretion, to acquire (pro rata based on the Commitment Percentages of the Lenders exercising such right) all of such Defaulting Lender's right, title, and interest in and to the Loan. The purchase price shall be the principal and accrued interest allocable to the Defaulting Lender's Commitment Percentage of the Loan and shall be paid on the closing day of such purchase. On the date of closing of such purchase, the Defaulting Lender shall pay the Agent a processing fee of $3,500. The Defaulting Lender shall retain liability for all obligations in respect of the Loan and this Agreement arising prior to the date of transfer (but releasing Defaulting Lender's liability for all obligations in respect of the Loan and this Agreement arising from and after the date of transfer) and shall execute and deliver such documents as may be reasonably necessary to effect such transfer.
Purchase Right
 
E. . If a Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, the other Lenders may (pro rata based on the Commitment Percentages of the Lenders exercising such right), but are not obligated to, make advances to the Agent in the aggregate amount that the Defaulting Lender is obligated to advance under the Credit Agreement or this Agreement. Such advances shall be treated as loans made to the Defaulting Lender, shall bear interest at the Default Rate (payable on demand), shall be due and payable upon demand, and shall be paid prior to any payment being made to the Defaulting Lender.
Default Loans
 
F. . The exercise of the above remedies shall not reduce, diminish or liquidate the Defaulting Lender's obligation for the sharing of losses and reimbursement of costs, liabilities, and expenses under the Loan Documents and this Agreement. The obligations of the Defaulting Lender arising prior to any purchase pursuant to shall survive any such purchase.
Cumulative Remedies and Survival
Section 8.6.D
 
.
8.7
Representations, Warranties and Acknowledgments
 
A. Each Lender represents and warrants, as of the date hereof, as follows:
Authorization, etc.
 
(1) Such Lender has all necessary corporate power and authority to own its interest in the Loan and the Loan Documents, and has all necessary corporate power and authority to perform its obligations with respect to this Agreement and the Loan Documents;
 
(2) The execution and delivery of this Agreement and all other instruments and documents executed and delivered in connection therewith by such Lender have been duly authorized by all requisite corporate action of such Lender; and
 
(3) No approval, authorization, order, license or consent of, or registration of filing with, any governmental authority or other person is required in connection with such Lender's execution and delivery of this Agreement by such Lender.
 
B. . Each Lender agrees that it has, independently and without reliance upon any other party hereto, or upon the directors, officers, agents or employees of any other party hereto, but only in reliance upon information supplied to it by
Independent Decision
 
or on behalf of the Borrower and upon such other information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own independent credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement and the Loan Documents. Without limiting the foregoing, each Lender acknowledges that it has received copies of the Loan Documents and financial statements, certificates, instruments, documents, affidavits, resolutions and agreements as it deems necessary to make its credit analysis and decisions in respect of the Loan. Each Lender also agrees that it shall, independently and without reliance upon any other party hereto, continue to make its own independent credit analyses and decisions in acting or not acting under the Loan Documents. Except as specifically provided herein, the Agent shall have no duty or responsibility, either initially or on a continuing basis, to provide any Lender with any credit or other information with respect thereto, whether coming into its possession before the Closing Date or at any time or times thereafter.
 
C. . Each Lender hereby acknowledges that, except as specifically set forth herein, Agent (i) makes no warranty or representation to Lenders for any statements, warranties or representations (written or otherwise, express or implied) made in or in connection with the Loan Documents for the financial condition of the Borrower or for the title or the value of any of the collateral for the Loan, and (ii) shall not be responsible to the Lenders for any recitals, statements, representations or warranties herein or for the due execution, effectiveness, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency, or collectibility of any of the Loan Documents or any other instrument or document furnished pursuant thereto or in connection with the Loan or the legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency, perfection or priority of any rights in all or any portion of the collateral for the Loan. The Agent shall not be bound to ascertain whether any notice, consent, waiver or request delivered to it by the Borrower or any holder of any Note shall have been duly authorized or is true, accurate and complete. Agent shall not be required to make any inquiry concerning either the performance or observance of any of the terms, provisions or conditions of this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents or the financial condition of the Borrower or Guarantor, or the existence or possible existence of any Event of Default or any default which, with the giving of notice, passage of time, or both, would become an Event of Default.
No Reliance
 
.
8.8
Assignments; Participation
 
A. . Any Lender may assign to any affiliate of such Lender all or a portion of its respective Commitment Percentage of the Loan, in such a manner as to create privity of contract between such affiliate and the Borrower and to make such affiliate a Lender for all purposes hereunder; provided, however any Lender serving as Agent hereunder shall hold not less than $20,000,000.00 of the total commitment so long as there exists no Event of Default. Any Lender may assign to any entity which meets the following conditions ("") all or a portion of its respective Commitment Percentage of the Loan, in such a manner as to create privity of contract between such person and the Borrower and to make such person a Lender for all purposes hereunder:
Permitted Assignments
Assignee Lender
 
(1) The minimum portion of the total commitment which the assigning Lender may assign to an Assignee Lender (the "") shall be Five Million and 00/100ths Dollars ($5,000,000.00).
Assigned Interest
 
(2) An Assignee Lender (or its direct or indirect parent) shall be either (A) a commercial lender organized under the laws of the United States, or any state thereof, and having total assets in excess of Ten Billion Dollars ($10,000,000,000) or (B) a U.S. branch of a commercial bank organized under the laws of any other country which has total assets in excess of Ten Billion Dollars ($10,000,000,000) or (C) any other U.S. financial institution which has total assets in excess of Ten Billion Dollars ($10,000,000,000).
 
(3) The senior unsecured debt of an Assignee Lender (or its direct or indirect parent) shall have a rating of Baa-2 or higher from Moody's Investors Service, Inc. or a comparable rating agency.
 
(4) Such assignment shall have been approved by Agent and, so long as no Event of Default exists hereunder or under the other Loan Documents, by Borrower. Borrower shall notify Agent within five (5) Business Days after receipt of notice of such proposal to advise Agent of whether it approves the proposed assignee. If Borrower disapproves such assignee, then, unless Borrower provides a reasonable basis for withholding its consent to such proposed assignee, Agent shall notify all of the Lenders who shall thereupon have a right of first refusal, exercisable within ten (10) Business Days after receipt of Agent's notice, to elect to acquire, pro rata based upon the percentage which its respective Commitment Percentage bears to the aggregate Commitment Percentages of all Lenders electing to purchase the Assigned Interest. The closing of such assignment to the electing Lenders shall occur twenty (20) Business Days after Agent's notice. If none of the Lenders exercise their right to purchase, the assigning Lender may thereafter convey the Assigned Interest to the originally proposed assignee, notwithstanding that Borrower did not approve such proposed assignee. It shall not be deemed to be reasonable for the Borrower to withhold its consent if such proposed assignee meets the criteria outlined in and hereof. No sub-assignments shall be permitted.
Section 8.8(A)((2)
(3)
 
(5) The Assignee Lender shall have paid to the Agent an administrative fee of $3,500.00 to process the admission of such Assignee Lender.
 
(6) The Assignee Lender shall not be Borrower or any affiliates of Borrower.
 
B. . The Borrower and Agent may continue to deal solely and directly with the assigning Lender in connection with the interest so assigned to an Assignee Lender (or to an affiliate of such Lender) until such time as (i) written notice of such assignment, together with payment instructions, addresses and related information with respect to the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) shall have been given to the Borrower and Agent by the assigning Lender and the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate); (ii) the assigning Lender and the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) shall have delivered to the Borrower and Agent an Assignment and Assumption Agreement in the form attached hereto as .
Assignment and Assumption
Exhibit C
 
Promptly following a request therefor, Borrower will execute and deliver to Agent an appropriate replacement promissory note or replacement promissory notes, in
 
each case designated as such, in favor of each assignee (and assignor, if such assignor is retaining a portion of its Commitment Percentage and advances) reflecting such assignee's (and assignor's) Commitment Percentage of the Revolving Commitment Amount. Promptly following the execution and delivery of such replacement promissory note(s) the original promissory note or notes evidencing all or a portion of the Commitment Percentage of the Revolving Commitment Amount and advances being assigned shall be canceled and returned to Borrower.
 
C. . Promptly following receipt by Agent of an executed Assignment and Assumption Agreement, Agent shall give notice to the Borrower and to the Lenders of: (i) the effectiveness of the assignment by the assigning Lender to the Assignee Lender (or the affiliate of the Lender); and (ii) the revised percentages and maximum amounts of the Commitment Percentage of the Revolving Commitment Amount in effect as a result of such assignment.
Notice by Agent
 
D. . Immediately upon delivery of the Assignment and Assumption Agreement to Agent, this Agreement shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, but only to the extent, necessary to reflect the addition of the Assignee Lender (or affiliate of the Lender) and the resulting adjustment of the Commitment Percentage arising therefrom. The Commitment Percentage of the Revolving Commitment Amount assigned to each Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) shall reduce the Commitment Percentage of the Revolving Commitment Amount of the assigning Lender by a like amount.
Adjustment of Shares
 
E. . From and after the date upon which Agent notifies the assigning Lender that it has received an executed Assignment and Assumption Agreement: (1) the Assignee Lender (or the Lender's affiliate) thereunder shall be a party to this Agreement and, to the extent that rights and obligations hereunder have been assigned to it pursuant to such Assignment and Assumption Agreement, shall have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement; and (2) the assigning Lender shall, to the extent that rights and obligations under this Agreement have been assigned by it pursuant to such Assignment and Assumption Agreement, relinquish its rights and be released from its obligations under this Agreement.
Rights of Assignee
 
F. . By executing and delivering an Assignment and Assumption Agreement, the Assignee Lender (or the Lender's affiliate) thereunder confirms and agrees as follows: (1) other than as provided in such Assignment and Assumption Agreement, the assigning Lender makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility with respect to any statements, warranties or representations made in or in connection with this Agreement or the execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of this Agreement, the Note or any other instrument or document furnished pursuant to the Loan; (2) the assigning Lender makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility with respect to the financial condition of the Borrower or any other parties or the performance or observance by the Borrower of any of its Obligations; (3) the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) has received a copy of this Agreement, together with such other documents and information as the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into the Assignment and Assumption Agreement; (4) the Assignee
Assignee's Agreements
 
Lender (or such affiliate) will, independently and without reliance upon Agent, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under this Agreement; (5) the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) hereby appoints and authorizes Agent to take such action as administrative agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under the Loan Documents and this Agreement as are delegated to Agent thereunder and hereunder, together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto; and (6) the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) agrees that it will perform all of the obligations which by the terms of this Agreement are required to be performed by it as a Lender and confirms the representations and warranties of the assigning Lender under this Agreement.
 
. The Agent and each Lender may accept deposits from, lend money to, and generally engage in any kind of banking, trust or other business with Borrower or any affiliate of Borrower as if it were not performing the duties specified herein, and may accept fees and other considerations from the Borrower or any such affiliate for services in connection with this Agreement and otherwise without having to account for the same to the other parties hereto.
8.9
Other Business
 
. If the Agent requests in writing the consent or approval from the Lenders and any Lender does not respond to such request within seven (7) Business Days (or such other period as may be provided herein), such Lender shall be deemed to have given such consent or approval.
8.10
Consents
 
. In its individual capacity as a Lender, U.S. Bank National Association shall have the same obligations and the same rights, powers and privileges in respect to its Commitment Percentage and the Advances made by it, and as the holder of a Note as it would have were it not also the Agent.
8.11
Agent as Lender
 
. Agent and each Lender hereby agree that, upon learning of the existence of a default or an Event of Default, it shall (to the extent notice has not previously been provided) promptly notify the other parties to this Agreement (other than Borrower) thereof. The Agent hereby agrees that upon receipt of any notice under this provision it shall promptly notify the other Lenders of the existence of such default or Event of Default. Agent shall provide to Lenders copies of any notice of a default or an Event of Default which Agent delivers to Borrower.
8.12
Notification of Defaults and Events of Default
 
. The provisions of this are for the benefit of Agent, the Lenders, and other than the portions of that pertain specifically to Borrower, Borrower shall have no right to rely on or enforce any of the provisions hereof; provided, however, the foregoing shall in no way limit Borrower's obligations under this . In performing its functions and duties under this Agreement, Agent shall act solely as agent of the Lenders and does not assume and shall not be deemed to have assumed any obligation toward or relationship of agency or trust with or for Borrower or any other person.
8.13
No Reliance by Borrower
Article VIII
Section 8.8
Article VIII
 
. Agent shall be entitled to rely upon any written notices, statements, certificates, orders or other documents, telecopies or any telephone message believed by it in good faith to be genuine and correct and to have been signed, sent or made by the proper person, and with respect to all matters pertaining to this Agreement or any of the other
8.14
Reliance
 
Loan Documents and its duties hereunder or thereunder, upon advice of legal counsel (including counsel for Borrower), independent public accountants and other experts selected by it.
 
. Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, without the need to comply with any of the formal or procedural requirements of this Agreement, including this , any Lender may at any time and from time to time pledge and assign all or any portion of its rights under all or any of the Loan Documents to a Federal Reserve Bank; provided that no such pledge or assignment shall release such Lender from its obligations thereunder. To facilitate any such pledge or assignment, Agent shall, at the request of such Lender, enter into a letter agreement with the Federal Reserve Bank in, or substantially in, the form of the exhibit to Appendix C to the Federal Reserve Bank of New York Operating Circular No. 10.
8.15
Pledge to Federal Reserve Bank
Section 8.15
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each party has caused this Agreement to be duly executed and delivered as of the day and year first above set forth.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10(r)
 
 
is made and entered into as of the 1st day of February, 2005 by , a Maryland corporation, having an address at 7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500, Bethesda, Maryland 20814 (), in favor of , a national banking association, whose address is 800 Nicollet Mall, BC-MN-H03A, Minneapolis, Minnesota 55402-7020, Attention: Real Estate Banking Group, Division Head ("") as administrative agent and sole lead arranger for itself and for the other financial institutions (collectively, the ) which are or may become parties to the Credit Agreement (as herein defined).
THIS GUARANTY
SAUL CENTERS, INC.
"Guarantor"
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
Agent
"Lenders"
 
 
, the Lenders have agreed upon certain conditions to make a revolving loan to , a Maryland limited partnership (""), in the aggregate principal amount of up to One Hundred Fifty Million and 00/100ths Dollars ($150,000,000.00) (), as such amount may be increased from time to time, pursuant to that certain Revolving Credit Agreement of even date herewith between Agent, Lenders and Borrower (as amended from time to time, the ), which Loan shall be evidenced by one or more Unsecured Revolving Promissory Notes of even date herewith (whether one or more, as modified, amended, restated or replaced from time to time, the ) in the aggregate face amount of $150,000,000.00 (as may be increased pursuant to the Credit Agreement); and
WHEREAS
SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
Borrower
"Loan"
"Credit Agreement"
"Note"
 
, Borrower has on this date executed and delivered to Agent the Note, the Credit Agreement, and certain other Loan Documents more particularly defined in the Credit Agreement;
WHEREAS
 
, the Guarantor is the sole general partner of Borrower; and
WHEREAS
 
, in order to induce Lenders to make the Loan, and as additional security for the Loan and for all sums advanced under the Note, the Credit Agreement, and the other Loan Documents, and for the payment and performance by Borrower of its obligations under the Note, the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents, Borrower has agreed to obtain, and Guarantor has agreed to execute, deliver and perform, this Guaranty; and
WHEREAS
 
, Lenders have refused to make the Loan to Borrower or to make any advances under the Loan Documents unless this Guaranty is executed by Guarantor and is delivered to Agent on behalf of Lenders.
WHEREAS
 
, in consideration of the Lenders' agreement to make the Loan to Borrower in accordance with the terms of the Loan Documents, and of other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged by Guarantor, Guarantor hereby covenants and agrees with Agent and Lenders as follows:
NOW, THEREFORE
 
1. Guarantor, for itself, its heirs, executors, administrators, personal representatives, legal representatives, successors and assigns, hereby primarily, unconditionally, absolutely and irrevocably, guaranties to Agent and Lenders and to their respective successors and assigns that all payments due and payable under the Note, including, but not limited to, payments of principal, interest (including, but not limited to, interest accruing under the Note after the filing of any petition under applicable federal bankruptcy laws and any amounts paid by Borrower to Agent or Lenders and required to be disgorged by Lenders or Agent as preferential payments under any applicable bankruptcy laws) and all other amounts owing under the Loan Documents, shall be fully and punctually paid in accordance with the terms of the Note, as and when due, and whether or not accelerated pursuant to the terms of the Note, that Borrower shall fully and punctually pay, comply with and perform all of the obligations, terms, covenants and conditions of the Loan Documents to be by it paid, complied with and performed, and that all warranties and representations made by Borrower in the Loan Documents and/or in connection therewith are true and correct in all material respects; and, if the payments due and payable under the Loan Documents shall not be so paid, and/or if Borrower shall fail or refuse to so pay, comply with or perform said obligations, terms, covenants and conditions of the Loan Documents, Guarantor shall fully and punctually so pay such payments and shall so pay, comply with and perform the obligations, terms, covenants and conditions with respect to which Borrower has failed or refused to pay, comply with or perform, whether or not the Note has been accelerated pursuant to the terms thereof, shall pay the attorneys' fees and court costs incurred by Agent and Lenders in enforcing or protecting, or obtaining the right to enforce or protect, whether in bankruptcy court, probate court or otherwise, any of the rights, remedies or recourses of Agent hereunder or thereunder (prior to trial, at trial and on appeal and whether or not Agent prevails therein), and shall reimburse Agent and the Lenders for all damages suffered thereby as the result of the incorrectness or untruthfulness of said warranties and representations, all without cost or expense to Agent and Lenders. The obligations and liabilities of Guarantor hereunder shall be primary and not secondary. In addition to all other rights of Agent and Lenders to accelerate the indebtedness evidenced by the Note, if (a) an event of default shall occur which, pursuant to the terms of the Note, would entitle Agent to accelerate said indebtedness, but (b) there shall be filed with respect to Borrower a petition in bankruptcy or similar relief under the United States Bankruptcy Code or any similar law, and by reason of such filing or as a result of any order of court, Agent shall be prevented from accelerating or collecting said indebtedness, then Agent shall have the right, on behalf of Lenders, to demand from Guarantor payment in full of, and Guarantor shall pay in full, all indebtedness evidenced or secured by the Loan Documents, including all principal, interest, costs, expenses, fees and charges, whether or not then due and payable by Borrower. This is a guaranty of payment and performance and not of collection only.
 
2. The Note, the Credit Agreement, and all other Loan Documents are hereby made a part of this Guaranty by reference thereto with the same force and effect as if fully set forth herein. Guarantor hereby acknowledges having received a true, correct and complete copy of each of the Loan Documents.
 
3. Guarantor hereby agrees that Agent may take other guaranties, collateral or security to further secure the Loan Documents, or any of them, and consents that any of the obligations, terms, covenants and conditions contained in the Loan Documents may be
 
renewed, altered, extended, changed, modified or released at the written direction of or with the written consent of Agent on behalf of Lenders, without in any manner affecting this Guaranty or releasing Guarantor herefrom, and without the further consent of or notice to Guarantor, and Guarantor shall continue to be liable hereunder to pay and perform pursuant hereto and to the Loan Documents, as so renewed, altered, extended, changed, modified or released, and notwithstanding the taking of such other guaranties, collateral or security. This Guaranty is additional and supplemental to any and all other guaranties heretofore or hereafter executed by Guarantor, or by any other person, party or entity for the benefit of Agent, Borrower or any other person, party or entity, in connection with the Loan, or any property, or relating to the Loan Documents or any other loan documents, and shall not supersede or be superseded by any other document or guaranty executed by Guarantor, or by any other person, party or entity, for any purpose. Guarantor hereby agrees that (a) all or any part of any collateral may be released from, and any new or additional security may be added to, the lien and security interest of the Loan Documents; (b) Borrower, Guarantor and any additional parties who are or may become liable for payment or performance of the Loan Documents may hereafter be released from its or their liability hereunder and/or under the Loan Documents; and (c) Agent may perfect or fail to perfect, or to continue the perfection of, any lien or security interest; and Agent may take, or delay in taking, or refuse to take, any and all action with reference to the Loan Documents (regardless of whether the same might vary the risk or alter the rights, remedies or recourses of Guarantor), including specifically the settlement or compromise of any amount allegedly due thereunder, all without notice to, consideration to or the consent of Guarantor, and without in any way releasing, diminishing or affecting the absolute nature of Guarantor's obligations and liabilities hereunder.
 
4. Guarantor hereby waives any and all legal requirements that Agent, on behalf of Lenders, or their respective successors or assigns, must institute any action or proceeding at law or in equity or exhaust their rights, remedies and/or recourses against Borrower or anyone else with respect to the Loan Documents, as a condition precedent to bringing an action against Guarantor under this Guaranty. Guarantor agrees that Agent, on behalf of Lenders, may simultaneously maintain an action upon this Guaranty and an action or proceeding upon the Note or the Credit Agreement, and/or to foreclose or otherwise enforce the other Loan Documents. All remedies afforded to Agent and Lenders, and their successors or assigns, by reason of this Guaranty and the Loan Documents, are separate and cumulative remedies, and no one of such remedies, whether exercised by Agent, Lenders, or their respective successors or assigns, or not, shall be deemed an exclusion of any of the other remedies available to Agent, Lenders or their respective successors or assigns, at law, in equity, by statute, under the Loan Documents, hereunder or otherwise, and shall in no way limit or prejudice any such other remedies which Agent, Lenders, or their respective successors or assigns, may have. Guarantor further waives any requirement that Agent demand or seek payment or performance by Borrower or by any other party of the amounts owing or the covenants to be performed under the Loan Documents, as a condition precedent to bringing any action against Guarantor under this Guaranty, it being agreed that a failure to pay, comply with or perform the obligations, terms, covenants and conditions herein guarantied, or any breach of a representation or warranty herein guarantied, shall, without further act, make Guarantor liable as herein set forth. All payments made by Borrower, by Guarantor or by any other party, and/or the proceeds of any security, may be applied by Agent upon such items of indebtedness owed to Agent pursuant to the Loan Documents in such order as Agent may determine, whether the same be due or not.
 
5. Guarantor specifically agrees that, in the event of the foreclosure of any collateral for the Loan or sale of any property, and in the event the proceeds thereof are not sufficient to pay in full the indebtedness secured thereby, Guarantor shall be and hereby is expressly made liable to Agent for the amount of the deficiency, notwithstanding any provision of any law or contract which may prevent Agent from enforcing such deficiency against, or collecting such deficiency from, Borrower, or its successors or assigns, or which provides that the indebtedness has been satisfied as the result of the foreclosure thereof.
 
6. Until the indebtedness evidenced and secured by the Loan Documents is indefeasibly paid in full, and until each and all of the terms, covenants and conditions of the Loan Documents and of this Guaranty are fully performed, Guarantor shall not be released by any act, omission or thing which might, but for this provision of this Guaranty, be deemed a legal or equitable discharge of a surety or guarantor, or by reason of any waiver, extension, modification, forbearance or delay by Agent, Lenders, or their respective successors or assigns, or its or their failure to proceed promptly or otherwise, or by reason of any further obligation or agreement between Borrower and/or the then owner of any collateral for the Loan and Lenders, relating to the payment of any sum evidenced thereby or to any of the other terms, covenants and conditions contained therein or in the other Loan Documents, and Guarantor hereby expressly waives and surrenders any defense to liability hereunder based upon the foregoing acts, omissions, things, waivers, extensions, modifications, forbearances, delays, obligations, agreements, or any of them. Guarantor also waives any defense arising by virtue of any disability, insolvency, bankruptcy, lack of authority or power, death, insanity, incompetence, liquidation or dissolution of Borrower, Guarantor or any other surety, comaker, endorser or guarantor, even though rendering the Note or any of the other Loan Documents invalid, void, unenforceable or otherwise uncollectible, it being agreed that Guarantor shall remain liable hereunder, regardless of whether Borrower, any other guarantor or any other person, firm or entity be found not to be liable thereunder or hereunder for any reason, and regardless of any claim which Guarantor might otherwise have against Agent and Lenders by virtue of Agent's or any Lender's invocation of or failure to invoke any right, remedy or recourse given to it hereunder or under the Loan Documents. No change in the ownership of Borrower or Guarantor shall affect or change the terms of this Guaranty or in any way change or reduce the liability of Guarantor hereunder.
 
7. Guarantor hereby waives diligence in collection, presentment for payment, demand, protest, notice of nonpayment, notice of protest and of dishonor, notice of extension of time for payment, notice of acceptance hereof, notice of future advances, notice of default, notice of acceleration, notice of intent to accelerate, notice of intent to proceed against any collateral and all other notices now or hereafter provided for by law.
 
8. In the event that Guarantor shall advance or become obligated to pay any sums hereunder, or in the event that for any reason Borrower and/or any subsequent owner of collateral for the Loan is now or shall hereafter become indebted or obligated to Guarantor, the amount of such sums and of such indebtedness and obligation and interest thereon shall at all times be subordinate as to lien, time of payment and in all other
 
respects to the amounts owing to Lenders under the Loan Documents. Guarantor shall have no right to participate in any way in the Note, in the Credit Agreement, in the other Loan Documents or in the right, title or interest of Agent in any collateral for the Loan, or to receive payments from Borrower upon any such indebtedness or obligation, notwithstanding any payments made by Guarantor hereunder, all rights of reimbursement, indemnification, subrogation and participation being hereby expressly subordinated, unless and until the entire indebtedness owing to Lenders under the Loan Documents has been paid in full and all other obligations of Borrower under the Loan Documents have been fully performed, discharged and satisfied. Guarantor agrees that, following any default or event of default under the Loan Documents, and until the indebtedness evidenced and secured by the Loan Documents shall have been paid in full, Guarantor will not accept any payment or satisfaction of any kind of any indebtedness or obligation of Borrower to Guarantor, and Guarantor hereby assigns to Agent on behalf of the Lenders all right, title and interest in such indebtedness and obligations, including the right to file proof of claim and to vote thereon in connection with any bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization proceeding, and including the right to vote on any plan of arrangement or reorganization. Further, Guarantor agrees that following any default or event of default under the Loan Documents, and until the indebtedness evidenced and secured thereby shall have been paid in full, (a) Guarantor shall not accept payment from any other guarantor or surety by way of contribution on account of any payment made hereunder by Guarantor to Agent, (b) Guarantor will not take any action to exercise or enforce any rights to such contribution, and (c), if Guarantor should receive any payment, satisfaction or security for any indebtedness or obligation of Borrower to Guarantor or for any contribution by any other guarantor or surety for payment made hereunder by Guarantor to Agent, the same shall be delivered to Agent on behalf of Lenders in the form received, endorsed or assigned as may be appropriate, for application on account of or as security for the indebtedness evidenced and secured by the Loan Documents, and, until so delivered, shall be held in trust for Agent as security for said indebtedness.
 
9. Guarantor hereby warrants and represents unto Agent and Lenders that (a) any and all balance sheets, net worth statements and other financial statements and data which have heretofore been given to Agent with respect to Guarantor more particularly described on hereto fairly and accurately represent the financial condition of Guarantor as of the dates thereof, and, since the dates thereof, there has been no material adverse change in the financial condition of Guarantor; (b) except as may be set out on attached hereto, (i) there are no legal proceedings, material claims or demands pending against, or to the knowledge of Guarantor threatened in writing against, Guarantor or any of Guarantor's assets, in which an adverse result would have a material adverse effect upon Guarantor, (ii) Guarantor is not in breach or default of any obligation to pay money, and (iii) no event (including specifically Guarantor's execution and delivery of this Guaranty) has occurred which, with or without the lapse of time or action by a third party, constitutes or could constitute a material breach or material default under any document evidencing or securing any obligation to pay money or under any other contract or agreement to which Guarantor is a party; (c) Guarantor has knowledge of Borrower's financial condition and affairs and of all other circumstances which bear upon the risk assumed by Guarantor under this Guaranty; (d) Guarantor is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction or incorporation or organization and is duly qualified and in good standing in every other jurisdiction where it
Exhibit A
Exhibit B
 
is doing business except where the failure to so qualify would not have a material adverse effect and has all power, authority, permits, consents, authorizations and licenses necessary to carry on its business and to execute, deliver and perform this Guaranty; and this Guaranty has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by Guarantor so as to constitute this Guaranty the valid and binding obligation of Guarantor, enforceable in accordance with its terms; (e) Guarantor shall at all times maintain its existence and shall cause its shares to be listed and admitted to trading on the New York Stock Exchange; (f) Guarantor meets the requirements of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and any applicable regulations thereunder and rulings with respect thereto, for qualification as a real estate investment trust; (g) Guarantor shall not, without the prior written consent of Agent, amend, supplement or modify the terms of its Articles of Incorporation or other charter or enabling documents which would impair Guarantor's ability to perform its obligations hereunder; and (h) Guarantor shall maintain its qualification to transact business in its state of organization, in each state in which failure so to qualify would permanently preclude Guarantor from enforcing its rights with respect to any material asset or would expose Guarantor to any material liability. (Guarantor hereby agrees to continue to keep itself informed thereof while this Guaranty is in force and agrees that neither Agent nor Lenders have or will have any obligation to investigate the financial condition or affairs of Borrower for the benefit of Guarantor or to advise Guarantor of any fact respecting, or any change in, the financial condition or affairs of Borrower or any other circumstances which may bear upon Guarantor's risk hereunder which come to the knowledge of Agent or Lenders, their respective directors, officers, employees or agents at any time, whether or not Agent or Lenders know, believe or have reason to know or to believe that any such fact or change is unknown to Guarantor or might or does materially increase the risk of Guarantor hereunder.) Guarantor shall not transfer any of its assets for the purpose of preventing Agent from satisfying any judgment rendered under this Guaranty therefrom, either before or after the entry of any such judgment. Guarantor shall promptly deliver to Borrower all financial statements of Guarantor which Borrower is required by the Credit Agreement to deliver to Agent on behalf of Lenders in time for Borrower to deliver the same to Agent on or before the date provided for the delivery thereof under the Credit Agreement.
 
10. Any notice, demand or request by Agent or its successors or assigns to Guarantor shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given or made if mailed by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to Guarantor at the address set forth for it in the caption hereof, or at such other address as Guarantor may notify Agent in writing, at least ten (10) days prior to the effective date of any such change of address, by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, at the address set forth in the caption hereof, or at such other address of which Agent shall have so notified Guarantor, at least ten (10) days prior to the effective date of any such change of address. Notice so mailed shall be deemed given and made upon deposit in the United States mail.
 
11. This Guaranty, for all purposes, shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Maryland, in which state it is to be performed. The unenforceability or invalidity of any provision or provisions of this Guaranty as to any persons or circumstance shall not render that provision nor any other provision or provisions herein contained unenforceable or invalid as to any other persons or circumstance, and all provisions hereof, in all other respects, shall remain valid and enforceable.
 
12. Agent and Lenders may divulge all information received by them from Guarantor or any other source, including, but not limited to, information relating to the Loan, to Borrower, to any collateral for the Loan and to Guarantor, to any Lender or prospective lender or participant, and Guarantor shall cooperate with Agent and Lenders in satisfying the requirements of any such other lender for consummating such a purchase or participation.
 
13. Notwithstanding any other provision or provisions herein contained, no provision of this Guaranty shall require or permit the collection from Guarantor of interest in excess of the maximum rate or amount, if any, which Guarantor may be required or permitted to pay by any applicable law.
 
14. Guarantor hereby agrees that, at the option of Agent, any action to enforce this Guaranty may be brought and venued in the courts of the State of Maryland, and Guarantor hereby consents thereto and submits itself to the jurisdiction of said courts with respect to any such action. Guarantor hereby waives any right which Guarantor may have to a trial by jury in any action relating to this Guaranty.
 
15. This instrument shall inure to the benefit of Agent, Lenders and their successors and assigns, and shall bind Guarantor and Guarantor's heirs, executors, administrators, personal representatives, legal representatives, successors and assigns. The obligations of Guarantor under this Guaranty shall be enforceable in all events against Guarantor, its successors and assigns, as a claim against its estate or otherwise against the representatives of its estate, its heirs at law, the devisees and beneficiaries of its total estate and each of them. The use of any gender herein shall include all other genders.
 
16. Notwithstanding anything herein contained, this Guaranty shall become null and void in the event that any person or entity shall pay, in full, the amount of principal, interest and all other sums and payments which may be then owing under the Loan Documents in accordance with the terms thereof and shall comply with and perform all of the other obligations of Borrower under the Loan Documents.
 
17. Capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Credit Agreement.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Guarantor has duly executed this Guaranty under seal as of the day and year first above written, intending to be legally bound.
 
 
I, a Notary Public in and for the aforesaid jurisdiction, do hereby certify that B. F. Saul II, who is personally well known to me as, or satisfactorily proven to be, the person named as Chairman of Saul Centers, Inc. in the foregoing Guaranty, bearing date as of the 1st day of February, 2005, personally appeared before me in the said jurisdiction, and acknowledged the same to be the act and deed of Saul Centers, Inc., party thereto, and delivered the same as such.
 
GIVEN under my hand and official seal this 1st day of February, 2005.
 
 
My Commission Expires: July 14, 2008
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20050224170508.txt.gz
TIME:20050224170508
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On February 23, 2005, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2004. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: February 24, 2005
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
February 23, 2005, Bethesda, MD.
 
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2004. Total revenues for the quarter ended December 31, 2004 increased 13.2% to $29,569,000 compared to $26,129,000 for the 2003 quarter. Operating income, defined as net income available to common stockholders before gain on property sold, minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 9.3% to $8,256,000 compared to $7,556,000 for the comparable 2003 quarter. After preferred stock dividends, the Company reported net income available to common stockholders of $4,228,000 or $0.26 per share (basic & fully diluted) for the 2004 quarter, a per share decrease of 7.1% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $4,471,000 or $0.28 per share (basic & fully diluted) for the 2003 quarter. Increased operating income in the 2004 fourth quarter was more than offset by (1) a full quarter of preferred stock dividends in 2004 ($2,000,000) versus a partial quarter in 2003 ($1,244,000); (2) increased accounting and administrative expenses related primarily to new Sarbanes-Oxley documentation and compliance requirements; and (3) the 2003 fourth quarter gain of $182,000 resulting from the State of Maryland's condemnation and purchase of a piece of land at Avenel Business Park for improvement of an interchange on I-270, adjacent to the property.
 
Overall same property revenues for the total portfolio increased 2.3% for the 2004 fourth quarter compared to the same quarter in 2003 and same property operating income increased 2.8%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting periods. Property operating income is calculated as total property revenue less property operating expenses, provision for credit losses and real estate taxes. Same center operating income in the shopping center portfolio decreased 2.2% for the 2004 fourth quarter, due primarily to a $425,000 lease termination fee collected from a former shopping center tenant in the prior year's quarter. Same property operating income in the office portfolio grew 14.9% for the 2004 quarter, due primarily to the completion of lease-up of space and new tenant occupancy at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue contributing an incremental $240,000, and the collection of a lease termination fee and a payment from a former bankrupt tenant at Avenel Business Park and a lease termination fee at Washington Square totaling a combined $264,000. Excluding the impact of 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, overall portfolio same property operating growth was 1.8% for the 2004 quarter.
 
For the year ended December 31, 2004, total revenues increased 15.3% to $112,842,000 compared to $97,884,000 for the 2003 year. Operating income before gain on property sold, minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 24.2% to $33,707,000 compared to $27,146,000 for the 2003 year. After preferred stock dividends, the Company reported net income available to common stockholders of $18,174,000 or $1.13 per share (basic) and $1.12 per share (fully diluted) for the 2004 year, resulting in a fully diluted per share decrease of 2.6% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $17,998,000 or $1.15 per share (basic & fully diluted) for the 2003 year. Increased operating income in the 2004 year was more than offset by (1) a full year of preferred stock dividends in 2004 ($8,000,000) versus a partial year in 2003 ($1,244,000); (2) increased personnel expenses particularly related to the Company's acquisition and development program; and (3) increased accounting and administrative expenses related primarily to new Sarbanes-Oxley documentation and compliance requirements.
 
Overall same property revenues for the total portfolio increased 4.2% for the 2004 year compared to the 2003 year and same property operating income increased 5.0%. Same center operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 2.2% for the 2004 year. Same property operating income in the office portfolio grew 11.2% for the 2004 year, due primarily to the completion of lease-up of space and new tenant occupancy at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue. Excluding the impact of 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, overall portfolio same property operating income growth was 2.5% for the 2004 year.
 
As of December 31, 2004, 93.9% of the portfolio was leased, compared to 94.4% a year earlier. On a same property basis, 94.0% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 94.4%. The comparative decrease in the year end 2004 same property leasing percentage is largely attributable to the departure of a 39,000 square foot local grocer at Southside Plaza in suburban Richmond, Virginia.
 
Funds From Operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 7.2% to $12,084,000 in the 2004 fourth quarter compared to $11,274,000 for the same quarter in 2003. The $810,000 increase in FFO available to common shareholders in the 2004 quarter resulted from the combination of (1) increased operating income from retail acquisition and development properties and (2) successful leasing efforts in the core portfolio, primarily at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue; offset in part by the payment of $2,000,000 (compared to $1,244,000 for a portion of the 2003 quarter) in preferred dividends relating to the November 2003 offering. On a fully diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 3.7% to $.56 per share in 2004 compared to $.54 for the 2003 quarter. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2004 year increased by $3,291,000 (7.5%) to $47,031,000. Fully diluted per share FFO available to common shareholders increased 4.8% to $2.20 per share in 2004 compared to $2.10 for the 2003 year. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, is defined as net income plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales.
 
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 40 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 7.2 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20050506162114.txt.gz
TIME:20050506162114
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On May 4, 2005, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2005. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: May 6, 2005
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
May 4, 2005, Bethesda, MD.
 
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust, announced its first quarter 2005 operating results. Total revenues for the quarter ended March 31, 2005 increased 15.1% to $30,307,000 compared to $26,341,000 for the 2004 quarter. Operating income before minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 3.7% to $8,639,000 compared to $8,329,000 for the comparable 2004 quarter. After preferred stock dividends and minority interests, the Company reported net income available to common stockholders of $4,610,000 or $0.28 per share (basic & diluted) for the 2005 quarter, a per share increase of 3.7% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $4,305,000 or $0.27 per share (basic & diluted) for the 2004 quarter.
 
Overall same property revenues for the total portfolio increased 4.3% for the 2005 first quarter compared to the same quarter in 2004 and same property operating income increased 3.1%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting periods. Property operating income is calculated as total property revenue less property operating expenses, provision for credit losses and real estate taxes. Same center property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 2.9% for the 2005 first quarter, compared to the prior year's quarter, despite the departure of two tenants, whose spaces combined total 152,000 square feet, and the resulting loss of revenues relating to these tenants during the entire 2005 quarter. While these spaces represent approximately 2.0% of the Company's total gross leaseable area, the combined rent payments were less than 1.0% of the Company's 2004 annual revenues. The loss of rental revenues from these tenants at Great Eastern Plaza and Southside Plaza was more than overcome by increased rental revenue from redevelopments of portions of Thruway and Southdale and operations at the balance of the Company's shopping center portfolio. Same property operating income in the office portfolio grew 3.6% for the 2005 quarter, due primarily to the completion of re-tenanting of space at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, which was being prepared for new occupancy during a portion of early 2004.
 
As of March 31, 2005, 92.4% of the portfolio was leased, compared to 94.2% a year earlier. On a same property basis, 92.2% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 94.2%. The comparative decrease in the 2005 same property leasing percentage is largely attributable to the early departure of the two tenants at Great Eastern Plaza and Southside Plaza.
 
Funds From Operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 11.7% to $12,254,000 in the 2005 first quarter compared to $10,967,000 for the same quarter in 2004. The $1,287,000 increase in FFO available to common shareholders in the 2005 quarter resulted from the combination of (1) increased operating income from retail acquisition and development properties and (2) successful leasing efforts in the core portfolio, primarily at Thruway, Southdale and 601 Pennsylvania Avenue. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 7.7% to $0.56 per share in 2005 compared to $0.52 for the 2004 quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, is defined as net income, plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales.
 
In March 2005, the Company acquired the 126,000 square foot Albertsons anchored, Palm Springs Center for a purchase price of $17.5 million. This grocery anchored neighborhood shopping center located in Altamonte Springs near Orlando is the Company's second Florida center. The property is 100% leased and includes tenants complementing Albertsons, such as Office Depot, Mimi's Caf and Toojay's Deli.
 
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 41 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 7.3 million square feet of leaseable area. Over 80% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20050808162108.txt.gz
TIME:20050808162108
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
99.1 Press Release, dated August 8, 2005, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On August 8, 2005, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2005. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: August 8, 2005
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
August 8, 2005, Bethesda, MD.
 
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust, announced its second quarter 2005 operating results. Total revenues for the quarter ended June 30, 2005 increased 10.3% to $30,752,000 compared to $27,888,000 for the 2004 quarter. Operating income before minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 7.5% to $8,952,000 compared to $8,329,000 for the comparable 2004 quarter. After preferred stock dividends and minority interests, the Company reported net income available to common stockholders of $4,871,000 or $0.29 per share (basic & diluted) for the 2005 quarter, a per share increase of 7.4% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $4,286,000 or $0.27 per share (basic & diluted) for the 2004 quarter.
 
Overall same property revenues for the total portfolio increased 3.9% for the 2005 second quarter compared to the same quarter in 2004 and same property operating income increased 2.5%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting periods. Property operating income is calculated as total property revenue less property operating expenses, provision for credit losses and real estate taxes. Same center property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 2.7% for the 2005 second quarter, compared to the prior year's quarter, despite the departure of two tenants, one each in Southside Plaza and Great Eastern Plaza, whose spaces combined total 152,000 square feet, and the resulting loss of revenues relating to these tenants during the entire 2005 quarter. While these spaces represent approximately 2.0% of the Company's total gross leaseable area, the combined rent payments were less than 1.0% of the Company's 2004 annual revenues. During the second quarter, the Company leased the 39,000 square feet of space at Southside Plaza, and subsequent to the end of the quarter, also leased the 113,000 square feet at Great Eastern Plaza. The loss of rental revenues from these spaces at Great Eastern Plaza and Southside Plaza was more than overcome by increased rental revenue from redevelopment of a portion of Thruway and improved operations at the balance of the Company's shopping center portfolio. Same property operating income in the office portfolio grew 2.1% for the 2005 quarter primarily due to the lease-up of space at Avenel Business Park.
 
For the six month period ended June 30, 2005, total revenues increased 12.6% to $61,059,000 compared to $54,229,000 for the 2004 period. Operating income before minority
 
interests and preferred stock dividends increased 5.6% to $17,591,000 compared to $16,658,000 for the comparable 2004 period. Net income available to common stockholders was $9,481,000 or $.57 per share (basic & diluted) for the 2005 period, a per share increase of 5.6% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $8,591,000 or $0.54 per share (basic & diluted) for the 2004 period. Overall same property revenues for the total portfolio increased 4.0% for the 2005 six month period compared to the same period in 2004 and same property operating income increased 2.8%. The shopping center portfolio same center operating income increased 2.7% and the office portfolio grew 2.9%.
 
As of June 30, 2005, on an overall and same property basis, 93.2% of the portfolio was leased, compared to 94.0% a year earlier. The comparative decrease in the 2005 leasing percentage is attributable to the 113,000 square foot vacancy at Great Eastern Plaza. The space was re-leased in July 2005.
 
Funds From Operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 6.9% to $12,484,000 in the 2005 second quarter compared to $11,676,000 for the same quarter in 2004. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, is defined as net income, plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales. The $808,000 increase in FFO available to common shareholders in the 2005 quarter resulted from the combination of (1) increased operating income from retail acquisition and development properties and (2) successful leasing efforts in the core portfolio, primarily at Thruway and Avenel Business Park. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 3.6% to $0.57 per share in 2005 compared to $0.55 per share for the 2004 quarter. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2005 six month period increased 9.3% to $24,738,000 from $22,643,000 during the 2004 period. Fully diluted per share FFO available to common shareholders increased 5.6% to $1.13 per share in 2005 compared to $1.07 per share for the 2004 period.
 
On July 29, 2005, Saul Centers paid a quarterly dividend of $0.40 per share on its common stock, a $0.01 per share increase (2.6%) over the prior quarter's dividend.
 
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 42 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 7.4 million square feet of leaseable area. Over 80% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20051109162054.txt.gz
TIME:20051109162054
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On November 8, 2005, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2005. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: November 8, 2005
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
November 8, 2005, Bethesda, MD.
 
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust, announced its third quarter 2005 operating results. Total revenue for the quarter ended September 30, 2005 increased 14.2% to $33,182,000 compared to $29,044,000 for the 2004 quarter. Third quarter 2005 revenue included $1,801,000 related to resolution of a land use dispute with a property owner adjacent to its Lexington Mall. The resolution of the land dispute, together with the recapture of the Dillard's store space provides the Company favorable alternatives for redeveloping the shopping center. Operating income before minority interests, real estate sale gains and preferred stock dividends increased 10.2% to $9,694,000 compared to $8,793,000 for the comparable 2004 quarter. After minority interests, real estate sale gains and preferred stock dividends, the Company reported net income available to common stockholders of $5,856,000 or $0.35 per share (basic & diluted) for the 2005 quarter, a per share increase of 6.1% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $5,355,000 or $0.33 per share (basic & diluted) for the 2004 quarter. As a result of the recent developments related to Lexington Mall, the Company increased depreciation expense by $1,515,000 representing a one-time charge related to the shortened useful life of vacant buildings at the property, exclusive of the Dillard's space. The Company also increased general and administrative expenses by $246,000 for the write-off of abandoned redevelopment costs associated with pre-settlement land use plans. During the 2004 quarter the Company recorded a $572,000 property sale gain resulting from the State of Maryland's condemnation of a small strip of unimproved land for road widening at the White Oak shopping center.
 
Overall same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 2.0% for the 2005 third quarter compared to the same quarter in 2004 and same property operating income increased 0.9%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting periods. The Lexington Mall results are not included in same property performance. Property operating income is calculated as total property revenue less property operating expenses, provision for credit losses and real estate taxes. Same center property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 1.6% for the 2005 third quarter, compared to the prior year's quarter. Same property operating income in the office portfolio decreased 1.0% for the 2005 quarter.
 
For the nine month period ended September 30, 2005, total revenue increased 13.2% to $94,241,000 compared to $83,273,000 for the 2004 period. Operating income before minority interests, real estate sale gains and preferred stock dividends increased 7.2% to $27,285,000 compared to $25,451,000 for the comparable 2004 period. Net income available to common stockholders was $15,337,000 or $0.92 per share (basic & diluted) for the 2005 period, a per share increase of 7.0% (diluted) compared to net income available to common stockholders of $13,946,000 or $0.87 per share (basic) and $0.86 per share (diluted) for the 2004 period. Overall same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 3.2% for the 2005 nine month period compared to the same period in 2004 and same property operating income increased 2.0%. The shopping center portfolio same center operating income increased 2.2% and the office portfolio grew 1.5%.
 
As of September 30, 2005, 97.2% of the operating portfolio was leased, compared to 94.2% a year earlier. The 2004 leasing percentage was adversely impacted by 133,000 square feet of vacant space in the Lexington Mall which the Company had not leased in anticipation of redeveloping the shopping center. As of September 30, 2005, the Company has been actively planning the redevelopment of the property and has taken the space out of service. On a same property basis, 97.0% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 95.9%. The increase in 2005 leasing percentage resulted from the lease-up of space at Olde Forte and Southside Plaza and to a lesser extent, the full lease-up of Washington Square.
 
Funds From Operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 20.7% to $14,856,000 in the 2005 third quarter compared to $12,304,000 for the same quarter in 2004. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, is defined as net income, plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales. The $2,552,000 increase in FFO available to common shareholders in the 2005 quarter resulted primarily from the combination of (1) the resolution of the Lexington Mall land use dispute and (2) increased operating income from retail acquisition and development properties. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 17.5% to $0.67 per share in 2005 compared to $0.57 per share for the 2004 quarter. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2005 nine month period increased 13.3% to $39,594,000 from $34,947,000 during the 2004 period. Diluted per share FFO available to common shareholders increased 9.8% to $1.80 per share in 2005 compared to $1.64 per share for the 2004 period. FFO available to common shareholders before the Lexington Mall impact was $13,301,000 or $0.60 per share (basic & diluted) for the 2005 quarter and $38,039,000 or $1.74 per share (basic & diluted) for the nine months ended September 30, 2005.
 
On October 31, 2005, Saul Centers paid a quarterly dividend of $0.42 per share on its common stock, representing a $0.02 per share increase (5.0%) over the prior quarter's dividend and an annualized dividend rate of $1.68 per share.
 
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 42 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 7.3 million square feet of leaseable area. Over 80% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20051207131454.txt.gz
TIME:20051207131454
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
In connection with the determination and awarding of annual bonuses for all Saul Centers, Inc. employees, on December 1, 2005, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors approved bonuses for the following named executive officers.
 
 
To determine the amount of the bonuses awarded to the named officers, the members of the Compensation Committee considered the performance of the Company over the past year, each officer's individual contribution to the success of the Company, employment longevity and the amount of base compensation paid to such officers. The Compensation Committee also considered that the Chief Executive Officer and President also devote a portion of their time to managing other related entities.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Dated: December 7, 2005


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20060224122537.txt.gz
TIME:20060224122537
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 22, 2006, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2005. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release, dated February 22, 2006, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: February 24, 2006
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
February 22, 2006, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2005. Total revenues for the quarter ended December 31, 2005 increased 10.8% to $32,774,000 compared to $29,569,000 for the 2004 quarter. Operating income, defined as net income available to common stockholders before minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 18.0% to $9,740,000 compared to $8,256,000 for the comparable 2004 quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $5,890,000 or $0.35 per diluted share for the 2005 quarter, a per share increase of 34.6% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $4,228,000 or $0.26 per diluted share for the 2004 quarter. Acquisitions and developments completed during the trailing twelve months produced the significant portion of increased operating income for the 2005 fourth quarter.
Same property revenues for the total portfolio increased 4.4% for the 2005 fourth quarter compared to the same quarter in 2004 and same property operating income increased 2.8%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting periods. Additionally, Lexington Mall results are not included in same property performance due to the planned redevelopment of the center. Property operating income is calculated as total property revenue less property operating expenses, provision for credit losses and real estate taxes. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 3.2% for the 2005 fourth quarter compared to the prior year's quarter. Same property operating income in the office portfolio grew 1.8% for the 2005 quarter.
For the year ended December 31, 2005, total revenues increased 12.6% to $127,015,000 compared to $112,842,000 for the 2004 year. Operating income before gain on property sold, minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 9.8% to $37,025,000 compared to $33,707,000 for the 2004 year. Net income available to common stockholders was $21,227,000 or $1.27 per diluted share for the 2005 year, resulting in a per share increase of 13.4% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $18,174,000 or $1.12 per diluted share for the 2004 year. Acquisitions and developments completed during 2004 and 2005 produced the significant portion of increased operating income for the 2005 year.
Same property revenues for the total portfolio increased 3.4% for the 2005 year compared to the 2004 year and same property operating income increased 2.3%. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 2.6% and same property operating income in the office portfolio grew 1.6% for the 2005 year.
As of December 31, 2005, 97.1% of the operating portfolio was leased, compared to 93.9% a year earlier. The 2004 leasing percentage was adversely impacted by 133,000 square feet of vacant space in the Lexington Mall which the Company was not leasing in anticipation of redeveloping the shopping center. Since September 30, 2005, the Company has been actively planning the redevelopment of the property and has taken the space out of service. On a same property basis, 96.9% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 95.7%. The increase in 2005 leasing percentage resulted from the lease-up of space at Olde Forte Village and Southside Plaza and to a lesser extent, the full lease-up of Washington Square.
Funds From Operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 12.8% to $13,628,000 in the 2005 fourth quarter compared to $12,084,000 for the same quarter in 2004. The $1,544,000 increase in FFO available to common shareholders in the 2005 quarter resulted primarily from increased operating income from retail acquisition and development properties. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 8.9% to $0.61 per share in 2005 compared to $0.56 for the 2004 quarter. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2005 year increased by $6,191,000 (13.2%) to $53,222,000 primarily due to increased operating income from retail acquisition and development properties and to a lesser extent, the resolution of the Lexington Mall land use dispute during the third quarter. Diluted per share FFO available to common shareholders increased 10.0% to $2.42 per share in 2005 compared to $2.20 for the 2004 year. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, is defined as net income plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales.
During 2005, the Company paid four quarterly dividends totaling $1.60 per share on its common stock. On January 31, 2006, the Company paid a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.42 per share, an annualized dividend rate of $1.68 per share.
Also during 2005, the Company acquired three grocery anchored shopping centers totaling 370,000 square feet, and completed the construction and lease-up of three neighborhood shopping center developments totaling 180,000 square feet.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 45 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 7.6 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20060428093857.txt.gz
TIME:20060428093857
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 26, 2006, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2006. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
99.1 Press Release, dated April 26, 2006, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: April 28, 2006
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
April 26, 2006, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended March 31, 2006. Total revenues for the quarter ended March 31, 2006 increased 10.4% to $33,467,000 compared to $30,307,000 for the 2005 quarter. Operating income, defined as net income available to common stockholders before minority interests and preferred stock dividends, increased 10.1% to $9,509,000 compared to $8,639,000 for the comparable 2005 quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $5,707,000 or $0.33 per diluted share for the 2006 quarter, a per share increase of 17.9% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $4,610,000 or $0.28 per diluted share for the 2005 quarter. Successful leasing activity at several core shopping centers and operating income from developments completed during the trailing twelve months produced the significant portion of increased operating income for the 2006 first quarter.
Same property revenues for the total portfolio increased 4.5% for the 2006 first quarter compared to the same quarter in 2005 and same property operating income increased 4.6%. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 6.4% for the 2006 first quarter compared to the prior year's quarter. Same property operating income in the office portfolio was unchanged for the 2006 quarter. Successful leasing activity at several core shopping centers was the primary contributor to the improvement in same property results. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting periods. Additionally, Lexington Mall results are not included in same property performance due to the planned redevelopment of the center. Property operating income is calculated as total property revenue less property operating expenses, provision for credit losses and real estate taxes.
As of March 31, 2006, 96.8% of the operating portfolio was leased, compared to 92.4% a year earlier. The 2005 leasing percentage was adversely impacted by 133,000 square feet of vacant space in the Lexington Mall which the Company was not leasing in anticipation of redeveloping the shopping center. Since September 30, 2005, the Company has been actively planning the redevelopment of the property and has taken the space out of service. On a same property basis, 96.8% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 93.9%. The increase in 2006 leasing percentage resulted from the lease-up of space at Great Eastern Plaza, Southside Plaza and Olde Forte Village and to a lesser extent, improved leasing at several other properties.
Funds From Operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 13.3% to $13,885,000 in the 2006 first quarter compared to $12,254,000 for the same quarter in 2005. The $1,631,000 increase in FFO available to common shareholders in the 2006 quarter resulted primarily from increased operating income from successful leasing activity at several core shopping centers and operating income from new developments. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 10.7% to $0.62 per share in 2006 compared to $0.56 for the 2005 quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, is defined as net income plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 45 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 7.6 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20060503164604.txt.gz
TIME:20060503164604
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
In connection with the determination and awarding of annual base salaries for all Saul Centers, Inc. employees, on April 28, 2006, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors approved annual base salaries commencing on May 1, 2006 for the following named executive officers.
 
To determine the annual base salaries, the members of the Compensation Committee considered the performance of the Company over the past year, each officer's individual contribution to the success of the Company, employment longevity and executive compensation reported by other publicly traded real estate investment trusts. The Compensation Committee also considered that the Chief Executive Officer and President also devote a portion of their time to managing other related entities.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: May 3, 2006


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20060530155611.txt.gz
TIME:20060530155611
EVENTS:	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 3.03. Material Modification to Rights of Security Holders
At the annual meeting of stockholders held on April 28, 2006, the stockholders of Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") approved an amendment to the Company's First Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation regarding stock ownership limitations. The amendment became effective on May 26, 2006 upon filing with the State of Maryland.
The amendment changes the Company's existing stock ownership limits by (a) increasing the current stock ownership limitation of B. Francis Saul II, the Company's Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of the Board, and affiliated entities from 29.9% to 39.9% of the outstanding shares of the Company's equity stock and (b) decreasing the stock ownership limitation for all other stockholders of the Company from 5.0% to 2.5% of the outstanding shares of the Company's equity stock.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(c) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: May 30, 2006

Exhibit 3.(a)
Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation having its principal office in Maryland in Bethesda, Maryland (hereinafter called the "corporation"), hereby certifies to the State Department of Assessments and Taxation of Maryland that:
The definition of "Existing Holder Limit" in ARTICLE VI, SECTION 4.A of the First Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation (the "Articles of Incorporation") is hereby amended to read as follows:
FIRST:
"Existing Holder Limit' shall mean, with respect to any given day as to which such limit is being computed, the greater of (i) the Ownership Limit on such day and (ii) the Value, as of the close of the next preceding day, of 39.9 percent of the then-outstanding Equity Stock, subject to adjustment pursuant to paragraph J of this Section 4 and to the limitations contained in paragraph L of this Section 4."
The definition of "Ownership Limit" in ARTICLE VI, SECTION 4.A. of the Articles of Incorporation is hereby amended to read as follows:
SECOND:
"Ownership Limit' shall mean 2.5 percent of the Value of the outstanding Equity Stock, subject to adjustment as set forth in paragraph K of this Section 4 (but not more than 9.8 percent of the Value of the outstanding Equity Stock, as so adjusted)."
ARTICLE VI, SECTION 4.F(1) of the Articles of Incorporation is hereby amended to read as follows:
THIRD:
"(1) Every Beneficial or Constructive Owner of more than 1.9 percent, or such lower percentages as required pursuant to regulations under the Code, of the Value of the outstanding Equity Stock of the Corporation shall annually, no later than January 31 of each calendar year, give written notice to the Corporation stating (i) the name and address of such Beneficial or Constructive Owner; (ii) the number of shares of Equity Stock Beneficially or Constructively Owned; and (iii) a description of how such shares are held. Each such Beneficial or Constructive Owner promptly shall provide to the Corporation such additional information as the Corporation, in its sole discretion, may request in order to determine the effect, if any, of such Beneficial or Constructive Ownership on the Corporation's status as a REIT and to ensure compliance with the Ownership Limit or the Existing Holder Limit, or otherwise, as the case may be."
ARTICLE VI, SECTION 4.M. of the Articles of Incorporation is hereby amended to read as follows:
FOURTH:
"M. . Each certificate for shares of Equity Stock shall bear substantially the following legend:
Legend
The securities represented by this certificate are subject to restrictions on transfer for the purpose of maintenance of the Corporation's status as a real estate investment trust under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code"). Except as otherwise provided pursuant to the Charter of the Corporation, no Person may (i) Beneficially or Constructively Own shares of Equity Stock in excess of 2.5 percent (or such greater percentage as may be determined by the Board of Directors of the Corporation) of the Value of the outstanding shares of Equity Stock of the Corporation (except in such circumstances as the Existing Holder Limit shall apply); or (ii) Beneficially Own Equity Stock which would result in the Corporation being "closely held" under Section 856(h) of the Code or otherwise would cause the Corporation to fail to qualify as a REIT. Any Person who attempts or proposes to Beneficially or Constructively Own shares of Equity Stock in excess of the above limitations must notify the Corporation in writing at least fifteen (15) days prior to the proposed or attempted transfer. If the transfer restrictions referred to herein are violated, the shares of Equity Stock represented hereby automatically will be held in trust by the Corporation, all as provided in the Charter of the Corporation. All capitalized terms in this legend have the meanings identified in the Corporation's Charter, as the same may be amended or restated from time to time, a copy of which, including the restrictions on transfer, will be sent without charge to each stockholder who so requests.'"
The amendment of the Articles of Incorporation of the corporation as hereinabove set forth has been duly advised by the board of directors and approved by the stockholders of the corporation.
FIFTH:
 
: Saul Centers, Inc. has caused these presents to be signed in its name and on its behalf by its Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer and attested by its Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer and Secretary on May 25, 2006.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
, Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer of Saul Centers, Inc., who executed on behalf of said corporation, the foregoing Articles of Amendment, of which this certificate is made a part, hereby acknowledges, in the name and on behalf of said corporation, the foregoing Articles of Amendment to be the corporate act of said corporation and further certifies that, to the best of his knowledge, information, and belief, the matters and facts set forth therein with respect to the approval thereof are true in all material respects, under the penalties of perjury.
THE UNDERSIGNED
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20060808162339.txt.gz
TIME:20060808162339
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On August 8, 2006, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2006. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
99.1 Press Release, dated August 8, 2006, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: August 8, 2006
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
August 8, 2006, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust, announced its second quarter 2006 operating results. Total revenues for the quarter ended June 30, 2006 increased 9.7% to $33,748,000 compared to $30,752,000 for the 2005 quarter. Operating income before minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 7.8% to $9,648,000 compared to $8,952,000 for the comparable 2005 quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $5,797,000 or $0.34 per diluted share for the 2006 quarter, a per share increase of 17.2% compared to $4,871,000 or $0.29 per diluted share for the 2005 quarter. Successful leasing activity at several core shopping centers and operating income from development properties produced the significant portion of increased operating income for the 2006 quarter.
Overall same property revenues for the total portfolio increased 4.1% for the 2006 second quarter compared to the same quarter in 2005 and same property operating income increased 4.0%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting periods. Property operating income is calculated as total property revenue less property operating expenses, provision for credit losses and real estate taxes. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 6.5% for the 2006 second quarter, compared to the prior year's quarter. Successful leasing activity at several core shopping centers was the primary contributor to the improvement in same property results. Same property operating income in the office portfolio declined 2.3% for the 2006 quarter, compared to the prior year's quarter, due to higher lease termination fees recognized in the 2005 quarter.
For the six month period ended June 30, 2006, total revenues increased 10.1% to $67,215,000 compared to $61,059,000 for the 2005 period. Operating income before minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 8.9% to $19,157,000 compared to $17,591,000 for the comparable 2005 period. Net income available to common stockholders was $11,504,000 or $0.67 per diluted share for the 2006 period, a per share increase of 17.5% compared to $9,481,000 or $0.57 per diluted share for the 2005 period. Overall same property revenues for the total portfolio increased 4.3% for the 2006 six month period compared to the same period in 2005 and same property operating income increased 4.4%. Shopping center same property operating income increased 6.5% due to successful leasing activity at several core shopping centers and office same property operating income declined 1.1% due to higher lease termination fees recognized in the 2005 period.
As of June 30, 2006, 96.7% of the operating portfolio was leased, compared to 93.2% a year earlier. The 2005 leasing percentage was adversely affected by the combined impact of a 113,000 square foot vacancy at Great Eastern Plaza and 133,000 square feet of vacant space in the Lexington Mall which the Company was not leasing in anticipation of redeveloping the shopping center. Since September 30, 2005, the Company has been actively planning the redevelopment of Lexington and has taken the space out of service. On a same property basis, 96.8% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 94.8%. The increase in 2006 leasing percentage resulted from the lease-up of space at Great Eastern Plaza, Southside Plaza and Olde Forte Village and to a lesser extent, improved leasing at several other properties.
Funds From Operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 12.5% to $14,048,000 in the 2006 second quarter compared to $12,484,000 for the same quarter in 2005. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, is defined as net income, plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 8.8% to $0.62 per share for the 2006 quarter compared to $0.57 per share for the 2005 quarter. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2006 six month period increased 12.9% to $27,933,000 from $24,738,000 during the 2005 period. Fully diluted per diluted share FFO available to common shareholders increased 9.7% to $1.24 per diluted share for the 2006 six month period compared to $1.13 per diluted share for the 2005 period. These increases resulted primarily from increased operating income from successful leasing activity at several core shopping centers and operating income from new developments.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 46 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 7.7 million square feet of leaseable area. Over 80% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20061107163118.txt.gz
TIME:20061107163118
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On November 7, 2006, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2006. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
99.1 Press Release, dated November 7, 2006, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: November 7, 2006
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
November 7, 2006, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust, announced its third quarter 2006 operating results. Total revenue for the quarter ended September 30, 2006 increased 5.1% to $34,860,000 compared to $33,182,000 for the 2005 quarter. Operating income before minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 6.5% to $10,328,000 compared to $9,694,000 for the comparable 2005 quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $6,321,000 or $0.37 per diluted share for the 2006 quarter, a per share increase of 5.7% compared to $5,856,000 or $0.35 per diluted share for the 2005 quarter. Successful leasing activity at several core shopping centers and operating income from development properties produced the significant portion of increased operating income for the 2006 quarter.
Overall same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 5.3% for the 2006 third quarter compared to the same quarter in 2005 and same property operating income increased 4.5%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting periods. Property operating income is calculated as total property revenue less property operating expenses, provision for credit losses and real estate taxes. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 5.2% for the 2006 third quarter, compared to the prior year's quarter. Successful leasing activity at several core shopping centers was the primary contributor to the improvement in same property results. Same property operating income in the office portfolio increased 2.6% for the 2006 quarter, compared to the prior year's quarter.
For the nine month period ended September 30, 2006, total revenue increased 8.3% to $102,075,000 compared to $94,241,000 for the 2005 period. Operating income before minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 8.1% to $29,485,000 compared to $27,285,000 for the comparable 2005 period. Net income available to common stockholders was $17,825,000 or $1.04 per diluted share for the 2006 period, a per share increase of 13.0% compared to $15,337,000 or $0.92 per diluted share for the 2005 period. Overall same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 4.7% for the 2006 nine month period compared to the same period in 2005 and same property operating income increased 4.4%. Shopping center same property operating income increased 6.1% due to successful leasing activity at several core shopping centers and office same property operating income increased 0.1% compared to the 2005 period.
As of September 30, 2006, 97.0% of the operating portfolio was leased, compared to 97.2% a year earlier.
Funds From Operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) decreased 0.4% to $14,791,000 in the 2006 third quarter compared to $14,856,000 for the same quarter in 2005. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders decreased 3.0% to $0.65 per share for the 2006 quarter compared to $0.67 per share for the 2005 quarter. During the 2005 quarter, the Company included $1,555,000 ($0.07 per diluted share) in FFO due to the resolution of a land use dispute with a property owner adjacent to Lexington Mall. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, is defined as net income, plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2006 nine month period increased 7.9% to $42,724,000 from $39,594,000 during the 2005 period. FFO available to common shareholders increased 5.0% to $1.89 per diluted share for the 2006 nine month period compared to $1.80 per diluted share for the 2005 period. Without considering the effects of the Lexington Mall land use settlement in each of the prior year periods, FFO increased in the 2006 quarter and year to date periods primarily as a result of increased operating income from successful leasing activity at several core shopping centers and operating income from new developments.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 46 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 7.7 million square feet of leaseable area. Over 80% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20070226165353.txt.gz
TIME:20070226165353
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
On February 22, 2007, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2006. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: February 26, 2007
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
February 22, 2007, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2006. Total revenue for the quarter ended December 31, 2006 increased 9.5% to $35,903,000 compared to $32,774,000 for the 2005 quarter. Operating income, defined as net income available to common stockholders before minority interests and preferred stock dividends, increased 12.8% to $10,988,000 for the 2006 quarter compared to $9,740,000 for the comparable 2005 quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $6,855,000 or $0.39 per diluted share for the 2006 quarter, a per share increase of 11.4% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $5,890,000 or $0.35 per diluted share for the 2005 quarter.
For the year ended December 31, 2006, total revenue increased 8.6% to $137,978,000 compared to $127,015,000 for the 2005 year. Operating income before minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 9.3% to $40,473,000 in 2006 compared to $37,025,000 in 2005. Net income available to common stockholders was $24,680,000 or $1.43 per diluted share in 2006, resulting in a per share increase of 12.6% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $21,227,000 or $1.27 per diluted share in 2005. Successful leasing activity at several core shopping centers and operating income from development properties produced the significant portion of increased operating income for the 2006 quarter and year.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 3.2% for the 2006 fourth quarter compared to the same quarter in 2005 and same property operating income increased 4.4%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting periods. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 5.2% for the 2006 fourth quarter compared to the prior year's quarter. Same property operating income in the office portfolio grew 2.4% for the 2006 quarter. Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 4.3% for the 2006 year compared to the 2005 year and same property operating income increased 4.5%. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 6.0% from 2005 to 2006. Successful leasing activity at several core shopping centers produced the significant portion of increased shopping center operating income for the 2006 quarter and year. Same property operating income in the office portfolio grew 0.7% for the 2006 year.
As of December 31, 2006, excluding development properties, 96.3% of the operating portfolio was leased, compared to 97.1% a year earlier. The company's significant development property, the 188,000 square foot Lansdowne Towne Center, was 85.0% leased at year-end 2006. On a same property basis, 96.7% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 97.1%. The 2006 leasing percentages decreased due to the departure of two local grocery anchors at the Belvedere and West Park shopping centers totaling 59,000 square feet.
Funds From Operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 13.0% to $15,397,000 in the 2006 fourth quarter compared to $13,628,000 for the same quarter in 2005. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 9.8% to $0.67 per share in 2006 compared to $0.61 per share for the 2005 quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, is defined as net income plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2006 year increased 9.2% to $58,121,000 compared to $53,222,000 in 2005. Diluted per share FFO available to common shareholders increased 6.2% to $2.57 per share in 2006 compared to $2.42 per share for the 2005 year. During the 2005 year, the Company included $1,555,000 ($0.07 per diluted share) in FFO due to the resolution of a land use dispute with a property owner adjacent to Lexington Mall. FFO increased in the 2006 quarter and 2006 year, despite the impact of the one-time Lexington Mall land use settlement included in the prior year period, due to increased operating income from successful leasing activity at several core shopping centers and operating income from new developments.
During 2006, the Company paid four quarterly dividends to its common stockholders totaling $1.68 per share, compared to $1.60 paid per share in 2005. On January 31, 2007, the Company paid a quarterly dividend of $0.42 per share to its common stockholders.
Also during 2006, the Company acquired two grocery anchored shopping centers, Hunt Club Corners and Smallwood Village Center, totaling 299,000 square feet, and developed two neighborhood shopping centers, Lansdowne Town Center and Broadlands Village III, totaling 211,000 square feet.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 47 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 7.9 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20070426160542.txt.gz
TIME:20070426160542
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
On April 25, 2007, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2007. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
(c) Exhibits
99.1 Press Release, dated April 25, 2007, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: April 26, 2007
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
April 25, 2007, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended March 31, 2007. Total revenue for the quarter ended March 31, 2007 increased 9.6% to $36,684,000 compared to $33,467,000 for the 2006 quarter. Operating income, defined as net income available to common stockholders before minority interests and preferred stock dividends, increased 15.8% to $11,009,000 for the 2007 quarter compared to $9,509,000 for the comparable 2006 quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $6,874,000 or $0.39 per diluted share for the 2007 quarter, a per share increase of 18.2% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $5,707,000 or $0.33 per diluted share for the 2006 quarter. The operating income increase for the 2007 quarter was produced by (1) Lansdowne Town Center, the 188,000 square foot shopping center development near Leesburg, Virginia, which commenced operations during the fourth quarter 2006, (2) successful leasing activity at several core properties and (3) to a lesser extent other development properties.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 5.1% for the 2007 quarter compared to the 2006 quarter and same property operating income increased 3.1%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting periods. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 2.7% for the 2007 quarter compared to the prior year's quarter. Same property operating income in the office portfolio grew 4.0% for the 2007 quarter. Successful leasing activity at several core properties produced the significant portion of increased property operating income for the 2007 quarter.
As of March 31, 2007, 95.9% of the operating portfolio was leased, compared to 96.8% a year earlier. The company's significant development property, the 188,000 square foot Lansdowne Towne Center, was 91.0% leased at March 31, 2007. On a same property basis, 96.0% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 96.8%. Approximately half of the 2007 leasing percentage decrease resulted from the departure of a 32,000 square foot local grocery anchor at Belvedere shopping center in Baltimore, Maryland.
Funds From Operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 11.3% to $15,457,000 in the 2007 quarter compared to $13,885,000 for the same quarter in 2006. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 8.1% to $0.67 per share in 2007 compared to $0.62 per share for the 2006 quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, is defined as net income plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales. FFO increased in the 2007 quarter due to increased operating income from (1) Lansdowne Town Center, (2) successful leasing activity at several core properties and (3) to a lesser extent acquisition and development properties.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 47 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 7.9 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20070808162122.txt.gz
TIME:20070808162122
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
On August 8, 2007, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2007. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
(c) Exhibits
99.1 Press Release, dated August 8, 2007, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: August 8, 2007
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
August 8, 2007, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended June 30, 2007. Total revenue for the quarter ended June 30, 2007 increased 9.9% to $37,077,000 compared to $33,748,000 for the 2006 quarter. Operating income, defined as net income available to common stockholders before minority interests and preferred stock dividends, increased 14.8% to $11,077,000 for the 2007 quarter compared to $9,648,000 for the comparable 2006 quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $6,926,000 or $0.39 per diluted share for the 2007 quarter, a per share increase of 14.7% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $5,797,000 or $0.34 per diluted share for the 2006 quarter. The operating income increase for the 2007 quarter was produced by (1) Lansdowne Town Center, the 188,000 square foot shopping center development near Leesburg, Virginia, which commenced operations during the fourth quarter 2006, (2) successful leasing activity at several core properties and (3) to a lesser extent other development properties.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 4.7% for the 2007 quarter compared to the 2006 quarter and same property operating income increased 3.7%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting periods. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 3.1% for the 2007 quarter compared to the prior year's quarter. Same property operating income in the office portfolio grew 5.9% for the 2007 quarter. Successful leasing activity at several core properties produced the significant portion of increased property operating income for the 2007 quarter.
For the six month period ended June 30, 2007, total revenues increased 9.7% to $73,761,000 compared to $67,215,000 for the 2006 period. Operating income before minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 15.3% to $22,086,000 compared to $19,157,000 for the comparable 2006 period. Net income available to common stockholders was $13,800,000 or $0.78 per diluted share for the 2007 period, a per share increase of 16.4% compared to $11,504,000 or $0.67 per diluted share for the 2006 period. Overall same property revenues for the total portfolio increased 5.0% for the 2007 six month period compared to the same period in 2006 and same property operating income increased 3.6%. Shopping center same property operating income increased 3.2% due to successful leasing activity at several core shopping centers and office same property operating income increased 4.9%.
As of June 30, 2007, 95.7% of the operating portfolio was leased, compared to 96.6% a year earlier. The company's significant development property, the 188,000 square foot Lansdowne Towne Center, was 91.3% leased at June 30, 2007. On a same property basis, 95.8% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 96.6%. Approximately half of the 2007 leasing percentage decrease resulted from the departure of a 32,000 square foot local grocery anchor at Belvedere shopping center in Baltimore, Maryland.
Funds From Operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 10.9% to $15,580,000 in the 2007 quarter compared to $14,048,000 for the same quarter in 2006. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 8.1% to $0.67 per share in 2007 compared to $0.62 per share for the 2006 quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for real estate investment trusts, is defined as net income plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales. FFO increased in the 2007 quarter due to increased operating income from (1) Lansdowne Town Center, (2) successful leasing activity at several core properties and (3) to a lesser extent acquisition and development properties. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2007 six month period increased 11.1% to $31,037,000 from $27,933,000 during the 2006 period. FFO available to common shareholders increased 8.1% to $1.34 per diluted share for the 2007 six month period compared to $1.24 per diluted share for the 2006 period.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 48 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 8.0 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20071108165746.txt.gz
TIME:20071108165746
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
On November 8, 2007, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2007. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: November 8, 2007
 
 

November 8, 2007, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended September 30, 2007. Total revenue for the three months ended September 30, 2007 ("2007 Quarter") increased 9.0% to $38,014,000 compared to $34,860,000 for the three months ended September 30, 2006 ("2006 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before minority interests and preferred stock dividends, increased 15.8% to $11,956,000 for the 2007 Quarter compared to $10,328,000 for the 2006 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $7,624,000 or $0.43 per diluted share for the 2007 Quarter, a per share increase of 16.2% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $6,321,000 or $0.37 per diluted share for the 2006 Quarter. The operating income increase for the 2007 Quarter was produced by (1) rental rate growth at several core properties and expansions of two shopping centers, (2) Lansdowne Town Center, the 188,000 square foot shopping center development near Leesburg, Virginia, which commenced operations during the fourth quarter 2006, and (3) to a lesser extent operating income contributed by the Broadlands III development property.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 2.9% for the 2007 Quarter compared to the 2006 Quarter and same property operating income increased 1.6%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting periods. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 1.8% for the 2007 Quarter compared to the 2006 Quarter. Same property operating income in the office portfolio grew 0.9% for the 2007 Quarter. Rental rate growth at several core properties and expansions of two shopping centers produced the significant portion of increased property operating income for the 2007 Quarter.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2007 ("2007 Period"), total revenue increased 9.5% to $111,775,000 compared to $102,075,000 for the nine months ended September 30, 2006 ("2006 Period") and operating income before minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 15.5% to $34,042,000 compared to $29,485,000 for the 2006 Period. Net income available to common stockholders was $21,424,000 or $1.21 per diluted share for the 2007 Period, a per share increase of 16.3% compared to $17,825,000 or $1.04 per diluted share for the 2006 Period. Overall same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 4.4% for the 2007
 
Period compared to the 2006 Period and same property operating income increased 3.0%. Shopping center same property operating income increased 2.9% due to rental rate growth at several core shopping centers and expansions of two shopping centers for the 2007 Period. Office same property operating income increased 3.6% due to rental rate growth at two properties for the 2007 Period.
As of September 30, 2007, 95.4% of the operating portfolio was leased, compared to 97.0% a year earlier. On a same property basis, 95.5% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year's level of 97.0%. The majority of the 2007 leasing percentage decrease resulted from the departure of a 32,000 square foot local grocery anchor at Belvedere shopping center and reduced occupancy at Smallwood shopping center, where the Company is preparing to redevelop the center's faade and common areas.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 11.4% to $16,481,000 in the 2007 Quarter compared to $14,791,000 for the 2006 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 9.2% to $0.71 per share for the 2007 Quarter compared to $0.65 per share for the 2006 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales. FFO increased in the 2007 Quarter due to increased operating income from (1) the Lansdowne Town Center development, (2) rental rate growth at several core properties and expansions of two shopping centers, and (3) to a lesser extent operating income from acquisition and other development properties. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2007 Period increased 11.2% to $47,518,000 from $42,724,000 during the 2006 Period. FFO available to common shareholders increased 7.9% to $2.05 per diluted share for the 2007 Period compared to $1.90 per diluted share for the 2006 Period.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 48 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 8.0 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20071203165339.txt.gz
TIME:20071203165339
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
On November 29, 2007, the Board of Directors of Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") adopted technical amendments to the Company's Amended and Restated Bylaws to expressly authorize the issuance of uncertificated shares of capital stock. The Board of Directors adopted these amendments to comply with the New York Stock Exchange (the "NYSE") requirement that securities listed on the NYSE be eligible for participation in the Direct Registration System by January 2008.
The full text of the amendment to the Amended and Restated Bylaws is attached hereto as Exhibit 3.(b) and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: December 3, 2007

Exhibit 3.(b)
Article V of the Amended and Restated Bylaws of Saul Centers, Inc., is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
Each stockholder shall be entitled to a certificate or certificates, in a form approved by the Board of Directors and consistent with the MGCL, which shall represent and certify the number, kind and class of shares owned by him or her in the Corporation. Each certificate shall be signed by the Chairman of the Board, President or Vice President, and by the Secretary or the Treasurer and, pursuant to resolutions of the Board of Directors, any such signature may be in facsimile. In case any officer, transfer agent or registrar who has signed, or whose facsimile signature has been placed on, a certificate has ceased to hold such office before the certificate is issued, it may nevertheless be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if he or she held such office at the date of issue. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary provided in these Bylaws, the Board of Directors may provide by resolution or resolutions that some or all of any or all classes or series of its stock shall be uncertificated shares (except that the foregoing shall not apply to shares represented by a certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation). To the extent required by Maryland law, within a reasonable time after the issuance or transfer of uncertificated shares, the Corporation shall send to the holder thereof a written notice that shall set forth (i) the name of the Corporation, (ii) the name of the holder or other person to whom the shares are issued, (iii) the class of stock and number of shares represented, (iv) the designations, preferences, conversion and other rights, voting powers, restrictions, limitations as to dividends, qualifications, and terms and conditions of redemption of the stock of each class of the Corporation, (v) the differences in the relative
Section 5.1. Share Certificates.
rights and preferences between the shares of each series to the extent they have been set and the authority of the Board of Directors to set the relative rights and preferences of subsequent series, and (vi) any restrictions on transferability of the shares issued, if any, and a full statement of the restrictions or a statement that the Corporation will furnish information about the restrictions to the holder on request without charge.
The Board of Directors may fix, in advance, a date as the record date for the purpose of determining stockholders entitled to notice of, or to vote at, any meeting of stockholders, or stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or the allotment of any rights, or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock, or in order to make a determination of stockholders for any other proper purpose. The record date may not be prior to the close of business on the day the record date is fixed. Such date shall be not more than ninety (90) days, and in case of a meeting of stockholders, not less than ten (10) days, prior to the date on which the action requiring such determination of stockholders is to be taken. The stock transfer books of the Corporation may not be closed for a period longer than twenty (20) days.
Section 5.2. Record Date and Closing of Transfer Books.
If no record date is fixed and the Corporation's stock transfer books are not closed, the determination of stockholders entitled to notice of, or to vote at, a meeting of stockholders shall be at the later of (a) the close of the business on the day on which notice of the meeting is mailed or (b) the thirtieth (30th) day before the meeting. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any purpose other than that specified in the preceding sentence shall be at the close of business on the day on which the resolution of the Board of Directors relating thereto is adopted.
When a determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of, or to vote at, any meeting of stockholders has been made as provided in this Section 5.2, such determination shall apply to any future meeting in respect of any adjournment thereof, unless the directors fix a new record date under this section for such future meeting.
The Corporation shall be entitled to treat the holder of record of shares as the holder in fact and, except as otherwise provided by the laws of the State of Maryland, shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in the shares.
Section 5.3. Registered Stockholders.
Shares of the Corporation only shall be transferred on its books upon the surrender to the Corporation of the share certificates duly endorsed or accompanied by proper evidence of succession, assignment or authority to transfer, and upon presentation of adequate evidence of the validity of the transfer under this Section 5.3 and the laws of the State of Maryland. In that event, the surrendered certificates shall be cancelled, new certificates issued to the person entitled to them and the transaction recorded on the books of the Corporation.
Shares of stock of the Corporation that are not represented by a certificate shall be transferable or assignable on the stock transfer books of the Corporation by the holder submitting to the Corporation or its transfer agent such evidence of transfer and following such other procedures as the Corporation or its transfer agent may reasonably require.
The Board of Directors may direct a new certificate to be issued in place of a certificate alleged to have been destroyed or lost if the owner makes an affidavit that it is destroyed or lost. The Board, in its discretion, may, as a condition precedent to issuing the new certificate, require the owner to give the Corporation a bond as indemnity against any claim that may be made against the Corporation on the certificate allegedly destroyed or lost.
Section 5.4. Lost Certificates.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20071226162501.txt.gz
TIME:20071226162501
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
On December 19, 2007, Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, the operating partnership for Saul Centers, Inc., entered into a new $150,000,000 unsecured revolving credit facility, effective as of December 19, 2007 (the "Facility"), with a syndicate of lenders led by U.S. Bank National Association. The Facility replaces the Company's existing unsecured revolving credit facility. U.S. Bank National Association acts as Administrative Agent and Sole Lead Arranger for the Facility, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, acts as Syndication Agent. Saul Centers, Inc. and certain subsidiaries of Saul Holdings Limited Partnership have guaranteed the payment obligations of Saul Holdings Limited Partnership under the Facility. For purposes of this Form 8-K, all references to the "Company" refer, collectively, to Saul Centers, Inc., together with Saul Holdings Limited Partnership and the wholly owned subsidiaries of Saul Holdings Limited Partnership.
The Facility provides for a $150,000,000 revolving credit facility maturing on December 19, 2010, which term may be extended by the Company for one additional year subject to the Company's satisfaction of certain conditions. Until December 19, 2009, certain or all of the lenders may, upon request by the Company, increase the revolving credit facility line by $50,000,000. Letters of credit may be issued under the revolving credit facility.
Currently, $150,000,000 is available for borrowing, of which approximately $8,200,000 is outstanding and the balance of $141,800,000 is available for working capital and operating property acquisitions. In general, loan availability under the Facility is primarily determined by operating income from the Company's existing unencumbered properties. As of November 30, 2007, the unencumbered properties supported availability of $98,000,000.Interest accrues at a rate of LIBOR plus a spread of 1.400% to 1.600% (determined by certain leverage tests) or upon the bank's reference rate at the Company's option. An additional $52,000,000 is available based on the Company's consolidated operating income after debt service. On this portion of the Facility, interest accrues at a rate of LIBOR plus a spread of 1.700% to 2.250% (determined by certain leverage tests) or upon the bank's reference rate plus a spread of 0.575% at the Company's option.
The Facility requires the Company and its subsidiaries to satisfy certain financial covenants. The material covenants require the Company, on a consolidated basis, to:
 
 
 
 
 
Each of U.S. Bank National Association, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, Compass Bank and Sovereign Bank, is a lender under the Facility. Some of the lenders or their affiliates from time to time have provided in the past and may provide in the future commercial lending services to the Company and its affiliates in the ordinary course of business.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20080219172635.txt.gz
TIME:20080219172635
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 19, 2008, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2007. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: February 19, 2008
 
 

February 19, 2008, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2007. Total revenue for the three months ended December 31, 2007 ("2007 Quarter") increased 8.1% to $38,810,000 compared to $35,903,000 for the three months ended December 31, 2006 ("2006 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before gain on property disposition, minority interests and preferred stock dividends, increased 3.2% to $11,340,000 for the 2007 Quarter compared to $10,988,000 for the 2006 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $7,279,000 or $0.41 per diluted share for the 2007 Quarter, a per share increase of 5.1% compared to net income available to common stockholders of $6,855,000 or $0.39 per diluted share for the 2006 Quarter. The operating income increase for the 2007 Quarter was produced by (1) Lansdowne Town Center which commenced operations during the fourth quarter of 2006, (2) increased lease termination fees, and (3) rental rate growth in the core properties. The operating income increases were offset in part by a charge to general and administrative expense resulting from the write-off of costs related to an abandoned acquisition of a development land parcel.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 3.1% for the 2007 Quarter compared to the 2006 Quarter and same property operating income increased 2.2%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 3.4% for the 2007 Quarter compared to the 2006 Quarter. Same property operating income in the office portfolio decreased 1.4% for the 2007 Quarter. Rental rate growth at several core properties and increased lease termination fees produced the significant portion of the shopping center operating income increase.
For the year ended December 31, 2007 ("2007 Year"), total revenue increased 9.1% to $150,585,000 compared to $137,978,000 for the year ended December 31, 2006 ("2006 Year"). Operating income before gain on property disposition, minority interests and preferred stock dividends increased 12.1% to $45,382,000 in the 2007 Year compared to $40,473,000 for the
 
2006 Year. Net income available to common stockholders was $28,703,000 or $1.62 per diluted share for the 2007 Year, a per share increase of 13.3% compared to $24,680,000 or $1.43 per diluted share for the 2006 Year. Overall same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 4.1% for the 2007 Year compared to the 2006 Year and same property operating income increased 2.8%. Shopping center same property operating income increased 3.0% due to rental rate growth at the core shopping centers and expansions of two shopping centers for the 2007 Year. Office same property operating income increased 2.3% due to rental rate growth for the 2007 Year.
As of December 31, 2007, 95.3% of the operating portfolio was leased (both in total and on a same center basis), compared to 96.3% for December 31, 2006. The 2007 leasing percentages decreased due to a net 67,000 square feet decrease in leased space, 42,000 in the shopping center portfolio and 25,000 in the office portfolio. The shopping center decrease in leased space occurred due to a 22,000 square foot decrease at Smallwood Village, Waldorf, Maryland, where the Company is planning a faade renovation and upgrade of the common areas and a 20,000 square foot decrease at South Dekalb Plaza in Atlanta, Georgia.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 6.0% to $16,328,000 in the 2007 Quarter compared to $15,397,000 for the 2006 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 4.5% to $0.70 per share for the 2007 Quarter compared to $0.67 per share for the 2006 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains and losses from property sales. FFO increased in the 2007 Quarter due to increased net rental income from (1) the Lansdowne Town Center development, (2) rental rate growth in the core properties, (3) increased lease termination fees, and (4) to a lesser extent operating income from acquisition and other development properties. The increases in FFO were offset by a charge of approximately $372,000 to general and administrative expense resulting from the write-off of costs related to an abandoned acquisition of a development land parcel. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2007 Year increased 9.9% to $63,846,000 from $58,121,000 during the 2006 Year. FFO available to common shareholders increased 7.0% to $2.75 per diluted share for the 2007 Year compared to $2.57 per diluted share for the 2006 Year.
During 2007, the Company paid four quarterly dividends to its common stockholders totaling $1.77 per share, compared to $1.68 paid per share in 2006. On January 31, 2008, the Company paid a quarterly dividend of $0.47 per share to its common stockholders ($1.88 per share annual rate).
In July 2007, the Company acquired Orchard Park, an 88,000 square foot grocery anchored shopping center, located in suburban Atlanta, Georgia and in December 2007 acquired a 10.4 acre land parcel in Frederick, Maryland, which it plans to develop into a 105,000 square foot neighborhood shopping center. In January 2008, the Company acquired a 15.4 acre land
 
parcel in Warrenton, Virginia, which it plans to develop into a grocery anchored community shopping center. Construction is expected to commence on both development parcels during the first quarter of 2008.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 48 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 8.0 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20080327171106.txt.gz
TIME:20080327171106
EVENTS:	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In connection with the sale by Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Registrant") of up to 3,450,000 depositary shares (the "Depositary Shares"), each representing 1/100
th
of a share of 9% Series B Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock of the Registrant (the "Series B Preferred Stock"), the Registrant issued Series B Preferred Stock on March 27, 2008. Upon the issuance of Series B Preferred Stock, the ability of the Registrant to pay dividends on, make distributions with respect to, or redeem, purchase or acquire, or make a liquidation payment on any other stock of the Registrant ranking junior to or on a parity with the Series B Preferred Stock, will be subject to certain restrictions in the event that the Registrant does not declare dividends on the Series B Preferred Stock during any dividend period.
The terms of the Series B Preferred Stock are set forth in the Articles Supplementary filed as Exhibit 3.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference. A specimen stock certificate for the Series B Preferred Stock is filed as Exhibit 4.2 hereto and incorporated herein by reference. The terms of the Depositary Shares are set forth in the form of deposit agreement to be entered into by the Registrant, Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, as depositary, and the holders of the depositary receipts issued thereunder (the "Deposit Agreement"). The Deposit Agreement is filed as Exhibit 4.1 hereto.
 
Under the Registrant's First Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation, as amended, the Board of Directors of the Registrant is authorized without further stockholder action to provide for the issuance of up to 1,000,000 shares of preferred stock. On March 26, 2008, the Registrant filed with the Maryland State Department of Assessments and Taxation Articles Supplementary designating 34,500 shares of the Registrant's preferred stock as "9% Series B Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock."
 
On March 20, 2008, the Registrant entered into an Underwriting Agreement with Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, a Maryland limited partnership of which the Registrant is general partner, and RBC Capital Markets Corporation, Ferris, Baker Watts, Incorporated and Raymond James & Associates, Inc., as representatives of the several underwriters named therein, for the public offering of up 3,000,000 Depositary Shares of the Registrant. The offering closed on March 27, 2008. The Registrant also granted the underwriters an option to purchase up to 450,000 additional Depositary Shares to cover over-allotments.
 
 
The exhibits listed in the following index relate to the Registration Statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-149463) of the Registrant and are filed herewith for incorporation by reference in such Registration Statement.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: March 27, 2008
 

Exhibit 1.1
March 20, 2008
RBC Capital Markets Corporation
One Liberty Plaza, 6
th
Floor
New York, NY 10006
Ferris, Baker Watts, Incorporated
100 Light Street, 8
th
Floor
Baltimore, MD 21202
Raymond James & Associates, Inc.
880 Carillon Parkway
St. Petersburg, FL 33716
As the Representatives of the
several Underwriters named in hereto
Schedule I
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the "") and the sole general partner of Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, a Maryland limited partnership (the ""), proposes to issue and sell to the several Underwriters (the "") named in hereto for whom you are acting as Representatives (the "") 3,000,000 shares (the "") of its depositary shares (the ""), each representing 1/100th of a share of the Company's 9% Series B Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock, par value $0.01 per share (the ""). The Company also proposes to grant to the Underwriters an option to purchase up to an additional 450,000 Depositary Shares solely to cover over-allotments (the ""; the Option Shares, together with the Firm Shares, hereinafter called the ""). The respective amounts of the Shares to be so purchased by the several Underwriters are set forth opposite their names in hereto.
Company
Operating Partnership
Underwriters
Schedule I
Representatives
Firm Shares
Depositary Shares
Series B Preferred Stock
Option Shares
Shares
Schedule I
The shares of Series B Preferred Stock represented by the Shares (the "") will, when issued, be deposited by the Company against delivery of depositary receipts (the "") to be issued by Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, as Depositary (the ""), under a Deposit Agreement (the "") among the Company, the Depositary, and the holders from time to time of the Depositary Receipts issued thereunder. Each Depositary Receipt will represent one or more Depositary Shares.
Preferred Shares
Depositary Receipts
Depositary
Deposit Agreement
As the Representatives, you have advised the Company (a) that you are authorized to enter into this underwriting agreement (the "") on behalf of the several Underwriters, and (b) that the several Underwriters are willing, acting severally and not jointly, to purchase the number of Shares set forth opposite their names in .
Agreement
Schedule I
The Company wishes to confirm as follows its agreement with you in connection with the purchase of the Shares by the several Underwriters.
1. . The Company has prepared and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") in accordance with the provisions of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the ""), a shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (file number 333-149463) under the Act (""), which registration statement included a prospectus dated March 10, 2008 (the ""), relating to up to $140,000,000 aggregate offering price of the Shares and the Preferred Shares, and has filed with, or transmitted for filing to, or shall promptly hereafter file with or transmit for filing to, the Commission a supplement to the prospectus included in such registration statement (the "") specifically relating to the Shares and the plan of distribution thereof pursuant to Rule 424. Registration Statement 333-149463, including any amendments thereto filed prior to the Execution Time, became effective on March 10, 2008. Except where the context otherwise requires, Registration Statement 333-149463 on each date and time that such registration statement and any post-effective amendment or amendments thereto became or becomes effective (each, an ""), including all documents filed as part thereof and including any information contained in a Prospectus (as defined below) subsequently filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) and deemed part of such registration statement, collectively, are herein called the "," and the Basic Prospectus, as supplemented by the final Prospectus Supplement, in the form first used by the Company in connection with confirmation of sales of the Shares, is herein called the ""; and the term "" means any preliminary form of the Prospectus Supplement. The Basic Prospectus together with the Preliminary Prospectus, as amended or supplemented, immediately prior to the date and time that this Agreement is executed and delivered by the parties hereto (the "") is hereafter called the "," and any "issuer free writing prospectus" (as defined in Rule 433) relating to the Shares is hereafter called an "." The Pricing Prospectus, as supplemented by the Issuer Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, attached and listed in hereto or that the parties hereto shall hereafter expressly agree in writing to treat as part of the Disclosure Package (as defined below), if any, taken together, are hereafter collectively called the "." Any reference in this Agreement to the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Act (the ""), as of each Effective Date or the Execution Time or the date of the Prospectus, as the case may be (it being understood that the several specific references in this Agreement to documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus are for clarifying purposes only and are not meant to limit the inclusiveness of any other definition herein). For purposes of this Agreement, all references to the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto shall be deemed to include the copy filed with the Commission pursuant to its Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval system ("").
Registration Statement and Prospectus
Commission
Act
Registration Statement 333-149463
Basic Prospectus
Prospectus Supplement
Effective Date
Registration Statement
Prospectus
Preliminary Prospectus
Execution Time
Pricing Prospectus
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
Schedule II
Disclosure Package
Incorporated Documents
EDGAR
 
All references in this Agreement to financial statements and schedules and other information which is "contained," "included," "stated" or "described" in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus (and all other references of like import) shall be deemed to mean and include all such financial statements and schedules and other information which is or is deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, as the case may be; and all references in this Agreement to amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus shall be deemed to include the filing of any document under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission promulgated thereunder (the ""), which is or is deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, as the case may be.
Exchange Act
2. .
Agreement to Sell and Purchase
(a) The Company hereby agrees, subject to all the terms and conditions set forth herein, to issue and sell to the Underwriters and, upon the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements of the Company herein contained and subject to all the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Underwriter agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at a purchase price of $24.2125 per Share, the number of Firm Shares set forth opposite their respective names on to this Agreement.
Schedule I
(b) Subject to the terms and conditions and in reliance upon the representations and warranties herein set forth, the Company hereby grants an option to the several Underwriters to purchase, severally and not jointly, up to the number of Option Shares set forth in hereto at the same purchase price set forth in Section 2(a). Said option may be exercised only to cover over-allotments in the sale of the Firm Shares by the Underwriters. Said option may be exercised in whole or in part at any time on or before the 30th day after the date of the Prospectus upon written or telegraphic notice by the Representatives to the Company setting forth the number of the Option Shares as to which the several Underwriters are exercising the option and the settlement date (each, an ""). Each purchase date must be at least one business day after the written notice is given and may not be earlier than the Closing Date for the Firm Shares nor later than ten (10) Business Days after the date of such notice. The number of Option Shares to be purchased by each Underwriter shall be the same percentage of the total number of the Option Shares to be purchased by the several Underwriters as such Underwriter is purchasing of the Firm Shares.
Schedule I
Option Closing Date
3. . It is understood that the several Underwriters propose to offer the Shares for sale to the public as soon after this Agreement has become effective as in their judgment is advisable and initially to offer the Shares upon the terms set forth in the Prospectus. Each Underwriter, severally and not jointly, represents and agrees as follows:
Offering by Underwriters
Each Underwriter, severally and not jointly, represents and agrees that unless it has or shall have obtained, as the case may be, the prior written consent of the Company, it has not
 
made and will not make any offer relating to the Shares that would constitute an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or that would otherwise constitute a "free writing prospectus" (as defined in Rule 405) required to be filed by the Company with the Commission or retained by the Company under Rule 433, other than the free writing prospectus containing the information contained in the final term sheet prepared and filed pursuant to Section 5(t) hereto; that the prior written consent of the parties hereto shall be deemed to have been given in respect of the Free Writing Prospectuses included in hereto and any electronic road show.
provided
Schedule II
4. . Delivery of and payment for the Shares shall be made at 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on March 27, 2008, or at such time on such later date not more than three (3) Business Days after the foregoing date as the Representatives shall designate, which date and time may be postponed by mutual written agreement of the Representatives and the Company (such date and time of delivery and payment for the Shares being herein called the "") or on the applicable Option Closing Date (or at such other time on the same or on such other date, in any event not later than the third business day thereafter, as the Underwriters and the Company may agree in writing). Delivery of the Shares shall be made against payment by the Representatives of the purchase price thereof, to or upon the order of the Company by wire transfer payable in same-day funds to an account specified by the Company. The Shares will be delivered to the Representatives for the respective accounts of the several Underwriters through the book-entry facilities of The Depository Trust Company ("") and will be made available for inspection by the Underwriters by 1:00 p.m. New York City time at least 24 hours prior to the Closing Date or any Option Closing Date, as the case may be, at such place as the Underwriters and the Company shall agree.The Shares shall be in global form registered in the name of Cede & Co., as nominee for DTC. Certificate(s) for the Preferred Shares shall be delivered to the Depositary and registered in the name of Cede & Co., as nominee for DTC and in such denominations as the Representatives shall request prior to 1:00 P.M., New York City time, on the second Business Day preceding the Closing Date or any Option Closing Date, as the case may be. Such certificates shall be made available to, or at the direction of, the Representatives in New York City for inspection and packaging not later than 9:30 A.M., New York City time, on the Business Day next preceding the Closing Date or any Option Closing Date, as the case may be. The certificates evidencing the Shares to be purchased hereunder shall be delivered to, or at the direction of, the Representatives on the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, against payment of the purchase price therefor by wire transfer of immediately available funds to the order of the Company.
Delivery of the Shares and Payment Therefor
Closing Date
DTC
5. . The Company agrees with the Underwriters as follows:
Agreements of the Company
(a) If, at the time this Agreement is executed and delivered, it is necessary for a post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement to be declared effective before the offering of the Shares may commence, the Company will use its best efforts to cause such post-effective amendment to become effective as soon as possible and will advise the Representatives promptly and, if requested by the Representatives, will confirm such advice in writing, immediately after such post-effective amendment has become effective.
(b) If, at any time prior to the filing of the Prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b), any event occurs as a result of which the Disclosure Package would (x) include any untrue
 
statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein in the light of the circumstances under which they were made or the circumstances then prevailing not misleading or (y) conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, the Company will (i) notify promptly the Representatives so that any use of the Disclosure Package may cease until it is amended or supplemented; (ii) amend or supplement the Disclosure Package to correct such statement, omission or conflicting information; and (iii) supply any amendment or supplement to the Representatives in such quantities as may be reasonably requested.
(c) The Company will advise the Representatives promptly and, if requested by the Representatives, will confirm such advice in writing: (i) of any review, issuance of comments, or request by the Commission or its staff on or for an amendment of or a supplement to the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus or for additional information regarding the Company, its affiliates or its filings with the Commission, whether or not such filings are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus; (ii) of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or of the suspension of qualification of the Shares or the Preferred Shares for offering or sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation of any proceeding for such purpose or any examination pursuant to Section 8(e) of the Act relating to the Registration Statement or Section 8A of the Act in connection with the offering of the Shares; (iii) of the receipt by the Company of any notification with respect to the suspension of the qualification of the Shares or the Preferred Shares for sale in any jurisdiction or the institution or threatening of any proceeding for such purpose; and (iv) within the period of time referred to in the first sentence in subsection (f) below, of any change in the Company's condition (financial or other), business, prospects, properties, net worth or results of operations, or of the happening of any event, which results in any statement of a material fact made in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus (as then amended or supplemented) being untrue or which requires the making of any additions to or changes in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus (as then amended or supplemented) in order to state a material fact required by the Act to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading, or of the necessity to amend or supplement the Prospectus (as then amended or supplemented) to comply with the Act or any other law. If at any time the Commission shall issue any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, the Company will make every reasonable effort to obtain the withdrawal of such order at the earliest possible time.
(d) The Company will furnish to the Representatives and counsel to the Representatives, without charge: (i) ten (10) signed copies of the Registration Statement as originally filed with the Commission and of each amendment thereto, including financial statements and all exhibits to the Registration Statement; (ii) such number of conformed copies of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, but without exhibits, as the Underwriters may request; (iii) such number of copies of the Incorporated Documents, without exhibits, as the Representatives may request; and (iv) ten copies of the exhibits to the Incorporated Documents. The Company will pay all of the expenses of printing or other production of all documents relating to the offering.
(e) The Company will not file any amendment to the Registration Statement or make any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus or, prior to the end of the period of
 
time referred to in the first sentence in subsection (f) below, file any document which upon filing becomes an Incorporated Document, of which the Representatives shall not previously have been advised or to which, after the Representatives shall have received a copy of the document proposed to be filed, the Representatives shall reasonably object; and no such further document, when it is filed, will contain an untrue statement of a material fact or will omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading. The Company will give the Representatives notice of its intention to make any other filing pursuant to the Exchange Act from the Execution Time to the Closing Time and will furnish the Representatives with copies of any such documents a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing.
(f) As soon after the execution and delivery of this Agreement as possible and thereafter from time to time for such period as in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriters a prospectus is required by the Act to be delivered in connection with sales by the Underwriters or any dealer (including circumstances where such requirement may be satisfied pursuant to Rule 172), the Company will file promptly all reports and any definitive proxy or information statements required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the Company will expeditiously deliver to the Underwriters and each dealer, without charge, as many copies of the Prospectus (and of any amendment or supplement thereto), any Preliminary Prospectus and any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus as the Representatives may request. The Company consents to the use of the Prospectus (and of any amendment or supplement thereto) in accordance with the provisions of the Act and with the securities or blue sky laws of the jurisdictions in which the Shares are offered by the several Underwriters and by all dealers to whom Shares may be sold, both in connection with the offering and sale of the Shares and for such period of time thereafter as the Prospectus is required by the Act to be delivered in connection with sales by any Underwriters or dealers. If during such period of time: (i) any event shall occur as a result of which, in the judgment of the Company, or in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriters, the Prospectus as supplemented would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances when the Prospectus is delivered to a purchaser, not misleading; or (ii) if it is necessary to supplement the Prospectus or amend the Registration Statement (or to file under the Exchange Act any document which, upon filing, becomes an Incorporated Document) in order to comply with the Act, the Exchange Act or any other law, the Company will promptly notify the Representatives of such event and forthwith prepare and, subject to the provisions of paragraph (e) above, file with the Commission an appropriate supplement or amendment thereto (or to such document), and will expeditiously furnish to the Underwriters and dealers a reasonable number of copies thereof. In the event that the Company and the Representatives agree that the Prospectus should be amended or supplemented, the Company, if requested by the Representatives, will promptly issue a press release announcing or disclosing the matters to be covered by the proposed amendment or supplement.
(g) The Company will: (i) cooperate with the Underwriters and with counsel for the Underwriters in connection with the registration or qualification of the Shares and the Preferred Shares for offering and sale by the Underwriters and by dealers under the securities or blue sky laws of such jurisdictions as the Underwriters may designate; (ii) maintain such qualifications in effect so long as required for the distribution of the Shares; (iii) pay any fee of
 
the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, in connection with its review of the offering; and (iv) file such consents to service of process or other documents necessary or appropriate in order to effect such registration or qualification; that in no event shall the Company be obligated to qualify to do business in any jurisdiction where it is not now so qualified or to take any action which would subject it to service of process in suits, other than those arising out of the offering or sale of the Shares, in any jurisdiction where it is not now so subject.
provided
(h) The Company agrees that, unless it has or shall have obtained the prior written consent of the Representatives, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Shares that would constitute an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or that would otherwise constitute a "free writing prospectus" (as defined in Rule 405) required to be filed by the Company with the Commission or retained by the Company under Rule 433, other than the free writing prospectus containing the information contained in the final term sheet prepared and filed pursuant to Section 5(t) hereto; that the prior written consent of the parties hereto shall be deemed to have been given in respect of the Free Writing Prospectuses included in hereto and any electronic road show. Any such free writing prospectus consented to by the Representatives or the Company is hereinafter referred to as a "." The Company agrees that (x) it has treated and will treat, as the case may be, each Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and (y) it has complied and will comply, as the case may be, with the requirements of Rules 164 and 433 applicable to any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, including in respect of timely filing with the Commission, legending and record keeping.
provided
Schedule II
Permitted Free Writing Prospectus
(i) The Company will make generally available to its security holders and to the Representatives a consolidated earnings statement, which need not be audited, covering a 12-month period commencing after the effective date of this Agreement and ending not later than 15 months thereafter, as soon as practicable after the end of such period, which consolidated earnings statement shall satisfy the provisions of Section 11(a) of the Act and Rule 158 under the Act.
(j) During the period commencing on the date hereof and ending on the date occurring three (3) years hereafter, the Company will furnish to the Representatives: (i) as soon as available, if requested, a copy of each report of the Company mailed to stockholders or filed with the Commission; and (ii) from time to time such other information concerning the Company as the Representatives may reasonably request.
(k) If this Agreement shall terminate or shall be terminated after execution pursuant to any provisions hereof, or if this Agreement shall be terminated by the Underwriters because of any inability, failure or refusal on the part of the Company to comply with the terms or fulfill any of the conditions of this Agreement, the Company shall reimburse the Underwriters for all out-of-pocket expenses (including fees and expenses of counsel for the Underwriters) incurred by the Underwriters in connection herewith.
(l) The Company will apply the net proceeds from the sale of the Shares substantially in accordance with the description set forth in the Prospectus.
 
(m) If Rule 430A, 430B or 430C of the Act is employed, the Company will timely file the Prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act and will advise the Underwriters of the time and manner of such filing.
(n) The Company has not taken, nor will it take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to, or that might reasonably be expected to cause or result in, under the Exchange Act or otherwise, stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of the Shares.
(o) The Company will comply and will use its best efforts to cause its tenants to comply in all material respects with all applicable Environmental Laws (as hereinafter defined).
(p) The Company will use its best efforts to continue to qualify as a real estate investment trust (a "") under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the ""), and to continue to have each of its corporate subsidiaries (other than its taxable REIT subsidiaries) comply with all applicable laws and regulations necessary to maintain a status as a "qualified REIT subsidiary" under the Code.
REIT
Code
(q) The Company will use all reasonable best efforts to do or perform all things required to be done or performed by the Company prior to the Closing Date to satisfy all conditions precedent to the delivery of the Shares pursuant to this Agreement.
(r) The Company will not, without the prior written consent of the Representatives, offer, sell, contract to sell, pledge or otherwise dispose of any debt securities issued or guaranteed by the Company or any class of capital stock (other than the Shares) ranking senior to the Preferred Shares with respect to dividend rights or rights upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up for a period of sixty (60) days after the Closing Date.
(s) The Company will comply with all applicable securities and other applicable laws, rules and regulations, including, without limitation, the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (the ""), and to use its best efforts to cause the Company's directors and officers, in their capacities as such, to comply with such laws, rules and regulations, including, without limitation, the provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act.
Sarbanes-Oxley Act
(t) Unless requested otherwise by the Representatives, the Company will prepare a final term sheet, containing solely a description of final terms of the Shares and the offering thereof, in the form and substance approved by the Representatives and attached as hereto and will file such final term sheet with the Commission as soon as practical after the Execution Time. The Company will file any other Issuer Free Writing Prospectus to the extent required by Rule 433 under the Securities Act within the time period required by such rule. The Company will retain, pursuant to reasonable procedures developed in good faith, copies of each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is not filed with the Commission in accordance with Rule 433(g) under the Securities Act.
Exhibit A
(u) The Company will use best efforts to complete all required filings with the New York Stock Exchange and other necessary actions in order to cause the Shares to be listed and admitted and authorized for trading on the New York Stock Exchange, subject to notice of issuance.
 
(v) At or prior to the Closing Date, the Company will prepare and file a registration statement on Form 8-A with the Commission covering the Shares.
(w) The Company will prepare and file articles supplementary to the Company's articles of incorporation, authorizing the Series B Preferred Stock and designating the rights, preferences and restrictions relating thereto (the "") with the Department of Assessments and Taxation of the State of Maryland ("") prior to the Closing.
Articles Supplementary
Maryland DAT
6. . As of the date hereof, the Company and the Partnership, jointly and severally, represent, warrant and covenant to each Underwriter as follows:
Representations and Warranties of the Company and the Operating Partnership
(a) The Basic Prospectus and each Preliminary Prospectus, if any, included as part of the registration statement as originally filed or as part of any amendment or supplement thereto, or filed pursuant to Rule 424 under the Act, complied when so filed in all material respects with the provisions of the Act.
(b) The Company and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement meet all of the requirements for using Form S-3 under the Act pursuant to the standards for such form in effect currently and immediately prior to October 21, 1992. The Registration Statement, including any amendments thereto filed prior to the Execution Time, was declared effective on March 10, 2008. No stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement is in effect, and no proceedings or examination under Section 8(d) or 8(e) of the Act are pending before or, to the best of the Company's knowledge, threatened by the Commission. The Company is not the subject of a pending proceeding under Section 8A of the Act in connection with the offering of the Shares. The Registration Statement meets the requirements set forth in Rule 415(a)(1)(x) under the Act and complies in all other material respects with such Rule. The Registration Statement, in the form in which it was declared effective, and also in such form as it may be when any post-effective amendment thereto shall become effective, and the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus and any supplement or amendment thereto, each when filed with the Commission under Rule 424(b) under the Act, complied or will comply in all material respects with the provisions of the Act and the Exchange Act. The Company has not received from the Commission any notice objecting to the use of the shelf registration statement form. On each Effective Date and at the Execution Time, the Registration Statement did not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements made therein not misleading. On the date of any filing pursuant to Rule 424(b) and on the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date, the Prospectus (together with any supplement thereto) will not, include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The representation and warranty contained in this Section 6(b) does not apply to statements in or omissions from the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus made in reliance upon and in conformity with information relating to the Underwriters furnished to the Company in writing by or on behalf of the Underwriters expressly for use therein.
 
(c) (i) The Disclosure Package, and (ii) each electronic road show when taken together as a whole with the Disclosure Package, did not at the Execution Time, and will not on the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The preceding sentence does not apply to statements in or omissions from the Disclosure Package made in reliance upon and in conformity with information relating to the Underwriters furnished to the Company in writing by or on behalf of the Underwriters expressly for use therein.
(d) (i) At the earliest time after the filing of the Registration Statement that the Company or another offering participant made a offer (within the meaning of Rule 164(h)(2)) of the Shares and (ii) as of the Execution Time (with such date being used as the determination date for purposes of this clause (ii)), the Company was not and is not an Ineligible Issuer (as defined in Rule 405), without taking account of any determination by the Commission pursuant to Rule 405 that it is not necessary that the Company be considered an Ineligible Issuer.
bona fide
(e) Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and the final term sheet prepared and filed pursuant to Section 5(t) hereof does not include any information that conflicts with the information contained in the Registration Statement, including any Incorporated Document by reference therein and any prospectus supplement deemed to be a part thereof that has not been superseded or modified. The foregoing sentence does not apply to statements in or omissions from any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus based upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representatives specifically for use therein, it being understood and agreed that the only such information furnished by or on behalf of any Underwriter consists of the information described as such in Section 12 hereof.
(f) The Incorporated Documents heretofore filed, when they were filed (or, if any amendment with respect to any such document was filed, when such amendment was filed), conformed in all material respects with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder. The Company has given the Representatives notice of any filings made pursuant to the Exchange Act within 48 hours prior to the Execution Time. No such document when it was filed (or, if an amendment with respect to any such document was filed, when such amendment was filed), contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(g) The Shares and the Preferred Shares have been duly and validly authorized and will conform in all material respects to the description of the Shares contained in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus and, when issued and delivered pursuant to this Agreement and, in the case of the Shares, the Deposit Agreement, will be fully paid and non-assessable; the Depositary Receipts will entitle the holders thereof to the benefits provided therein and in the Deposit Agreement. The form of certificate for the Shares will be in valid and sufficient form in compliance with the New York Stock Exchange requirements.
 
(h) Each of the Company, the Partnership and their subsidiaries is a corporation, limited liability company or limited partnership, as applicable, duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the state of its formation, as set forth on hereto, with full corporate, limited liability company or partnership power, as applicable, and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, and each is duly registered and qualified to conduct its business, and is in good standing, in each jurisdiction or place where the nature of its properties or the conduct of its business requires such registration or qualification, except where the failure so to register or qualify does not have a material adverse effect on the condition (financial or other), prospects, earnings, business, properties, net worth or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, whether or not arising from transactions in the ordinary course of business ("").
Schedule III
Material Adverse Effect
(i) Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries does any business in Cuba.
(j) Other than as set forth on hereto, the Company has no subsidiary or subsidiaries, and does not control, directly or indirectly, any corporation, partnership, joint venture, association or other business association. The issued shares of capital stock of each of the Company's subsidiaries have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid and non-assessable and, other than as set forth on hereto, are owned legally and beneficially by the Company free and clear of any security interests, liens, encumbrances, equities or claims.
Schedule III
Schedule III
(k) There are no legal or governmental actions, suits or proceedings pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened, against the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries, or to which the Company or the Operating Partnership or any properties of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries is subject, that (A) are required to be described in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus but are not described as required; (B) could reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the performance of this Agreement or the consummation of any of the transactions contemplated hereby; or (C) could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, except as set forth in or contemplated in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (exclusive of any supplement thereto). There are no statutes, regulations, capital expenditures, off-balance sheet transactions, contingencies or agreements, contracts, indentures, leases or other instruments or documents of a character that are required to be described in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or to be filed or incorporated by reference as an exhibit to the Registration Statement or any Incorporated Document that are not described, filed or incorporated as required by the Act or the Exchange Act (and the Pricing Prospectus contains in all material respects the same description of the foregoing matters contained in the Prospectus). The statements in the Prospectus under the heading "Federal Income Tax Considerations" and in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement under the heading Additional Certain Federal Income Tax Considerations" fairly summarize the matters therein described.
"
(l) None of the Company, the Partnership or their subsidiaries is: (A) in violation of (i) its respective articles of incorporation, partnership agreement, operating agreement or by-laws (or analogous governing instruments), (ii) any law, ordinance,
 
administrative or governmental rule or regulation applicable to the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries, which violation would have a Material Adverse Effect, or (iii) any decree of any court or governmental agency or body having jurisdiction over the Company or its subsidiaries; or (B) in default in any material respect in the performance of any obligation, agreement, condition or covenant (financial or otherwise) contained in any bond, debenture, note or any other evidence of indebtedness or in any material agreement, indenture, lease or other instrument to which the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries or any of their respective properties may be bound, and no such default is foreseeable.
(m) (A) As of the date of this Agreement, the Company owns either directly or indirectly through its subsidiaries, 54 properties (the ""). To the best of the Company's knowledge, none of Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries is in violation of any municipal, state or federal law, rule or regulation concerning any of their Properties, which violation would have a Material Adverse Effect; (B) to the best of the Company's knowledge, each of the Properties complies with all applicable zoning laws, ordinances and regulations in all material respects and, if and to the extent there is a failure to comply, such failure does not materially impair the value of any of such Properties and will not result in a forfeiture or reversion of title thereof; (C) none of Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries has received from any governmental authority any written notice of any condemnation of, or zoning change affecting any of, the Properties, and the Company does not know of any such condemnation or zoning change which is threatened and which if consummated would have a material adverse effect on the Company or any of such Properties; (D) the leases under which the Company or any of its subsidiaries leases the Properties as lessor (the "") are in full force and effect and have been entered into in the ordinary course of business of such entity; (E) the Company and each of its subsidiaries has complied with its respective obligations under the Leases in all material respects and the Company does not know of any default by any other party to the Leases which, alone or together with other such defaults, would have a Material Adverse Effect or material adverse effect on any of the properties subject to a Lease; and (F) all liens, charges, encumbrances, claims or restrictions on or affecting the Properties and assets (including the Properties) of the Company and its subsidiaries that are required to be disclosed in the Prospectus are disclosed therein.
Properties
Leases
(n) Neither the issuance and sale of the Shares, the execution, delivery or performance of this Agreement or the Deposit Agreement by the Company or the Operating Partnership, nor the consummation by the Company or the Operating Partnership of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby (including the application of the proceeds from the sale of the Shares and the designation, issuance and deposit of the Preferred Shares), nor the fulfillment of the terms hereof or thereof: (A) requires any consent, approval, authorization or other order of, or registration or filing with, any court, regulatory body, administrative agency or other governmental body, agency or official (except (i) such as may be required for the registration of the Shares under the Act and compliance with the securities or blue sky laws of various jurisdictions and (ii) the filing with the Maryland DAT of the Articles Supplementary), or conflicts or will conflict with or constitutes or will constitute a breach or violation of, or a default under, the articles of incorporation, including the Articles Supplementary, or by-laws (or analogous governing documents) of the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their
 
subsidiaries; or (B) conflicts or will conflict with or constitutes or will constitute a breach of, or a default under, any agreement, indenture, lease or other instrument to which the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or the Operating Partnership or any properties of the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries may be bound, or violates or will violate any statute, law, regulation or filing or judgment, injunction, order or decree applicable to the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries or any properties of the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries, or will result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries pursuant to the terms of any agreement or instrument to which the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries may be bound, or to which any property or assets of the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries is subject.
(o) To the Company's knowledge, Ernst & Young LLP, who has certified or shall certify the financial statements and schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), is and was, as of the date of this Agreement and during the periods covered by the financial statements on which it reported, an independent registered public accounting firm with respect to the Company as required by the Act and the Exchange Act and the applicable published rules and regulations thereunder and by the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board.
(p) The financial statements, together with related schedules and notes, included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus (and any amendment or supplement thereto), present fairly in all material respects the financial position, results of operations and changes in financial position of the Company and its subsidiaries on the basis stated in the Registration Statement and the Incorporated Documents at the respective dates or for the respective periods to which they apply. Such statements and related schedules and notes have been prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied throughout the periods involved, except as disclosed therein. The other financial and statistical information and data included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus (and any amendment or supplement thereto) are accurately presented and prepared on a basis consistent with such financial statements and the books and records of the Company and its subsidiaries. The pro forma financial statements and other pro forma financial information included, or incorporated by reference in, the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus include assumptions that provide a reasonable basis for presenting the significant effects directly attributable to the transactions and events described therein, the related pro forma adjustments give appropriate effect to those assumptions, and the pro forma adjustments reflect the proper application of those adjustments to the historical financial statement amounts in the pro forma financial statements included in the Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus and the Registration Statement. The pro forma financial statements included in the Prospectus , the Pricing Prospectus and the Registration Statement comply as to form in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements of Regulation S-X under the Act and the pro forma adjustments have been properly applied to the historical amounts in the compilation of those statements. The Company has filed with the Commission all financial statements, together with related schedules and notes, required to be filed pursuant to Regulation S-X under the Act.
 
(q) The Company has the corporate power to issue, sell and deliver the Shares and the Preferred Shares as provided herein and in the Deposit Agreement; the execution and delivery of, and the performance by the Company of its obligations under, this Agreement and the Deposit Agreement have been duly and validly authorized by the Company, and this Agreement and the Deposit Agreement have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and constitute the valid and legally binding agreements of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, except as may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and by general principles of equity and to the extent that rights to indemnity and contribution hereunder may be limited by federal or state securities laws; the execution and delivery of, and the performance by the Operating Partnership of its obligations under, this Agreement have been duly and validly authorized by the Operating Partnership, and this Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Operating Partnership and constitutes the valid and legally binding agreement of the Operating Partnership, enforceable against the Operating Partnership in accordance with their terms, except as may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and by general principles of equity and to the extent that rights to indemnity and contribution hereunder may be limited by federal or state securities laws.
(r) Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), subsequent to the respective dates as of which such information is given in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), none of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries has incurred any liability or obligation (financial or other), direct or contingent, or entered into any transaction (including any off-balance sheet activities or transactions), not in the ordinary course of business, that is material to the Company and its subsidiaries, and there has not been any change in the capital stock, or material increase in the short-term debt or long-term debt (including any off-balance sheet activities or transactions), of any of the Company or the Operating Partnership or their subsidiaries, or any material adverse change, or any development involving or which may reasonably be expected to involve, a prospective material adverse change, in the condition (financial or other), business, prospects, net worth or results of operations of any of the Company or the Operating Partnership or their subsidiaries.
(s) The Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries has good and marketable title to all property (real and personal) described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus as being owned by each of them (including the Properties), free and clear of all liens, claims, security interests or other encumbrances that would materially and adversely affect the value thereof or materially interfere with the use made or presently contemplated to be made thereof by them as described in the Prospectus, except such as are described in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, or in any document filed as an exhibit to the Registration Statement, and each property described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus as being held under lease by the Company or any of its subsidiaries is held by it under a valid, subsisting and enforceable lease.
 
(t) The "significant subsidiaries" of the Company as defined in Section 1-02(w) of Regulation S-X are set forth in hereto (the "").
Schedule III
Significant Subsidiaries
(u) The Company has not distributed and, prior to the later to occur of (x) the Closing Date and (y) completion of the distribution of the Shares, will not distribute, any offering material in connection with the offering and sale of the Shares other than the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus. The Company has not, directly or indirectly: (i) taken any action designed to cause or to result in, or that has constituted or which might reasonably be expected to constitute, the stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of the Shares; or (ii) since the filing of the Registration Statement (A) sold, bid for, purchased, or paid anyone any compensation for soliciting purchases of, the Shares or (B) paid or agreed to pay to any person any compensation for soliciting another to purchase any other securities of the Company.
(v) The Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries possess all certificates, permits, licenses, franchises and authorizations of governmental or regulatory authorities (the "") as are necessary to own their respective properties and to conduct their respective businesses in the manner described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, where such failure to possess could have a Material Adverse Effect, subject to such qualifications as may be set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus. The Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries has fulfilled and performed all of their respective material obligations with respect to such permits, and no event has occurred which allows, or after notice or lapse of time would allow, revocation or termination thereof or which would result in any other material impairment of the rights of the holder of any such permit, subject in each case to such qualification as may be set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus. Except as described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, exclusive of any supplement thereto, neither the revocation or modification of any permit singly or in the aggregate, nor the announcement of an unfavorable decision, ruling or finding with respect to any permit, would have a Material Adverse Effect.
permits
(w) The Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries have established and maintain disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported, within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms and is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management, including its chief executive officer and chief financial officer, or persons performing similar functions, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure; and the Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries maintain a system of internal control over financial reporting sufficient to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and which includes policies and procedures that (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries, (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and that receipts and expenditures of the
 
Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries are being made only in accordance with the authorization of management, and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisitions, use or dispositions of assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements. The Company's disclosure controls and procedures have been evaluated for effectiveness as of the end of the most recent period required to be evaluated by the Company which precedes the date of the Prospectus and were effective in all material respects to perform the functions for which they were established. Based on the most recent evaluation of its internal control over financial reporting, the Company was not aware of (i) any material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting or (ii) any fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the Company's internal control over financial reporting. There has been no change in the Company's internal control over financial reporting that has occurred during its most recently completed fiscal quarter that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting.
(x) There is and has been no failure on the part of the Company and any of the Company's directors or officers, in their capacities as such, to comply with any provision of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and the rules and regulations promulgated in connection therewith, including, without limitation, Section 402 related to loans to insiders and Sections 302 and 906 related to certifications.
(y) To the Company's knowledge, none of Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries nor any employee or agent of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries has made any payment of funds of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries or received or retained any funds in violation of any law, rule or regulation, which payment, receipt or retention of funds is of a character required to be disclosed in the Prospectus.
(z) No labor problem or dispute with the employees of the Company and/or any of its subsidiaries or any of the Company's or its subsidiaries' principal suppliers, contractors or customers, exists, is threatened or imminent that could result in a Material Adverse Effect. To the Company's knowledge, no labor problem or dispute with the Company's or its subsidiaries' tenants exists, is threatened or imminent that could result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(aa) The Company has filed all foreign, federal, state and local tax returns that are required to be filed, which returns are complete and correct, or has requested extensions thereof (except in any case in which the failure so to file would not have a Material Adverse Effect, except as set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus) and has paid all taxes required to be paid by it and any other assessment, fine or penalty levied against it, to the extent that any of the foregoing is due and payable, except for any such assessment, fine or penalty that is currently being contested in good faith or as would not have a material adverse effect on the condition (financial or otherwise), prospects, earnings, business or properties of the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, whether or not arising from transactions in the ordinary course of business, except as set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (exclusive of any supplement thereto).
 
(bb) No holder of any security of the Company or the Operating Partnership has any right to require registration of the Shares or any other security of the Company or the Operating Partnership because of the filing of the Registration Statement or consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, which right has not been waived in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. The holders of outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company and the Operating Partnership are not entitled to preemptive or other rights to subscribe for the Shares or the Preferred Shares.
(cc) The Company and its subsidiaries own or possess all patents, trademarks, trademark registrations, service marks, service mark registrations, trade names, copyrights, licenses, inventions, trade secrets and rights described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus as being owned by them or necessary for the conduct of their respective businesses. The Company is not aware of any claim to the contrary or any challenge by any other person to the rights of the Company and its subsidiaries with respect to the foregoing.
(dd) The Company is not now, and after sale of the Shares to be sold by the Company hereunder and the application of the net proceeds from such sale as described in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus under the caption "Use of Proceeds," will not be, an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
(ee) (i) To the best of the Company's knowledge, the Company, the Operating Partnership, their subsidiaries, the Properties and the operations conducted thereon comply and heretofore have complied with all applicable Environmental Laws, and no expenditures are required or advisable to maintain or achieve such compliance.
(ii) None of Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries has at any time and, to the best of the Company's knowledge, no other party has at any time, handled, buried, stored, retained, refined, transported, processed, manufactured, generated, produced, spilled, allowed to seep, leak, escape or leach, or be pumped, poured, emitted, emptied, discharged, injected, dumped, transferred or otherwise disposed of or dealt with, Hazardous Materials (as defined below) on, to, under or from the Properties, except as disclosed in environmental site assessment reports obtained by the Company on or before the date hereof in connection with the purchase of any of the Properties and directly provided to the Underwriters or their counsel (collectively, the "") and except for those circumstances that have not had and will not have a material adverse effect on the relevant Property. None of Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries intends to use the Properties or any subsequently acquired properties for the purpose of handling, burying, storing, retaining, refining, transporting, processing, manufacturing, generating, producing, spilling, seeping, leaking, escaping, leaching, pumping, pouring, emitting, emptying, discharging, injecting, dumping, transferring or otherwise disposing of or dealing with Hazardous Materials.
Environmental Reports
(iii) To the best of the Company's knowledge, no seepage, leak, escape, leach, discharge, injection, release, emission, spill, pumping, pouring, emptying or
 
dumping of Hazardous Materials into any surface water, groundwater, soil, air or other media on or adjacent to the Properties has occurred, is occurring or is reasonably expected to occur, except as is disclosed in the Environmental Reports and except for those circumstances not likely to have a material adverse effect on the relevant Property.
(iv) None of Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries has received notice from any Governmental Authority or other person of, or has knowledge of, any occurrence or circumstance which, with notice, passage of time, or failure to act, would give rise to any claim under or pursuant to any Environmental Law or under common law pertaining to Hazardous Materials on or originating from the existing Properties or any act or omission of any party with respect to the existing Properties, except as disclosed in the Environmental Reports.
(v) To the best of the Company's knowledge, none of the Properties is included or proposed for inclusion on any federal, state, or local lists of sites which require or might require environmental cleanup, including, but not limited to, the National Priorities List or CERCLIS List issued pursuant to CERCLA (as defined below) by the United States Environmental Protection Agency or any analogous state list, except as is disclosed in the Environmental Reports and except for those circumstances not likely to have a material adverse effect on the relevant Property.
(vi) In the ordinary course of its business, the Company periodically reviews the effect of Environmental Laws on the business, operations and properties of the Company and its subsidiaries, in the course of which it identifies and evaluates associated costs and liabilities (including, without limitation, any capital or operating expenditures required for clean-up, closure of properties or compliance with Environmental Laws, or any permit, license or approval, any related constraints on operating activities and any potential liabilities to third parties). On the basis of such review, the Company has reasonably concluded that such associated costs and liabilities would not, singly or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect, whether or not arising from transactions in the ordinary course of business, except as set forth in or contemplated in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
As used herein, "" shall include, without limitation, any flammable explosives, radioactive materials, hazardous materials, hazardous wastes, hazardous or toxic substances, or related materials, asbestos, polychlorinated biphenyls (""), petroleum products and by-products and substances defined or listed as "hazardous substances," "toxic substances," "hazardous waste," or "hazardous materials" in any Federal, state or local Environmental Law.
Hazardous Material
PCBs
As used herein, "" shall mean all laws, common law duties, regulations or ordinances (including any orders or agreements) of any Federal, state or local governmental authority having or claiming jurisdiction over any of the Properties (a
Environmental Law
 
"") that are designed or intended to protect the public health and the environment or to regulate the handling of Hazardous Materials, including, without limitation, the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as amended (42 U.S.C. Section 9601 et seq.) (""), the Hazardous Material Transportation Act, as amended (49 U.S.C. Section 1801 et seq.), the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, as amended (42 U.S.C. Section 6901 et seq.), the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended (33 U.S.C. Section 1251 et seq.), and the Clean Air Act, as amended (42 U.S.C. Section 7401 et seq.), and any and all analogous future federal or present or future state or local laws.
Governmental Authority
CERCLA
(ff) The Company is organized in conformity with the requirements for qualification as a real estate investment trust under Sections 856 through 860 of the Code and the rules and regulations thereunder. As of the close of every taxable year during the Company's existence, the Company has had no earnings and profits accumulated in a non-REIT year within the meaning of Section 857(a)(2)(B) of the Code. The Company's past and proposed method of operation have enabled it, and will enable it, to meet the requirements for taxation as a REIT under the Code.
(gg) Each of the Company's corporate subsidiaries, is in compliance with all requirements applicable to a REIT or a "qualified REIT subsidiary" within the meaning of Section 856(i) of the Code and all applicable regulations under the Code, and the Company is not aware of any fact that would negatively impact such qualifications. Each of the Company's non-corporate subsidiaries qualifies as a partnership or a disregarded entity for federal income tax purposes.
(hh) The Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries is insured by insurers of recognized financial responsibility against such losses and risks and in such amounts as are prudent and customary in the businesses in which they are engaged and the value of their properties. All policies of insurance and fidelity or surety bonds insuring the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries or their respective businesses, assets, employees, officers and directors are in full force and effect. The Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries are in compliance with the terms of such policies and instruments in all material respects and there are no claims by the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries under any such policy or instrument as to which any insurance company is denying liability or defending under a reservation of rights clause. None of Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries has been refused any insurance coverage sought or applied for, and the Company does not have any reason to believe that the Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries will not be able to renew its respective existing insurance coverage as and when such coverage expires or to obtain similar coverage from similar insurers as may be necessary to continue their respective businesses at a cost that would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(ii) The Company, the Partnership, and their subsidiaries have title insurance on each of the Properties owned in fee simple in amounts at least equal to the cost of acquisition of such property; with respect to an uninsured loss on any of the Properties, the title insurance shortfall would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
 
(jj) No subsidiary of the Company is currently prohibited, directly or indirectly, from paying any dividends to the Company, from making any other distribution on such subsidiary's capital stock, from repaying to the Company any loans or advances to such subsidiary from the Company or from transferring and of such subsidiary's assets or property to the Company or any other subsidiary of the Company, except as described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus; the Company has not declared, paid or made any dividend or distribution of any kind on any class of its capital stock, except as set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (exclusive of any supplement thereto).
(kk) There are no transfer taxes or other similar fees or charges under Federal law or the laws of any state, or any political subdivision thereof, required to be paid in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the issuance by the Company or sale by the Company of the Shares.
(ll) Each of the Company and its subsidiaries has fulfilled its obligations, if any, under the minimum funding standards of Section 302 of the United States Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 ("") and the regulations and published interpretations thereunder with respect to each "plan" (as defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA and such regulations and published interpretations) in which employees of the Company and its subsidiaries are eligible to participate. Each such plan is in compliance in all material respects with the presently applicable provisions of ERISA and such regulations and published interpretations. Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has incurred any unpaid liability to the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation (other than for the payment of premiums in the ordinary course) or to any such plan under Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA
(mm) To the knowledge of the Company, no stock options awards granted by the Company have been retroactively granted, or the exercise or purchase price of any stock option award determined retroactively.
(nn) The Company's authorized capitalization is as set forth in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus; the capital stock of the Company conforms in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus; the outstanding shares of common stock and preferred stock of the Company have each been duly and validly authorized and issued in compliance with all Federal and state securities laws, and are fully paid and non-assessable.
(oo) Assuming due authorization, execution and delivery of the Deposit Agreement by the Depositary, each Share will represent an interest in 1/100th of a share of a validly issued, outstanding, fully paid and non-assessable share of Series C Preferred Stock. Assuming due execution and delivery of the Depositary Receipts by the Depositary pursuant to the Deposit Agreement, the Depositary Receipts will entitle the holders thereof to the benefits provided therein and in the Deposit Agreement.
(pp) Application has been made to list the Shares on the New York Stock Exchange.
 
(qq) Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), there are no outstanding (i) securities or obligations of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries convertible into or exchangeable for any equity interests of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries, (ii) warrants, rights or options to subscribe for or purchase from the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries any such equity interests or any such convertible or exchangeable securities or obligations (except for (a) units of partnership interest in the Operating Partnership (""), (b) common stock, par value $0.01, of the Company ("") issuable upon the redemption of outstanding Partnership Units, (c) Common Stock issuable in connection with the Company's dividend reinvestment and share purchase plan, or (d) 131,078 shares of Common Stock issuable upon the exercise of the options issued under the Company's 1993 Stock Option Plan) or (e) 455,675 shares of Common Stock issuable upon exercise of the options issues under the Company's 2004 Stock Option Plan, or (iii) obligations of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries to issue any equity interests, any such convertible or exchangeable securities or obligation, or any such warrants, rights or options. Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), there are no persons with registration or other similar rights to have any equity or debt securities, including securities which are convertible into or exchangeable for equity securities, registered pursuant to the Registration Statement or otherwise registered by the Company under the Act. The Company is the sole general partner of each of the Operating Partnership, Saul Subsidiary I Limited Partnership and Saul Subsidiary II Limited Partnership. The Company's wholly-owned subsidiary, Saul QRS, Inc., is the sole general partner of Saul Subsidiary I Limited Partnership.
Partnership Units
Common Stock
7. .
Indemnification and Contribution
(a) The Company and the Operating Partnership, jointly and severally, agree:
(i) to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter and each person, if any, who controls such Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the Act, against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which such Underwriter or any such controlling person may become subject under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon (i) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in (A) the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto, or (B) any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act, (ii) the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, or (iii) any alleged act or failure to act by any Underwriter in connection with, or relating in any manner to, the Shares, the Preferred Shares or the offering contemplated hereby, and which is included as part of or referred to in any loss, claim, damage, liability or action arising out of or based upon matters covered by clause (i) or (ii) above (,
provided
 
, that neither the Company nor the Operating Partnership shall be liable under this clause (iii) to the extent that it is determined in a final judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction that such loss, claim, damage, liability or action resulted directly from any such acts or failures to act undertaken or omitted to be taken by such Underwriter through its gross negligence or willful misconduct); , , that neither the Company nor the Operating Partnership will be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement, or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or such amendment or supplement, or any Company Free Writing Prospectus or any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by or through the Representatives specifically for use in the preparation thereof, such information being listed in Section 12 below.
however
provided
however
(ii) to reimburse each Underwriter and each such controlling person upon demand for any legal or other out-of-pocket expenses reasonably incurred by such Underwriter or such controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage or liability, action or proceeding or in responding to a subpoena or governmental inquiry related to the offering of the Shares, whether or not such Underwriter or controlling person is a party to any action or proceeding , that neither the Company nor the Operating Partnership will be liable to reimburse such expenses incurred in connection with any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement, or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or such amendment or supplement, or any Company Free Writing Prospectus or any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by or through the Representatives specifically for use in the preparation thereof, such information being listed in Section 12 below. In the event that it is finally judicially determined that the Underwriters were not entitled to receive payments for legal and other expenses pursuant to this subparagraph, the Underwriters will promptly return all sums that had been advanced pursuant hereto.
provided, however
(b) Each Underwriter, severally and not jointly, will indemnify and hold harmless the Company, each of its directors, each of its officers who have signed the Registration Statement and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of Section 15 of the Act, against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company or any such director, officer or controlling person may become subject under the Securities Act or
 
otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon (i) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto, or in any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus (ii) the omission or the alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading in the light of the circumstances under which they were made; and will reimburse any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company or any such director, officer or controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability, action or proceeding; , , that each Underwriter will be liable in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission has been made in the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto, or in any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by or through the Representatives specifically for use in the preparation thereof, such information being listed in Section 15 below.
provided
however
(c) In case any proceeding (including any governmental investigation) shall be instituted involving any person in respect of which indemnity may be sought pursuant to this Section, such person (the "") shall promptly notify the person against whom such indemnity may be sought (the "") in writing. No indemnification provided for in Section 7(a) or (b) shall be available to any party who shall fail to give notice as provided in this Subsection if the party to whom notice was not given was unaware of the proceeding to which such notice would have related and was materially prejudiced by the failure to give such notice, but the failure to give such notice shall not relieve the indemnifying party or parties from any liability which it or they may have to the indemnified party for contribution or otherwise than on account of the provisions of Section 7(a) or (b). In case any such proceeding shall be brought against any indemnified party and it shall notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party shall be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it shall wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party and shall pay as incurred the fees and disbursements of such counsel related to such proceeding. In any such proceeding, any indemnified party shall have the right to retain its own counsel at its own expense. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the indemnifying party shall pay as incurred (or within 30 days of presentation) the fees and expenses of the counsel retained by the indemnified party in the event (i) the indemnifying party and the indemnified party shall have mutually agreed to the retention of such counsel, (ii) the named parties to any such proceeding (including any impleaded parties) include both the indemnifying party and the indemnified party and representation of both parties by the same counsel would be inappropriate due to actual or potential differing interests between them or (iii) the indemnifying party shall have failed to assume the defense and employ counsel acceptable to the indemnified party within a reasonable period of time after notice of commencement of the action.
indemnified party
indemnifying party
It is understood that the indemnifying party shall not, in connection with any proceeding or related proceedings in the same jurisdiction, be liable for the reasonable fees and expenses of more than one separate firm for all such indemnified parties. Such firm shall be designated in writing by you in the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 7(a) and by
 
the Company in the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 7(b). The indemnifying party shall not be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent but if settled with such consent or if there be a final judgment for the plaintiff, the indemnifying party agrees to indemnify the indemnified party from and against any loss or liability by reason of such settlement or judgment. In addition, the indemnifying party will not, without the prior written consent of the indemnified party, settle or compromise or consent to the entry of any judgment in any pending or threatened claim, action or proceeding of which indemnification may be sought hereunder (whether or not any indemnified party is an actual or potential party to such claim, action or proceeding) unless such settlement, compromise or consent includes an unconditional release of each indemnified party from all liability arising out of such claim, action or proceeding.
(d) If the indemnification provided for in this Section is unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under Section 7(a) or (b) above in respect of any losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company and the Operating Partnership on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other from the offering of the Shares. If, however, the allocation provided by the immediately preceding sentence is not permitted by applicable law then each indemnifying party shall contribute to such amount paid or payable by such indemnified party in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only such relative benefits but also the relative fault of the Company and the Operating Partnership on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities, (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof), as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company and the Operating Partnership on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other shall be deemed to be in the same proportion as the total net proceeds from the offering (before deducting expenses) received by the Company and the Operating Partnership bear to the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by the Underwriters, in each case as set forth in the table on the cover page of the Prospectus. The relative fault shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company and the Operating Partnership on the one hand or the Underwriters on the other and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission.
The Company, the Operating Partnership and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contributions pursuant to this Subsection were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this Subsection. The amount paid or payable by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) referred to above in this Subsection shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Subsection, (i) no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the underwriting discounts and commissions applicable to
 
the Shares purchased by such Underwriter and (ii) no person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The Underwriters' obligations in this Subsection to contribute are several in proportion to their respective underwriting obligations and not joint.
(e) In any proceeding relating to the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any supplement or amendment thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, each party against whom contribution may be sought under this Section hereby consents to the jurisdiction of any court having jurisdiction over any other contributing party, agrees that process issuing from such court may be served upon him or it by any other contributing party and consents to the service of such process and agrees that any other contributing party may join him or it as an additional defendant in any such proceeding in which such other contributing party is a party.
(f) Any losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses for which an indemnified party is entitled to indemnification or contribution under this Section shall be paid by the indemnifying party to the indemnified party as such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses are incurred. The indemnity and contribution agreements contained in this Section and the representations and warranties of the Company and the Operating Partnership set forth in this Agreement shall remain operative and in full force and effect, regardless of (i) any investigation made by or on behalf of any Underwriter or any person controlling any Underwriter, the Company, the Operating Partnership, their directors or officers or any persons controlling the Company or the Operating Partnership, (ii) acceptance of any Shares and payment therefor hereunder, and (iii) any termination of this Agreement. A successor to any Underwriter, or to the Company, the Operating Partnership, their directors or officers, or any person controlling the Company or the Operating Partnership, shall be entitled to the benefits of the indemnity, contribution and reimbursement agreements contained in this Section.
8. . The obligations of the Underwriters to purchase the Shares hereunder are subject to the following conditions:
Conditions of Underwriters' Obligations
(a)(i) The Prospectus, and any supplement thereto, have been filed in the manner and within the time period required by Rule 424(b) (without reference to Rule 424(b)(8)); the final term sheet contemplated by Section 5(b) hereto and any other material required to be filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 433(d) shall have been filed with the Commission within the applicable time periods prescribed for such filings by Rule 433 and (ii) any request of the Commission for additional information (to be included in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or otherwise) shall have been complied with to the satisfaction of the Underwriters.
(b) Subsequent to the Execution Time, or, if earlier, the dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement (exclusive of any amendment thereto), the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (exclusive of any amendment thereof), there shall not have occurred: (i) any change, or any development involving a prospective change, in or affecting the condition (financial or otherwise), earnings, business, properties, net worth, or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, whether or not arising from
 
transactions in the ordinary course of business, except as set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (exclusive of any amendments or supplements thereto subsequent to the date of this Agreement), the effect of which, in the sole judgment of the Representatives is so material and adverse as to make it impractical or inadvisable to proceed with the offering or delivery of the Shares as contemplated by the Registration Statement (exclusive of any amendments thereto), the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (exclusive of any supplement thereto); or (ii) any event or development relating to or involving the Company and its subsidiaries or any officer or director of the Company and its subsidiaries which makes any statement made in the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus untrue or which, in the opinion of the Company and its counsel or the Representatives and their counsel, requires the making of any addition to or change in the Disclosure Package in order to state a material fact required by the Act or any other law to be stated therein, or necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading, if amending or supplementing the Disclosure Package to reflect such event or development would, in the opinion of the Representatives, adversely affect the market for the Shares.
(c) The Representatives shall have received on the Closing Date and, if applicable, each Option Closing Date an opinion of Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP, counsel for the Company, dated as of such date and addressed to the Representatives, to the effect that:
(i) The Company and each of the Significant Subsidiaries: (x) is a corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership or trust duly incorporated and validly existing in good standing under the laws of its state of formation, with full corporate, partnership or trust power, as applicable, and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (and any amendment or supplement thereto); and, (y) based solely on certificates of public officials and officers of the Company and the Significant Subsidiaries, are duly registered and qualified to conduct their business; and (z) based solely on certificates of public officials, are in good standing in each jurisdiction or place where the nature of its properties or the conduct of its business requires such registration or qualification, except where the failure so to register or qualify does not have a material adverse effect on the condition (financial or other), business, properties, net worth or results of operations of the Company and the Significant Subsidiaries, taken as a whole;
(ii) To the knowledge of such counsel, the Company has no subsidiary or subsidiaries and does not control, directly or indirectly, any corporation, partnership, joint venture, association or other business association other than as set forth on hereto. To the knowledge of such counsel, the subsidiaries that meet the definition of "Significant Subsidiary," as such term is defined in Section 210.1-02 of Regulation S-X are set forth on hereto. All of the outstanding equity interests of each subsidiary on the Company (including the Operating Partnership) have been duly and validly authorized and issued and are
Schedule III
Schedule III
 
fully paid and nonassessable, were not issued and are not owned or held in violation of any preemptive rights, and, except as otherwise set forth in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus, to such counsel's knowledge, all outstanding equity interests of the subsidiaries owned of record by the Company either directly or through subsidiaries are free of any security interest, claim, lien or encumbrance;
(iii) The authorized capital stock and depositary shares of the Company conform in all material respects as to legal matters to the description thereof contained under the captions "Description of Preferred Stock," "Description of Depositary Shares," "Certain Provisions of Maryland Law and our Articles of Incorporation and Bylaws" in the Basic Prospectus and under the caption Description of Series B Preferred Stock and Depositary Shares in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus;
"
"
(iv) All the shares of capital stock of the Company outstanding prior to the issuance of the Shares have been duly authorized and validly issued, and are fully paid and non-assessable;
(v) The Deposit Agreement (A) has been duly authorized, executed and delivered and (B) constitutes a legal, valid and binding agreement enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms (subject, as to enforcement of remedies, to applicable bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors' rights generally from time to time in effect and to general principles of equity, including, without limitation, concepts of materiality, reasonableness, good faith and fair dealing, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law); when the Depositary Receipts have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and countersigned by the Depositary against a deposit of the Preferred Shares represented by the Depositary Receipts in accordance with the Deposit Agreement and delivered to and paid for by the Underwriters in the manner contemplated by, and in accordance with, the Registration Statement and this Agreement, the Depositary Receipts will entitle the holders thereof to the benefits provided therein and in the Deposit Agreement;
(vi) The Shares and the Preferred Shares have been duly authorized and, when issued and delivered pursuant to the Agreement and the Deposit Agreement and, in the case of the Shares, paid for by the Underwriters pursuant to the Agreement, will be fully paid and non-assessable; the Shares and the Series B Preferred Stock conform in all material respects as to legal matters to the description thereof contained under the caption "Description of Preferred Stock" and "Description of the Depositary Shares" in the Basic Prospectus and under the caption Description of Series B Preferred Stock and Depositary Shares in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus; the deposit of the Preferred Shares in accordance with the Deposit Agreement has been duly authorized;
"
"
 
(vii) The holders of outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company are not entitled to statutory preemptive or other statutory rights to subscribe for the Shares or the Preferred Shares; and, except as set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, to the knowledge of such counsel, no options, warrants or other rights to purchase, agreements or other obligations to issue, or rights to convert any obligations into or exchange any securities for, shares of capital stock of or ownership interests in the Company are outstanding;
(viii) To the knowledge of such counsel, no holder of securities of the Company is entitled to have such securities registered under the Registration Statement which right has not been waived in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement;
(ix) The form of certificate for the Shares and Depositary Receipts conforms to the requirements of the Deposit Agreement, the New York Stock Exchange and Maryland General Corporation Law, if any; the Shares have been duly authorized for listing, subject to official notice of issuance, on the New York Stock Exchange;
(x) The Registration Statement is effective under the Act; any required filing of the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus, and any supplements thereto, pursuant to Rule 424(b) or any required filing of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus has been made in the manner and within the time period required by Rule 424(b) and Rule 433, respectively; to the knowledge of such counsel, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued, no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or threatened;
(xi) The Company has the corporate power and authority to enter into this Agreement and the Deposit Agreement and to issue, sell and deliver the Shares to the Underwriters as provided herein and to designate, issue and deliver the Preferred Shares. This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company;
(xii) The Operating Partnership has the partnership power and authority to enter into this Agreement and this Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Operating Partnership. The Company is the sole general partner of each of the Operating Partnership and Saul Subsidiary II Limited Partnership. The Company's wholly-owned subsidiary, Saul QRS, Inc., is the sole general partner of Saul Subsidiary I Limited Partnership;
(xiii) To the knowledge of such counsel, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is or with the giving of notice or the lapse of time or both, would be: (A) in violation of its respective articles of incorporation, by-laws or other organizational documents; or (B) in default in the
 
performance of any agreement set forth on hereto (each a ""), except as disclosed in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus;
Schedule IV
Material Agreement
(xiv) Neither the issue, offer, sale or delivery of the Shares, the execution, delivery or performance by the Company of this Agreement or the Deposit Agreement, compliance by the Company with the provisions hereof or thereof nor consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby (including the application of the proceeds from the sale of the Shares and the designation, issuance and deposit of the Preferred Shares): (A) conflicts or will conflict with or constitutes or will constitute or result in a breach of, or a default under, (1) the articles of incorporation including the Articles Supplementary, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries or (2) any material agreement, indenture, lease or other instrument to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any properties of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is bound (other than any financial covenants contained therein as to which such counsel needs express no opinion) (x) that is a Material Agreement or (y) which is otherwise known to such counsel; or (B) results or will result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or its subsidiaries, pursuant to any of the Material Agreements; or (C) violates or will violate any statute, law, rule or regulation of the United States of America, the State of Maryland, or the State of New York, or judgment, order or decree applicable to the Company or any of its subsidiaries of any court, regulatory body, administrative agency, governmental body, arbitrator or other authority having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its subsidiaries or any of its or their properties;
(xv) Neither the execution, delivery or performance by the Operating Partnership of this Agreement, compliance by the Operating Partnership with the provisions hereof or thereof nor consummation by the Operating Partnership of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby (including the application of the proceeds from the sale of the Shares and the designation, issuance and deposit of the Preferred Shares): (A) conflicts or will conflict with or constitutes or will constitute or result in a breach of, or a default under, (1) the Agreement of Limited Partnership or other organizational documents of the Operating Partnership or (2) any material agreement, indenture, lease or other instrument to which the Operating Partnership or any of its subsidiaries is a party or by which the Operating Partnership or any properties of the Operating Partnership or any of its subsidiaries is bound (other than any financial covenants contained therein as to which such counsel needs express no opinion) (x) that is a Material Agreement or (y) which is otherwise known to such counsel; or (B) results or will result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Operating Partnership or
 
its subsidiaries, pursuant to any of the Material Agreements; or (C) violates or will violate any statute, law, rule or regulation of the United States of America, the State of Maryland, or the State of New York, or judgment, order or decree applicable to the Operating Partnership or any of its subsidiaries of any court, regulatory body, administrative agency, governmental body, arbitrator or other authority having jurisdiction over the Operating Partnership or any of its subsidiaries or any of its or their properties;
(xvi) No consent, approval, authorization or other order of, or registration or filing with, any court, regulatory body, administrative agency or other governmental body, agency, or official is required on the part of the Company or the Operating Partnership (except (i) as have been obtained under the Act or such as may be required under state securities or blue sky laws governing the purchase and distribution of the Shares and (ii) the filing with the Maryland DAT of the Articles Supplementary) for the valid issuance and sale of the Shares to the Underwriters as contemplated by this Agreement;
(xvii)(A) The Registration Statement, the Preliminary Prospectus and the Prospectus, and any supplements or amendments thereto (except for the financial statements and the notes thereto and the schedules and other financial and statistical data included therein), comply as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Act; and (B) each of the Incorporated Documents (except for the financial statements and the notes thereto and the schedules and other financial and statistical data included therein, as to which counsel need not express any opinion) complies as to form in all material respects with the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder;
(xviii) To the knowledge of such counsel, (A) there is no action, suit or proceeding pending or threatened by or before any court or governmental agency, authority or body or any arbitrator involving the Company or any of its subsidiaries or any of its or their property of a character required to be described in the Registration Statement or Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), and (B) there are no agreements, contracts, indentures, leases or other instruments or documents that are required to be described in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or to be filed or incorporated by reference as an exhibit to the Registration Statement or any Incorporated Document that are not described, filed or incorporated as required, as the case may be;
(xix) Such counsel is not aware of any certificates, authorizations, licenses or permits required by any federal regulatory authority which are necessary for the Company and/or its subsidiaries to conduct their respective businesses other than any such certificates, authorizations,
 
licenses or permits which have been obtained or where such failure to possess such certificates, authorizations, licenses or permits could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. To the knowledge of such counsel, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any certificate, authorization, license or permit issued by any federal, state, municipal or foreign regulatory authority which, singly or in the aggregate, if the subject of an unfavorable decision, ruling or finding, would result in a Material Adverse Effect;
(xx) The Company is not subject to registration as an investment company under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (including the application of the proceeds from the sale of the Shares), will not cause the Company to become an investment company subject to registration under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended;
(xxi) The Company was a "real estate investment trust" as defined by Section 856(a) of the Code for its taxable years ended December 31, 1993 through December 31, 2007, and its current and proposed method of operation and ownership will enable it to meet the requirements for qualification and taxation as a REIT under the Code for its taxable year ending December 31, 2008 and for all future taxable years; and the statements in the Basic Prospectus set forth under the caption "Federal Income Tax Considerations" and in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement under the caption "Additional Federal Income Tax Considerations," insofar as they purport to describe or summarize certain provisions of the agreements, statutes or regulations referred to therein, are accurate descriptions or summaries in all material respects, and the discussion thereunder expresses the opinion of Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP insofar as it relates to matters of United States federal income tax law and legal conclusions with regard to those matters.
(xxii) The statements in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, insofar as they are descriptions of contracts or agreements or constitute statements of law or legal conclusions, are accurate and present fairly the information required to be shown in all material respects; and
(xxiii) Although counsel has not undertaken, except as otherwise indicated in its opinion, to determine independently, and does not assume any responsibility for, the accuracy, completeness or fairness of the statements in the Registration Statement, such counsel has participated in the preparation of the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, including review and discussion of the contents thereof (including review and discussion of the contents of all Incorporated Documents), and nothing has come to the attention of such counsel that has caused it to believe that the Registration Statement (including the
 
Incorporated Documents), at the time the Registration Statement became effective, or the Disclosure Package, at the Execution Time and as of the date of such opinion, or the Prospectus, as of its date and as of the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading or that any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus, as of its respective date, and as of the date of such opinion contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading (it being understood that such counsel need express no opinion with respect to the financial statements and the notes thereto and the schedules and other financial, accounting and statistical data included in the Registration Statement, Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or any Incorporated Document).
(d) The Representatives shall have received on the Closing Date and, if applicable, each Option Closing Date an opinion of Hunton & Williams LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, dated as of such date and addressed to the Representatives with respect to such matters as the Underwriters may request.
(e) The Representatives shall have received a letter addressed to the Underwriters and dated as of the date hereof, the Closing Date and, if applicable, each Option Closing Date from Ernst & Young, independent registered public accounting firm, substantially in the form heretofore approved by the Underwriters; that the letter delivered on the Closing Date or any applicable Option Closing Date shall use a "cut-off" date no more than three (3) Business Days prior to the Closing Date or such Option Closing Date, as the case may be.
provided
(f)(A) No stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued and no proceedings for that purpose shall have been taken or, to the knowledge of the Company, shall be contemplated by the Commission at or prior to the Closing Date or any Option Closing Date; (B) there shall not have been any change in the capital stock of the Company nor any material increase in the short-term or long-term debt (including any off-balance sheet activities or transactions) of the Company and its subsidiaries (other than in the ordinary course of business) from that set forth or contemplated in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto); (C) there shall not have been, since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), except as may otherwise be stated in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), any material adverse change in the condition (financial or other), business, prospects, properties, net worth or results of operations of the Company or its subsidiaries; (D) the Company and its subsidiaries shall not have any liabilities or obligations (financial or other), direct or contingent (whether or not in the ordinary course of business), that are material to the Company or its subsidiaries, other than those reflected in the Registration Statement or the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto); and (E) all the representations and warranties of the Company and the Operating Partnership contained in this Agreement shall be true and correct at
 
and as of the Execution Time and on and as of the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date as if made at and as of such time or on and as of such date, and the Representatives shall have received a certificate, dated the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date and signed by either the chief executive officer or president and the chief financial officer of the Company (or such other officers as are acceptable to the Representatives), confirming the conditions set forth in this Section 8(f) and in Section 8(g) hereof.
(g) The Company shall not have failed at or prior to the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date to have performed or complied with any of its agreements herein contained and required to be performed or complied with by it hereunder or under the Deposit Agreement, at or prior to the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date.
(h) Subsequent to the Execution Time, there shall not have been any decrease in the rating of any of the Company's debt securities by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" (as defined for purposes of Rule 436(g) under the Act) or any notice given of any intended or potential decrease in any such rating or of a possible change in any such rating that does not indicate the direction of the possible change.
(i) The Company shall have completed all required filings with the New York Stock Exchange and other necessary actions in order to cause the Shares to be listed and admitted and authorized for trading on the New York Stock Exchange, subject to notice of issuance.
(j) The Company shall have furnished or caused to be furnished to the Representatives such further certificates and documents as the Representatives shall have requested.
All such opinions, certificates, letters and other documents will be in compliance with the provisions hereof only if they are satisfactory in form and substance to the Representatives and their counsel.
Any certificate or document signed by any officer of the Company or the general partner of the Operating Partnership and delivered to the Underwriters, or to counsel for the Underwriters, shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Company or the Operating Partnership, as the case may be, to the Underwriters as to the statements made therein.
If any of the conditions specified in this Section 8 shall not have been fulfilled in all material respects when and as provided in this Agreement, or if any of the opinions and certificates mentioned above or elsewhere in this Agreement shall not be in all material respects reasonably satisfactory in form and substance to the Representatives and counsel for the Underwriters, this Agreement and all obligations of the Underwriters hereunder may be canceled by the Representatives at, or at any time prior to, the Closing Date or any Option Closing Date, with respect to any Option Shares remaining to be purchased. Notice of such cancellation shall be given to the Company in writing or by telephone or facsimile confirmed in writing.
With respect to the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date, the documents required to be delivered by this Section 8 shall be delivered at the offices of Hunton & Williams LLP, Attn: Andrew A. Gerber, Esq., counsel for the Underwriters, at 101 South Tryon Street, Suite 3500, Charlotte, North Carolina on or prior to such date.
 
9. . The Company agrees to pay the following costs and expenses and all other costs and expenses incident to the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder: (i) the preparation, printing or reproduction, and filing with the Commission of the registration statement (including financial statements and exhibits thereto), each Preliminary Prospectus, if any, the Prospectus, each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and each amendment or supplement to any of them; (ii) the printing (or reproduction) and delivery (including postage, air freight charges and charges for counting and packaging) of such copies of the registration statement, each Preliminary Prospectus, the Prospectus, each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus , the Incorporated Documents, and all amendments or supplements to any of them, as may be reasonably requested for use in connection with the offering and sale of the Shares; (iii) the preparation, printing, authentication, issuance and delivery of certificates for the Shares and the Preferred Shares, including any stamp or other taxes in connection with the original issuance and sale of the Shares and the Preferred Shares; (iv) the printing (or reproduction) and delivery of this Agreement, the preliminary and supplemental blue sky memoranda and all other agreements or documents printed (or reproduced) and delivered in connection with the offering of the Shares; (v) the registration or qualification of the Shares and the Preferred Shares for offer and sale under the securities or blue sky laws of the several states as provided in Section 5(g) hereof (including the reasonable fees, expenses and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters relating to the preparation, printing or reproduction, and delivery of the preliminary and supplemental blue sky memoranda and such registration and qualification); (vi) the filing fees and the fees and expenses of counsel for the Underwriters in connection with any filings required to be made with the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority; (vii) the transportation and other expenses incurred by or on behalf of Company representatives in connection with presentations to prospective purchasers of the Shares; and (viii) the fees and expenses of the Company's accountants, counsel (including local and special counsel) for the Company and the Depositary (including the fees and expenses of its counsel).
Expenses
10. . If any one or more Underwriters shall fail to purchase and pay for any of the Shares agreed to be purchased by such Underwriter or Underwriters hereunder and such failure to purchase shall constitute a default in the performance of its or their obligations under this Agreement, the remaining Underwriters shall be obligated severally to take up and pay for (in the respective proportions which the number of Shares set forth opposite their names in hereto bears to the number of Shares set forth opposite the names of all the remaining Underwriters) the Shares which the defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters agreed but failed to purchase; , , that in the event that the number of Shares which the defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters agreed but failed to purchase shall exceed 10% of the aggregate number of Shares set forth in hereto, the remaining Underwriters shall have the right to purchase all, but shall not be under any obligation to purchase any, of the Shares, and if such nondefaulting Underwriters do not purchase all the Shares, this Agreement will terminate without liability to any nondefaulting Underwriter or the Company. In the event of a default by any Underwriter as set forth in this Section 10, the Closing Date shall be postponed for such period, not exceeding five (5) Business Days, as the Representatives shall determine in order that the required changes in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus or in any other documents or arrangements may be effected. Nothing contained in this Agreement shall relieve any defaulting Underwriter of its liability, if any, to the Company and any nondefaulting Underwriter for damages occasioned by its default hereunder.
Default by an Underwriter
Schedule I
provided
however
Schedule I
 
11. . This Agreement may be terminated by you at any time prior to the Closing Date if any of the following has occurred: (i) since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, any material adverse change or any development involving a prospective change, which (A) in the absolute discretion of any group of Underwriters (which may include RBC Capital Markets Corporation) that has agreed to purchase in the aggregate at least 50% of the Firm Securities, as long as RBC Capital Markets Corporation does not affirmatively assert that termination should not occur, or (B) in the absolute discretion of RBC Capital Markets Corporation (whether or not the condition of clause (A) is satisfied) has had or is reasonably likely to have a Material Adverse Effect, (ii) any outbreak, attack, or escalation of hostilities or declaration of war, national emergency, act of terrorism or other national or international calamity or crisis or change in economic, financial or political conditions if the effect of such outbreak, escalation, declaration, emergency, calamity, crisis or change on the financial markets of the United States would, in (A) the absolute discretion of any group of Underwriters (which may include RBC Capital Markets Corporation) that has agreed to purchase in the aggregate at least 50% of the Firm Securities, as long as RBC Capital Markets Corporation does not affirmatively assert that termination should not occur, or (B) in the absolute discretion of RBC Capital Markets Corporation (whether or not the condition of clause (A) is satisfied), make it impracticable or inadvisable to market the Shares or to enforce contracts for the sale of the Shares, or (iii) suspension of trading in securities generally on the New York Stock Exchange or the American Stock Exchange or limitation on prices (other than limitations on hours or numbers of days of trading) for securities on either such Exchange, (iv) the enactment, publication, decree or other promulgation of any statute, regulation, rule or order of any court or other governmental authority which in your opinion materially and adversely affects or may materially and adversely affect the business or operations of the Issuer, (v) declaration of a banking moratorium by United States or New York State authorities, (vi) any downgrading, or placement on any watch list for possible downgrading, in the rating of the Company's debt securities by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" (as defined for purposes of Rule 436(g) under the Exchange Act); (vii) the suspension of trading of the Company's common stock by New York Stock Exchange, the Commission, or any other governmental authority or, (viii) the taking of any action by any governmental body or agency in respect of its monetary or fiscal affairs which in your reasonable opinion has a material adverse effect on the securities markets in the United States; or
Termination of Agreement
(b) as provided in Sections 8 and 10 of this Agreement.
Notice of such termination may be given to the Company by telegram, telecopy or telephone and shall be subsequently confirmed by letter.
12. . The statements in the fourth, eighth and ninth paragraphs under the heading "Underwriting" in any Preliminary Prospectus and in the Prospectus Supplement, constitute the only information furnished by or on behalf of the Underwriters as such information is referred to in the last sentence of Sections 6(b), 7(b) and 7(c) hereof.
Information Furnished by the Underwriters
 
13. . The respective agreements, representations, warranties, indemnities and other statements of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their officers and of the Underwriters set forth in or made pursuant to this Agreement will remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation made by or on behalf of the Underwriters or the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of the officers, directors, employees, agents or controlling persons referred to in Section 7 hereof, and will survive delivery of and payment for the Shares. The provisions of Sections 5(k), 7 and 9 hereof shall survive the termination or cancellation of this Agreement.
Representations and Indemnities to Survive
14. . The Company acknowledges and agrees that:
Absence of Fiduciary Relationship; Research Independence
(a) the Underwriters have been retained solely to act as underwriters in connection with the sale of the Shares and that no fiduciary, advisory or agency relationship between the Company and the Underwriters has been created in respect of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or the process leading thereto, irrespective of whether any of the Underwriters has advised or is advising the Company on other matters;
(b) the price of the Shares set forth in this Agreement was established by the Company following discussions and arms-length negotiations with the Representatives, and the Company is capable of evaluating and understanding and understands and accepts the terms, risks and conditions of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement;
(c) it has been advised that the Underwriters and their affiliates are engaged in a broad range of transactions which may involve interests that differ from those of the Company and that the Underwriters have no obligation to disclose such interests and transactions to the Company by virtue of any fiduciary, advisory or agency relationship; and
(d) it waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any claims they may have against the Underwriters for breach of fiduciary duty or alleged breach of fiduciary duty.
(e) In addition, the Company acknowledges that the Underwriters' research analysts and research departments are required to be independent from their respective investment banking divisions and are subject to certain regulations and internal policies, and that such Underwriters' research analysts may hold and make statements or investment recommendations and/or publish research reports with respect to the Company and/or the offering that differ from the views of its investment bankers. The Company hereby waives and releases, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any claims that the Company may have against the Underwriters with respect to any conflict of interest that may arise from the fact that the views expressed by their independent research analysts and research departments may be different from or inconsistent with the views or advice communicated to the Company by such Underwriters' investment banking divisions. The Company acknowledges that each of the Underwriters is a full service securities firm and as such from time to time, subject to applicable securities laws, may effect transactions for its own account or the account of its customers and hold long or short position in debt or equity securities of the companies which may be the subject to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
 
. All communications hereunder will be in writing and effective only on receipt, and, if sent to the Representatives, will be mailed, delivered or telefaxed to RBC Capital Markets Corporation, c/o RBC Capital Markets, One Liberty Plaza, 165 Broadway, New York, NY 10006-1404, Attention: Joe Morea, Syndicate Director (facsimile 212 428-6260); Ferris, Baker Watts, Incorporated, 100 Light Street, 8
Notices
th
Floor, Baltimore, MD 21202, Attention: Samer Tahboub (facsimile 410-659-4652), and Raymond James & Associates, Inc., 880 Carillon Parkway St. Petersburg, FL 33716, (facsimile 727-567-8058), Attention: Kevin Lyons; or, if sent to the Company, will be mailed, delivered or telefaxed to the office of the Company at 7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500E, Bethesda, Maryland 20814, (fax no.: 301-986-6023), Attention: Thomas H. McCormick, Executive Vice President and General Counsel.
15. . This Agreement has been made solely for the benefit of the Underwriters, the Company, the Operating Partnership, their directors and officers, and the other controlling persons referred to in Section 7 hereof and their respective successors and assigns, to the extent provided herein. This Agreement will inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors and the officers and directors and controlling persons referred to in Section 7 hereof, and no other person shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement. Neither the term "successor" nor the term "successors and assigns" as used in this Agreement shall include a purchaser from the Underwriters of any of the Shares in his status as such purchaser.
Successors
16. . This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements and understandings (whether written or oral) between the Company, the Operating Partnership and the Underwriters, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Integration
17. . This Agreement will be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York applicable to contracts made and to be performed within the State of New York.
Applicable Law
18. . The Company and the Operating Partnership hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any and all right to trial by jury in any legal proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby.
Waiver of Jury Trial
19. . This Agreement may be signed in one or more counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original, and all of which together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
Counterparts
20. . The section headings used herein are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction hereof.
Headings
21. . The term which follows, when used in this Agreement, shall have the meaning indicated.
Definition
"" shall mean any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a legal holiday or a day on which banking institutions or trust companies are authorized or obligated by law to close in New York City.
Business Day
 
"" shall mean a free writing prospectus, as defined in Rule 405.
Free Writing Prospectus
"," "," "," "," "," "," "," "," "" and "" refer to such rules under the Act.
Rule 158
Rule 163
Rule 164
Rule 172
Rule 401
Rule 405
Rule 415
Rule 424
Rule 433
Rule 456
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, please sign and return to us the enclosed duplicate hereof, whereupon this letter and your acceptance shall represent a binding agreement among the Company and the several Underwriters.
 
 
 
FREE WRITING PROSPECTUSES INCLUDED IN THE DISCLOSURE PACKAGE
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The issuer has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and other documents the issuer has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the issuer and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC web site at
www.sec.gov
. Alternatively, the issuer, any Underwriter or any dealer participating in the offering will arrange to send to you the prospectus if you request it by calling RBC Capital Markets Corporation at 212-428-6670, Ferris, Baker Watts, Incorporated toll-free at 800-436-2000, or Raymond James & Associates, Inc. toll-free at 800-248-8863.
Any disclaimers or other notices that may appear below are not applicable to this communication and should be disregarded. Such disclaimers or other notices were automatically generated as a result of this communication being sent via Bloomberg or another email system.

Exhibit 3.1
 
 
 
 
Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the "Corporation"), hereby certifies to the State Department of Assessments and Taxation of the State of Maryland that, pursuant to the authority conferred upon the Board of Directors of the Corporation by Article VI, Section 2 of the Corporation's First Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation, as amended to the date hereof and as the same may be amended hereafter from time to time (the "Charter"), and in accordance with Section 2-208(b) of the Maryland General Corporation Law, the Board of Directors and the Pricing Committee thereof, on February 29, 2008 and March 20, 2008, respectively, duly divided and classified unissued shares of Preferred Stock into a series designated as "9% Series B Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock" of the Corporation. The description of the 9% Series B Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock, including the preferences, conversion and other rights, voting powers, restrictions, limitations as to dividends, qualifications, and terms or conditions of redemption thereof, as set by the Board of Directors and the Pricing Committee, are as follows:
. .
Section 1
Number of Shares and Designation
The shares of such series shall be designated 9% Series B Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock" (the "Series B Preferred Stock") and the number of shares constituting such series shall be 34,500. The designations, powers, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights, and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions, of the Series B Preferred Stock shall be subject in all cases to the provisions of Article VI of the Charter regarding limitations on beneficial ownership of the Corporation's equity securities.
. .
Section 2
Definitions
"AMEX" shall mean the American Stock Exchange or a successor that is a national securities exchange registered under Section 6 of the Exchange Act.
"Board of Directors" shall mean the Board of Directors of the Corporation or any committee authorized by such Board of Directors to perform any of its responsibilities with respect to the Series B Preferred Stock.
"Beneficiary" shall have the meaning set forth in paragraph A of Article VI, Section 4 of the Charter.
"Business Day" shall mean any day other than a Saturday, Sunday or a day on which state or federally chartered banking institutions in Bethesda, Maryland or New York, New York are not required to be open.
"Capital Gains" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 3 hereof.
"Charter" shall have the meaning set forth in the Preamble hereof.
"Code" shall mean the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
"Common Stock" shall mean the common stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Corporation.
"Corporation" shall have the meaning set forth in the Preamble hereof.
"Deposit Agreement" shall mean the depositary agreement, dated as of March 27, 2008, among the Corporation, the Depositary and the holders from time to time of Depositary Receipts, or a successor deposit agreement.
"Depositary" shall mean Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, or a duly appointed successor depositary.
"Depositary Receipts" shall mean the depositary receipts issued by the Depositary under the Deposit Agreement representing a Depositary Share.
"Depositary Share(s)" shall mean depositary shares, each representing ownership of 1/100th of a share of Series B Preferred Stock at any time that the Series B Preferred Stock is being held by the Depositary under the Deposit Agreement.
"Dividend Payment Date" shall mean, with respect to each Dividend Period, the fifteenth (15
th
) day of the month following the month in which such Dividend Period has ended (January, April, July and October of each year), commencing on July 15, 2008.
"Dividend Payment Record Date" shall mean the date designated by the Board of Directors for the payment of dividends that is not more than 30 nor less than 10 days prior to the applicable Dividend Payment Date.
"Dividend Period" shall mean the respective periods commencing on and including January 1, April 1, July 1 and October 1 of each year and ending on and including the day preceding the first day of the next succeeding Dividend Period (other than the initial Dividend Period, which shall commence on the Original Issue Date and end on and include June 30, 2008, and other than the Dividend Period during which any shares of Series B Preferred Stock shall be redeemed pursuant to Section 5 hereof, which shall end on and include the redemption date with respect to the shares of Series B Preferred Stock being redeemed).
"Event" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 6 hereof.
"Excess Stock" shall have the meaning set forth in Article VI, Section 1 of the Charter.
 
"Exchange Act" shall mean the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
"Existing Holder" shall have the meaning set forth in paragraph A of Article VI, Section 4 of the Charter.
"Existing Holder Limit" shall have the meaning set forth in paragraph A of Article VI, Section 4 of the Charter.
"NASDAQ" shall mean the NASDAQ Stock Market, Inc. or a successor that is a national securities exchange registered under Section 6 of the Exchange Act.
"NYSE" shall mean the New York Stock Exchange, Inc. or a successor that is a national securities exchange registered under Section 6 of the Exchange Act.
"Original Issue Date" shall mean the first date on which the Series B Preferred Stock is issued and sold in the form of Depositary Shares or otherwise.
"Ownership Limit" shall have the meaning set forth in paragraph A of Article VI, Section 4 of the Charter.
"Parity Preferred" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 6 hereof.
"Preferred Directors" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 6 hereof.
"Preferred Dividend Default" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 6 hereof.
"Preferred Stock" shall mean the preferred stock, par value $.01 per share, of the Corporation.
"REIT" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 5 hereof.
"SEC" shall mean the Securities and Exchange Commission.
"Series B Preferred Stock" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 1 hereof.
"Total Distributions" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 3 hereof.
"Transfer Agent" shall mean Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, or such other agent or agents of the Corporation as may be designated by the Board of Directors or their designee as the transfer agent, registrar and dividend disbursing agent for the Series B Preferred Stock.
"Trust" shall mean the trust created pursuant to paragraph A of Article VI, Section 5 of the Charter.
. .
Section 3
Dividends and Distributions
(a) Subject to the preferential rights of the holders of any class or series of equity securities of the Corporation ranking senior to the Series B Preferred Stock as to dividends, the
 
holders of the then outstanding Series B Preferred Stock shall be entitled to receive, when, as and if declared by the Board of Directors, out of funds legally available for the payment of dividends, cumulative cash dividends at the rate of 9% per annum of the $2,500.00 liquidation preference per share of the Series B Preferred Stock (equivalent to a fixed amount of $225.00 per share of the Series B Preferred Stock); , , that during any period of time that both (i) the Depositary Shares (or the Series B Preferred Stock if no longer held in depositary form) are not listed on the NYSE, the AMEX or NASDAQ, and (ii) the Corporation is not subject to the reporting requirements of the Exchange Act, but any shares of Series B Preferred Stock are outstanding, the Corporation will increase the cumulative cash distributions payable on the Series B Preferred Stock to a rate of 10% per year of the $25.00 liquidation preference per Depositary Share (equivalent to a rate of 10% per annum of the $2,500.00 liquidation preference per share of Series B Preferred Stock). Such dividends shall accrue and be cumulative from and including the Original Issue Date and shall be payable quarterly in arrears on each Dividend Payment Date, commencing July 15, 2008; , , that if any Dividend Payment Date is not a Business Day, then the dividend which would otherwise have been payable on such Dividend Payment Date may be paid on the next succeeding Business Day with the same force and effect as if paid on such Dividend Payment Date, and no interest or additional dividends or other sums shall accrue on the amount so payable from such Dividend Payment Date to such next succeeding Business Day. The initial dividend payable on the Series B Preferred Stock, which will be greater than a full Dividend Period and will cover the period from the Original Issue Date through June 30, 2008, will be paid on July 15, 2008. The amount of any dividend payable on the Series B Preferred Stock for each full Dividend Period shall be computed by dividing $225.00 (or $250.00, if such higher rate is then applicable) by four (4) regardless of the actual number of days in such full Dividend Period. If the rate increases from 9% to 10% during any Dividend Period, the amount of the dividend payable shall be computed based on the number of days elapsed at the applicable rate during the Dividend Period and on the basis of a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30 day months using the applicable dividend rate. The amount of any dividend payable on the Series B Preferred Stock for any partial Dividend Period including a portion of the initial Dividend Period shall be prorated and computed on the basis of a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months. Dividends will be payable to holders of record as they appear in the stockholder records of the Corporation at the close of business on the applicable Dividend Payment Record Date. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained herein, each outstanding share of Series B Preferred Stock shall be entitled to receive a dividend with respect to any Dividend Payment Record Date equal to the dividend paid with respect to each other share of Series B Preferred Stock that is outstanding on such date.
provided
however
provided
however
(b) No dividends on the Series B Preferred Stock shall be declared by the Board of Directors or paid or set apart for payment by the Corporation at such time as the terms and provisions of any agreement of the Corporation, including any agreement relating to its indebtedness, prohibits such declaration, payment or setting apart for payment or provides that such declaration, payment or setting apart for payment would constitute a breach thereof or a default thereunder, or if such declaration, or payment or setting apart for payment shall be restricted or prohibited by law.
(c) Notwithstanding anything contained herein to the contrary, dividends on the Series B Preferred Stock shall accrue whether or not (i) the terms and provisions set forth in Section 3(b) hereof at any time prohibit the current payment of dividends, (ii) the Corporation
 
has earnings, (iii) there are funds legally available for the payment of such dividends, (iv) such dividends are declared and (v) any financial, contractual, legal or other limitation exists or arises that limits or may limit the Corporation's ability to declare, set aside or pay dividends on the Series B Preferred Stock. Accrued but unpaid dividends on the Series B Preferred Stock will accumulate as of the Dividend Payment Date on which they first become payable. No interest shall be payable in respect of any accrued but unpaid dividend on the Series B Preferred Stock.
(d) Except as provided in Section 3(e) below, no dividends shall be declared or paid or set apart for payment and no other distribution of cash or other property may be declared or made, directly or indirectly, on or with respect to any shares of Common Stock or shares of any other class or series of equity securities of the Corporation ranking, as to dividends, on a parity with or junior to the Series B Preferred Stock (other than a dividend paid in shares of Common Stock or in shares of any other class or series of equity securities ranking junior to the Series B Preferred Stock as to dividends and upon liquidation) for any period, nor shall any shares of Common Stock or any other shares of any other class or series of equity securities of the Corporation ranking, as to dividends or upon liquidation, on a parity with or junior to the Series B Preferred Stock be redeemed, purchased or otherwise acquired for any consideration and no other distribution of cash or other property may be made, directly or indirectly, on or with respect thereto (or any moneys be paid to or made available for a sinking fund for the redemption of any such shares) by the Corporation (except by conversion into or exchange for other shares of any class or series of equity securities of the Corporation ranking junior to the Series B Preferred Stock as to dividends and upon liquidation and except for the acquisition of shares made pursuant to the provisions of Article VI of the Charter), unless full cumulative dividends on the Series B Preferred Stock for all past dividend periods and the then current dividend period shall have been or contemporaneously are (i) declared and paid in cash or (ii) declared and a sum sufficient for the payment thereof in cash is irrevocably set apart for such payment.
(e) When dividends are not paid in full (or a sum sufficient for such full payment is not irrevocably so set apart) upon the Series B Preferred Stock and the shares of any other class or series of equity securities ranking, as to dividends, on a parity with the Series B Preferred Stock, all dividends declared upon the Series B Preferred Stock and each such other class or series of equity securities ranking, as to dividends, on a parity with the Series B Preferred Stock shall be declared pro rata so that the amount of dividends declared per share of Series B Preferred Stock and such other class or series of equity securities shall in all cases bear to each other the same ratio that accrued dividends per share on the Series B Preferred Stock and such other class or series of equity securities (which shall not include any accrual in respect of unpaid dividends on such other class or series of equity securities for prior dividend periods if such other class or series of equity securities does not have a cumulative dividend) bear to each other. No interest, or sum of money in lieu of interest, shall be payable in respect of any dividend payment or payments on the Series B Preferred Stock which may be in arrears.
(f) Holders of shares of Series B Preferred Stock shall not be entitled to any dividend, whether payable in cash, property or shares of stock, in excess of full cumulative dividends on the Series B Preferred Stock as provided herein. Any dividend payment made on the Series B Preferred Stock shall first be credited against the earliest accrued but unpaid dividends due with respect to such shares which remains payable.
 
(g) If, for any taxable year, the Corporation elects to designate as "capital gain dividends" (as defined in Section 857 of the Code or any successor revenue code or section) any portion (the "Capital Gains Amount") of the total distributions not in excess of the Corporation's earnings and profits (as determined for United States federal income tax purposes) paid or made available for such taxable year to holders of all classes and series of capital stock (the "Total Distributions"), then the portion of the Capital Gains Amount that shall be allocable to holders of Series B Preferred Stock shall be in the same proportion that the Total Distributions paid or made available to the holders of Series B Preferred Stock for such taxable year bears to the Total Distributions for such taxable year made with respect to all classes or series of capital stock outstanding.
. .
Section 4
Liquidation Preference
Upon any voluntary or involuntary liquidation, dissolution or winding-up of the affairs of the Corporation, before any distribution or payment shall be made to holders of shares of Common Stock or any other class or series of equity securities of the Corporation ranking, as to liquidation rights, junior to the Series B Preferred Stock, the holders of shares of Series B Preferred Stock then outstanding shall be entitled to be paid out of the assets of the Corporation legally available for distribution to its stockholders a liquidation preference of $2,500.00 per share, plus an amount equal to any accrued and unpaid dividends to the date of payment (whether or not declared). In the event that, upon any such voluntary or involuntary liquidation, dissolution or winding-up, the available assets of the Corporation are insufficient to pay the amount of the liquidating distributions on all outstanding shares of Series B Preferred Stock and the corresponding amounts payable on all shares of other classes or series of equity securities of the Corporation ranking, as to liquidation rights, on a parity with the Series B Preferred Stock in the distribution of assets, then the holders of the Series B Preferred Stock and each such other class or series of shares of equity securities ranking, as to liquidation rights, on a parity with the Series B Preferred Stock shall share ratably in any such distribution of assets in proportion to the full liquidating distributions to which they would otherwise be respectively entitled. Written notice of any such liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation, stating the payment date or dates when, and the place or places where, the amounts distributable in such circumstances shall be payable, shall be given by first class mail, postage pre-paid, not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior to the payment date stated therein, to each record holder of shares of Series B Preferred Stock at the respective addresses of such holders as the same shall appear on the stock transfer records of the Corporation. After payment of the full amount of the liquidating distributions to which they are entitled, the holders of Series B Preferred Stock will have no right or claim to any of the remaining assets of the Corporation. The consolidation or merger of the Corporation with or into any other corporation, trust or entity, or the sale, lease, transfer or conveyance of all or substantially all of the property or business of the Corporation, shall not be deemed to constitute a liquidation, dissolution or winding-up of the affairs of the Corporation.
. .
Section 5
Redemption
(a) Shares of Series B Preferred Stock shall not be redeemable prior to March 15, 2013. However, in order to ensure that the Corporation remains qualified as a real estate investment trust ("REIT") for United States federal income tax purposes in accordance with the
 
Charter, the Series B Preferred Stock, together with all other equity securities of the Corporation, shall be subject to Article VI of the Charter pursuant to which Series B Preferred Stock owned by a stockholder in excess of the Ownership Limit, or by the Existing Holder in excess of the Existing Holder Limit, shall automatically be transferred to a Trust for the exclusive benefit of a Beneficiary, as provided in Article VI, Section 5 of the Charter.
(b) On or after March 15, 2013, the Corporation, at its option upon not less than 30 nor more than 60 days' written notice, may redeem the Series B Preferred Stock, in whole or in part, at any time or from time to time, for cash at a redemption price of $2,500.00 per share, plus all accrued and unpaid dividends (whether or not declared) thereon to and including the date fixed for redemption, without interest. If fewer than all of the outstanding shares of Series B Preferred Stock are to be redeemed, the shares of Series B Preferred Stock to be redeemed shall be redeemed pro rata (as nearly as may be practicable without creating fractional shares), by lot or by any other equitable method determined by the Corporation that will not result in a violation of the Ownership Limit or, in the case of the Existing Holder, the Existing Holder Limit. If such redemption is to be by lot and, as a result of such redemption, any holder of a number of shares of Series B Preferred Stock would become a holder of a number of shares of Series B Preferred Stock in excess of the Ownership Limit or, in the case of the Existing Holder, the Existing Holder Limit, because such holder's Series B Preferred Stock was not redeemed, or was only redeemed in part, then, except as otherwise provided in the Charter, the Corporation will redeem the requisite number of shares of Series B Preferred Stock of such holder such that no holder will hold in excess of the Ownership Limit or, in the case of the Existing Holder, the Existing Holder Limit, subsequent to such redemption.
(c) During any period of time that both (i) the Depositary Shares (or the Series B Preferred Stock if no longer held in depositary form) are not listed on the NYSE, the AMEX or NASDAQ, and (ii) the Corporation is not subject to the reporting requirements of the Exchange Act, but any shares of Series B Preferred Stock are outstanding, the Corporation will have the option to redeem the Series B Preferred Stock, in whole but not in part, within 90 days of the date upon which the Depositary Shares (or the shares of the Series B Preferred Stock) cease to be listed and the Corporation ceases to be subject to such reporting requirements, for a redemption price of $2,500.00 per share of Series B Preferred Stock (or $25.00 per Depositary Share), plus all dividends accrued and unpaid (whether or not declared), if any, to the date such shares are redeemed as provided in this Section 5(c), upon the giving of notice as provided in Section 5(h) hereof.
(d) Holders of Series B Preferred Stock to be redeemed shall surrender such Series B Preferred Stock at the place designated in such notice and shall be entitled to the redemption price of $2,500.00 per share and any accrued and unpaid dividends (whether or not declared) payable upon such redemption following such surrender. If (i) notice of redemption of any shares of Series B Preferred Stock has been given, (ii) the funds necessary for such redemption have been irrevocably set aside by the Corporation in trust for the benefit of the holders of any shares of Series B Preferred Stock so called for redemption and (iii) irrevocable instructions have been given to pay the redemption price and all accrued and unpaid dividends (whether or not declared), then from and after the redemption date dividends shall cease to accrue on such shares of Series B Preferred Stock, such shares of Series B Preferred Stock shall no longer be deemed outstanding and all rights of the holders of such shares will terminate, except the right to receive
 
the redemption price plus any accrued and unpaid dividends (whether or not declared) payable upon such redemption, without interest. So long as no dividends are in arrears, nothing herein shall prevent or restrict the Corporation's right or ability to purchase, from time to time either at a public or a private sale, all or any part of the Series B Preferred Stock at such price or prices as the Corporation may determine, subject to the provisions of applicable law, including the repurchase of shares of Series B Preferred Stock in open-market transactions duly authorized by the Board of Directors.
(e) The deposit of funds with a bank or trust corporation for the purpose of redeeming Series B Preferred Stock shall be irrevocable except that:
(i) the Corporation shall be entitled to receive from such bank or trust corporation the interest or other earnings, if any, earned on any money so deposited in trust, and the holders of any shares redeemed shall have no claim to such interest or other earnings; and
(ii) any balance of monies so deposited by the Corporation and unclaimed by the holders of the Series B Preferred Stock entitled thereto at the expiration of two (2) years from the applicable redemption dates shall be repaid, together with any interest or other earnings thereon, to the Corporation, and after any such repayment, the holders of the shares entitled to the funds so repaid to the Corporation shall look only to the Corporation for payment without interest or other earnings.
(f) In the event of any redemption of the Series B Preferred Stock in order to preserve the status of the Corporation as a qualified REIT, such redemption shall be made in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in this Section 5 of these Articles Supplementary. If the Corporation calls for redemption any shares of Series B Preferred Stock pursuant to and in accordance with this Section 5(f), then, the redemption price for such shares will be an amount in cash equal to $2,500.00 per share together with all accrued and unpaid dividends (whether or not declared) thereon to and including the date fixed for redemption, without interest.
(g) Unless full cumulative dividends on all Series B Preferred Stock shall have been or contemporaneously are declared and paid in cash or declared and a sum sufficient for the payment thereof in cash irrevocably set apart for payment for all past dividend periods and the then current dividend period, no Series B Preferred Stock shall be redeemed unless all outstanding shares of Series B Preferred Stock are simultaneously redeemed and the Corporation shall not purchase or otherwise acquire directly or indirectly any shares of Series B Preferred Stock or any class or series of equity securities of the Corporation ranking, as to dividends or upon liquidation, on a parity with or junior to the Series B Preferred Stock (except by exchange for shares of equity securities of the Corporation ranking, as to dividends and upon liquidation, junior to the Series B Preferred Stock); , , that the foregoing shall not prevent the purchase of Series B Preferred Stock by the Corporation in accordance with the terms of Section 5(a) or 5(f) hereof or Article VI of the Charter or otherwise in order to ensure that the Corporation remains qualified as a REIT for United States federal income tax purposes or the purchase or acquisition of Series B Preferred Stock pursuant to a purchase or exchange offer made on the same terms to holders of all outstanding shares of Series B Preferred Stock.
provided
however
 
(h) Notice of redemption shall be mailed by the Corporation, postage prepaid, as of a date set by the Corporation not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior to the redemption date, addressed to the respective holders of record of the shares of Series B Preferred Stock to be redeemed at their respective addresses as they appear on the share transfer records of the Transfer Agent. No failure to give such notice or any defect thereto or in the mailing thereof shall affect the sufficiency of notice or validity of the proceedings for the redemption of any Series B Preferred Stock except as to a holder to whom notice was defective or not given. A redemption notice which has been mailed in the manner provided herein shall be conclusively presumed to have been duly given on the date mailed whether or not the holder received the redemption notice. In addition to any information required by law or the applicable rules of any exchange upon which Series B Preferred Stock may be listed or admitted to trading, each notice shall state (i) the redemption date; (ii) the redemption price; (iii) the number of shares of Series B Preferred Stock and Depositary Receipts to be redeemed; (iv) the place or places where the shares of Series B Preferred Stock and the Depositary Receipts evidencing the Depositary Shares are to be surrendered for payment of the redemption price; and (v) that dividends on the Series B Preferred Stock to be redeemed shall cease to accrue on such redemption date. If fewer than all of the shares of Series B Preferred Stock held by any holder are to be redeemed, the notice mailed to such holder shall also specify the number of shares of Series B Preferred Stock held by such holder to be redeemed.
(i) If a redemption date falls after a Dividend Payment Record Date and on or prior to the corresponding Dividend Payment Date, each holder of Series B Preferred Stock at the close of business of such Dividend Payment Record Date shall be entitled to the dividend payable on such shares on the corresponding Dividend Payment Date notwithstanding the redemption of such shares on or prior to such Dividend Payment Date, and each holder of Series B Preferred Stock that surrenders its shares on such redemption date will be entitled to the dividends accruing after the end of the Dividend Period to which such Dividend Payment Date relates up to and including the redemption date. Except as provided herein, the Corporation shall make no payment or allowance for unpaid dividends, whether or not in arrears, on Series B Preferred Stock which are redeemed.
(j) The Series B Preferred Stock is subject to the provisions of Article VI of the Charter, including, without limitation, the provision for the redemption of Excess Stock. In addition to the redemption rights set forth in Article VI of the Charter, Excess Stock issued upon exchange of Series B Preferred Stock pursuant to such Article may be redeemed, in whole or in part, at any time when outstanding Series B Preferred Stock are being redeemed, for cash at a redemption price of $2,500.00 per share of Series B Preferred Stock, plus all accrued and unpaid dividends (whether or not declared) on the Series B Preferred Stock, which were exchanged for such Excess Stock, through the date of such exchange, without interest. If the Corporation elects to redeem Excess Stock pursuant to the redemption right set forth in the preceding sentence, such Excess Stock shall be redeemed in such proportion and in accordance with such procedures as Series B Preferred Stock are being redeemed.
. .
Section 6
Voting Rights
(a) Holders of the Series B Preferred Stock shall not have any voting rights, except as provided by applicable law and as set forth in this Section 6.
 
(b) Whenever dividends on any shares of Series B Preferred Stock shall be in arrears for six (6) or more quarterly periods (whether or not declared or consecutive) (a "Preferred Dividend Default"), the holders of such shares of Series B Preferred Stock (voting separately as a class with all other series of preferred stock ranking on a parity with the Series B Preferred Stock as to dividends or upon liquidation and upon which like voting rights have been conferred and are exercisable ("Parity Preferred")) will be entitled to vote for the election of a total of two additional directors of the Corporation (the "Preferred Directors"), and the number of directors on the Board of Directors shall increase by two, at a special meeting called by the holders of record of at least 10% of the Series B Preferred Stock or the holders of any other series of Parity Preferred so in arrears (unless such request is received less than 90 days before the date fixed for the next annual or special meeting of stockholders) or at the next annual meeting of stockholders, and at each subsequent annual meeting until all dividends accumulated on such shares of Series B Preferred Stock for the past dividend periods and the dividend for the then current dividend period shall have been fully paid or declared and a sum sufficient for the payment thereof irrevocably set aside for payment.
(c) If and when all accumulated dividends and the dividend for the then current dividend period on the Series B Preferred Stock shall have been paid in full or irrevocably set aside for payment in full, the holders of shares of Series B Preferred Stock shall be divested of the voting rights set forth in Section 6(b) hereof (subject to revesting in the event of each subsequent Preferred Dividend Default) and, if all accumulated dividends and the dividend for the current dividend period have been paid in full or irrevocably set aside for payment in full on all other series of Parity Preferred, the term of office of each Preferred Director so elected shall terminate and the number of directors on the Board of Directors shall decrease by two. Any Preferred Director may be removed at any time with or without cause by the vote of, and shall not be removed otherwise than by the vote of, the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of the Series B Preferred Stock when they have the voting rights set forth in Section 6(b) hereof (voting separately as a class with the Parity Preferred). So long as a Preferred Dividend Default shall continue, any vacancy in the office of a Preferred Director may be filled by written consent of the Preferred Director remaining in office, or, if none remains in office, by a vote of the holders of record of a majority of the outstanding shares of Series B Preferred Stock when they have the voting rights set forth in Section 6(b) hereof (voting separately as a class with all other series of Parity Preferred). The Preferred Directors shall each be entitled to one vote per director on any matter.
(d) So long as any shares of Series B Preferred Stock remain outstanding, the affirmative vote or consent of the holders of at least 66 
 2
/
3
% of the shares of Series B Preferred Stock outstanding at the time, given in person or by proxy, either in writing or at a meeting (voting separately as a single class), will be required to:
(i) authorize, create or issue, or increase the authorized or issued amount of, any class or series of equity securities ranking senior to the Series B Preferred Stock with respect to payment of dividends or the distribution of assets upon liquidation, dissolution or winding-up of the affairs of the Corporation or reclassify any authorized equity securities of the Corporation into such equity securities, or create, authorize or issue any obligation or security convertible into or evidencing the right to purchase any such senior equity securities; or
 
(ii) amend, alter or repeal the provisions of the Charter or these Articles Supplementary, whether by merger, consolidation, transfer or conveyance of all or substantially all of its assets or otherwise (an "Event"), so as to materially and adversely affect any right, preference, privilege or voting power of the Series B Preferred Stock or the holders thereof; , , with respect to the occurrence of any Event, so long as the Series B Preferred Stock remains outstanding with the terms thereof materially unchanged, or in the case in which the Corporation is not the surviving entity, so long as shares into which the Series B Preferred Stock have been converted in any successor entity to the Corporation remain outstanding with the terms thereof materially unchanged, the occurrence of such Event shall not be deemed to materially and adversely affect such rights, preferences, privileges or voting power of holders of Series B Preferred Stock, and in such case such holders shall not have any voting rights with respect to the occurrence of an Event; that holders of the Series B Preferred Stock shall not be entitled to vote with respect to any increase in the amount of the authorized Common Stock or Preferred Stock or the creation or issuance of any other class or series of equity securities, in each case ranking on a parity with or junior to the Series B Preferred Stock with respect to the payment of dividends and the distribution of assets upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation.
provided
however
provided further
(e) The foregoing voting provisions of this Section 6 shall not apply if, at or prior to the time when the act with respect to which such vote would otherwise be required shall be effected, all outstanding shares of Series B Preferred Stock shall have been redeemed or called for redemption upon proper notice and sufficient funds, in cash, shall have been deposited in trust to effect such redemption.
(f) In any matter in which the Series B Preferred Stock may vote (as expressly provided herein or as may be required by law), each share of Series B Preferred Stock shall be entitled to one vote per $2,500.00 of liquidation preference.
(g) Except as expressly stated herein, the Series B Preferred Stock will not have any relative, participating, optional or other special voting rights and powers and the consent of the holders thereof shall not be required for the taking of any corporate action, including but not limited to, any merger or consolidation of the Corporation or a sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation, irrespective of the effect that such merger, consolidation or sale may have upon the rights, preferences, privileges or voting power of the holders of the Series B Preferred Stock.
. .
Section 7
Conversion
The shares of Series B Preferred Stock shall not be convertible into or exchangeable for any other property or securities of the Corporation or any other entity, except that the Series B Preferred Stock will automatically be exchanged by the Corporation for Excess Stock in accordance with Article VI of the Charter in the same manner that Common Stock are exchanged for Excess Stock pursuant thereto, in order to ensure that the Corporation remains qualified as a REIT for federal income tax purposes.
 
. .
Section 8
Ranking
In respect of rights to the payment of dividends and the distribution of assets in the event of any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the affairs of the Corporation, the Series B Preferred Stock shall rank (i) senior to all classes or series of the Corporation's Common Stock and to all other equity securities issued by the Corporation ranking junior to the Series B Preferred Stock as to the payment of dividends and the distribution of assets in the event of any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation, (ii) on a parity with Series A preferred stock and with all equity securities issued by the Corporation in the future the terms of which specifically provide that such equity securities rank on a parity with the Series B Preferred Stock as to the payment of dividends and the distribution of assets in the event of any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation, and (iii) junior to all equity securities issued by the Corporation in the future the terms of which specifically provide that such equity securities rank senior to the Series B Preferred Stock as to the payment of dividends and the distribution of assets in the event of any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation. The term "equity securities" does not include convertible debt securities, which will rank senior to the Series B Preferred Stock prior to conversion. All shares of Series B Preferred Stock shall rank equally with one another and shall be identical in all respects.
. .
Section 9
Restrictions on Transfer, Acquisition and Redemption of Shares
The Series B Preferred Stock is governed by and issued subject to all of the limitations, terms and conditions of the Corporation's Charter, including but not limited to the terms and conditions (including exceptions and exemptions) of Article VI of the Charter. The foregoing sentence shall not be construed to limit to the Series B Preferred Stock the applicability of any other term or provision of the Charter. In addition to the legend contemplated by paragraph M of Article VI, Section 4 of the Charter, each certificate for Series B Preferred Stock shall bear substantially the following legend:
"The Corporation will furnish to any stockholder, on request and without charge, a full statement of the information required by Section 2-211(b) of the Maryland General Corporation Law with respect to the designations and any preferences, conversion and other rights, voting powers, restrictions, limitations as to distributions, qualifications, and terms and conditions of redemptions of the stock of each class which the Corporation has authority to issue and, if the Corporation is authorized to issue any preferred or special class in series or classes, (i) the difference in the relative rights and preferences between the shares of each series and class to the extent set, and (ii) the authority of the Board of Directors to set such rights and preferences of subsequent series and classes. The foregoing summary does not purport to be complete and is subject to and qualified in its entirety by reference to the Charter of the Corporation, a copy of which will be sent without charge to each stockholder who so requests. Such request must be made to the Secretary of the Corporation at its principal office."
. .
Section 10
Shares of Stock To Be Retired
All shares of Series B Preferred Stock which shall have been issued and reacquired in any manner by the Corporation shall be restored to the status of authorized but unissued shares of Preferred Stock of the Corporation, without designation as to class or series.
 
. .
Section 11
Record Holders
The Corporation and the Transfer Agent may deem and treat the record holder of any Series B Preferred Stock as the true and lawful owner thereof for all purposes, and neither the Corporation nor the Transfer Agent shall be affected by any notice to the contrary.
. .
Section 12
Information Rights
During any period of time that both (i) the Depositary Shares (or the Series B Preferred Stock if no longer held in depositary form) are not listed on the NYSE, the AMEX or NASDAQ, and (ii) the Corporation is not subject to the reporting requirements of the Exchange Act, but any shares Series B Preferred Stock are outstanding, the Corporation will (a) transmit by mail or other permissible means under the Exchange Act to all holders of Depositary Shares (or the Series B Preferred Stock if no longer held in depositary form) as their names and addresses appear in our record books and without cost to such holders, copies of the annual reports and quarterly reports that the Corporation would have been required to file with the SEC, pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act if the Corporation were subject thereto (other than any exhibits that would have been required), and (ii) within 15 days following written request, supply copies of such reports to any prospective holder of the Depositary Shares (or the Series B Preferred Stock if no longer held in depositary form). The Corporation will mail (or otherwise provide) the reports to the holders of Depositary Shares (or the Series B Preferred Stock if no longer held in depositary form) within 15 days after the respective dates by which the Corporation would have been required to file such reports with the SEC if the Corporation were subject to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act.
. .
Section 13
Sinking Fund
The Series B Preferred Stock shall not be entitled to the benefits of any retirement or sinking fund.
. .
Section 14
Exclusion of Other Rights
The Series B Preferred Stock shall not have any preferences or other rights, voting powers, restrictions, limitations as to dividends or other distributions, qualifications or terms or conditions of redemption other than expressly set forth in the Charter and these Articles Supplementary.
. .
Section 15
Headings of Subdivisions
The headings of the various subdivisions hereof are for convenience of reference only and shall not affect the interpretation of any of the provisions hereof.
. .
Section 16
Severability of Provisions
If any preferences or other rights, voting powers, restrictions, limitations as to dividends or other distributions, qualifications or terms or conditions of redemption of the Series B Preferred Stock set forth in the Charter and these Articles Supplementary are invalid, unlawful or incapable of being enforced by reason of any rule of law or public policy, all other preferences or
 
other rights, voting powers, restrictions, limitations as to distributions, qualifications or terms or conditions of redemption of Series B Preferred Stock set forth in the Charter which can be given effect without the invalid, unlawful or unenforceable provision thereof shall, nevertheless, remain in full force and effect and no preferences or other rights, voting powers, restrictions, limitations as to dividends or other distributions, qualifications or terms or conditions of redemption of the Series B Preferred Stock herein set forth shall be deemed dependent upon any other provision thereof unless so expressed therein.
. .
Section 17
No Preemptive Rights
No holder of shares of Series B Preferred Stock shall have any preemptive or preferential right to subscribe for, or to purchase, any additional shares of stock of the Corporation of any class or series, or any other security of the Corporation which the Corporation may issue or sell.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Corporation has caused these Articles Supplementary to be executed under seal in its name and on its behalf by its President and attested to by its Secretary on this 26th day of March 2008.
 
 
THE UNDERSIGNED President of Saul Centers, Inc., who executed on behalf of the Corporation the foregoing Articles Supplementary which this certificate is made a part, hereby acknowledges in the name and on behalf of said Corporation the foregoing Articles Supplementary to be the duly authorized act of said Corporation and hereby certifies to the best of his knowledge, information and belief that the matters and facts set forth herein with respect to the authorization and approval thereof are true in all material respects under the penalties of perjury.
 
 

Exhibit 4.1
This DEPOSIT AGREEMENT is made and entered into as of March 27, 2008 by and among Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the "Company"), Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, as Depositary, and all holders from time to time of Receipts (as hereinafter defined) issued hereunder.
WHEREAS, it is desired to provide, as hereinafter set forth in this Deposit Agreement, for the deposit of shares of the Company's Preferred Stock (as hereinafter defined) with the Depositary for the purposes set forth in this Deposit Agreement and for the issuance hereunder of the Receipts evidencing Depositary Shares representing a fractional interest in the Preferred Stock deposited; and
WHEREAS, the Receipts are to be substantially in the form of annexed to this Deposit Agreement, with appropriate insertions, modifications and omissions, as hereinafter provided in this Deposit Agreement;
Exhibit A
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the promises contained herein, it is agreed by and among the parties hereto as follows:
The following definitions shall apply to the respective terms (in the singular and plural forms of such terms) used in this Deposit Agreement and the Receipts:
SECTION 1.01. "AMEX" shall mean the American Stock Exchange or a successor that is a national securities exchange registered under Section 6 of the Exchange Act.
SECTION 1.02. "Articles of Incorporation" shall mean the Articles of Incorporation, as amended and supplemented from time to time, of the Company.
SECTION 1.03. "Articles Supplementary" shall mean the Articles Supplementary Classifying 34,500 Shares of Preferred Stock as 9% Series B Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock filed with the State Department of Assessments and Taxation of the State of Maryland establishing the Preferred Stock as a series of Preferred Stock of the Company.
SECTION 1.04. "Common Stock" shall mean shares of the Company's common stock, $.01 par value per share.
SECTION 1.05. "Company" shall mean Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation, and its successors.
SECTION 1.06. "Corporate Office" shall mean the corporate office of the Depositary at which at any particular time its business in respect of matters governed by this Deposit Agreement shall be administered, which at the date of this Deposit Agreement is located at 17 Battery Place, 8
th
Floor, New York, New York.
SECTION 1.07. "Deposit Agreement" shall mean this agreement, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time.
SECTION 1.08. "Depositary" shall mean Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, a company or corporation having its principal office in the United States, and any successor as depositary hereunder.
SECTION 1.09. "Depositary Share" shall mean a 1/100
th
fractional interest of a share of Preferred Stock deposited with the Depositary hereunder and the same proportionate interest in any and all other property received by the Depositary in respect of such share of Preferred Stock and held under this Deposit Agreement, all as evidenced by the Receipts issued hereunder. Subject to the terms of this Deposit Agreement, each owner of a Depositary Share is entitled, proportionately, to all the rights, preferences and privileges of the Preferred Stock represented by such Depositary Share, including the dividend and distribution, voting, redemption, conversion and liquidation rights as set forth in the Articles Supplementary.
SECTION 1.10. "Depositary's Agent" shall mean one or more agents appointed by the Depositary as provided, and for the purposes specified, in Section 7.05 hereof.
SECTION 1.11. "Exchange Act" shall mean the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
SECTION 1.12. "Existing Holder Limit" shall have the meaning set forth in Article VI, Section 4 of the Company's Articles of Incorporation.
SECTION 1.13. "NASDAQ" shall mean the NASDAQ Stock Market, Inc. or a successor that is a national securities exchange registered under Section 6 of the Exchange Act.
SECTION 1.14. "NYSE" shall mean the New York Stock Exchange, Inc. or a successor that is a national securities exchange registered under Section 6 of the Exchange Act.
SECTION 1.15. "Ownership Limit" shall have the meaning set forth in Article VI, Section 4 of the Company's Articles of Incorporation.
SECTION 1.16. "Preferred Stock" shall mean shares of the Company's 9% Series B Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock, $.01 par value per share, heretofore validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
SECTION 1.17. "Receipt" shall mean a Depositary Receipt issued hereunder to evidence one or more Depositary Shares, whether in definitive or temporary form, substantially in the form set forth as hereto.
Exhibit A
 
SECTION 1.18. "record date" shall mean the date fixed pursuant to Section 4.04 hereof.
SECTION 1.19. "record holder" or "holder" as applied to a Receipt shall mean the person in whose name a Receipt is registered on the books maintained by the Depositary for such purpose.
SECTION 1.20. "redemption date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.03 hereof.
SECTION 1.21. "REIT" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.03 hereof.
SECTION 1.22. "Registrar" shall mean Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, or any bank or trust company appointed to register ownership and transfers of Receipts or the deposited Preferred Stock, as the case may be, as herein provided.
SECTION 1.23. "Securities Act" shall mean the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
SECTION 1.24. "Signature Guarantee" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 2.04 hereof.
SECTION 1.25. "Special Damages" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 5.08 hereof.
SECTION 1.26. "Transfer Agent" shall mean Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, or any bank or trust company appointed to transfer the Receipts or the deposited Preferred Stock, as the case may be, as herein provided.
SECTION 2.01. . Definitive Receipts shall be engraved or printed or lithographed with steel-engraved borders and underlying tint and shall be substantially in the form set forth in annexed to this Deposit Agreement, with appropriate insertions, modifications and omissions, as hereinafter provided. Pending the preparation of definitive Receipts, the Depositary, upon the written order of the Company, delivered in compliance with Section 2.02, shall execute and deliver temporary Receipts which may be printed, lithographed, typewritten, mimeographed or otherwise substantially of the tenor of the definitive Receipts in lieu of which they are issued and with such appropriate insertions, omissions, substitutions and other variations as the persons executing such Receipts may determine, as evidenced by their execution of such Receipts. If temporary Receipts are issued, the Company and the Depositary will cause definitive Receipts to be prepared without unreasonable delay. After the preparation of definitive Receipts, the temporary Receipts shall be exchangeable for definitive Receipts upon surrender of the temporary Receipts at the Corporate Office or such other offices, if any, as the Depositary may designate, without charge to the holder. Upon surrender for cancellation of any one or more temporary Receipts, the Depositary
Form and Transferability of Receipts
Exhibit A
 
shall execute and deliver in exchange therefor definitive Receipts representing the same number of Depositary Shares as represented by the surrendered temporary Receipt or Receipts. Such exchange shall be made at the Company's expense and without any charge therefor. Until so exchanged, the temporary Receipts shall in all respects be entitled to the same benefits under this Deposit Agreement, and with respect to the Preferred Stock deposited, as definitive Receipts.
Receipts shall be executed by the Depositary by the manual or facsimile signature of a duly authorized signatory of the Depositary, provided that if a Registrar (other than the Depositary) shall have been appointed then such Receipts shall also be countersigned by manual signature of a duly authorized signatory of the Registrar. No Receipt shall be entitled to any benefits under this Deposit Agreement or be valid or obligatory for any purpose unless it shall have been executed as provided in the preceding sentence. The Depositary shall record on its books each Receipt executed as provided above and delivered as hereinafter provided.
Except as the Depositary may otherwise determine, Receipts shall be in denominations of any number of whole Depositary Shares. All Receipts shall be dated the date of their issuance.
Receipts may be endorsed with or have incorporated in the text thereof such legends or recitals or changes not inconsistent with the provisions of this Deposit Agreement as may be required by the Company or required to comply with any applicable law or regulation or with the rules and regulations of any securities exchange or interdealer quotation system upon which the Preferred Stock, the Depositary Shares or the Receipts may be listed or quoted or to conform with any usage with respect thereto, or to indicate any special limitations or restrictions to which any particular Receipts are subject, in each case, as directed by the Company.
Title to any Receipt (and to the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipt) that is properly endorsed or accompanied by a properly executed instrument of transfer or endorsement shall be transferable by delivery with the same effect as in the case of a negotiable instrument; provided, however, that until a Receipt shall be transferred on the books of the Depositary as provided in Section 2.04, the Depositary may, notwithstanding any notice to the contrary, treat the record holder thereof at such time as the absolute owner thereof for the purpose of determining the person entitled to dividends or other distributions, the exercise of any redemption or voting rights or to any notice provided for in this Deposit Agreement and for all other purposes.
SECTION 2.02. . Concurrently with the execution of this Deposit Agreement, the Company is delivering to the Depositary a certificate or certificates, registered in the name of the Depository Trust Company, or its designee, and evidencing up to 34,500 shares of Preferred Stock, properly endorsed or accompanied, if required by the Depositary, by a duly executed instrument of transfer or endorsement, in form satisfactory to the Depositary, together with (i) all such certifications as may be required by the Depositary in accordance with the provisions of this Deposit Agreement and (ii) a written letter of instruction of the Company directing the Depositary to execute and deliver to, or upon the written order of, the person or persons stated in such order a Receipt or Receipts for the Depositary Shares representing such deposited Preferred Stock. The Depositary acknowledges receipt of the deposited Preferred Stock and related
Deposit of Preferred Stock; Execution and Delivery of Receipts in Respect Thereof
 
documentation and agrees to hold such deposited Preferred Stock in an account to be established by the Depositary at the Corporate Office or at such other office as the Depositary shall determine. The Company hereby appoints the Depositary as the Registrar and Transfer Agent for the Preferred Stock deposited hereunder and the Depositary hereby accepts such appointment and, as such, will reflect changes in the number of shares (including any fractional shares) of deposited Preferred Stock held by it by notation, book-entry or other appropriate method.
If required by the Depositary, Preferred Stock presented for deposit by the Company at any time, whether or not the register of stockholders of the Company is closed, shall also be accompanied by an agreement or assignment, or other instrument satisfactory to the Depositary, that will provide for the prompt transfer to the Depositary or its nominee of any distribution or right to subscribe for additional Preferred Stock or to receive other property that any person in whose name the Preferred Stock is or has been registered may thereafter receive upon or in respect of such deposited Preferred Stock, or in lieu thereof such agreement of indemnity or other agreement as shall be satisfactory to the Depositary.
Upon receipt by the Depositary of a certificate or certificates for Preferred Stock deposited hereunder, together with the other documents specified above, and upon registering such Preferred Stock in the name of the Depositary, the Depositary, subject to the terms and conditions of this Deposit Agreement, shall execute and deliver to, or upon the order of, the person or persons named in the written order delivered to the Depositary referred to in the first paragraph of this Section 2.02 a Receipt or Receipts for the number of whole Depositary Shares representing the Preferred Stock so deposited and registered in such name or names as may be requested by such person or persons. The Depositary shall execute and deliver such Receipt or Receipts at the Corporate Office, except that, at the request, risk and expense of any person requesting such delivery, such delivery may be made at such other place as may be designated by such person.
Other than in the case of splits, combinations or other reclassifications affecting the Preferred Stock, or in the case of distributions of Preferred Stock, if any, there shall be deposited hereunder not more than the number of shares constituting the Preferred Stock as set forth in the Articles Supplementary, as such may be amended.
The Company shall deliver to the Depositary from time to time such quantities of Receipts as the Depositary may request to enable the Depositary to perform its obligations under this Deposit Agreement.
SECTION 2.03. . Shares of the Preferred Stock are not redeemable prior to March 15, 2013. However, in order to ensure that the Company remains qualified as a real estate investment trust ("REIT") for United States federal income tax purposes in accordance with the Articles of Incorporation, the Preferred Stock, together with all other equity securities of the Company, shall be subject to Article VI of the Articles of Incorporation pursuant to which Preferred Stock owned by a stockholder in excess of the Ownership Limit, or by the Existing Holder in excess of the Existing Holder Limit, shall automatically be transferred to a Trust for the exclusive benefit of a Beneficiary, as provided in Article VI, Section 5 of the Articles of Incorporation. On or after March 15, 2013, if the
Optional Redemption of Preferred Stock for Cash
 
Company shall elect to redeem shares of deposited Preferred Stock for cash in accordance with the provisions of the Articles Supplementary, it shall (unless otherwise agreed in writing with the Depositary) give the Depositary not less than 30 nor more than 60 days' prior written notice of the date of such proposed redemption and of the number of such shares of Preferred Stock held by the Depositary to be redeemed and the applicable redemption price, as set forth in the Articles Supplementary, including the amount, if any, of accrued and unpaid dividends thereon to and including the date fixed for redemption. The Depositary shall mail, first-class postage prepaid, notice of the redemption of Preferred Stock and the proposed simultaneous redemption of the Depositary Shares representing the Preferred Stock to be redeemed, not less than 30 nor more than 60 days prior to the date fixed for redemption of such Preferred Stock and Depositary Shares (the "redemption date"), to the record holders of the Receipts evidencing the Depositary Shares to be so redeemed, at the addresses of such holders as the same appear on the records of the Depositary. No failure to give such notice or any defect thereto or in the mailing thereof shall affect the sufficiency of notice or validity of the proceedings for redemption except as to a holder to whom notice was defective or not given. A redemption notice which has been mailed in the manner provided herein shall be conclusively presumed to have been duly given on the date mailed whether or not the holder received the redemption notice. The Company shall provide the Depositary with such notice, and each such notice shall state: the redemption date; the redemption price and accrued and unpaid dividends payable on the redemption date; the number of shares of deposited Preferred Stock and Depositary Shares to be redeemed; if fewer than all the Depositary Shares held by any holder are to be redeemed, the number of such Depositary Shares held by such holder to be so redeemed; the place or places where Receipts evidencing the Depositary Shares to be redeemed are to be surrendered for payment of the redemption price and accrued and unpaid dividends payable on the redemption date; and that from and after the redemption date dividends in respect of the Preferred Stock represented by the Depositary Shares to be redeemed will cease to accrue. If fewer than all of the outstanding Depositary Shares are to be redeemed, the Depositary Shares to be redeemed shall be redeemed pro rata (as nearly as may be practicable without creating fractional Depositary Shares) or by any other equitable method determined by the Company that will not result in a violation of the Ownership Limit or the Existing Holder Limit.
During any period of time that both (i) Preferred Stock is not listed on the NYSE, AMEX or NASDAQ (or if the Preferred Stock is at any time held in the form of Depositary Shares, the Depositary Shares representing Preferred Stock are not listed on the NYSE, AMEX or NASDAQ), and (ii) the Company is not subject to the reporting requirements of the Exchange Act, but any shares of Series B Preferred Stock are outstanding, the Corporation will have the option to redeem the Series B Preferred Stock, in whole but not in part, within 90 days of the date upon which the shares of the Series B Preferred Stock (or the Depositary Shares) cease to be listed and we cease to be subject to such reporting requirements, for a redemption price of $2,500.00 per share, plus all dividends accrued and unpaid (whether or not declared), if any, to the date such shares are redeemed as provided in Section 5(c) of the Articles Supplementary, upon the giving of notice as provided in Section 5(h) of the Articles Supplementary.
In the event that notice of redemption has been made as described in this Section 2.03 and the Company shall then have paid or caused to be paid in full to the Depositary the redemption price (determined pursuant to the Articles Supplementary) of the Preferred Stock
 
deposited with the Depositary to be redeemed (including any accrued and unpaid dividends to and including the redemption date), the Depositary shall redeem the number of Depositary Shares representing such Preferred Stock so called for redemption by the Company and from and after the redemption date (unless the Company shall have failed to pay for the shares of Preferred Stock to be redeemed by it as set forth in the Company's notice provided for in the preceding paragraph), all dividends in respect of the shares of Preferred Stock called for redemption shall cease to accrue, the Depositary Shares called for redemption shall be deemed no longer to be outstanding and all rights of the holders of Receipts evidencing such Depositary Shares (except the right to receive the redemption price plus all accrued and unpaid dividends to and including the redemption date) shall, to the extent of such Depositary Shares, cease and terminate. Upon surrender in accordance with said notice of the Receipts evidencing such Depositary Shares (properly endorsed or assigned for transfer, if the Depositary or applicable law shall so require), such Depositary Shares shall be redeemed at a redemption price of $25.00 per Depositary Share plus all accrued and unpaid dividends to and including the redemption date. The foregoing shall be further subject to the terms and conditions of the Articles Supplementary. In the event of any conflict between the provisions of this Deposit Agreement and the provisions of the Articles Supplementary, the provisions of the Articles Supplementary will govern and the Company will instruct the Depositary accordingly.
Unless full cumulative dividends on all Preferred Stock shall have been or contemporaneously are declared and paid in cash or declared and a sum sufficient for the payment thereof in cash irrevocably set apart for payment for all past dividend periods and the then current dividend period, no Preferred Stock shall be redeemed unless all outstanding shares of Preferred Stock are simultaneously redeemed and the Company shall not purchase or otherwise acquire directly or indirectly any shares of Preferred Stock or any class or series of equity securities of the Company ranking, as to dividends or upon liquidation, on a parity with or junior to the Preferred Stock (except by exchange for shares of equity securities of the Company ranking, as to dividends and upon liquidation, junior to the Preferred Stock); , , that the foregoing shall not prevent the purchase of Preferred Stock by the Company in accordance with the terms of Section 5(a) or 5(e) of the Articles Supplementary or Article VI of the Articles of Incorporation or otherwise in order to ensure that the Company remains qualified as a REIT for United States federal income tax purposes or the purchase or acquisition of Preferred Stock pursuant to a purchase or exchange offer made on the same terms to holders of all outstanding shares of Preferred Stock.
provided
however
If fewer than all of the Depositary Shares evidenced by a Receipt are called for redemption, the Depositary will deliver to the holder of such Receipt upon its surrender to the Depositary, together with payment of the redemption price for and all other amounts payable in respect of the Depositary Shares called for redemption, a new Receipt evidencing such holder's Depositary Shares evidenced by such prior Receipt that are not called for redemption.
The Company acknowledges that the bank accounts maintained by the Depositary in connection with the performance of the services described herein will be in the name of the Depositary and that the Depositary may receive investment earnings in connection with the investment at the Depositary's risk and for its benefit of funds held in those accounts from time to time.
 
SECTION 2.04. . The Company hereby appoints the Depositary as the Registrar and Transfer Agent for the Receipts and the Depositary hereby accepts such appointment and, as such, shall register on its books from time to time transfers of Receipts upon any surrender thereof by the holder in person or by a duly authorized attorney, agent or representative, properly endorsed or accompanied by a properly executed instrument of transfer or endorsement and including a guarantee of the signature thereon by a participant in a signature guarantee medallion program approved by the Securities Transfer Association (a "Signature Guarantee"), together with evidence of the payment of any transfer taxes as may be required by applicable law. Upon such surrender, the Depositary shall execute a new Receipt or Receipts and deliver the same to or upon the order of the person entitled thereto evidencing the same aggregate number of Depositary Shares evidenced by the Receipt or Receipts surrendered.
Registration of Transfers of Receipts
SECTION 2.05. . Upon surrender of a Receipt or Receipts at the Corporate Office or such other office as the Depositary may designate for the purpose of effecting a split-up or combination of Receipts, subject to the terms and conditions of this Deposit Agreement, the Depositary shall execute and deliver a new Receipt or Receipts in the authorized denominations requested evidencing the same aggregate number of Depositary Shares evidenced by the Receipt or Receipts surrendered.
Combinations and Split-ups of Receipts
SECTION 2.06. . Any holder of a Receipt or Receipts may withdraw any or all of the deposited Preferred Stock represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipt or Receipts and all money and other property, if any, represented by such Depositary Shares by surrendering such Receipt or Receipts at the Corporate Office or at such other office as the Depositary may designate for such withdrawals. After such surrender, without unreasonable delay, the Depositary shall deliver to such holder, or to the person or persons designated by such holder as hereinafter provided, the number of whole or fractional shares of such Preferred Stock and all such money and other property, if any, represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by the Receipt or Receipts so surrendered for withdrawal, but holders of such whole or fractional shares of Preferred Stock will not thereafter be entitled to deposit such Preferred Stock hereunder or to receive Depositary Shares therefor. If the Receipt or Receipts delivered by the holder to the Depositary in connection with such withdrawal shall evidence a number of Depositary Shares in excess of the number of Depositary Shares representing the number of whole or fractional shares of deposited Preferred Stock to be withdrawn, the Depositary shall at the same time, in addition to such number of whole or fractional shares of Preferred Stock and such money and other property, if any, to be withdrawn, deliver to such holder, or (subject to Section 2.04) upon his order, a new Receipt or Receipts evidencing such excess number of Depositary Shares. Delivery of such Preferred Stock and such money and other property being withdrawn may be made by the delivery of such certificates, documents of title and other instruments as the Depositary may deem appropriate, which, if required by the Depositary, shall be properly endorsed or accompanied by a properly executed instrument of transfer or endorsement.
Surrender of Receipts and Withdrawal of Preferred Stock
If the deposited Preferred Stock and the money and other property being withdrawn are to be delivered to a person or persons other than the record holder of the Receipt or Receipts being surrendered for withdrawal of Preferred Stock, such holder shall execute and deliver to the Depositary a written order so directing the Depositary and the Depositary may require that the
 
Receipt or Receipts surrendered by such holder for withdrawal of such shares of Preferred Stock be properly endorsed in blank or accompanied by a properly executed instrument of transfer or endorsement in blank with a Signature Guarantee.
The Depositary shall deliver the deposited Preferred Stock and the money and other property, if any, represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by Receipts surrendered for withdrawal at the Corporate Office, except that, at the request, risk and expense of the holder surrendering such Receipt or Receipts and for the account of the holder thereof, such delivery may be made at such other place as may be designated by such holder.
SECTION 2.07. . As a condition precedent to the execution and delivery, transfer, split-up, combination, surrender or exchange of any Receipt, the Depositary, any of the Depositary's Agents or the Company may require any or all of the following: (i) payment to it of a sum sufficient for the payment (or, in the event that the Depositary or the Company shall have made such payment, the reimbursement to it) of any tax or other governmental charge with respect thereto (including any such tax or charge with respect to the Preferred Stock being deposited or withdrawn); (ii) the production of proof satisfactory to it as to the identity and genuineness of any signature (or the authority of any signature), including a Signature Guarantee; and (iii) compliance with such regulations, if any, as the Depositary or the Company may establish consistent with the provisions of this Deposit Agreement as may be required by any securities exchange upon which the deposited Preferred Stock, the Depositary Shares or the Receipts may be included for quotation or listed.
Limitations on Execution and Delivery, Transfer, Split-up, Combination
The deposit of Preferred Stock may be refused, the delivery of Receipts against Preferred Stock may be suspended, the transfer of Receipts may be refused, and the transfer, split-up, combination, surrender, exchange or redemption of outstanding Receipts may be suspended (i) during any period when the register of stockholders of the Company is closed or (ii) if any such action is deemed reasonably necessary or advisable by the Depositary, any of time Depositary's Agents or the Company at any time or from time to time because of any requirement of applicable law or of any government or governmental body or commission, or under any provision of this Deposit Agreement.
SECTION 2.08. . In case any Receipt shall be mutilated or destroyed or lost or stolen, the Depositary in its discretion may execute and deliver a Receipt of like form and tenor in exchange and substitution for such mutilated Receipt or in lieu of and in substitution for such destroyed, lost or stolen Receipt, provided that the holder thereof provides the Depositary with (i) evidence reasonably satisfactory to the Depositary of such destruction, loss or theft of such Receipt, of the authenticity thereof and of his ownership thereof and (ii) reasonable indemnification and the provision of an open penalty surety bond, in each case, satisfactory to the Depositary and the Company and holding the Depositary and the Company harmless.
Lost Receipts, etc
SECTION 2.09. . All Receipts surrendered to the Depositary or any Depositary's Agent shall be cancelled by the Depositary. Except as prohibited by applicable law or regulation, the Depositary is authorized to destroy such Receipts so cancelled.
Cancellation and Destruction of Surrendered Receipts
 
SECTION 3.01. . Any person presenting Preferred Stock for deposit or any holder of a Receipt may be required from time to time to file such proof of residence or other information and to execute such certificates as the Depositary or the Company may reasonably deem necessary or proper. The Depositary or the Company may withhold or delay the delivery of any Receipt, the transfer, redemption or exchange of any Receipt, the withdrawal of the deposited Preferred Stock represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by any Receipt, the distribution of any distribution or the sale of any rights or of the proceeds thereof, until such proof or other information is filed or such certificates are executed.
Filing Proofs, Certificates and Other Information
SECTION 3.02. . Holders of Receipts shall be obligated to make payments to the Depositary of certain fees and expenses, as provided in Section 5.09, or provide evidence reasonably satisfactory to the Depositary that such fees and expenses have been paid. Until such payment is made, transfer of any Receipt or any withdrawal of the Preferred Stock or money or other property, if any, represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipt may be refused, any distribution may be withheld, and any part or all of the Preferred Stock or other property represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipt may be sold for the account of the holder thereof (after attempting by reasonable means to notify such holder a reasonable number of days prior to such sale). Any distribution so withheld and the proceeds of any such sale may be applied to any payment of such fees or expenses, the holder of such Receipt remaining liable for any deficiency.
Payment of Fees and Expenses
SECTION 3.03. . In the case of the initial deposit of the Preferred Stock hereunder, the Company and, in the case of subsequent deposits thereof, each person so depositing Preferred Stock under this Deposit Agreement, shall be deemed thereby to represent and warrant that such Preferred Stock and each certificate therefor are valid and that the person making such deposit is duly authorized to do so. The Company hereby further represents and warrants that such Preferred Stock, when issued, will be validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable. Such representations and warranties shall survive the deposit of the Preferred Stock and the issuance of Receipts.
Representations and Warranties as to Preferred Stock
SECTION 3.04. . The Company hereby represents and warrants that the Receipts, when issued, will evidence legal and valid interests in the Depositary Shares and each Depositary Share will represent a legal and valid fractional interest in a share of deposited Preferred Stock represented by such Depositary Share. Such representation and warranty shall survive the deposit of the Preferred Stock and the issuance of Receipts evidencing the Depositary Shares.
Representation and Warranty as to Receipts and Depositary Shares
 
SECTION 4.01. . Whenever the Depositary shall receive any dividend or other cash distributions on the deposited Preferred Stock, including any cash received upon redemption of any shares of Preferred Stock pursuant to Section 2.03, the Depositary shall, subject to Section 3.02, distribute to record holders of Receipts on the record date fixed pursuant to Section 4.04 such amounts of such sum as are, as nearly as practicable, in proportion to the respective numbers of Depositary Shares evidenced by the Receipts held by such holders; provided, however, that, in case the Company or the Depositary shall be required by law to withhold and shall withhold from any cash distribution in respect of the Preferred Stock an amount on account of taxes or as otherwise required by law, regulation or court process, the amount made available for distribution or distributed in respect of Depositary Shares shall be reduced accordingly. The Depositary shall distribute or make available for distribution, as the case may be, only such amount, however, as can be distributed without attributing to any holder of Receipts a fraction of one cent, and any balance not so distributable shall be held by the Depositary (without liability for interest thereon) and shall be added to and be treated as part of the next sum received by the Depositary for distribution to record holders of Receipts then outstanding.
Dividends and Other Cash Distributions
SECTION 4.02. . Whenever the Depositary shall receive any distribution other than cash on the deposited Preferred Stock, the Depositary shall, subject to Section 3.02, distribute to record holders of Receipts on the record date fixed pursuant to Section 4.04 such amounts of the securities or property received by it as are, as nearly as practicable, in proportion to the respective numbers of Depositary Shares evidenced by the Receipts held by such holders, in any manner that the Depositary and the Company may deem equitable and practicable for accomplishing such distribution. If in the opinion of the Depositary after consultation with the Company, such distribution cannot be made proportionately among such record holders, or if for any other reason (including any requirement that the Company or the Depositary withhold an amount on account of taxes), the Depositary deems, after consultation with the Company, such distribution not to be feasible, the Depositary may, with the approval of the Company, adopt such method as it deems equitable and practicable for the purpose of effecting such distribution, including the sale (at public or private sale) of the securities or property thus received, or any part thereof at such place or places and upon such terms as it may deem proper. The net proceeds of any such sale shall, subject to Section 3.02, be distributed or made available for distribution, as the case may be, by the Depositary to record holders of Receipts as provided by Section 4.01 in the case of a distribution received in cash. The Company shall not make any distribution of such securities or property to the holders of Receipts unless the Company shall have provided to the Depositary an opinion of counsel stating that such securities or property have been registered under the Securities Act or do not need to be registered in order to be freely transferable.
Distributions Other Than Cash
SECTION 4.03. . If the Company shall at any time offer or cause to be offered to the persons in whose names deposited Preferred Stock is registered on the books of the Company any rights, preferences or privileges to subscribe for or
Subscription Rights, Preferences or Privileges
 
to purchase any securities or any rights, preferences or privileges of any other nature, the offering of such rights, preferences or privileges shall in each such instance be communicated to the Depositary and thereafter made available by the Depositary to the record holders of Receipts in such manner as the Company shall instruct (including by the issue to such record holders of warrants representing such rights, preferences or privileges); provided, however, that (a) if at the time of issue or offer of any such rights, preferences or privileges the Company determines upon advice of its legal counsel that it is not lawful or feasible to make such rights, preferences or privileges available to the holders of Receipts (by the issue of warrants or otherwise) or (b) if and to the extent instructed by holders of Receipts who do not desire to exercise such rights, preferences or privileges, the Depositary shall then, if so instructed by the Company, and if applicable laws or the terms of such rights, preferences or privileges so permit, sell such rights, preferences or privileges of such holders at public or private sale, at such place or places and upon such terms as it may deem proper. The net proceeds of any such sale shall, subject to Section 3.01 and Section 3.02, be distributed by the Depositary to the record holders of Receipts entitled thereto as provided by Section 4.01 in the case of a distribution received in cash. The Company shall not make any distribution of such rights, preferences or privileges, unless the Company shall have provided to the Depositary an opinion of counsel stating that such rights, preferences or privileges have been registered under the Securities Act or do not need to be registered in order to be freely transferable.
If registration under the Securities Act of the securities to which any rights, preferences or privileges relate is required in order for holders of Receipts to be offered or sold the securities to which such rights, preferences or privileges relate, the Company agrees that it will promptly file a registration statement pursuant to the Securities Act with respect to such rights, preferences or privileges and securities and use its reasonable best efforts and take all steps available to it to cause such registration statement to become effective sufficiently in advance of the expiration of such rights, preferences or privileges to enable such holders to exercise such rights, preferences or privileges. In no event shall the Depositary make available to the holders of Receipts any right, preference or privilege to subscribe for or to purchase any securities unless and until such a registration statement shall have become effective or unless the offering and sale of such securities to such holders are exempt from registration under the provisions of the Securities Act and the Company shall have provided to the Depositary an opinion of counsel to such effect.
If any other action under the law of any jurisdiction or any governmental or administrative authorization, consent or permit is required in order for such rights, preferences or privileges to be made available to holders of Receipts, the Company agrees to use its reasonable best efforts to take such action or obtain such authorization, consent or permit sufficiently in advance of the expiration of such rights, preferences or privileges to enable such holders to exercise such rights, preferences or privileges.
SECTION 4.04. . Whenever any dividend or other cash distributions shall become payable, any distribution other than cash shall be made, or any rights, preferences or privileges shall at any time be offered, with respect to the deposited Preferred Stock, or whenever the Depositary shall receive notice of (i) any meeting at which holders of such Preferred Stock are entitled to vote or of which holders of such Preferred Stock are entitled to notice or (ii) any election on the part of the Company to
Notice of Distributions; Fixing of Record Date for Holders of Receipts
 
redeem any shares of such Preferred Stock, the Depositary shall in each such instance fix a record date (which shall be the same date as the record date, if any, fixed by the Company with respect to the Preferred Stock) for the determination of the holders of Receipts (a) who shall be entitled to receive such dividend, distribution, rights, preferences or privileges or the net proceeds of the sale thereof, (b) who shall be entitled to give instructions for the exercise of voting rights at any such meeting or to receive notice of such meeting or (c) whose Depositary Shares are to be so redeemed.
SECTION 4.05. . Upon receipt of notice of any meeting at which the holders of deposited Preferred Stock are entitled to vote, the Depositary shall, as soon as practicable thereafter, mail to the record holders of Receipts a notice, which shall be provided by the Company and which shall contain (i) such information as is contained in such notice of meeting, (ii) a statement that the holders of Receipts at the close of business on a specified record date fixed pursuant to Section 4.04 will be entitled, subject to any applicable provision of law, to instruct the Depositary as to the exercise of the voting rights pertaining to the amount of Preferred Stock represented by their respective Depositary Shares and (iii) a brief statement as to the manner in which such instructions may be given. Upon the written request of a holder of a Receipt on such record date, the Depositary shall vote or cause to be voted the amount of Preferred Stock represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipt in accordance with the instructions set forth in such request. To the extent any such instructions request the voting of a fractional interest of a share of deposited Preferred Stock, the Depositary shall aggregate such interest with all other fractional interests resulting from requests with the same voting instructions and shall vote the number of whole votes resulting from such aggregation in accordance with the instructions received in such requests. Each share of Preferred Stock is entitled to one vote and, accordingly, each Depositary Share is entitled to 1/100
Voting Rights
th
of a vote. The Company hereby agrees to take all reasonable action that may be deemed necessary by the Depositary in order to enable the Depositary to vote such Preferred Stock or cause such Preferred Stock to be voted. In the absence of specific instructions from the holder of a Receipt, the Depositary will abstain from voting to the extent of the Preferred Stock represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipt. The Depositary shall not be required to exercise discretion in voting any Preferred Stock represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Receipt.
SECTION 4.06. . Upon any change in par or stated value, split-up, combination or any other reclassification of Preferred Stock, or upon any recapitalization, reorganization, merger, amalgamation or consolidation affecting the Company or to which it is a party or sale of all or substantially all of the Company's assets, the Depositary shall, upon the instructions of the Company, (i) make such adjustments in (a) the fraction of an interest represented by one Depositary Share in one share of Preferred Stock and (b) the ratio of the redemption price per Depositary Share to the redemption price of a share of Preferred Stock, in each case as may be required by or as is consistent with the provisions of the Articles Supplementary to fully reflect the effects of such change in liquidation preference, split-up, combination or other reclassification of stock, or of such recapitalization, reorganization, merger, amalgamation, consolidation or sale and (ii) treat any shares of stock or other securities or property (including cash) that shall be received by the Depositary in exchange for or upon conversion of or in respect
Changes Affecting Preferred Stock and Reclassifications, Recapitalizations, etc
 
of the Preferred Stock as new deposited property under this Deposit Agreement, and Receipts then outstanding shall thenceforth represent the proportionate interests of holders thereof in the new deposited property so received in exchange for or upon conversion of or in respect of such Preferred Stock. In any such case the Depositary may, in its discretion, with the approval of the Company, execute and deliver additional Receipts, or may call for the surrender of all outstanding Receipts to be exchanged for new Receipts specifically describing such new deposited property. Anything to the contrary herein notwithstanding, holders of Receipts shall have the right from and after the effective date of any such change in par or stated value, split-up, combination or other reclassification of the Preferred Stock or any such recapitalization, reorganization, merger, amalgamation or consolidation or sale of substantially all the assets of the Company to surrender such Receipts to the Depositary with instructions to convert, exchange or surrender the Preferred Stock represented thereby only into or for, as the case may be, the kind and amount of shares of stock and other securities and property and cash into which the deposited Preferred Stock evidenced by such Receipts might have been converted or for which such Preferred Stock might have been exchanged or surrendered immediately prior to the effective date of such transaction, subject to any subsequent change in par or stated value, split-up, combination or other reclassification or any subsequent recapitalization, reorganization, merger, amalgamation or consolidation or sale of substantially all the assets. The Company shall cause effective provision to be made in the charter of the resulting or surviving corporation (if other than the Company) for protection of such rights as may be applicable upon exchange of the deposited Preferred Stock for securities or property or cash of the surviving corporation in connection with the transactions set forth above. The Company shall cause any such surviving corporation (if other than the Company) expressly to assume the obligations of the Company hereunder.
SECTION 4.07. . The Depositary shall make available for inspection by holders of Receipts at the Corporate Office and at such other places as it may from time to time deem advisable during normal business hours any reports and communications received from the Company that are both received by the Depositary as the holder of deposited Preferred Stock and made generally available to the holders of the Preferred Stock. In addition, the Depositary shall transmit certain notices and reports to the holders of Receipts as provided in Section 5.05.
Inspection of Reports
SECTION 4.08. . Promptly upon request from time to time by the Company, the Depositary shall furnish to the Company a list, as of a recent date specified by the Company, of the names, addresses and holdings of Depositary Shares of all persons in whose names Receipts are registered on the books of the Depositary.
Lists of Receipt Holders
SECTION 4.09. . The Depositary shall be responsible for (i) preparing and mailing of IRS Forms 1099, 1042 and 1042-S for all open and closed accounts, (ii) all applicable withholding related to payments made with respect to the Receipts, including, without limitation, withholding required pursuant to Sections 1441, 1442, 1445 and 3406 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, (iii) mailing Form W-99, or W8-BEN, as appropriate, to new holders of Receipts without a certified taxpayer identification number or to non-US investors, (iv) processing certified Forms W-99 and W8-BEN, (v) preparing and filing of state information returns and (vi) providing escheatment services.
Tax and Regulatory Compliance
 
SECTION 4.10. . Notwithstanding any other provision of this Deposit Agreement to the contrary, in the event that the Depositary determines that any distribution in property is subject to any tax which the Depositary is obligated by applicable law to withhold, the Depositary may dispose of all or a portion of such property in such amounts and in such manner as the Depositary deems necessary and practicable to pay such taxes, by public or private sale, and the Depositary shall distribute the net proceeds of any such sale or the balance of any such property after deduction of such taxes to the holders of Receipts entitled thereto in proportion to the number of Depositary Shares held by them, respectively; provided, however, that in the event the Depositary determines that such distribution of property is subject to withholding tax only with respect to some but not all holders of Receipts, the Depositary will use its best efforts (i) to sell only that portion of such property distributable to such holders that is required to generate sufficient proceeds to pay such withholding tax and (ii) to effect any such sale in such a manner so as to avoid affecting the rights of any other holders of Receipts to receive such distribution in property.
Withholding
SECTION 5.01. . The Depositary shall maintain at the Corporate Office facilities for the execution and delivery, transfer, surrender and exchange, split-up, combination and redemption of Receipts and deposit and withdrawal of Preferred Stock and at the offices of the Depositary's Agents, if any, facilities for the delivery, transfer, surrender and exchange, split-up, combination and redemption of Receipts and deposit and withdrawal of Preferred Stock, all in accordance with the provisions of this Deposit Agreement.
Maintenance of Offices, Agencies and Transfer Books by the Depositary and the Registrar
The Depositary shall keep books at the Corporate Office for the registration and transfer of Receipts, which books at all reasonable times shall be open for inspection by the record holders of Receipts as provided by applicable law. The Depositary may close such books, at any time or from time to time, when deemed expedient by it in connection with the performance of its duties hereunder. The Depositary may maintain such books in customary electronic form.
If the Receipts or the Depositary Shares evidenced thereby or the Preferred Stock represented by such Depositary Shares shall be listed on the New York Stock Exchange, Inc. or any other stock exchange, or quoted on any interdealer quotation system, the Depositary may, with the approval of the Company, appoint a Registrar (acceptable to the Company) for registration of such Receipts or Depositary Shares in accordance with the requirements of such stock exchange or quotation system. Such Registrar (which may be the Depositary if so permitted by the requirements of such Exchange) may be removed and a substitute registrar appointed by the Depositary upon the request or with the approval of the Company. If the Receipts, such Depositary Shares or such Preferred Stock are listed on one or more other stock exchanges or quotation systems, the Depositary will, at the request and expense of the Company, arrange such facilities for the delivery, transfer, surrender, redemption and exchange of such Receipts, such Depositary Shares or such Preferred Stock as maybe required by applicable law or applicable stock exchange or quotation system regulations.
 
SECTION 5.02. . None of the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent, any Registrar or the Company shall incur any liability to any holder of any Receipt, if by reason of any provision of any present or future law or regulation thereunder of the United States of America or of any other governmental authority or, in the case of the Depositary, the Depositary's Agent or the Registrar, by reason of any provision, present or future, of the Articles of Incorporation or the Articles Supplementary or, in the case of the Company, the Depositary, the Depositary's Agent or the Registrar, by reason of any act of God or war or other circumstance beyond the control of the relevant party, the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent, the Registrar or the Company shall be prevented or forbidden from doing or performing any act or thing that the terms of this Deposit Agreement provide shall be done or performed; nor shall the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent, any Registrar or the Company incur any liability to any holder of a Receipt by reason of any nonperformance or delay, caused as aforesaid, in the performance of any act or thing that the terms of this Deposit Agreement provide shall or may be done or performed, or by reason of any exercise of, or failure to exercise, any discretion provided for in this Deposit Agreement.
Prevention or Delay in Performance by the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, the Registrar or the Company
SECTION 5.03. . Each of the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent and any Registrar shall at all times act in good faith and shall use its best efforts within reasonable time limits to insure the accuracy of all services performed pursuant to this Agreement. None of the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent, any Registrar or the Company assumes any obligation or shall be subject to any liability under this Deposit Agreement or any Receipt to holders of Receipts other than from acts or omissions arising out of conduct constituting bad faith, gross negligence or willful misconduct in the performance of such duties as are specifically set forth in this Deposit Agreement.
Obligations of the Depositary, the Depositary's Agents, the Registrar and the Company
None of the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent, any Registrar or the Company shall be under any obligation to appear in, prosecute or defend any action, suit or other proceeding with respect to the deposited Preferred Stock, Depositary Shares or Receipts that in its reasonable opinion may involve it in expense or liability, unless indemnity reasonably satisfactory to it against all expense and liability be furnished as often as may be required.
None of the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent, any Registrar or the Company shall be liable for any action or any failure to act by it in reliance upon the written advice of legal counsel or accountants, or information provided by any person presenting Preferred Stock for deposit, any holder of a Receipt or any other person believed by it in good faith to be competent to give such advice or information. The Depositary, any Depositary's Agent, any Registrar and the Company may each rely and shall each be protected in acting upon any written notice, request, direction or other document believed by it in good faith to be genuine and to have been signed or presented by the proper party or panics.
In the event the Depositary shall receive conflicting claims, requests or instructions from any holders of Receipts, on the one hand, and the Company, on the other hand, the Depositary shall be entitled to act on such claims, requests or instructions received from the Company, and shall be entitled to the full indemnification set forth in Section 5.06 hereof in connection with any action so taken.
 
The Depositary shall not be responsible for any failure to carry out any instruction to vote any of the deposited Preferred Stock or for the manner or effect of any such vote made, as long as any such action or non-action is in good faith and does not result from negligence or willful misconduct of the Depositary. The Depositary undertakes, and any Registrar shall be required to undertake, to perform such duties and only such duties as are specifically set forth in this Deposit Agreement, and no implied covenants or obligations shall be read into this Agreement against the Depositary or any Registrar.
The Depositary, its parent, affiliate, or subsidiaries, any Depositary's Agent, and any Registrar may own, buy, sell or deal in any class of securities of the Company and its affiliates and in Receipts or Depositary Shares or become pecuniarily interested in any transaction in which the Company or its affiliates may be interested or contract with or lend money to or otherwise act as fully or as freely as if it were not the Depositary or the Depositary's Agent hereunder. The Depositary may also act as transfer agent or registrar of any of the securities of the Company and its affiliates or act in any other capacity for the Company or its affiliates.
It is intended that neither the Depositary nor any Depositary's Agent shall be deemed to be an "issuer" of the securities under the federal securities laws or applicable state securities laws, it being expressly understood and agreed that the Depositary and any Depositary's Agent are acting only in a ministerial capacity as Depositary for the deposited Preferred Stock; provided, however, that the Depositary agrees to comply with all information reporting and withholding requirements applicable to it under law or this Deposit Agreement in its capacity as Depositary.
Neither the Depositary (or its officers, directors, employees or agents) nor any Depositary's Agent makes any representation or has any responsibility as to the validity of the registration statement pursuant to which the Depositary Shares are registered under the Securities Act, the deposited Preferred Stock, the Depositary Shares, the Receipts (except its countersignature thereon) or any instruments referred to therein or herein, or as to the correctness of any statement made therein or herein; provided, however, that the Depositary is responsible for its representations in this Deposit Agreement and for the validity of any action taken or required to be taken by the Depositary in connection with this Deposit Agreement.
The Company represents that it has registered the deposited Preferred Stock and the Depositary Shares for sale in accordance with applicable securities laws.
SECTION 5.04. . The Depositary may at any time resign as Depositary hereunder by delivering to the Company notice of its election to do so, such resignation to take effect upon the appointment of a successor depositary and its acceptance of such appointment as hereinafter provided.
Resignation and Removal of the Depositary; Appointment of Successor Depositary
 
The Depositary may at any time be removed by the Company by notice of such removal delivered to the Depositary, such removal to take effect upon the appointment of a successor depositary and its acceptance of such appointment as hereinafter provided.
In case at any time the Depositary acting hereunder shall resign or be removed, the Company shall, within 60 days after the delivery of the notice of resignation or removal, as the case may be, appoint a successor depositary, which shall be a bank or trust company having its principal office in the United States of America and having a combined capital and surplus of at least $50,000,000. If a successor depositary shall not have been appointed in 60 days, the resigning Depositary may petition a court of competent jurisdiction to appoint a successor depositary. Every successor depositary shall execute and deliver to its predecessor and to the Company an instrument in writing accepting its appointment hereunder, and thereupon such successor depositary, without any further act or deed, shall become fully vested with all the rights, powers, duties and obligations of its predecessor and for all purposes shall be the Depositary under this Deposit Agreement, and such predecessor, upon payment of all sums due it and on the written request of the Company, shall promptly execute and deliver an instrument transferring to such successor all rights and powers of such predecessor hereunder, shall duly assign, transfer and deliver all rights, title and interest in the deposited Preferred Stock and any moneys or property held hereunder to such successor and shall deliver to such successor a list of the record holders of all outstanding Receipts. Any successor depositary shall promptly mail notice of its appointment to the record holders of Receipts.
Any corporation into or with which the Depositary may be merged, consolidated or converted shall be the successor of such Depositary without the execution or filing of any document or any further act. Such successor depositary may execute the Receipts either in the name of the predecessor depositary or in the name of the successor depositary.
SECTION 5.05. . The Company agrees that it will deliver to the Depositary, and the Depositary will, promptly after receipt thereof transmit to the record holders of Receipts, in each case at the address recorded in the Depositary's books, copies of all notices and reports (including financial statements) required by law, by the rules of any national securities exchange or interdealer quotation system upon which the Preferred Stock, the Depositary Shares or the Receipts are listed or quoted or by the Articles of Incorporation and the Articles Supplementary to be furnished by the Company to holders of the deposited Preferred Stock and, if requested by the holder of any Receipt, a copy of this Deposit Agreement, the form of Receipt, the Articles Supplementary and the form of Preferred Stock. Such transmission will be at the Company's expense and the Company will provide the Depositary with such number of copies of such documents as the Depositary may reasonably request. In addition, the Depositary will transmit to the record holders of Receipts at the Company's expense such other documents as may be requested by the Company.
Notices, Reports and Documents
SECTION 5.06. . The Company agrees to indemnify the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent and any Registrar against, and hold each of them harmless from, any liability, costs and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees) that may arise out of, or in connection with, its acting as Depositary, Depositary's Agent or Registrar, respectively, under this Deposit Agreement and the Receipts, except for any liability arising out
Indemnification by the Company
 
of the willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith on the part of any such person or persons. The obligations of the Company set forth in this Section 5.06 shall survive any succession of any Depositary, Registrar or Depositary's Agent or termination of this Deposit Agreement.
SECTION 5.07. . The Depositary agrees to indemnify the Company against, and hold the Company harmless from, any liability, costs and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees) that may arise out of, or in connection with, the refusal or failure of any of the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent or the Registrar to comply with the terms of this Deposit Agreement, or which arise out of the willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith on the part of any such person or persons; provided, however, that the Depositary's aggregate liability hereunder with respect to, arising from, or arising in connection with this Deposit Agreement, or from all services provided or omitted to be provided under this Deposit Agreement, whether in contract, or in tort, or otherwise, is limited to, and shall not exceed, the amounts paid hereunder by the Company to the Depositary as fees and charges under this Agreement or otherwise, but not including reimbursable expenses, during the six (6) calendar months immediately preceding the event for which recovery from the Depositary is being sought. The obligations of the Depositary set forth in this Section 5.07 shall survive any succession of the Company or termination of this Deposit Agreement.
Indemnification by the Depositary
SECTION 5.08. . The Depositary shall not be liable for any incidental, indirect, special or consequential damages of any nature whatsoever, including, but not limited to, loss of anticipated profits (collectively, "Special Damages"), occasioned by breach of any provision of this Agreement by the Depositary even if apprised of the possibility of such damages. The Company shall not be liable to the Depositary for Special Damages occasioned by breach of any provision of this Agreement by the Company even if apprised of the possibility of such damages.
Damages
SECTION 5.09. . No charges and expenses of the Depositary or any Depositary's Agent hereunder shall be payable by any person, except as provided in this Section 5.09. The Company shall pay all transfer and other taxes and governmental charges arising solely from the existence of this Deposit Agreement. The Company shall also pay all fees and expenses of the Depositary in connection with the initial deposit of the Preferred Stock and the initial issuance of the Depositary Shares evidenced by the Receipts, any redemption of the Preferred Stock at the option of the Company and all withdrawals of the Preferred Stock by holders of Receipts. If a holder of Receipts requests the Depositary to perform duties not required under this Deposit Agreement, the Depositary shall notify the holder of the cost of the performance of such duties prior to the performance thereof. Upon approval of such cost by such holder, such holder will thereafter be liable for the charges and expenses related to such performance. All other fees and expenses of the Depositary and any Depositary's Agent hereunder and of any Registrar (including, in each case, fees and expenses of counsel) incident to the performance of their respective obligations hereunder will be promptly paid by the Company pursuant to such terms as the Company and the Depositary shall agree in good faith. The Depositary shall present its statement for fees and expenses to the Company every month or at such other intervals as the Company and the Depositary may agree.
Fees, Charges and Expenses
 
SECTION 6.01. . The form of the Receipts and any provision of this Deposit Agreement may at any time and from time to time be amended by agreement between the Company and the Depositary in any respect that they may deem necessary or desirable; provided, however, that no such amendment (other than any change in the fees of any Depositary, Registrar or Transfer Agent that are payable by the Company) which (i) shall materially and adversely alter the rights of the holders of Receipts or (ii) would be materially and adversely inconsistent with the rights granted to the holders of the Preferred Stock pursuant to the Articles Supplementary shall be effective unless such amendment shall have been approved by the holders of Receipts evidencing at least 66-2/3% of the Depositary Shares then outstanding. In no event shall any amendment impair the right, subject to the provisions of Section 2.06 and Section 2.07 and Article III, of any holder of any Depositary Shares to surrender the Receipt evidencing such Depositary Shares with instructions to the Depositary to deliver to the holder the deposited Preferred Stock and all money and other property if any, represented thereby, except in order to comply with mandatory provisions of applicable law. Every holder of an outstanding Receipt at the time any such amendment becomes effective shall be deemed, by continuing to hold such Receipt, to consent and agree to such amendment and to be bound by this Deposit Agreement as amended thereby.
Amendment
SECTION 6.02. . This Deposit Agreement may be terminated by the Company upon not less than 30 days' prior written notice to the Depositary if (i) such termination is necessary to preserve the Company's status as a real estate investment trust under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (or any successor provision), or (ii) the holders of Receipts evidencing at least a majority of the Depositary Shares then outstanding consent to such termination, whereupon the Depositary shall deliver or make available to each holder of a Receipt, upon surrender of the Receipt held by such holder, such number of whole or fractional shares of deposited Preferred Stock as are represented by the Depositary Shares evidenced by such Depositary Receipt, together with any other property held by the Depositary in respect of such Receipt. In the event that this Deposit Agreement is terminated pursuant to clause (i) of the immediately preceding sentence, the Company hereby agrees to use its reasonable best efforts to list or quote the Preferred Stock issued upon surrender of the Receipt evidencing the Depositary Shares represented thereby on a national securities exchange or interdealer quotation system. This Deposit Agreement will automatically terminate if (i) all outstanding Depositary Shares shall have been redeemed pursuant to Section 2.03 or (ii) there shall have been made a final distribution in respect of the deposited Preferred Stock in connection with any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Company and such distribution shall have been distributed to the holders of Receipts entitled thereto.
Termination
Upon the termination of this Deposit Agreement, (i) the Company shall be discharged from all obligations under this Deposit Agreement except for its obligations to the Depositary, any Depositary's Agent and any Registrar under Section 5.06 and Section 5.09 and (ii) the Depositary shall be discharged from all obligations under this Deposit Agreement except for its obligations to the Company under Section 5.07.
 
SECTION 7.01. . This Deposit Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, and by each of the parties hereto on separate counterparts, each of which counterparts, when so executed and delivered, shall be deemed an original, but all such counterparts taken together shall constitute one and the same instrument. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page to this Deposit Agreement by telecopier shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Deposit Agreement. Copies of this Deposit Agreement shall be filed with the Depositary and the Depositary's Agents and shall be open to inspection during business hours at the Corporate Office and the respective offices of time Depositary's Agents, if any, by any holder of a Receipt.
Counterparts
SECTION 7.02. . This Deposit Agreement is for the exclusive benefit of the parties hereto, and their respective successors hereunder, and shall not be deemed to give any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim to any other person whatsoever.
Exclusive Benefits of Parties
SECTION 7.03. . In case any one or more of the provisions contained in this Deposit Agreement or in the Receipts should be or become invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein or therein shall in no way be affected, prejudiced or disturbed thereby.
Invalidity of Provisions
SECTION 7.04. . Any and all notices to be given to the Company hereunder or under the Receipts shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if personally delivered or sent by mail, or by telegram or facsimile transmission confirmed by letter, addressed to the Company at:
Notices
Saul Centers, Inc.
7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500
Bethesda, Maryland 20814
Attention: Corporate Secretary
Telephone No.: (301) 986-6200
or at any other address of which the Company shall have notified the Depositary in writing.
Any notices to be given to the Depositary hereunder or under the Receipts shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if personally delivered or suit by mail, or by telegram or telex or telecopier confirmed by letter, addressed to the Depositary at the Corporate Office to the attention of the General Counsel.
Any notices given to any record holder of a Receipt hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if personally delivered or sent by mail, or by telegram or telex or telecopier confirmed by letter, addressed to such record holder at the address of such record holder as it appears on the books of the Depositary or, if such holder shall have filed with the Depositary in a timely manner a written request that notices intended for such holder be mailed to some other address, at the address designated in such request.
 
Delivery of a notice sent by mail, or by telegram or telex or telecopier shall be deemed to be effected at the time when a duly addressed letter containing the same (or a confirmation thereof in the case of a telegram or telex or telecopier message) is deposited, postage prepaid, in a post office letter box. The Depositary or the Company may, however, act upon any telegram or telex or telecopier message received by it from the other or from any holder of a Receipt, notwithstanding that such telegram or telex or telecopier message shall not subsequently be confirmed by letter as aforesaid.
SECTION 7.05. . The Depositary may from time to time appoint Depositary's Agents to act in any respect for the Depositary for the purposes of this Deposit Agreement and may at any time appoint additional Depositary's Agents and vary or terminate the appointment of such Depositary's Agents. The Depositary will notify the Company of any such action.
Depositary's Agents
SECTION 7.06. . The holders of Receipts from time to time shall be deemed to be parties to this Deposit Agreement and shall be bound by all of the terms and conditions hereof and of the Receipts by acceptance of delivery thereof.
Holders of Receipts Are Parties
SECTION 7.07. . This Deposit Agreement and the Receipts and all rights hereunder and thereunder and provisions hereof and thereof shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the law of the State of Maryland applicable to agreements made and to be performed in said State.
Governing Law
SECTION 7.08. . Copies of this Deposit Agreement and the Articles Supplementary shall be filed with the Depositary and the Depositary's Agents and shall be open to inspection during business hours at the Corporate Office and the respective offices of the Depositary's Agents, if any, by any holder of any Receipt.
Inspection of Deposit Agreement and Articles Supplementary
SECTION 7.09. . The headings of articles and sections in this Deposit Agreement and in the form of the Receipt set forth in Exhibit A hereto have been inserted for convenience only and are not to be regarded as a part of this Deposit Agreement or to have any bearing upon the meaning or interpretation of any provision contained herein or in the Receipts.
Headings
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Saul Centers, Inc. and Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company have caused this Deposit Agreement to be duly executed on their behalf as of the date set forth above and all holders of Receipts shall become parties hereto by and upon acceptance by them of delivery of Receipts issued in accordance with the terms hereof.
 
 
 
DEPOSITARY SHARES
THIS CERTIFICATE IS TRANSFERABLE
IN NEW YORK, NY
SEE REVERSE FOR CERTAIN DEFINITIONS
CUSIP 804395 40 8
Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company , as Depositary (the "Depositary"), hereby certifies that is the registered owner of Depositary Shares ("Depositary Shares"), each Depositary Share representing
            
            
 1
/
100
th
of one share of 9% Series B Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock (the "Stock"), of Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the "Corporation"), on deposit with the Depositary, subject to the terms and entitled to the benefits of the Deposit Agreement, dated as of March 27, 2008 (the "Deposit Agreement"), among the Corporation, the Depositary and all holders from time to time of Depositary Receipts. By accepting this Depositary Receipt, the holder hereof becomes a party to and agrees to be bound by all the terms and conditions of the Deposit Agreement. This Depositary Receipt shall not be valid or obligatory for any purpose or be entitled to any benefits under the Deposit Agreement unless it shall have been executed by the Depositary by the manual and or facsimile signature of a duly authorized officer.
 
The Corporation is authorized to issue Common Stock and one or more series of Preferred Stock. The Corporation will furnish without charge to each receipt holder, who so requests in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation at its principal office or to the transfer agent, a copy of the Deposit Agreement. Any such request shall be made to the Corporation at the principal office of the Corporation at 7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500, Bethesda, Maryland 20814, Attention: Secretary.
Dated:
 
 
The securities represented by this certificate are subject to restrictions on transfer for the purpose of maintenance of the Corporation's status as a real estate investment trust ("REIT") under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code"). Except as otherwise provided pursuant to the Charter of the Corporation, no Person may (i) Beneficially or Constructively Own shares of Equity Stock in excess of 2.5 percent (or such greater percentage as may be determined by the Board of Directors of the Corporation) of the Value of the outstanding shares of Equity Stock of the Corporation (except in such circumstances as the Existing Holder Limit shall apply) or (ii) Beneficially Own Equity Stock which would result in the Corporation being "closely held" under Section 856(h) of the Code or otherwise would cause the Corporation to fail to qualify as a REIT. Any Person who attempts or proposes to Beneficially or Constructively Own shares of Equity Stock in excess of the above limitations must notify the Corporation in writing at least fifteen (15) days prior to the proposed or attempted transfer. If the transfer restrictions referred to herein are violated, the shares of Equity Stock represented hereby automatically will be held in trust by the Corporation, all as provided in the Charter of the Corporation. All capitalized terms in this legend have the meanings identified in the Corporation's Charter, as the same may be amended or restated from time to time, a copy of which, including the restrictions on transfer, will be sent without charge to each stockholder who so requests.
The Corporation will furnish to any stockholder upon request and without charge a full statement of the information required by Section 2-211(b) of the Maryland General Corporation Law with respect to the designations and any preferences, conversion and other rights, voting powers, restrictions, limitations as to distributions, qualifications and terms and conditions of redemption of the stock of each class which the Corporation has authority to issue and, if the Corporation is authorized to issue any preferred or special class in series or classes, (i) the difference in the relative rights and preferences between the shares of each series and class to the extent set, and (ii) the authority of the Board of Directors to set such rights and preferences of subsequent series and classes. The foregoing summary does not purport to be complete and is subject to and qualified in its entirety by reference to the Charter of the Corporation, a copy of which will be sent without charge to each stockholder who so requests. Such request must be made to the Secretary of the Corporation at its principal office.
The following abbreviations, when used in the inscription on the face of this Depositary Receipt shall be construed as though they were written out in full according to applicable laws or regulations:
TEN COM as tenants in common
TEN ENT as tenants by the entireties
JT TEN as joint tenants with right of survivorship and not as tenants in common
 
 
Additional abbreviations may also be used though not in the above list.
For Value Received, hereby sell, assign and transfer unto
                        
 
 
 
 
PLEASE INSERT SOCIAL SECURITY OR OTHER
IDENTIFYING NUMBER OF ASSIGNEE
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
NOTICE: THE SIGNATURE FOR THIS ASSIGNMENT MUST CORRESPOND WITH THE NAME AS WRITTEN UPON THE FACE OF THIS DEPOSITARY RECEIPT IN EVERY PARTICULAR, WITHOUT ALTERNATION OR ENLARGEMENT OR ANY CHANGE WHATEVER.
 
Signature(s) Guaranteed:
 
THE SIGNATURE(S) SHOULD BE GUARANTEED BY AN ELIGIBLE GUARANTOR INSTITUTION (BANKS, STOCKBROKERS, SAVINGS AND LOAN ASSOCIATIONS AND CREDIT UNIONS WITH MEMBERSHIP IN AN APPROVED SIGNATURE GUARANTEE MEDALLION PROGRAM), PURSUANT TO S.E.C. RULE 17Ad-15.
 
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
Saul Centers, Inc.
7501 Wisconsin Avenue
Suite 1500
Bethesda, Maryland
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We have acted as counsel to Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the "Company"), in connection with the registration statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-149463) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") under the Securities Act of 1933 (the "Act"), on February 29, 2007, as amended on March 7, 2008 (the "Registration Statement"). Pursuant to the Registration Statement, the Company proposes to issue and sell up to 3,450,000 depositary shares (the "Depositary Shares"), each representing 1/100
th
fractional interest in a share of 9% Series B Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock, par value $.01 (the "Preferred Stock"), in accordance with the terms set forth in the prospectus supplement dated March 20, 2008 (the "Prospectus Supplement") to the prospectus filed as part of the Registration Statement.
For purposes of giving the opinions hereinafter set forth, our examination of documents has been limited to examination of copies of the following (each, a "Document," and collectively, the "Documents"):
 
 
Saul Centers, Inc.
March 20, 2008
Page 2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Based upon the foregoing and subject to the assumptions, qualifications, limitations, and exceptions set forth below, we are of the opinion that:
1. The Preferred Stock, when issued and delivered by the Company in accordance with the terms of the Underwriting Agreement and the Deposit Agreement, upon receipt of consideration for the Depositary Shares in accordance with the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable.
2. When the depositary receipts have been duly executed and delivered by the Company and countersigned by the Depositary against a deposit of the Preferred Stock represented by the depositary receipts in accordance with the Deposit Agreement and delivered to and paid for by the purchasers of the depositary receipts in the manner contemplated by, and in accordance with, the Registration Statement and the Underwriting Agreement, the depositary receipts will entitle the holders thereof to the benefits provided therein and in the Deposit Agreement.
Saul Centers, Inc.
March 20, 2008
Page 3
 
For purposes of this opinion letter, we have not reviewed any documents other than the Documents. In particular, we have not reviewed any document (other than the Documents) that is referred to in or incorporated by reference into any Document reviewed by us. We have assumed that there exists no provision in any document that we have not reviewed that is inconsistent with the opinions stated herein.
In connection with this opinion letter, we have considered such matters of law and fact as we, in our professional judgment, have deemed necessary or appropriate to render the opinions contained herein. In rendering this opinion letter, we have assumed without independent investigation: (i) that each entity (other than the Company) that is a party to any Document is, and has been at all times relevant to this opinion letter, duly formed or organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction in which each is formed or organized; (ii) the due authorization, execution and delivery of each Document by each of the parties thereto (other than the Company); (iii) the completeness of all Documents; (iv) the genuineness of all signatures; (v) the legal capacity of all individuals who have executed any of the Documents; (vi) the authenticity of all Documents submitted to us as originals; (vii) the conformity to the original documents of all Documents submitted to us as certified, photostatic, reproduced, facsimile or conformed copies of valid existing agreements; (viii) the authenticity of all such latter Documents; and (ix) that the statements regarding matters of fact in any of the Documents that we have examined are accurate and complete. We have further assumed that there are no oral or written modifications or amendments to any of the Documents, and that the executed versions of the Documents are identical to any unexecuted forms or versions that we may have reviewed.
Our opinions expressed above are limited in all respects and for all purposes to the laws of the State of Maryland (excluding the securities laws and blue sky laws of the State of Maryland), and we express no opinion on the laws of any other jurisdiction, including federal laws and rules and regulations relating thereto. Our opinions are rendered only with respect to Maryland laws and rules, regulations and orders thereunder that are currently in effect. In rendering the opinions set forth herein, we express no opinion concerning (i) the creation, attachment, perfection or priority of any security interest, lien or other encumbrance, or (ii) the nature or validity of title to any property. The opinions set forth in this letter are limited to the matters and the transaction expressly addressed herein and no opinion is to be implied or may be inferred beyond the opinions expressly stated in this letter.
We express no opinion as to the enforceability of any provisions contained in the Underwriting Agreement or Deposit Agreement that constitute waivers that are prohibited by law prior to default.
Saul Centers, Inc.
March 20, 2008
Page 4
 
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and to the use of our name in the Prospectus Supplement under the caption "Legal Matters." The giving of this consent, however, does not constitute an admission that we are "experts" within the meaning of Section 11 of the Act, or within the category of persons whose consent is required by Section 7 of the Act.
 

Exhibit 8.1
 
Saul Centers, Inc.
7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500
Bethesda, Maryland 20814
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") has filed a registration statement on Form S-3, as amended (File No. 333-149463) (the "Registration Statement," which term includes the prospectus and all documents incorporated and deemed to be incorporated by reference therein) with the Securities and Exchange Commission, which was declared effective on March 10, 2008. In connection with the filing of a prospectus supplement (the "Prospectus Supplement") dated March 20, 2008, you have asked us to render an opinion with respect to the qualification of the Company as a real estate investment trust ("REIT") under sections 856 through 860 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code").
In rendering the following opinions, we have examined such statutes, regulations, records, certificates and other documents as we have considered necessary or appropriate as a basis for such opinions, including the following: (1) the Registration Statement, (2) the Prospectus Supplement, (3) the Articles of Incorporation of the Company, as amended, restated or supplemented (the "Articles of Incorporation"), (4) certain written representations of the Company contained in a letter to us dated as of the date hereof, (5) representative copies of the leases entered into by the Company as of the date hereof, and (6) such other documents or information as we have deemed necessary to render the opinions set forth in this letter.
In our review, we have assumed, with your consent, that the documents listed above that we reviewed in proposed form will be executed in substantially the same form, all of the representations and statements set forth in such documents as to factual matters (but not legal conclusions) are true, correct and complete, and that all representations that speak in the future, or to the intention, or to the best of belief and knowledge of any person(s) or party(ies) are and will be true, correct and complete as if made without such qualification. Nothing has come to our attention which would cause us to believe that any of such representations are untrue, incorrect or incomplete. We have also assumed that all of the obligations imposed by any such documents on the parties thereto, including obligations imposed under the Articles of Incorporation have been or will be performed or satisfied in accordance with their terms. Further, we have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the proper execution of all documents, the authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals, the conformity to originals of documents submitted to us as copies, and the authenticity of the originals from which any copies were made.
Saul Centers, Inc.
March 27, 2008
Page 2
 
Unless facts material to the opinions expressed herein are specifically stated to have been independently established or verified by us, we have relied as to such facts solely upon the representations made by the Company. To the extent that the representations of the Company are with respect to matters set forth in the Code or the regulations promulgated thereunder (the "Treasury Regulations"), we have reviewed with the individuals making such representations the relevant provisions of the Code, the applicable Treasury Regulations and published administrative interpretations thereof.
Based upon and subject to the foregoing and to the qualifications below, we are of the opinion that:
1. The Company was a REIT under the Code for each of its taxable years ending through December 31, 2007.
2. The Company is organized in conformity with the requirements for qualification and taxation as a REIT under the Code, and its current method of operation and ownership will enable it to meet the requirements for qualification and taxation as a REIT for the current taxable year and for future taxable years.
3. The statements in the prospectus set forth under the caption "Federal Income Tax Considerations," and in the Prospectus Supplement set forth under the caption "Additional Federal Income Tax Considerations," to the extent that they discuss matters of law or legal conclusions or purport to describe or summarize certain provisions of the agreements, statutes or regulations referred to therein, are accurate descriptions or summaries in all material respects, and the discussion thereunder expresses the opinion of Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP insofar as it relates to matters of United States federal income tax law and legal conclusions with regard to those matters.
The opinions set forth in this letter are based on existing law as contained in the Code, Treasury Regulations (including any Temporary and Proposed Regulations), and interpretations of the foregoing by the Internal Revenue Service ("IRS") and by the courts in effect (or, in case of certain Proposed Regulations, proposed) as of the date hereof, all of which are subject to change, both retroactively or prospectively, and to possibly different interpretations. Moreover, the Company's ability to achieve and maintain qualification as a REIT depends upon its ability to achieve and maintain certain diversity of stock ownership requirements and, through actual annual operating results, certain requirements under the Code regarding its income, assets and distribution levels. No assurance can be given as to whether, for any given taxable year, the actual ownership of the Company's stock and its actual operating results and distributions satisfy the tests necessary to achieve and maintain its status as a REIT. We assume no obligation to update the opinions set forth in this letter. We believe that the conclusions expressed herein, if challenged by the IRS, would be sustained in court. Because our positions are not binding upon the IRS or the courts, however, there can be no assurance that contrary positions may not be successfully asserted by the IRS.
Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP
Saul Centers, Inc.
March 27, 2008
Page 3
 
The foregoing opinions are limited to the specific matters covered thereby and should not be interpreted to imply the undersigned has offered its opinion on any other matter.
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to the Registration Statement. The giving of this consent, however, does not constitute an admission that we are "experts" within the meaning of Section 11 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Act"), or within the category of persons whose consent is required by Section 7 of the Act.
 
Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20080423172243.txt.gz
TIME:20080423172243
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 23, 2008, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2008. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: April 23, 2008
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
April 23, 2008, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended March 31, 2008. Total revenue for the three months ended March 31, 2008 ("2008 Quarter") increased 5.6% to $38,722,000 compared to $36,684,000 for the three months ended March 31, 2007 ("2007 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before gain on property disposition, minority interests and preferred stock dividends, increased 0.6% to $11,073,000 for the 2008 Quarter compared to $11,009,000 for the 2007 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $7,033,000 or $0.39 per diluted share for the 2008 Quarter, compared to net income available to common stockholders of $6,874,000 or $0.39 per diluted share for the 2007 Quarter.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 4.2% for the 2008 Quarter compared to the 2007 Quarter and same property operating income increased 3.2%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 4.5% for the 2008 Quarter compared to the 2007 Quarter. The stabilization of Lansdowne Town Center produced approximately 65% of the quarter over quarter growth. Rental rate growth at several core properties produced the remainder of the shopping center operating income increase. Same property operating income in the office portfolio remained relatively stable, decreasing 0.6% for the 2008 Quarter.
 
 
As of March 31, 2008, 95.4% of the operating portfolio was leased compared to 95.9% for March 31, 2007. On a same property basis, 95.3% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 95.9%. The 2008 leasing percentages decreased due to a net decrease of approximately 45,000 square feet of leased space. The majority of the leasing decrease, approximately 20,000 square feet, occurred in the office portfolio at Avenel Business Park where the percentage leased decreased from 99.1% in 2007 to 94.2% in 2008. There was also an 18,000 square foot decrease at South Dekalb Plaza in Atlanta, Georgia.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 3.0% to $15,919,000 in the 2008 Quarter compared to $15,457,000 for the 2007 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 1.5% to $0.68 per share for the 2008 Quarter compared to $0.67 per share for the 2007 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains from property dispositions. FFO increased in the 2008 Quarter primarily due to increased net rental income from the lease-up of Lansdowne Town Center and to a lesser extent, rental rate growth at other core properties, partially offset by an increase in general and administrative expense.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 51 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 8.2 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20080430124404.txt.gz
TIME:20080430124404
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
At the annual meeting of stockholders of Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") held on April 25, 2008, the stockholders of the Company approved amendments to the Company's 2004 Stock Plan. The amendments approved by stockholders are as follows:
 
 
 
 
Upon the unanimous recommendation of the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee of the Board of Directors, at a meeting held on April 25, 2008, the Board of Directors appointed Mark Sullivan III a director of the Company effective April 26, 2008. Mr. Sullivan will stand for re-election at the Company's 2009 annual meeting of stockholders.
Mr. Sullivan served as U.S. Executive Director of the European Bank for Reconstruction and Development from 2002 until April 2008. Previously, he practiced as an attorney representing financial service providers from 2000 to 2002. He served as president from 1996 to 1999 of the Small Business Funding Corporation. Prior to that, he was an attorney advising senior management of financial institutions on legal and policy matters from 1989 to 1996. Mr. Sullivan served on the Company's Board of Directors from 1997 to 2002.
The Board of Directors has determined that Mr. Sullivan is an "independent director" as defined in the New York Stock Exchange listing standards and the Company's First Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation, as amended.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: April 29, 2008


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20080520105310.txt.gz
TIME:20080520105310
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 14, 2008, Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, the operating partnership for Saul Centers, Inc., entered into a new $157,500,000 construction loan facility (the "Facility"), with a syndicate of lenders led by U.S. Bank National Association. The Facility is to be used to finance construction of Clarendon Center, a mixed use development including up to approximately 42,300 square feet of retail space, 170,400 square feet of office space and 244 residential units located adjacent to the Clarendon Metro Station in Arlington, Virginia. The Facility is secured by the property and improvements thereon. Saul Centers, Inc. has guaranteed the payment obligations of Saul Holdings Limited Partnership under the Facility, with the maximum principal amount guaranteed to be reduced in the event the Company meets certain conditions relating to pre-leasing, completion of the project, and net operating income from the project. For purposes of this Form 8-K, all references to the "Company" refer, collectively, to Saul Centers, Inc., together with Saul Holdings Limited Partnership and the wholly owned subsidiaries of Saul Holdings Limited Partnership.
The Facility matures on November 14, 2011, which term may be extended by the Company for two additional periods of 9 months each, subject to the Company's satisfaction of certain conditions.
Interest on amounts borrowed under the Facility accrues at a rate of LIBOR plus a spread of 2.50%, which spread may be reduced to 2.35% upon completion of the project and 2.20% upon compliance with certain tests relating to the property's generation of net operating income.
The Facility requires the Company and its subsidiaries to satisfy customary covenants relating to approval by the U.S. Bank National Association, as Agent, of significant construction agreements and significant changes in plans or construction costs. The Company must also provide documentation of construction costs, budgets and leasing information to the Agent. In addition, the Facility requires the Company and its subsidiaries to satisfy certain financial covenants contained in its revolving credit facility, any default under which revolving credit facility covenants would also be a default under the Facility.
Each of U.S. Bank National Association, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, HSBC Realty Credit Corporation (USA), Compass Bank and Raymond James Bank, FSB, is a lender under the Facility. Some of the lenders or their affiliates from time to time have provided in the past and may provide in the future commercial lending services to the Company and its affiliates in the ordinary course of business.
 
On May 14, 2008, Saul Holdings Limited Partnership entered into the Facility, the terms of which are described in Item 1.01 above.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: May 19, 2008
 

Exhibit 10. (a)
 
 
(this "") is made and entered into as of the 14th day of May, 2008, by and among (i) , a Maryland limited partnership (""), (ii) , a national banking association, as agent (""), and (iii) , a national banking association, as lender, and any other lenders who are now or who may hereafter become parties to this Agreement (collectively, the "").
THIS CONSTRUCTION LOAN AGREEMENT
Agreement
SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
Borrower
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
Agent
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
Lenders
, in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements hereinafter set forth, the parties hereto agree as follows:
WITNESSETH THAT
For the purposes of this Agreement, the following terms shall have the following respective meanings, unless the context hereof clearly requires otherwise:
: Any portion of the Loan advanced to or for the benefit of Borrower in accordance with the terms hereof.
Advance
: The date on which an Advance requested by Borrower hereunder is to be made.
Advance Date
: Any parent of Borrower, subsidiary of Borrower or entity controlled by or under common control with Borrower.
Affiliate
: U. S. Bank National Association, its successors and assigns as agent for the Lenders.
Agent
: This Construction Loan Agreement, including any amendments hereof and supplements hereto executed by Borrower and Agent.
Agreement
: That certain Certificate of Architect regarding the Property from the Project Architect.
Architect's Certificate
: As defined in .
Assignee Lender
Section 8.9(a)
: An instrument in the form of , duly completed and executed and delivered.
Assignment and Assumption Agreement
Exhibit A
: An Interest Rate Hedge which is provided by any Lender and which meets the following requirements: such Interest Rate Hedge (i) is documented in a standard International Swap Dealer Association Agreement, (ii) provides for the method of calculating the reimbursable amount of the provider's credit exposure in a reasonable and customary manner, and (iii) is entered into for hedging (rather than speculative) purposes. If Borrower elects to obtain a Bank-Provided Interest Rate Hedge, and provided that Agent confirms that such Interest Rate Hedge meets the foregoing requirements, the liabilities of the Borrower to the provider of any Bank-Provided Interest Rate Hedge shall be a part of Borrower's obligations hereunder, guaranteed by the Guaranty and secured by the Deed of Trust and other Loan Documents.
Bank-Provided Interest Rate Hedge
: Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, a Maryland limited partnership, and its permitted successors and assigns.
Borrower
 
: Any day, other than a Saturday, a Sunday, or a legal holiday on which Agent is not open for business.
Business Day
: The date of this Agreement.
Closing Date
: The Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and applicable U.S. Department of Treasury regulations issued pursuant thereto in temporary or final form.
Code
With respect to each Lender's share of all right, title and interest in the Loan and the Loan Documents, as set forth on attached hereto, as amended and modified by unilateral action of Agent from time to time to reflect the sale or assignment of a portion of the Loan.
:
Commitment Percentage
Exhibit I
: One Hundred Fifty-Seven Million Five Hundred Thousand and 00/100ths Dollars ($157,500,000.00).
Committed Amount
: All Improvements have achieved Substantial Completion (as defined in the Construction Contract), free of all mechanics', labor, materialmen's and other similar lien claims; said Substantial Completion has been approved by the Inspecting Architect; Borrower and Project Architect have delivered a certification to Agent on AIA Form G704 that the Property has been substantially completed in accordance with the approved Plans; Borrower has obtained and delivered to Agent copies of all licenses and permits needed to operate the Property; Agent has received photographs of the completed Improvements, copies of all warranties from suppliers covering materials, equipment and appliances included within the Property and evidence that all insurance required hereby is in full force and effect; and no Event of Default exists hereunder.
Completion
: December 24, 2010, provided however that such Completion Date shall be subject to extension by reason of acts of God (including hurricanes, tornadoes, cyclones, other severe storms, high winds, lightning, floods or earthquakes); action or inaction of governmental authorities having jurisdiction over the Project; strikes; shortages or unavailability of labor or materials; lockouts or labor difficulty; explosion; sabotage; accident; riot or civil commotion; act of war, fire or other casualty; legal requirements; and causes beyond the reasonable control of Borrower; provided, Borrower provides written notice to Agent immediately upon becoming aware of the occurrence of any of the foregoing conditions and provided further that the aggregate period of such delay(s) shall not extend beyond April 26, 2011.
Completion Date
: As defined in hereof.
Construction Contract
Section 2.1(c)
: Third party experts retained by Agent to assist it in connection with closing, advancing, disbursing or administering the Loan.
Consultants
: A reserve of Loan proceeds to pay costs of the Property which are in excess of the amounts thereof anticipated on the date hereof, whether as a result of price increases, changes in the Plans or otherwise, the initial amount of which shall be Seven Million Four Hundred and Five Thousand and Two Hundred Eighteen and 00/100ths Dollars ($7,405,218.00).
Contingency Reserve
: Any person, party or entity (other than the Project Architect) which has a contract or subcontract under which payment may be required for any work done, material supplied or services furnished in connection with acquiring, constructing, financing, equipping and/or developing the Property.
Contractor
 
: An amount equal to (x) the amount of the Loan outstanding at the time of determination multiplied by (y) the greater of (i) a debt constant calculated using a rate of interest equal to 2.25% per annum in excess of the then prevailing T-Note Rate and assuming a thirty (30) year principal amortization schedule, or (ii) seven percent (7.0%) per annum.
Debt Service
: The determination by Agent, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, that the Property has generated Net Operating Income during the immediately preceding three (3) months which, when annualized, equals or exceeds the product of (a) with respect to a proposed reduction in the Interest Rate payable under the Loan Documents, as contemplated in the definition of "LIBOR Rate" below, 1.00 times Debt Service (the ""), (b) with respect to the condition set forth in hereof for the Second Extension Period, as determined as of the first day of such Extension Period, 1.00 times Debt Service (the ""), and (c) with respect to a proposed reduction in the liability of Borrower under the Loan Documents, as contemplated in Section 8.17 hereof, 1.00 times Debt Service (the "").
Debt Service Test
Interest Rate Reduction Debt Service Test
Section 1.4(b)
Extension Debt Service Test
Recourse Reduction Debt Service Test
: The Combination Credit Line Deed of Trust, Security Agreement and Fixture Financing Statement of even date herewith covering the Property, executed by Borrower in favor of Agent for the benefit of the Lenders to secure the Loan, including any amendments thereof and supplements thereto executed by Borrower and Agent.
Deed of Trust
: As defined in hereof.
Default Rate
Section 1.11
: Any Lender who for any reason shall fail or refuse to abide by its obligations under the Loan Documents or this Agreement within the time periods specified for performance of such obligation or, if no time frame is specified, if such failure or refusal continues for a period of five (5) Business Days. Agent shall notify Lender of its determination that such Lender is a Defaulting Lender. Any such Defaulting Lender shall have a period of five (5) Business Days after Agent's notice within which to cure such Defaulting Lender's failure or refusal to comply with its obligations hereunder and the under the Loan Documents.
Defaulting Lender
: Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, a Maryland limited partnership.
Developer
: A sum equal to $8,500,000.00, representing the fee payable by Borrower to Developer. The Development Fee shall not be a part of any Advance hereunder.
Development Fee
: A written request by Borrower, in the form of hereto, or such other form as may be reasonably requested by Agent, for an advance of Loan proceeds under this Agreement.
Draw Request
Exhibit K
: Any employee benefit or other plan establishing benefits or compensation for employees established or maintained, or to which contributions have been made, by Borrower.
Employee Benefit Plan
: A written environmental review, audit, assessment or report addressed to Agent, setting forth the results of an investigation of the Property, including an historical investigation of the uses and ownership of the Land, contacts with appropriate governmental agencies and any Tests which may be requested by Agent, prepared by a competent environmental engineer or consultant who is acceptable to Agent and is licensed, bonded and insured in accordance with all applicable statutes.
Environmental Audit
: Any judgment, decree, order, law, license, rule or regulation pertaining to environmental matters, including without limitation, those arising under the Resource Conservation and
Environmental Laws
 
Recovery Act (""), the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980 as amended (""), the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 (""), the Federal Clean Water Act, the Federal Clean Air Act, the Toxic Substances Control Act, or any state or local statute, regulation, ordinance, order or decree relating to health, safety or the environment.
RCRA
CERCLA
SARA
: All fixtures, equipment and personal property owned by Borrower and located or to be located in or on, and used in connection with, the construction, management, maintenance or operation of the Land and the Improvements.
Equipment
: An aggregate amount of Fifty-Three Million Five Hundred Thousand and 00/100ths Dollars ($53,500,000.00), consisting of (i) Twenty Nine Million Seven Hundred Thirty Five Thousand Three Hundred Thirty One and 00/100ths Dollars ($29,735,331.00) which shall be contributed on or prior to the Closing Date, (ii) the Development Fee, and (iii) Fifteen Million Two Hundred Sixty Four Thousand Six Hundred Sixty Nine and 00/100th Dollars ($15,264,669.00) which shall be contributed on a pari passu (50/50) basis with the Loan proceeds until all such additional Fifteen Million Two Hundred Sixty Four Thousand Six Hundred Sixty Nine and 00/100th Dollars ($15,264,669.00) has been contributed. The Equity Requirement shall not be deemed satisfied unless and until confirmed by Agent in writing, in its sole discretion, upon Borrower's written request.
Equity Requirement
: As defined in .
ERISA
Section 5.16
: Any corporation which is a member of the same controlled group of corporations (within the meaning of Section 414(b) of the Code) as Borrower or any trade or business which is under common control (within the meaning of Section 414(c) of the Code) with Borrower or any organization which is required to be treated as a single employer with Borrower under Section 414(m) or 414(o) of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
: Any event set forth in .
Event of Default
Section 6.1
: As defined in the definition of Debt Service Test.
Extension Debt Service Test
: Fifteen hundredths of one percent (0.15%) of the then outstanding principal balance of the Loan.
Extension Fee
: As defined in .
Extension Periods
Section 1.4
: As defined in .
Extension Request
Section 1.4
: As of any date of determination, the rate set forth in the weekly statistical release designated as H.15(519), or any successor publication, published by the Federal Reserve Board (including any such successor, "H.15(519)") for such date opposite the caption "". If for any relevant date such rate is not yet published in H.15(519), the rate for such date will be the rate set forth in the daily statistical release designated as the Composite 3:30 p.m. Quotations for U.S. Government Securities, or any successor publication, published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York (including any such successor, the "") for such date under the caption "". If on any relevant date the appropriate rate for such date is not yet published in either H.15(519) or the Composite 3:30 p.m. Quotation, the rate for such date will be the arithmetic mean of the rates for the last transaction in overnight Federal funds arranged prior to 9:00 a.m. (New York City time) on that date by each of three leading brokers of Federal funds transactions in New York City selected by Agent.
Federal Funds Rate
Federal Funds (Effective)
Composite 3:30 p.m. Quotation
Federal Funds Effective Rate
 
: That certain Fee Letter between Borrower and Agent of even date herewith.
Fee Letter
: As defined in .
First Extension Period
Section 1.4
: Generally accepted accounting principles set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or in such other statements by such other entity as may be approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession, which are applicable to the circumstances as of any date of determination. Except as may be expressly provided to the contrary herein, all accounting terms used herein shall be interpreted, and all accounting determinations hereunder shall be made, in accordance with GAAP. To the extent any change in GAAP affects any computation or determination required to be made pursuant to this Agreement, such computation or determination shall be made as if such change in GAAP had not occurred, unless Borrower and Agent agree in writing on an adjustment to said computation or determination to account for such change in GAAP.
GAAP
: Clark Residential, LLC.
General Contractor
: All laws, statutes, codes, ordinances, and governmental rules, regulations and requirements (including, without limitation, the Proffers) applicable to Borrower and the Property.
Governmental Requirements
: Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation.
Guarantor
: That certain Guaranty of even date herewith given by Guarantor in favor of Agent and the Lenders.
Guaranty
: Any hazardous waste, as defined by 42 U.S.C.  9601(5), any hazardous substances as defined by 42 U.S.C.  9601(14), any pollutant or contaminant as defined by 42 U.S.C. 9601(33) or any toxic substances, oil or hazardous materials or other chemicals or substances regulated by any Environmental Laws.
Hazardous Substances
: The buildings and improvements that are now or are hereafter placed or constructed upon the Land, as more particularly described on attached hereto (including all sitework, utilities, infrastructure, paving, striping, signage, curb and gutter, landscaping and installation of all "common area" improvements required under any covenants encumbering the Property, required by applicable law, or zoning approvals entered into by Borrower).
Improvements
Exhibit B
: The first advance of Loan proceeds.
Initial Advance
: EMJ Construction Consultants and/or any other independent architect, engineer or consultant selected by Agent.
Inspecting Architect
: An interest rate exchange, collar, cap, swap, adjustable strike cap, adjustable strike corridor or similar agreements entered into by Borrower to provide protection to, or minimize the impact upon, the Borrower of increasing floating rates of interest applicable to the Loan
Interest Rate Hedge
.
: As defined in the definition of Debt Service Test.
Interest Rate Reduction Debt Service Test
 
: A reserve of Loan proceeds to pay interest on the Loan through Completion of the Improvements, the initial amount of which shall be Twenty Million Nine Hundred Forty Eight Thousand Nine Hundred Eighty Nine and 00/100ths Dollars ($20,948,989.00).
Interest Reserve
: The land legally described on attached hereto and hereby made a part hereof, together with all additions thereto and substitutions therefor agreed to by Borrower and Agent.
Land
Exhibit C
: Any federal, state or local law, statute, rule, regulation, ordinance, order, decree, directive, requirement, code, notice of violation or rule of common law, now or hereafter in effect, and in each case as amended, and any judicial or administrative interpretation thereof by a governmental authority or otherwise, including any judicial or administrative order, determination, consent decree or judgment.
Law
: Leadership Institute, a Virginia non-stock corporation
Leadership
: Collectively, those certain documents by and between Borrower and Leadership relating to the Project, as may be amended, modified, supplemented or replaced from time to time, including, without limitation, (i) that certain Development Agreement dated as of June 7, 2006, as amended by that certain First Amendment to Development Agreement dated as of September 5, 2007; (ii) that certain Lease dated as of June 7, 2006; and (iii) that certain Temporary Construction Easement and Crane Swing License Agreement dated as of June 7, 2006.
Leadership Agreements
: Any lease, sublease or sub-sublease, letting, license, concession or other agreement (whether written or oral and whether now or hereafter in effect), pursuant to which any Person is granted a possessory interest in, or right to use or occupy, all or any portion of any space in the Project, and every modification, amendment or other agreement relating to such lease, sublease, sub-sublease or other agreement entered into in connection with such lease, sublease, sub-sublease or other agreement and every guarantee of the performance and observance of the covenants, conditions and agreements to be performed and observed by the other party thereto; provided, however, that such term shall not include any agreements, instruments or other documents that are necessary to satisfy the Proffers.
Lease
: As set forth on attached hereto and hereby made a part hereof.
Leasing Guidelines
Exhibit N
: Each Lender that is a party to this Agreement and which hereafter becomes party to this Agreement, collectively, and each of their respective permitted successors and assigns.
Lenders
: With respect to any requested LIBOR Rate Advance, the one month LIBOR Rate quoted by Agent from Reuters Screen LIBOR01 or any successor thereto, which shall be that one-month LIBOR Rate in effect two New York Banking Days prior to the beginning of each calendar month, adjusted for any reserve requirement and any subsequent costs arising from a change in government regulation, such rate to be reset monthly on the first day of each calendar month.
LIBOR
(a) For the period commencing on the date of this Agreement and continuing thereafter unless and until the effective date of any reduction in such rate in accordance with clause (b) below, LIBOR Rate shall mean a rate of interest equal to two and one-half percent (2.5%) per annum plus LIBOR; (b) if, upon Borrower's written request, Agent determines, in its sole discretion acting in good faith, that Completion has occurred, LIBOR Rate shall mean a rate of interest equal to two and thirty-five hundredths percent (2.35%) per annum plus LIBOR, and (c) if, upon Borrower's written request, Agent determines, in its sole discretion acting in good faith, that the Interest Rate Reduction Debt Service Test is satisfied, LIBOR Rate shall mean a rate of interest equal to two and twenty hundredths percent (2.20%) per annum plus LIBOR. In no event shall the LIBOR Rate ever exceed the maximum lawful rate.
:
LIBOR Rate
 
: Any portion of the Principal Balance which bears interest at a LIBOR Rate; provided, however, that any LIBOR Rate Advance must be in the aggregate principal amount of at least $500,000.00.
LIBOR Rate Advance
: The loan of the proceeds of the Note by the Lenders to Borrower in advances to be made pursuant to the terms of this Agreement.
Loan
: The documents enumerated in of this Agreement, which evidence and secure the Loan, including, but not limited to, the Note, the Deed of Trust, this Agreement, the Assignment of Leases and Rents and the Indemnification Agreement, and including any amendments thereof and supplements thereto executed by Borrower and Agent.
Loan Documents
Section 2.2
: Lenders holding Notes representing, in the aggregate, not less than sixty six and sixty seven hundredths percent (66.67%) of the Committed Amount or, if no such principal amount is then outstanding, Lenders representing not less than sixty six and sixty seven hundredths percent (66.67%) of the Commitment Percentages.
Majority Lenders
: November 14, 2011, as such date may be extended in accordance with the provisions of hereof.
Maturity Date
Section 1.4
: One or more wholesale funding markets available to Agent, including negotiable certificates of deposit, commercial paper, eurodollar deposits, bank notes, federal funds and others.
Money Markets
: Any plan defined as such in Section 3(37) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
: For any period of determination, net operating income generated by the Property for such period (, gross operating income determined in accordance with GAAP, less (x) all operating expenses payable in the ordinary course of operating the Property, determined in accordance with GAAP (exclusive of debt service, capital expenditures, leasing costs, tenant improvement costs, depreciation and amortization) and (y) reserves calculated for the first year on the basis of (1) for apartments units, $250.00 per unit per year, or $61,000.00, (2) for office space, $0.25 per rentable square foot per year, or $42,600.00; and (3) for retail space, $0.25 per rentable square foot per year, or $10,575, for a total reserve deduction in the first year of operations of $114,175. After completing the first full year of operations, reserves shall be escalated at 4% per annum. Borrower shall provide Agent with all information and materials required by Agent necessary for the determination of Net Operating Income.
Net Operating Income
i.e.
: Any day (other than a Saturday or Sunday) on which commercial Lenders are open for business in New York, New York.
New York Banking Day
: Individually or collectively, as the context may require, the Promissory Notes, of even date herewith, executed and delivered by Borrower to the Lenders in the aggregate maximum principal amount of One Hundred Fifty-Seven Million Five Hundred Thousand and 00/l00ths Dollars ($157,500,000.00), to evidence the Loan, as the same may be amended, modified or replaced from time to time.
Note
: The obligations of Borrower to Agent and the Lenders described in the Loan Documents.
Obligations
: A detailed listing of all anticipated annual income and expenses from and for managing, maintaining and operating the Property, prepared by Borrower or its agent and in form and substance acceptable to Agent.
Operating Budget
 
: A current, detailed statement of income and expenses from and for managing, maintaining and operating the Property, in form and substance acceptable to Agent, certified as true, correct and complete by the chief financial officer of Borrower (or officer acting in a similar such capacity), and expressly showing all variations from the Operating Budget for the period covered thereby.
Operating Statement
: Any employee pension benefit plan within the meaning of Section 3(2) of ERISA with respect to which Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate at any relevant time has liability or an obligation to contribute.
Pension Plan
: The liens, charges and encumbrances on title to the Property listed on hereto, if any, or otherwise approved by the Agent in writing.
Permitted Encumbrances
Exhibit D
: The following transfers, pledges and other changes in the direct or indirect ownership interests in Borrower and/or Guarantor (which shall be permitted without payment of any fee to Agent or the Lenders):
Permitted Transfer
(a) transfers of interests, admissions of additional members, limited partners or shareholders, and other structural changes, in Borrower, Guarantor, or any owner of a direct or indirect legal or beneficial interest in either of them, including, but not limited to, their respective partners, members or shareholders, provided that after giving effect thereto (i) B. Francis Saul II, B. Francis Saul III, members of their respective families, trusts for the benefit of any of the same and/or companies or other entities controlled directly or indirectly by any of the same, continue to (A) own and control, directly or indirectly, at least ten percent (10%), in the aggregate, of (x) the limited partnership units of Borrower, and (y) the common stock of Guarantor on a fully diluted basis, and (B) retain responsibility for the day-to-day management of the Property; and (ii) Guarantor continues to be the sole managing general partner of Borrower; and
(b) transfers of the publicly traded stock of Guarantor, provided that after giving effect thereto, B. Francis Saul II, B. Francis Saul III, members of their respective families, trusts for the benefit of any of the same and/or companies or other entities controlled directly or indirectly by any of the same, continue to (i) own and control, directly or indirectly, at least ten percent (10%), in the aggregate, of the common stock of Guarantor on a fully diluted basis, and (ii) retain responsibility for the day-to-day management of the Property.
For purposes of the foregoing, a pledge of any interest shall not constitute a transfer of such interest unless and until the interest so pledged has been transferred pursuant to a foreclosure of the lien of such pledge, provided that any such pledge shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%), in the aggregate, of the limited partnership interests in Borrower. As necessary, all representations and warranties of Borrower and Guarantor in the Loan Documents shall be deemed modified to conform to any such transfers, pledges or other changes.
: Any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, partnership (general or limited), limited liability partnership, joint venture, firm, association, trust, unincorporated organization, government or governmental agency or political subdivision or any other entity, whether acting in an individual, fiduciary or other capacity.
Person
: As defined in .
Plan
Section 5.16
: The construction documents for the Improvements, including the plans, drawings and specifications, as approved (or deemed approved) by Agent from time to time.
Plans
 
: Any hazardous or toxic substance, waste or material, or other pollutant or contaminant (including but not limited to radioactive materials, gasoline, asbestos, ureaformaldehyde and polychlorinated biphenyls), as those terms are defined or used in any Environmental Law.
Pollutant
: As defined on hereto.
Pre-Leasing Test
Exhibit Q
: The rate publicly announced by Agent from time to time as its prime rate, as and when such rate changes; provided, however, that Agent may lend to its customers at interest rates that are above or below the Prime Rate.
Prime Rate
: Any portion of the Principal Balance which bears interest at the Prime Rate.
Prime Rate Advance
: One Hundred Fifty-Seven Million Five Hundred Thousand and 00/100ths Dollars ($157,500,000.00) or so much thereof as may have been advanced to or for the benefit of Borrower and remains unpaid from time to time.
Principal Balance
: As defined in .
Prior Advance
Section 3.5(d)(2)
: The approved development conditions of Arlington County special exception site plan no. 397, and all agreements contemplated thereby, whether or not existing in separate written form as of the date of this Agreement.
Proffers
: A mixed use development located on two parcels of land straddling the North and South sides of Clarendon Boulevard between North Garfield and North Highland Streets comprised of approximately 244 rental apartment units, approximately 170,400 square feet of office space, approximately 42,300 square feet of ground floor and retail space and an underground parking garage containing approximately 600 spaces.
Project
: Torti Gallas and Partners, or such other architectural firm that may be selected by Borrower, subject to the approval of Agent, such approval not to be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed.
Project Architect
: As defined in .
Projected Sources
Section 5.3
: The Land, the Improvements and the Equipment.
Property
: Any amount advanced or expended by the Agent and/or the Lenders pursuant to the Loan Documents to preserve or protect the Lenders' rights with respect to the Loan.
Protective Advances
: As defined in the definition of Debt Service Test.
Recourse Reduction Debt Service Test
: Regulations D and U, respectively (or any substitute regulations), of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor thereto), together with all amendments from time to time thereto.
Regulation D; Regulation U
: Any change, after the date of the initial funding of the Note, in United States federal, state or foreign laws, regulations or treaties, or the adoption or making after such date of any interpretations, directives or requests applying to Agent and/or the Lenders of or under any United States federal, state or foreign laws or regulations (whether or not having the force of law) by any court or
Regulatory Change
 
governmental or monetary authority charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, excluding, however, for purposes of LIBOR Rate Advances, any such change which results in an adjustment of the reserve requirement specified by Regulation D and the effect of which is reflected in a change in rate applicable to any such LIBOR Rate Advance.
: The Interest Reserve, Contingency Reserve and Tenant Improvement Reserve.
Reserves
: As defined in .
Revolving Credit Agreement
Section 5.14
: As defined in .
Second Extension Period
Section 1.4
: A security interest granted by Borrower to Agent and the Lenders, a lien on and an express contractual right to set off against all depository account balances, cash and any other property of the Borrower now or hereafter in the possession of Agent or the Lenders and the right to refuse to allow withdrawals from any account, subject to the terms of the Loan Documents and applicable law.
Set-Off
: An itemized, certified statement of actual and estimated costs of the Property, in the form of attached hereto or to be attached hereto within ninety (90) days after the date hereof and hereby made a part hereof, signed and sworn to by Borrower (as indicated on hereto), as the same may be amended or supplemented with the approval of Agent from time to time, Section I of which is referred to as the "".
Sworn Construction Cost Statement
Exhibit E
Exhibit E
Summary Sworn Construction Cost Statement
: All finish improvements to the basic building shell of the Improvements for tenant space within the Improvements, as shown on the schedule thereof delivered by Borrower to Agent.
Tenant Improvements
: A reserve of Loan proceeds to pay the costs of Tenant Improvements for retail and office space, the initial amounts of which shall be $2,750,085.00 and $10,310,760.00, respectively.
Tenant Improvement Reserve
: Such soil tests, chemical tests, materials tests and other tests and analyses as are appropriately required to confirm, with relative certainty, the absence of Pollutants from the Property.
Tests
: Commonwealth Land Title Insurance Company.
Title Company
: A loan policy of title insurance in favor of Agent for the benefit of the Lenders issued by the Title Company and complying with the requirements of attached hereto and hereby made a part hereof.
Title Policy
Exhibit F
: The annualized yield on ten (10) year United States Treasury notes having a maturity date closest to the Maturity Date, as determined by Agent in its sole discretion.
T-Note Rate
I.
LOAN
. Subject to the terms, provisions and conditions of this Agreement, each Lender severally, but not jointly, agrees to lend to Borrower pro rata in accordance with its Commitment Percentage, and Borrower agrees to borrow from the Lenders, the proceeds of the Loan, from time to time, in accordance with the terms hereof until the Maturity Date, for the purpose of constructing the Improvements and otherwise developing the Property. All advances of Loan proceeds shall be evidenced by the Note. Notwithstanding the expressed principal amount of the Note, Borrower shall not be obligated to repay more than the unpaid balance of advances made to or for the
1.1
Principal
 
benefit of Borrower by Agent and the Lenders pursuant hereto and to the other Loan Documents, together with interest thereon at the rates specified below, computed on each Advance from the date it is made by the Lenders. In no event shall the Lenders be obligated hereunder to lend to Borrower more than Borrower has qualified to receive under the terms of hereof.
Article III
. Interest shall accrue on the Principal Balance from and after the date hereof. All interest payable hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a 360 day year, but shall be charged for the actual number of days principal is unpaid. Interest accruing in accordance herewith shall be payable, as accrued, on the first Business Day of each calendar month, commencing with the first Business Day of the next calendar month following the calendar month in which the Initial Advance is made to Borrower, and continuing on the first Business Day of each and every calendar month thereafter until the Principal Balance and all accrued interest thereon are paid in full. Agent shall provide a monthly notice to Borrower setting forth the amount of interest due and the due date thereof, which notice shall be mailed on or prior to the tenth (10th) day preceding the first day of each month; provided, however, that Borrower shall be obligated to pay interest on the Loan when due regardless of the date Borrower receives such notice. All unpaid, accrued interest shall be paid in full at the time the Principal Balance is paid in full.
1.2
Payment of Interest
In the event that the interest and/or charges in the nature of interest, if any, provided for by this Agreement or by any other Loan Document, shall contravene a legal or statutory limitation applicable to the Loan, if any, Borrower shall pay only such amounts as would legally be permitted; provided, however, that if the defense of usury and all similar defenses are unavailable to Borrower, Borrower shall pay all amounts provided for herein. If, for any reason, amounts in excess of the amounts permitted in the foregoing sentence shall have been paid, received, collected or applied hereunder, whether by reason of acceleration or otherwise, then, and in that event, any such excess amounts shall be applied to principal, unless principal has been fully paid, in which event such excess amount shall be refunded to Borrower.
. The Principal Balance and accrued interest thereon may be prepaid in full or in part at any time, without premium or penalty, after a minimum of three (3) Business Days' prior written notice from Borrower to Agent of the date of prepayment. In the event that Borrower shall fail to provide at least such three (3) Business Days' notice when herein required, Agent will charge, and Borrower shall pay, additional interest on the amount prepaid, at the LIBOR Rate or at the Default Rate, whichever is then applicable, from the earlier of the date such notice is given or the date the prepayment is made through the date three (3) Business Days after the date of such notice or, if no notice is given, such prepayment. Each prepayment shall be in an amount not less than the lesser of $100,000.00 or the Principal Balance.
1.3
Prepayment
. If not sooner paid in accordance with the terms hereof, the Principal Balance, together with all unpaid interest accrued thereon, shall be due and payable, in full, on the Maturity Date; provided, however, the Maturity Date may be extended for two (2) additional periods of nine (9) months each (individually, the "" and the "" and collectively, the ) upon the written request (the ) of Borrower given not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days prior to the Maturity Date then existing, each such extension being subject to satisfaction of all of the following conditions:
1.4
Maturity Date; Extension
First Extension Period
Second Extension Period
"Extension Periods"
"Extension Request"
(a) Payment on or before the first day of each Extension Period of the Extension Fee;
 
(b) With respect to the Second Extension Period, the Extension Debt Service Test shall be satisfied as of the first day of such Extension Period, as determined by Agent in its sole discretion exercised in good faith (assuming that all principal and interest payments due hereunder are paid in a timely manner after receipt by Agent of the Extension Request); provided, however, if the Extension Debt Service Test is not satisfied, Borrower may elect to satisfy this condition by paying a principal curtailment in an amount sufficient to reduce the Principal Balance as of the first day of the Second Extension Period such that the Extension Debt Service Test shall be satisfied as of such date, as determined by Agent in its sole discretion exercised in good faith (assuming that all principal and interest payment due hereunder are paid in a timely manner after receipt by Agent of the Extension Request);
(c) At the time of each Extension Request and on the first day of each Extension Period, there shall exist no uncured Event of Default (as hereinafter defined);
(d) Borrower shall deliver to Agent a title bringdown or, in the event Agent requires that any documentation be recorded in connection with such extension, an endorsement to the existing title insurance policy held by Agent on behalf of the Lenders in connection with the Loan, bringing current the effective date of such coverage setting forth no liens or encumbrances other than Permitted Encumbrances and stating that the coverage afforded by such title insurance policy, or the agreements thereunder, shall not be affected because of such extension;
(e) Completion of the Improvements has been achieved to the satisfaction of Agent and all certificates of occupancy and use permits shall have been issued in connection therewith;
(f) Borrower shall deliver to Agent all financial information relating to Borrower and the Guarantor required hereunder, and such information shall reflect that no Materially Adverse Effect (as defined in the Deed of Trust), financial or otherwise, as determined by Agent, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, shall have occurred with respect to Borrower;
(g) Borrower shall deliver to Agent on or before the then existing Maturity Date such documentation as Agent may reasonably require in connection with such proposed extension, all of which shall be in form and substance acceptable to Agent;
(h) Borrower shall pay all costs and expenses reasonably incurred by or on behalf of Agent in connection with such extension, including appraisal fees, internal or external appraisal review fees, inspection fees, legal fees and such other professional services which Agent requires; Borrower shall also pay survey costs and costs of environmental studies and reports if such survey(s) and/or environmental studies or reports are deemed necessary by Agent pursuant to Agent's internal policies or pursuant to applicable laws, rules or regulations; the payment by Borrower of these costs and expenses shall not be credited, in any way or to any extent, against any portion of the outstanding balance of the Loan; and
(i) At the time of each Extension Request and on the first day of each Extension Period, Agent shall have determined that the Loan is in balance pursuant to .
Section 3.2
Notwithstanding Borrower's right to extend the Maturity Date of the Loan as set forth above, Borrower hereby agrees that Agent and the Lenders shall have no commitment or obligation to extend the Maturity Date unless each of the foregoing conditions shall have been satisfied.
. From and after the date hereof, and until the date on which the Note is paid in full, Borrower shall pay interest only on the outstanding Principal Balance at the
1.5
Calculation of Interest
 
rate per annum equal to the LIBOR Rate, except as otherwise provided in this Agreement and the Loan Documents.
. Notwithstanding any other provision herein, if any Regulatory Change shall change the basis of taxation of payments to the Lenders of the principal of or interest on any LIBOR Rate Advance or any other fees or amounts payable hereunder (other than taxes imposed on the overall net income of the Lenders by the jurisdiction in which the Lenders have their principal offices or by any political subdivision or taxing authority therein), or shall subject the Lenders to any new or additional charge, fee, withholding or tax of any kind with respect to the Loan hereunder or change the method of taxation of the Loan or impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit or loan commitments extended by, the Lenders (except any such reserve requirement which is reflected in LIBOR) or shall impose on the Lenders or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement, the Note or the LIBOR Rate Advances made by the Lenders, and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to the Lenders of making or maintaining any LIBOR Rate Advance or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by the Lenders hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise) in respect thereof, by an amount deemed by such Lender to be material, then Borrower shall pay to Agent for the benefit of such Lender upon demand, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender for such additional costs or reduction, including lost income resulting therefrom as reasonably determined by such Lender. A statement from such Lender setting forth such amount or amounts as shall be necessary to so compensate such Lender shall be delivered to Borrower and shall, in the absence of manifest error, be conclusive and binding upon Borrower. Borrower shall pay Agent on behalf of such Lender the amount shown as due on any such statement within ten (10) Business Days after its receipt of the same. Failure on the part of any Lender to demand compensation for any increased costs, lost income or reduction in amounts received or receivable shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's rights to demand compensation for any increased costs or reduction in amounts received or receivable. The protection under this section shall be available to the Lenders regardless of any possible contention of the invalidity or inapplicability of any law, regulation or directive which shall give rise to any demand by the Lenders.
1.6
Regulatory Costs
. In the event that on any date for determining the LIBOR Rate, Agent shall determine (which determination shall be conclusive in the absence of manifest error) that, by reason of circumstances affecting the London interbank market, adequate and fair means do not exist for ascertaining the LIBOR Rate, Agent shall promptly give to Borrower notice (confirmed as soon as practicable in writing) of the nature and effect of such circumstances, and the Principal Balance shall bear interest at a rate based upon an alternate index selected by the Agent, reasonably comparable to that of LIBOR, intended to generate a return substantially the same as that generated by the LIBOR Rate. If at any time subsequent to Agent's giving of such notice, Agent determines that because of a change in circumstances the LIBOR Rate is again available to Borrower, Agent shall so notify Borrower and shall convert the rate of interest payable with respect to such portion of the Principal Balance from such alternative rate to the LIBOR Rate. Nothing in this Section shall affect the LIBOR Rate then in effect on any LIBOR Rate Advance outstanding at the time of receipt by Borrower of such notice until the expiration of the LIBOR Rate period in effect with respect to such LIBOR Rate Advance at such time.
1.7
Inability to Determine LIBOR
. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein contained, if any Regulatory Change shall make it unlawful for Agent and/or the Lenders to make or maintain any LIBOR Rate Advance or to give effect to its obligations as contemplated hereby, then, by written notice to Borrower, Agent may:
1.8
Illegality
 
(a) declare that LIBOR Rate Advances will not thereafter be made hereunder, in which event Borrower shall be prohibited from requesting LIBOR Rate Advances, and the Lenders shall not be required to make LIBOR Rate Advances to Borrower, hereunder unless such declaration is subsequently withdrawn; and
(b) require, but only to the extent and for so long as the Regulatory Change affects outstanding LIBOR Rate Advances, that all outstanding LIBOR Rate Advances made by Lenders be converted to Prime Rate Advances as of the effective date of such notice as is hereinafter provided for (notwithstanding any provisions of the Note or this Agreement to the contrary), and interest shall accrue thereon, from and after said date, at the Prime Rate or the Default Rate, whichever is then applicable. For purposes of this Section, a notice to Borrower by Agent shall be effective, if lawful, on the date of receipt by Borrower.
. Borrower shall also pay to the applicable Lenders from time to time on demand such amounts as such Lender may determine to be necessary to compensate such Lender for any costs which such Lender determines are attributable to the extension of credit hereunder in respect of any amount of capital maintained by such Lender or any of its affiliates pursuant to any law, guideline or regulation of any jurisdiction or any interpretation, directive or request (whether or not having the force of law) of any court or governmental or monetary authority enacted, whether proposed on the date of this Agreement or enacted, promulgated or issued after the date of this Agreement, but only to the extent that such costs are charged generally by such Lender to similarly situated borrowers in similar loan transactions; provided, however, that the applicable Lender(s) shall use good faith efforts to provide Borrower with notice of such amounts not later than ten (10) Business Days after the date on which such Lender(s) learn of the same. Without limiting the foregoing, such compensation shall include an amount equal to any reduction in return on assets or return on equity to a level below that which the Lenders could have achieved absent their extension of credit hereunder and but for such law, regulation, interpretation, directive or request. Each Lender will notify Agent as promptly as practicable after it determines to demand such compensation.
1.9
Capital Adequacy
.
1.10
[Intentionally Omitted]
. If a default shall occur and continue beyond any applicable notice, cure or grace period under the Note, this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents or the entire Principal Balance, all interest accrued thereon, and all other amounts payable under the Loan have not been repaid on or before the Maturity Date, then the entire Principal Balance shall (without notice to or demand upon Borrower) become due and payable on said date, together with all unpaid, accrued interest thereon and all other amounts payable under the Loan, and with interest computed thereon from and after that date at a rate which is five percent (5%) per annum in excess of the current rate of interest accruing on the Principal Balance, or at the maximum lawful rate of interest which may be charged thereon by Agent, if any, whichever is less (hereinafter called ""), until all such amounts are paid in full.
1.11
Default Rate
Default Rate
. In the event that any required payment of principal and/or interest hereunder (other than full payment at maturity) is not made within five (5) days of the due date thereof, Borrower shall pay to Agent an additional payment of a late payment charge to compensate for Lenders' loss of use of funds and for the expenses of handling the delinquent payment, in an amount equal to five percent (5.0%) of such delinquent payment. In the event the maturity of the indebtedness hereunder is accelerated by Agent, this section shall apply only to payments overdue prior to the time of such acceleration.
1.12
Late Payment Charge
 
. Borrower, Agent and the Lenders agree that no payment of interest or other consideration made or agreed to be made by Borrower to Agent and/or the Lenders pursuant to this Agreement, the Note, the Deed of Trust or any other instrument referring to or securing the Note shall, at any time, be deemed to have been computed at an interest rate in excess of the maximum rate of interest permissible by law, if any. In the event such payments of interest or other consideration provided for in this Agreement, the Note, the Deed of Trust or any other instrument referring to or securing the Note shall result in payment of an effective rate of interest which, for any period of time, is in excess of the limit of the usury law or any other law applicable to the Loan evidenced by the Note, all sums in excess of those lawfully collectible as interest for the period in question shall, without further agreement or notice between or by any party or parties hereto, be applied to the Principal Balance immediately upon receipt of such monies by Agent with the same force and effect as though Borrower had specifically designated, and Agent had agreed to accept, such extra payments as a principal payment, without premium or penalty. If principal has been fully paid, any such excess amount shall be refunded to Borrower. This provision shall control over every other obligation of Borrower, Agent and the Lenders hereunder and under the Note, the Deed of Trust and any other instrument which secures the Note.
1.13
Effective Rate
. All payments made under the Note shall be applied to any late payment charge then due, to accrued interest, to the Principal Balance and, if Agent and the Lenders have advanced any sums under the terms of any instrument which secures the Note, to repayment of the funds so advanced, even though the same have become part of the Principal Balance, together with interest thereon at the Default Rate, in such order as Agent, at its option, may elect. All payments made under the Loan shall be made in immediately available funds, without counterclaim or set off and free and clear of, and without any deduction or withholding for any taxes or other payments.
1.14
Payments
. On the date hereof and on or before the dates set forth therein, Borrower shall pay Agent all fees, costs and expenses referenced in the Fee Letter. The agency fee set forth in the Fee Letter is for the services to be performed by Agent in acting as Agent and is fully earned on the date paid. The agency fee paid to the Agent is solely for its own account and is nonrefundable.
1.15
Fees
. Agent shall not by any act, delay, omission or otherwise be deemed to have waived any of its rights or remedies, and no waiver of any kind shall be valid unless in writing and signed by Agent. All rights and remedies of Agent under the terms of this Agreement, the Note, or any of the other Loan Documents, and under any statutes or rules of law shall be cumulative and may be exercised successively or concurrently. Any provision of this Agreement and the Note which may be unenforceable or invalid under any law shall be ineffective to the extent of such unenforceability or invalidity without affecting the enforceability or validity of any other provision hereof.
1.16
No Waiver by Agent
II.
CONDITIONS OF BORROWING
Neither Agent nor the Lenders shall be required to make any advances hereunder until the pre-closing requirements, conditions and other requirements set forth below have been completed and fulfilled to the satisfaction of Agent, at Borrower's sole cost and expense. It is agreed, however, that Agent and the Lenders may, in their discretion, make advances prior to completion and fulfillment of any or all of such pre-closing requirements, conditions and requirements, without waiving their right to require such completion and fulfillment before any additional advances are made.
. At least five (5) Business Days prior to the closing of the Loan, Borrower shall provide to Agent each of the following, in form and substance acceptable to Agent.
2.1
Pre-Closing Requirements
 
(a) A commitment for the Title Policy or a preliminary title report from the Title Company, complying with the standard requirements of Agent therefor, a copy of which has been delivered to Borrower.
(b) Two (2) complete sets of the Plans for the Improvements set forth in . All mechanical, electrical, structural and other specialized drawings for the Improvements shall be signed by licensed engineers of the respective disciplines normally responsible for such drawings. All portions of such Plans prepared by the Project Architect shall be signed by the Project Architect.
Exhibit M
(c) The General Contractor's construction contract and the guarantee given to Owner in connection therewith (collectively, the "") and a schedule of values of all trades, the Project Architect's agreement (the ""), a schedule listing all subcontracts signed to date relating to the construction of the Improvements on the Property, and such other contracts, subcontracts and schedules relating to the Property as Agent may reasonably require to the extent then executed.
Construction Contract
Architect's Agreement
(d) Three (3) copies of a current, certified ALTA/ACSM land title survey prepared in accordance with Agent's standard requirements therefor, copies of which have been delivered to Borrower.
(e) Soil reports on the Land, showing that the soil will adequately support the Improvements.
(f) An Environmental Audit running to the benefit of Agent, satisfactory to Agent, and all reports, data and other information produced in connection with the Tests. The Environmental Audit shall also specify whether or not any environmental assessment, study or statement with respect to the Property is required by any Governmental Requirement. If such an assessment, study or statement is so required, Borrower shall provide a copy thereof to Agent.
(g) Copies of insurance policies or certificates of insurance for Borrower and the General Contractor written by insurers satisfactory to Agent and in amounts satisfactory to Agent, prepared in accordance with Agent's standard requirements therefor, a copy of which has been delivered to Borrower. Agent confirms that the insurance coverage currently carried by Borrower and General Contractor, as previously provided to Agent, is currently satisfactory as to the insurer and all other requirements; provided, however, nothing contained herein shall be deemed to limit Agent's right to modify its insurance requirements from time to time.
(h) Borrower's estimated schedules for construction of the Improvements and for disbursement of the Loan proceeds.
(i) Copies of all building permits required for the then current stage of construction of the Improvements, and a schedule of all other necessary licenses and permits which must be obtained in order to occupy and operate the Property.
(j) A zoning opinion from Borrower's counsel in form and substance acceptable to Agent.
(k) An appraisal of the Property showing an "as stabilized" loan to value ratio less than or equal to seventy-five percent (75%), addressed to Agent, prepared by an M.A.I. appraiser acceptable to Agent.
 
(l) Letters addressed to Agent from the suppliers confirming the availability of water, storm and sanitary sewer, gas, electric and telephone utilities for the Improvements, prepared in accordance with Agent's standard requirements therefor, copies of which have been delivered to Borrower.
(m) A Certificate of the Project Architect (the "") addressed to Agent, prepared in accordance with Agent's standard requirements therefor, a copy of which has been delivered to Borrower. Borrower agrees that it shall not, without the prior written consent of Agent, consent to any release or settlement of any claims under the Architect's Certificate or any agreements pursuant to which the Plans and Specifications were, or are to be, prepared, including, but not limited to, any architect's contracts, which consent shall not be unreasonably conditioned, withheld, or delayed given the overall interests of constructing the Improvements and otherwise developing the Property.
Architect's Certificate
(n) UCC chattel lien searches from the Maryland State Department of Assessments and Taxation ("") in the name of Borrower.
MSDAT
(o) A Certificate of Good Standing for Borrower, currently issued by MSDAT; copies of Borrower's Limited Partnership Agreement, Certificate of Limited Partnership currently certified by MSDAT, Certificate of Fact currently issued by the Virginia State Corporation Commission, and resolutions of Borrower's general partner authorizing the transaction described herein, all currently certified by Borrower's general partner; a Certificate of Good Standing for Guarantor, currently issued by MSDAT; and copies of the Guarantor's Articles of Incorporation, currently certified by MSDAT, and Guarantor's Bylaws, all currently certified by Guarantor.
(p) A copy of each agreement relating to the management, operation or maintenance of the Property.
(q) A proposed Operating Budget for the Property.
(r) The most current available annual financial statements for Borrower and Guarantor on a consolidated basis, as well as financial statements on a consolidated basis for each of the three (3) full fiscal years of Guarantor immediately preceding the time period covered by said current financial statements;
(s) All property tax information regarding the Property requested by Agent;
(t) The Sworn Construction Cost Statement for the Property;
(u) A flood zone certification indicating that the portion of the Property on which the Improvements are located is not located in a flood plain or any other flood prone area, as designated by any governmental agency; provided, however, that if the portion of the Property on which the Improvements are so located, Borrower shall obtain and deliver to Agent evidence of flood insurance acceptable to Agent;
(v) A copy of any subdivision plat and site plan for the Property;
(w) One or more standard forms of lease to be used by Borrower in leasing residential, retail and office space within the Property;
(x) Copies of the Leadership Agreements;
 
(y) Copies of the Proffers;
(x) Other agreements, documents and exhibits, without limitation, which may be required, in Agent's judgment, exercised in good faith, to assure compliance with the requirements of this Agreement.
In addition to the above, at least five (5) Business Days prior to the initial advance of Loan Proceeds, Borrower shall provide to Agent evidence satisfactory to Agent that Borrower has contributed to the Property cash equity in an amount not less than $29,735,331.00 prior to the date hereof.
. Except to the extent expressly set forth below in this , on or before the date of closing of the Loan, Borrower shall execute and deliver (or cause to be executed and delivered) to Agent the following documents in form and substance acceptable to Agent and to its counsel, to evidence and secure the Loan:
2.2
Loan Documents
Section 2.2
(a) The Note.
(b) The Deed of Trust.
(c) This Agreement.
(d) An Assignment of Leases and Rents.
(e) An Indemnification Agreement.
(f) A first security interest in all Equipment and in all of Borrower's intangible property relating to the Property, created and evidenced by a security agreement (which may be incorporated within the Deed of Trust) and by appropriate Uniform Commercial Code financing statements.
(g) A covenant compliance certificate, in the form attached hereto as .
Exhibit O
(h) The Fee Letter.
(i) An assignment of the Plans and of the Project Architect's agreement pursuant to which the same were prepared, along with written acknowledgment from the Project Architect authorizing Agent to rely on and utilize the Plans, without additional charge, and further confirming to Agent that, if an Event of Default has occurred, the Project Architect will cooperate with Agent regarding the completion of construction of the Property.
(j) An assignment of the Construction Contract for the Property and an agreement from the General Contractor to honor and perform the same for Agent in the event of an Event of Default under the Loan Documents.
(k) Such other documents as Agent may reasonably require to evidence and secure the Loan.
Agent may designate which of the Loan Documents are to be placed of record, the order of recording thereof, and the offices in which the same are to be recorded. Borrower shall pay all documentary, recording and/or registration taxes and/or fees, if any, due upon the Loan Documents.
 
. Agent shall have received a pro forma copy of the Title Policy.
2.3
Title Insurance
. Agent shall have received from outside counsel for Borrower and Guarantor a current written opinion, subject to customary assumptions and qualifications, in scope, form and substance acceptable to Agent.
2.4
Opinion of Borrower's Attorneys
III.
ADVANCES OF LOAN PROCEEDS
. Subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, each Lender shall, pro rata according to such Lender's Commitment Percentage of the Committed Amount, make advances for the benefit of Borrower, not more frequently than once per month, in such amounts as Borrower may request, in accordance with the terms of this Agreement. All monies advanced by Agent and the Lenders (including amounts payable to Agent and the Lenders and advanced by Agent and the Lenders to themselves pursuant to the terms hereof) shall constitute loans made to Borrower under this Agreement, evidenced by the Note and this Agreement and secured by the other Loan Documents, and interest shall be computed thereon, as prescribed by this Agreement and the Note, from the date of the Advance, whether or not an Advance made to the Title Company is fully disbursed by the Title Company or is withheld in full or in part.
3.1
General
Subject to Section 6.2(e), Agent reserves the right, exercisable after the occurrence of an Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default exists, to make advances of amounts which are allocated to any of the designated items in the Sworn Construction Cost Statement for such other purposes or in such different proportions as Agent may, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, deem necessary or advisable.
No advance shall constitute a waiver of any condition precedent to the obligation of the Lenders to make any further advance. All conditions precedent to the obligation of the Lenders to make any advance are imposed hereby solely for the benefit of Agent and the Lenders, and no other party may require satisfaction of any such condition precedent or shall be entitled to assume that Agent and the Lenders will make or refuse to make any advance in the absence of strict compliance with such condition precedent.
Lenders may advance to themselves, when due after the occurrence of an Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default exists, from the proceeds of the Loan, without further order or request from Borrower, all interest payable to the Lenders under the terms hereof or of the Note, and shall, at Agent's option, advance to Agent all other sums then due under this Agreement or under any of the other Loan Documents, including but not limited to fees, attorneys' fees, Inspecting Architect's fees and all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by Agent in connection with this Agreement and the other Loan Documents. After the occurrence of an Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default exists, Agent shall also have the right, but not the obligation, to advance and directly apply the proceeds of the Loan to the satisfaction of any of Borrower's other obligations hereunder or under any of the other Loan Documents.
In the event that the total amount of the Loan exceeds the amount needed to fully pay all cost allocations set forth on the Sworn Construction Cost Statement approved by Agent, Agent and the Lenders shall not be required to advance, and Borrower shall not be entitled to receive, the excess. Upon extension of the Maturity Date as herein provided, Borrower shall not be entitled to borrow, and Agent and the Lenders shall not be obligated to advance, additional proceeds of the Loan.
 
. Agent and the Lenders shall not be obligated to make any advance of Loan proceeds unless and until Borrower has provided Agent with evidence, acceptable to Agent, that the Loan is in balance: .., that all remaining unpaid costs of the Property for the remaining period until the Maturity Date, as determined by Agent, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, including the Reserves, do not exceed the sum of the amount of the Loan proceeds not yet advanced by the Lenders, the remaining amount, if any, to be contributed in respect of the Equity Requirement, and the net operating income from the Property reasonably projected to be received during such period. The initial amount of the Reserves has been designated in the Sworn Construction Cost Statement. The required amount of said Reserves shall decline as costs and payments for which they are maintained are paid therefrom; provided, however, that the amount of any such Reserves shall never decline below an amount sufficient to pay all costs and payments for which it is maintained which then remain unpaid, as determined by Agent. If the Reserves become depleted, such depletion shall not limit Borrower's obligation hereunder to pay all sums which otherwise would have been payable from such Reserves.
3.2
Loan In Balance
i
e
Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, in the event that Agent or Borrower determines in good faith that the Loan is not in balance, it shall notify the other party hereto of such determination, and Borrower shall, within ten (10) Business Days, deposit with Agent funds equal to said insufficiency in order to bring the Loan back into balance. Said funds shall be disbursed by Agent pursuant to and in accordance with the disbursement procedures set forth in this Agreement prior to any advances by Agent or the Lenders of additional Loan proceeds.
. Agent, the Title Company, the Inspecting Architect, Consultants and their representatives shall have access to the Property at all reasonable times and shall have the right to enter the Property and to conduct such inspections thereof as they shall reasonably deem necessary or desirable for the protection of the interests of Agent and the Lenders.
3.3
Inspections
Agent may retain the Inspecting Architect, and any other consultants deemed necessary or desirable by Agent, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, at Borrower's expense, to make periodic inspections of the Property and to review all change orders relating to the Property. Agent may request the Inspecting Architect, before any advance of Loan proceeds is made, to inspect all work and materials for which payment is requested and all other work upon the Property, review the current Draw Request, approve such work and Draw Request and/or submit to Agent a progress inspection report. Agent may also retain such other Consultants as Agent reasonably deems necessary or convenient to perform such services as may, from time to time, be required by Agent in connection with the Loan, this Agreement, the other Loan Documents or the Property.
Neither Borrower nor any third party shall have the right to use or rely upon the reports of the Inspecting Architect or any other reports generated by Agent or its Consultants for any purpose whatsoever, whether made prior to or after commencement of construction. Borrower shall be responsible for making its own inspections of the Property during the course of construction and shall determine to its own satisfaction that the work done and materials supplied are in accordance with applicable contracts with its contractors. By advancing funds after any inspection of the Property by Agent or the Inspecting Architect, Agent shall not be deemed to waive any Event of Default, waive any right to require construction defects to be corrected, or acknowledge that all construction conforms with the Plans.
Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, in the event that Agent should determine in good faith that the actual quality or value of the work performed or the materials furnished does not correspond with the quality or value of the work required by the Plans, Agent shall
 
notify Borrower of its objections thereto, and, as soon as reasonably practicable, Borrower shall correct the conditions to which Agent objects if such conditions are not in accordance with the Plans.
. It is expressly understood and agreed that neither Agent nor the Lenders assume any liability or responsibility for the sufficiency of the Loan proceeds to complete the Property, for protection of the Property, for the satisfactory completion of the Property, for inspection during construction, for the adequacy or accuracy of the Sworn Construction Cost Statement, for any representations made by Borrower, or for any acts on the part of Borrower or its contractors to be performed in the construction of the Property.
3.4
Responsibility of Agent and the Lenders
.
3.5
Advance Procedures
(a) Borrower shall submit to Agent a copy of the Sworn Construction Cost Statement for the Property, and shall advise Agent of the names of each Contractor providing goods or services in connection with the development and construction of the Improvements. If requested by Agent, Borrower shall also furnish to Agent a copy of each contract with each of the Contractors. Borrower shall keep the Agent advised at all times of the names of all Contractors, and of the type of work, material or services and of the dollar amount covered by each of their respective contracts with Borrower or with the General Contractor. It is understood that only Contractors whose names, contract descriptions and, after a request therefor, contracts have been furnished to Agent shall be entitled to receive disbursements of Loan proceeds under this Agreement. Borrower shall also provide or cause to be provided to Agent a date down of the Title Policy.
(b) Borrower shall either (a) refrain from commencing construction of, and from accepting delivery of materials for, the Property prior to the recording of the Deed of Trust, or (b) provide such evidence and/or documents to the Title Company as shall be sufficient to secure from the Title Company priority insurance over all possible mechanic's lien claims, relating to construction of the Improvements that may have commenced prior to the recording of the Deed of Trust.
(c) Subject to the provisions of this Section 3.5(c), Borrower may obtain advances for disbursement to Contractors only to the extent of the amount of the contract work satisfactorily completed or materials actually incorporated into the Property by each such Contractor in accordance with his contract, less retainage determined and held in accordance with the terms of the Construction Contract. Borrower agrees that all sums requested hereunder for disbursement to each Contractor shall not exceed that amount; provided, however, Agent will, at Borrower's request, make Advances for materials, supplies and equipment purchased for the Improvements stored on-site, or off-site within the continental United States, in either case which materials will largely be those made specifically for inclusion in the Improvements rather than being stock goods, the aggregate of which Advances shall not at any time exceed $2,500,000, and otherwise in accordance with the provisions of the balance of this Section 3.5(c).
Borrower may not obtain advances for disbursement to Contractors for the cost of materials acquired for the Property and stored on-site but not yet incorporated therein, unless Agent has received and approved (i) such financing statements and other documents and evidence as Agent may reasonably require sufficient to create, perfect and protect a first lien on said materials (including, but not limited to, lien searches) which such documents and evidence Agent shall request, to the extent Agent determines them to be necessary, promptly after receipt of the applicable Draw Request Form, (ii) evidence that upon payment therefor Borrower has acquired title to the same and that the same are covered by all risk insurance covering 100% of the total value of said materials, with Agent, Borrower and the General Contractor as named insureds under the policy; (iii) such materials are reasonably protected against theft or damage as determined by the Inspecting Architect; (iv) the Inspecting Architect
 
has viewed and inspected such materials; and (v) in the opinion of the Inspecting Architect, the stored materials are physically secured and can be incorporated into the Improvements within ninety (90) days. Each request for an advance of Loan proceeds for materials to be stored on-site shall constitute Borrower's representation to Agent and Lenders that the conditions set forth in items  above in this paragraph have been satisfied.
(i) through (v)
Borrower may not obtain advances for disbursement to Contractors for the cost of materials acquired for the Property and stored off-site but not yet incorporated therein, unless Agent has received and approved (i) such security agreements, financing statements and other documents and evidence as Agent may reasonably require sufficient to create, perfect and protect a first lien on said materials including, but not limited to, lien searches which materials Agent shall request, to the extent Agent determines them to be necessary, promptly after receipt of the applicable Draw Request Form, (ii) evidence that Borrower has acquired title to the same and that the same are covered by all risk insurance covering 100% of the total value of said materials for all periods until delivery of the same to the Property, with Agent, Borrower and the General Contractor as named insureds under the policy; (iii) information regarding the place of storage therefor on the Land, in a secure or bonded warehouse or at other facilities or locations off the Property reasonably acceptable to Agent (the Agent agreeing for this purpose that the premises of the supplier or subcontractor from which the materials are being obtained shall be an acceptable location); (iv) certification from the supplier or subcontractor that the materials are stored in a secure manner at a location separate from any materials not owned by Borrower and are clearly identified as owned by Borrower and subject to a security interest in favor of Agent on behalf of the Lenders; and (v) a written statement from the holder of said materials to the effect that Borrower and/or the General Contractor, or their representatives may freely inspect said materials at all reasonable times upon reasonable advance notice (Borrower agreeing that, for this purpose, Agent and the Inspecting Architect shall be identified to such holder as such a representative). Each request for an advance of Loan proceeds for materials to be stored off-site shall constitute Borrower's representation to Agent and Lenders that the conditions set forth in items  above in this paragraph have been satisfied.
(i) through (v)
Borrower covenants to deliver to Agent, within ten (10) days of any such Advance: (A) for materials owned by Borrower outright, (x) paid bills and original warehouse receipts or other documents of title which correspond to the materials so purchased and stored, (y) a statement from the seller of said materials to the effect that title thereto has passed to Borrower outright, and that no lien has or will be filed or claimed by the seller in connection therewith and (z) a certificate of Borrower to the effect that said materials are owned by Borrower outright, free and clear of all liens other than the lien held by or on behalf of Lenders and that all of the applicable terms of this paragraph have been complied with and (B) for materials for which the advance was paid as a down payment or deposit, (1) paid bills and original warehouse receipts, as applicable, which correspond to the materials to which a deposit or down payment was made, (2) a statement from the seller of said materials to the effect that all payments due and payable with respect to such materials have been paid, together with lien waivers, if appropriate, in connection therewith, and (3) a certificate of Borrower to the effect that all of the applicable terms of this paragraph have been complied with (the representations set forth above and the statements contained in such certificates shall be deemed to be "representations and warranties" of Borrower with the same force and effect as if they had been set forth in and the accuracy thereof shall be subject to independent verification by Agent and the Inspecting Architect).
Article IV
Agent and the Lenders shall not be required to make the final advance for the payment of the full amount of each Contractor's contract until Agent is satisfied that such Contractor's portion of the work on the Improvements has been completed in accordance with the approved Plans, and compliance with all requirements set forth in this Agreement.
 
(d) Whenever Borrower desires to obtain an advance of Loan proceeds, Borrower shall submit a signed Draw Request, in the form of hereto or such other form as Agent may reasonably require, to Agent and to the Inspecting Architect at least ten (10) Business Days prior to the date on which the requested advance is to be made ("") and within three (3) Business Days after receipt thereof, Agent shall provide a complete copy of such Draw Request (including the supporting detail provided pursuant hereto) to the Lenders. Borrower shall also simultaneously submit to Agent the following:
Exhibit K
Advance Date
(1) A certificate (which may be incorporated in or attached to the Draw Request) relating to each Contractor who is to receive a disbursement from the advance, signed by the Project Architect, or by another construction supervisor approved by Agent (provided that in the case of Contractors engaged directly by Borrower, such certification shall be made by Borrower), stating that each such Contractor has satisfactorily completed the work for which disbursement (less any required retainage) is requested in such Draw Request. Such certificate shall be provided on AIA Form G702/703.
(2) An unconditional waiver of mechanic's lien and/or materialman's lien, executed by the General Contractor and each direct subcontractor of the General Contractor to which any portion of the immediately preceding advance ("") of Loan proceeds was paid, covering liens for all work done and materials supplied for which disbursement was made from the Prior Advance, in the form required by Agent and, if appropriate, the Title Company. Such waivers shall be submitted in each case, unless the Agent determines that such Advance does not include payment for any lienable work. Agent hereby approves the form of lien waiver attached hereto as .
Prior Advance
Exhibit J
(3) To the extent not yet fully contributed, evidence satisfactory to Agent of the contribution, since the date of the last Advance, of additional equity in respect of the Equity Requirement, in an amount not less than the amount of the Requested Advance.
(4) Such other supporting evidence as may be reasonably requested by the Agent to establish the cost or value of the Improvements for which disbursement is to be and has been made.
(e) Prior to the initial disbursement of Loan proceeds, upon Completion of the Improvements, and prior to the final disbursement for construction costs of the Improvements, Borrower shall furnish to Agent and the Title Company six (6) copies of an acceptable survey, showing the exact location of the Improvements. When the foundation for the Improvements is completed, Borrower shall furnish to Agent and the Title Company six (6) copies of a wall check survey in form and substance satisfactory to Agent. Disbursements shall be made by the Agent only if the Title Company has confirmed in writing its willingness to insure over any adverse matters shown by such survey (to the extent such affirmative coverage is acceptable to Agent) or such matters are otherwise addressed to the satisfaction of Agent.
Agent and/or Borrower shall provide notice to the Title Company when Agent has determined that a requested Advance is approved, at which time the Title Company shall date down its examination of title. The Title Company shall (i) give Agent immediate notice by telephone if any intervening liens are disclosed (other than those expressly listed in the Title Company's loan policy of title insurance or subsequent amendments thereto previously given to Agent), and (ii) on the date of each Advance, deliver to Agent a written continuation of said loan policy of title insurance, dated as of the relevant Advance Date, insuring the priority of the lien of the Deed of Trust in an amount equal to advances made by the Lenders through such date. If any such intervening liens or other matters, which are not bonded over by Borrower or otherwise permitted by this Agreement and may, in Agent's or the Majority Lenders' reasonable determination, jeopardize the Lenders' security interest in the Property, are
 
disclosed by said continuation or are in any other manner discovered by the Title Company or Agent, the Agent may (or shall, upon the written direction of the Majority Lenders), refrain from making further disbursements until Agent (following withdrawal of Majority Lenders' written direction to refrain from further disbursements, if applicable) notifies the Title Company that such intervening liens or other matters have been waived by the Agent or the Majority Lenders, as applicable, or satisfied. Upon demand of Agent, Borrower shall promptly cause any such liens or other matters to be satisfied of record or bonded, or shall make other arrangements with respect to the discharge thereof or other protection with respect thereto satisfactory to Agent.
On each Advance Date, if all the terms and conditions of this Agreement have been complied with by Borrower, to the satisfaction of Agent, if no default or Event of Default exists hereunder or under any of the other Loan Documents, Agent shall advance to Borrower (or, at Borrower's direction, to the General Contractor) in a manner satisfactory to the Agent, the principal amount of the requested advance (less any required retainage, if applicable, and less amounts payable to and advanced by Agent to itself and the Lenders).
(g) The provisions of this Agreement requiring submission of the Architect's Certificate and related documents and the required retainage shall not apply with respect to Loan proceeds to be disbursed for the items listed below, which may be disbursed in full upon submission of a Draw Request listing such items signed by Borrower or Agent and/or the following special documentation, if any, to Agent or as otherwise provided by this Agreement:
 
If Borrower directly pays certain costs of construction, the Agent may disburse Loan proceeds, advanced for payment of such construction costs, directly to Borrower, as a reimbursement for such payment; provided that all of the other requirements of this Agreement, including, but not limited to, the presentation of waivers of lien with respect thereto, are fulfilled.
 
(h) Agent may take such steps as it may deem appropriate, at its option, to verify the application of Loan proceeds to work done and material furnished for the Property, and to vary the disbursement procedures herein set forth, if the same becomes necessary or desirable, in Agent's sole discretion exercised in good faith, to assure the proper application of Loan proceeds and/or to preserve the first lien status of the Deed of Trust with respect to disbursements made pursuant hereto, including, but not limited to, making disbursements directly to subcontractors after the occurrence of an Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default exists. However, Agent shall not be obligated to conduct any such verification or to so vary said procedures.
(i) The Borrower shall keep records showing the names of all Contractors and other payees to whom disbursements of Loan proceeds are made, the date of each disbursement, and the amount of each disbursement, which records may be inspected by Agent.
(j) In the event that the Agent shall determine, in its reasonable judgment, that proper documentation to support a given disbursement, as required by this Agreement, has not been furnished, the Agent shall withhold payment of all or such portion of such disbursement as shall not be so supported by proper documentation, and shall promptly notify Borrower of the discrepancy in or omission of such documentation. Such funds shall remain available for advancement under this Agreement, if the requirements hereof with respect thereto are later met.
(k) Borrower shall be responsible for making inspections of the Property during the course of construction, and shall determine to its own satisfaction that the work done or material supplied by the Contractors to whom disbursements are to be made out of each advance has been properly done or supplied in accordance with applicable contracts with such Contractors. The Title Company and the Agent shall not be required to conduct any inspections of the Property.
(l) It is expressly understood and agreed that neither Agent nor any Lenders assume any liability or responsibility for the satisfactory completion of the Improvements, for the adequacy of funds advanced or disbursed pursuant hereto to complete the Improvements, for inspections during construction, or for any acts on the part of Borrower or the Contractors to be performed in the construction of the Improvements.
. Agent will not advance Loan proceeds to pay costs of Tenant Improvements for any non-residential rentable space within the Property unless and until, in addition to the other conditions to such advance as provided in this Agreement, Agent has approved the lease covering said space (to the extent required by the Loan Documents) and has received from the tenant a tenant estoppel certificate, in Agent's form, confirming the existence and terms of the lease and such other matters as Agent may request (or such other form as may be specified by the applicable lease if such lease was approved by Agent), and a budget covering the costs of such Tenant Improvements. If such costs exceed the amount set forth therefor on the schedule of standard tenant improvements furnished by Borrower and approved by Agent, Borrower shall pay said excess, in cash, before Agent will advance Loan proceeds to pay the same. As soon as practicable following the completion of the Tenant Improvements for any non-residential space within the Property, Borrower shall deliver to Agent a tenant estoppel certificate from the applicable tenant, in Agent's form, confirming the continued existence of the lease, the absence of any default thereunder, the completion of such tenant improvements to the tenant's satisfaction, the occupancy of the leased space by the tenant and such other matters as Agent may reasonably require.
3.6
Tenant Improvements
. All income from the Property shall be used first to pay operating expenses of the Property in accordance with the then applicable Operating Budget for the Property prepared by Borrower and approved by Agent and then to pay interest on the Loan, before any
3.7
Advances During Property Operation
 
proceeds of the Loan shall be advanced to pay interest on the Loan. If, as and when the income from the Property is sufficient, in the determination of Agent, to pay (i) all of the operating expenses of the Property in accordance with such approved Operating Budget, and (ii) all interest on the Loan as and when such interest becomes due and payable, then, from and after such event, no further Advances from the Interest Reserve shall be made or permitted, and any remaining balance in the Interest Reserve shall not be reallocated and shall be terminated and the Committed Amount shall be reduced accordingly.
IV.
REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF BORROWER
Borrower represents and warrants to Agent and the Lenders that:
. Borrower is a limited partnership duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Maryland, duly qualified to transact business under the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia, and has all power, authority, permits, consents, authorizations and licenses necessary to carry on its business, to construct, equip, own and operate the Property and to execute, deliver and perform this Agreement and the other Loan Documents; the Guarantor is the sole managing general partner of Borrower; all resolutions of the general partner of Borrower necessary to authorize the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and of the other Loan Documents which have been or are to be executed by and on behalf of Borrower have been duly adopted and are in full force and effect; and this Agreement and such other Loan Documents have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by and on behalf of Borrower so as to constitute this Agreement and such other Loan Documents the valid and binding obligations of Borrower, enforceable in accordance with their terms, subject only to the effects of applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium and other similar laws affecting the rights of creditors generally, principles of equity and exercise of judicial discretion.
4.1
Legal Status of Borrower
. Borrower is the owner, in fee simple, of the Land, subject to no lien, charge, mortgage, deed of trust, restriction or encumbrance, except the Permitted Encumbrances.
4.2
Title
. The consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and the execution, delivery and/or performance of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents will not result in any breach of or constitute a default under any mortgage, deed of trust, lease, bank loan, credit agreement, or other instrument or violate any Governmental Requirements, to which Borrower is a party, or by which Borrower may be bound or affected.
4.3
No Breach of Applicable Agreements or Laws
. As of the date hereof, there are no actions, suits, proceedings or investigations pending or, to the knowledge of Borrower, threatened in writing against Borrower or the Property, or involving the validity or enforceability of the Loan Documents or the priority of the lien thereof, at law or in equity; in any court or before any federal, state, municipal or other governmental agency, in an amount greater than or equal to $500,000, except as previously disclosed to Lender; and Borrower is not in default with respect to any order of any court or governmental agency having jurisdiction over Borrower.
4.4
No Litigation or Defaults
. The financial statements of Borrower and the Guarantor previously or hereafter delivered to Agent fairly and accurately present, or will fairly and accurately present, the financial condition of Borrower and the Guarantor, as of the dates of such statements, and neither this Agreement nor any document, financial statement, financial or credit information, certificate or statement referred to herein or furnished to Agent by Borrower or the Guarantor contains, or will contain, any untrue statement of a material fact or omits, or will omit, a material fact, or is or will be misleading in any material respect.
4.5
Financial and Other Information
 
. There is, and, until the Lenders have been fully repaid the entire indebtedness evidenced or to be evidenced by the Note, there will be, no default or Event of Default on the part of Borrower under the Loan Documents or under any other document, including, without limitation, the Proffers and the Leadership Agreements, to which Borrower is a party and which relates to the ownership, occupancy, use, development, construction or management of the Property. Neither Borrower nor Guarantor is, nor will be, in default beyond applicable notice, grace or cure periods under any instrument or agreement under and subject to which any recourse indebtedness in excess of $100,000.00 in the aggregate or any nonrecourse indebtedness in excess of $10,000,000.00 in the aggregate for borrowed money has been issued or is secured.
4.6
No Defaults under Loan Documents or Other Agreements
. The exterior lines of the Improvements are, and at all times will be, within the boundary lines of the Land (except for such encroachments as are otherwise addressed to the satisfaction of Agent), and Borrower has examined and is familiar with all applicable covenants, conditions, restrictions and reservations, and with all applicable Governmental Requirements, including, but not limited to, building codes and zoning, environmental, hazardous substance, energy and pollution control laws, ordinances and regulations affecting the Property, and the Property will in all material respects conform to and comply with said covenants, conditions, restrictions, reservations and Governmental Requirements. All Governmental Requirements necessary for the subdivision, development and construction of the Improvements as contemplated by the Plans and this Agreement have been obtained, or with respect to construction will be obtained before the applicable phase of construction commences.
4.7
Boundary Lines; Conformance with Governmental Requirements and Restrictions
. The Loan is in balance, or, if not, Borrower is prepared to deposit with Agent, immediately upon demand by Agent, sufficient funds to bring the Loan into balance.
4.8
Loan in Balance
. To the best of Borrower's knowledge, the information set forth in the Architect's Certificate is true, accurate and complete.
4.9
Architect's Certificate
4.10 .
Anti-Terrorism Regulations
(a) . None of Borrower, Guarantor or any Affiliate is in violation of any Anti-Terrorism Law or engages in or conspires to engage in any transaction that evades or avoids, or has the purpose of evading or avoiding, or attempts to violate, any of the prohibitions set forth in any Anti-Terrorism Law.
General
(b) . None of Borrower, Guarantor or any Affiliate, or their respective agents acting or benefiting in any capacity in connection with the Loan or other transactions hereunder, is any of the following (each a ""):
Executive Order No. 13224
Blocked Person
(1) a Person that is listed in the annex to, or is otherwise subject to the provisions of, Executive Order No. 13224;
(2) a Person owned or controlled by, or acting for or on behalf of, any Person that is listed in the annex to, or is otherwise subject to the provisions of, Executive Order No. 13224;
(3) a Person or entity with which any Bank is prohibited from dealing or otherwise engaging in any transaction by any Anti-Terrorism Law;
 
(4) a Person or entity that commits, threatens or conspires to commit or supports "terrorism" as defined in Executive Order No. 13224;
(5) a Person or entity that is named as a "specially designated national" on the most current list published by the U.S. Treasury Department Office of Foreign Asset Control at its official website or any replacement website or other replacement official publication of such list; or
(6) a Person or entity who is affiliated or associated with a person or entity listed above.
(c) None of Borrower, Guarantor or any Affiliate, nor any of their agents acting in any capacity in connection with the Loan, any letters of credit or other transactions hereunder (i) conducts any business or engages in making or receiving any contribution of funds, goods or services to or for the benefit of any Blocked Person, or (ii) deals in, or otherwise engages in any transaction relating to, any property or interests in property blocked pursuant to Executive Order No. 13224.
(d) Neither the Borrower nor any Affiliate, nor any person owning an interest therein, are a "Special Designated National" or "Blocked Person" as those terms are defined in the office of Foreign Asset Control Regulations (31 C.F.R.  500 .).
et. seq
. is a true, correct and complete list of all plans and specifications for the Project as of the date hereof.
4.11
Plans and Specifications
Exhibit M
THE WARRANTIES AND REPRESENTATIONS IN THIS , AND ANY ADDITIONAL WARRANTIES AND REPRESENTATIONS CONTAINED HEREIN AND IN THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS, SHALL BE DEEMED TO HAVE BEEN RENEWED AND RESTATED BY BORROWER AT THE TIME OF EACH REQUEST BY BORROWER FOR AN ADVANCE OF LOAN PROCEEDS.
ARTICLE IV
V.
COVENANTS OF BORROWER
While this Agreement is in effect, and until the Lenders have been paid in full the principal of and interest on all advances made by the Lenders hereunder and under the other Loan Documents:
. The parties hereto acknowledge that construction of the Project has commenced. Borrower shall become a party to no contract for an amount in excess of $500,000, or more than one contract for any one contractor for an amount in excess of $1,000,000 in the aggregate, including the General Contractor's construction contract, for the performance of any work on the Property or for the supplying of any labor, materials or services for the construction of the Improvements and the Tenant Improvements, except upon such terms and with such parties as shall be approved in writing by Agent. No approval by Agent of any contract or change order shall make Agent and/or the Lenders responsible for the adequacy, form or content of such contract or change order. Borrower shall expeditiously complete the development and construction of the Improvements in a good and workmanlike manner and in accordance with the contracts, subcontracts and Plans submitted to and approved by Agent (to the extent required by this Agreement), and in compliance with all applicable Governmental Requirements, and any covenants, conditions, restrictions and reservations applicable thereto, so that Completion of the Improvements occurs on or before the Completion Date. Borrower shall not permit any approvals issued pursuant to applicable Governmental Requirements in connection with the development and construction of the Improvements to expire. Borrower assumes full responsibility for paying in full for the development and construction of the Improvements and for the compliance of the Plans and the Property with all
5.1
Completing Construction
 
Governmental Requirements and with sound building and engineering practices, and, notwithstanding any approvals by Agent, neither Agent nor any Lenders shall have any obligation or responsibility whatsoever for the Plans or any other matter incident to the Property or the construction of the Improvements. Borrower shall correct or cause to be corrected (a) any defect in the Improvements, (b) any departure in the construction of the Improvements from the Plans or Governmental Requirements, and (c) any encroachment by any part of the Improvements or any other structure located on the Land on any building line, easement, property line or restricted area unless such encroachment is either (i) contemplated by a Permitted Encumbrance or (ii) both minor in nature and addressed to the satisfaction of Agent. Borrower shall cause all roads necessary for the utilization of the Property for its intended purposes to be completed and dedicated (if dedication thereof is required by any governmental authority or pursuant to any Governmental Requirements), the bearing capacity of the soil on the Land to be made sufficient to support the Improvements, and sufficient local utilities to be made available to the Property and installed at costs (if any) set out in the Sworn Construction Cost Statement, on or before the Completion Date.
. Borrower shall deliver to Agent revised sworn statements of estimated costs of the Improvements, showing changes in or variations from the original Sworn Construction Cost Statement, as soon as reasonably practicable after such changes are known to Borrower. Borrower shall deliver to Agent a revised construction schedule, if and when there has been one or more delays in construction resulting in a net aggregate delay of thirty (30) days or more.
5.2
Changing Costs, Scope or Timing of Work
Borrower shall promptly furnish Agent with two (2) copies of all changes or modifications in the Plans, contracts or subcontracts for the Property, as approved by Agent, prior to incorporation of any such change or modification into the Property, whether or not Agent's consent to such change or modification is required hereby; provided that if Agent's prior consent was not required with respect to such change, Borrower shall deliver such change at the time of the next Draw Request. Borrower shall not make or consent to any change or modification in such Plans, contracts or subcontracts, and no work shall be performed with respect to any such change or modification, without the prior written consent of Agent, if such change or modification would in any material way alter the design or structure of the Improvements or materially change the rentable area thereof in any way, or increase or decrease the cost of the Improvements by $500,000.00 or more for any single change or modification, or if the aggregate amount of all changes and modifications increases the total amount set forth in the original Sworn Construction Cost Statement by more than $1,000,000.00; provided, however, that such increases or decreases in costs shall not include changes in the budget due to construction interest costs). Agent shall reply within ten (10) Business Days after receipt of (a) the request for approval of a change order from Borrower and (b) all information reasonably necessary for Agent and Inspecting Architect to evaluate such proposed change order. Agent shall promptly notify Borrower if the materials it has received in connection with any such request for approval are not sufficient to satisfy the condition set forth in clause (b) of the preceding sentence.
. Borrower shall furnish to Agent, within ten (10) days after a request therefor by Agent, (a) satisfactory evidence of Borrower's projected ability to pay all unpaid costs of completing the Improvements and operating the Property through the Maturity Date, which projection ("") shall include, among other things, the undisbursed Loan proceeds and net operating income from the Property reasonably projected to be received during the term of the Loan, and/or (b) except as otherwise set forth in the definition of the term "Equity Requirement", cash equal to any difference between such unpaid costs and Projected Sources, which shall be held and advanced by Agent pursuant to the terms hereof.
5.3
Balancing the Loan
Projected Sources
 
. Borrower shall pay and discharge, when due, all taxes, assessments and other governmental charges upon the Property, as well as all claims for labor and materials which, if unpaid, might become a lien or charge upon the Property; provided, however, that Borrower shall have the right to contest the amount, validity and/or applicability of any of the foregoing in strict accordance with the terms of the Deed of Trust.
5.4
Paying Costs of Property and Loan
Borrower shall also pay all costs and expenses of Agent (and, during periods when a default exists, the Lenders) and Borrower in connection with the Property, the preparation and review of the Loan Documents and the making, closing, administration and repayment of the Loan, and, reasonable costs incurred in connection with any transfer of the Loan, including, but not limited to, the fees of Agent's attorneys (which, at times when no default exists, shall be limited to reasonable attorneys' fees), fees of the Inspecting Architect, appraisal fees, environmental fees, survey and title search fees, title insurance costs, disbursement expenses, and all other costs and expenses payable to third parties incurred by Agent (and, during periods when a default exists, the Lenders), or Borrower in connection with the Loan. Such costs and expenses shall be so paid by Borrower whether or not the Loan is fully advanced or disbursed.
. Borrower shall use the Loan proceeds solely to pay, or to reimburse Borrower for paying, costs and expenses shown on the Sworn Construction Cost Statement approved by Agent and incurred by Borrower in connection with the construction of the Improvements on the Land and the equipping of the Improvements, together with other expenses set forth on the Sworn Construction Cost Statement approved by Agent and such incidental costs and expenses relating thereto as may be approved from time to time in writing by Agent.
5.5
Using Loan Proceeds
No portion of the proceeds of the Loan shall be used, in whole or in part, for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any "" as such term is defined in Regulation U of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.
margin stock
. Borrower shall set up and maintain accurate and complete books, accounts and records pertaining to the Property in a manner reasonably acceptable to Agent and to the Title Company. Upon twenty-four (24) hours prior notice and during normal business hours, Borrower will permit representatives of Agent, the Inspecting Architect and the Title Company to have free access to and to inspect and copy all books, records and contracts of Borrower (other than any such records relating to prior financing secured by the Property). Any such inspection by Agent and/or the Inspecting Architect shall be for the sole benefit and protection of Agent and the Lenders, and Agent shall have no obligation to disclose the results thereof to Borrower or to any third party other than the Lenders.
5.6
Keeping of Records
. Borrower shall furnish to Agent such financial information concerning Borrower and Guarantor, and Borrower's and Guarantor's other assets and investments, as Agent may reasonably request, and shall furnish to Agent, at Borrower's sole cost and expense the following:
5.7
Providing Financial Information
(a) . Not later than one hundred ten (110) days after the end of each fiscal year, a consolidated balance sheet, a consolidated statement of profit and loss and consolidated statement of cash flows, as of the end of such fiscal year, for the Borrower and Guarantor, on a consolidated basis certified by independent accountants satisfactory to Agent as being complete and correct and fairly presenting the financial condition and results of operations as of the end of such year and for that fiscal year for Borrower and Guarantor together with a statement from the chief financial officer for Borrower and the Guarantor, in the forms attached hereto as and .
Fiscal Year
Exhibits O
P
 
(b) .
Fiscal Quarter
(i) Not later than forty five (45) days after the end of each fiscal quarter, ending March 31, June 30 and September 30, a balance sheet, statement of profit and loss and statement of cash flows for such fiscal quarter, for the Guarantor and its consolidated subsidiaries, to be prepared on an accrual basis and certified as complete and correct by the chief financial officer of such entities; and
(ii) Not later than forty five (45) days after the end of each fiscal quarter, a statement from the chief financial officer for the Borrower and the Guarantor, in the forms attached hereto as and , together with documentation showing all calculations necessary to support such statement.
Exhibits O
P
(c) . Copies of all 8Ks, 10Ks and 10Qs filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, the Maryland State Securities Commission, and any other state regulators regarding the Guarantor, which shall be delivered to Agent as and when filed or distributed; and
Securities Filings
(d) . Such other statements or reports as the Lenders may through Agent reasonably request in form and detail satisfactory to such Lenders.
Other
All such financial statements shall be in reasonable detail, shall be prepared in general accordance with GAAP (except that assets may be valued based on market value), or in accordance with another accounting method acceptable to Agent, and shall be certified as true, correct and complete by Borrower (by its chief financial officer) or Guarantor. In addition, Borrower shall permit Agent and each Lender to examine all of Borrower's and Guarantor's books and records pertaining thereto.
. Following Completion, Borrower shall deliver to Agent prior to the commencement of each fiscal year of the Property, an Operating Budget for the Property for said fiscal year. In addition, Borrower shall, by the fifteenth (15th) day of each calendar month, deliver to Agent an Operating Statement for the Property for the preceding calendar month, which shall specifically note all variations from the current Operating Budget. Borrower shall also deliver to Agent an annual Operating Statement for the Property within one hundred twenty (120) days following the end of each fiscal year thereof. All such Operating Statements shall be certified as true, correct and complete by Borrower.
5.8
Providing Operating Budgets and Operating Statements
. As soon as available and in any event within forty-five (45) days after the close of each fiscal quarter of Borrower, Borrower shall furnish to Agent a leasing status report on the Property for the preceding fiscal quarter, which shall specifically include a summary of all letters of intent and leasing proposals received or issued by Borrower, a rent roll for Leases then in effect, and such other leasing information reasonably required by Agent. All such leasing reports shall be certified as true, correct and complete by Borrower and in the same form as previously provided to Agent.
5.9
Providing Leasing Information
All Leases entered into after the date hereof (i) which are for greater than (a) five thousand (5,000) square feet of office space, or (b) three thousand five hundred (3,500) square feet of retail space, or (ii) that do not materially conform to Borrower's standard lease form (whether for residential, office, or retail) approved by Agent in writing, or (iii) that contain terms or conditions that deviate from the Leasing Guidelines for such space, shall be upon terms and with tenants approved in writing by Agent (and by the Majority Lenders with respect to any Lease for office space in excess of 20,000 square feet or any Lease for retail space in excess of 5,000 square feet) prior to Borrower's execution of any such Lease. Borrower shall seek Agent's approval of any Lease requiring such approval
 
by delivering, via personal delivery or certified mail, a letter requesting such approval, and such financial information regarding the proposed tenant as Agent requests. If Agent has not responded to any such request for approval within seven (7) Business Days after Agent's receipt of such request together with any such requested financial information, Borrower shall have the right to send a written notice (the "") to Agent marked, in conspicuous type, "" requesting that Agent respond to such request for approval. If Agent fails to either deny or approve such request for approval in writing within three (3) Business Days from Agent's receipt of such Second Request, Agent and, where such approval is required, the Majority Lenders, shall be deemed to have approved such request. As to any Leases not requiring Agent's approval, Borrower shall, upon request, deliver financial information regarding such proposed tenant concurrently with its delivery of the first draft, as provided below. All Leases shall include estoppel, subordination, attornment and mortgagee protection provisions satisfactory to Agent. For each proposed Lease requiring Agent's consent, Borrower shall provide Agent with a copy of the final draft of such proposed Lease to be delivered to all parties thereto for execution, marked to show changes made from the form approved by Agent. Any amendment, supplement or modification of a Lease entered into solely to memorialize the exercise by a Tenant of an existing right or option set forth in the applicable Lease shall not require Agent's consent.
Second Request
Clarendon Center: Leasing Materials for Agent Review - SECOND REQUEST
. Upon completion of the foundation, and at such other times as Agent may deem appropriate in good faith, Borrower shall furnish to Agent six (6) copies of a certified survey of the Property, certifying that the Improvements are constructed within the property lines of the Land, do not encroach upon any easement affecting the Land (other than such encroachments which have been insured over to Agent's satisfaction or which have been approved as permissible by the other parties to such easement) and do comply with all applicable Governmental Requirements relating to the location of improvements, along with a letter from the Title Company confirming the acceptability of said survey.
5.10
Providing Updated Surveys
. Upon Completion of the Improvements, and prior to the final advance of Loan proceeds to pay for hard costs of construction of the Property (except for Tenant Improvements), including, but not limited to, any retainage therefor, and as a condition of the same, Borrower shall furnish Agent with all items required to evidence Completion, including unconditional occupancy permits; a final, certified Property "as-built" survey (six [6] copies); certification from the Borrower and Project Architect on AIA Form G704 that the Property has been substantially completed in accordance with the approved Plans; final lien waivers (which may be conditioned on payment) from the General Contractor, and all subcontractors with respect to the work performed in connection with the construction and equipping of the Improvements, provided that final, unconditional lien waivers shall be delivered to Agent as soon as practicable thereafter; the evidence of insurance required by hereof; copies of all warranties covering materials, equipment and appliances included within the Property; copies of all licenses and permits required for operation of the Property; and photographs of the completed Improvements.
5.11
Providing Evidence of Completion
Section 5.12
. Borrower shall, at all times until the Lenders have been fully repaid all indebtedness evidenced by the Note, maintain, or cause to be maintained, in effect (and, upon request, shall furnish to Agent copies of), insurance policies, as required under the terms of attached hereto, and shall furnish to Agent proof of payment of all premiums for such insurance.
5.12
Maintaining Insurance Coverage
Exhibit G
. Borrower shall comply with and perform, in all material respects, all of its agreements and obligations under all contracts and agreements to which Borrower is a party relating to the ownership, occupancy, use, leasing, development, construction or
5.13
Complying with Other Documents
 
management of the Property (expressly including, without limitation, the Leadership Agreements and the Proffers), and shall comply with all requests by Agent which are consistent with the terms thereof.
Borrower shall at all times comply with its covenants and agreements under Section 5.8 of that certain Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 19, 2007, by and among Borrower, as borrower, Agent, as agent, and certain other parties thereto, as it may have been and hereafter may be from time to time modified, amended, restated, supplemented or replaced (the ""), which evidences a $150,000,000 revolving credit facility, the provisions of which Section 5.8 are hereby incorporated herein by reference as if fully set forth herein. Borrower acknowledges and agrees that it shall be an Event of Default hereunder and under the Loan Documents in the event that Agent declares an "Event of Default" under the Revolving Credit Agreement for failure to comply with the covenants and obligations set forth in Section 5.8 of the Revolving Credit Agreement, within the cure periods provided therein. In the event that such facility is terminated, Borrower shall continue to be bound by the covenants set forth in Section 5.8 of the Revolving Credit Agreement in effect thereunder as of the date immediately prior to such termination, until such time as the obligations of the Borrower hereunder have been fully and finally satisfied. Borrower shall cause the Guarantor to at all times comply with its covenants and agreements under of the Guaranty.
5.14 .
Financial Covenants
Revolving Credit Agreement
Section 19
. Borrower may (but shall not be required to) purchase an Interest Rate Hedge in form and substance acceptable to Agent at the time of Closing or within ninety (90) days thereafter. Any request thereafter is subject to Agent's approval.
5.15
Interest Rate Protection Agreement
.
5.16
ERISA
(a) Borrower hereby represents and warrants that none of its assets are, for purposes of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, and any applicable regulations or guidance promulgated thereunder ("") or Section 4975 of the Code, considered assets of a Plan. Lender hereby represents and warrants that the source of funds for the Loan are not the assets of a Plan or the plan assets of a Plan. For purposes hereof, "" shall mean any "plan" as defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA that is subject to any provision of Title I of ERISA and any plan as defined in Section 4975 of the Code that is subject to any provision of such section.
ERISA
Plan
(b) Borrower hereby covenants and agrees that, for so long as the Loan remains outstanding:
(i) In addition to the prohibitions set forth in the Loan Documents, and not in limitation thereof, Borrower shall not assign, sell, pledge, encumber, transfer, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of its interest or rights in any of the Loan Documents or in the Property, or attempt to do any of the foregoing or suffer any of the foregoing, if such proposed action will result in a prohibited transaction under ERISA or the Code; and
(ii) Borrower shall take and cause to be taken all necessary actions so that at all times the assets of Borrower shall not be considered for any purpose of ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code to be assets of a Plan.
(c) Borrower shall indemnify and hold Agent and Lenders free and harmless from and against all loss, costs (including reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses), taxes, damages and expenses Agent or any Lender may suffer by reason of the investigation, defense and settlement of claims, and in obtaining any prohibited transaction exemption under ERISA necessary in Agent's reasonable judgment, by reason of the inaccuracy of the foregoing representations and warranties of
 
Borrower or a breach of the foregoing covenants of Borrower of this . The obligations of Borrower under this subparagraph (c) shall survive the payment in full of the Loan or other satisfaction thereof.
Section 5.16
(d) Lender hereby covenants and agrees that, for so long as the Loan remains outstanding, it will not (in addition to the prohibitions set forth in the Loan Documents, and not in limitation thereof), assign, sell, pledge, encumber, transfer, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of any interest in the Loan to a Plan or to an entity the assets of which constitute the plan assets of a Plan.
(e) No Pension Plan sponsored, maintained or contributed to by Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates has an accumulated funding deficiency (whether or not waived) under Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA.
(f) Neither Borrower nor any ERISA Affiliate has any unsatisfied liability for withdrawal liability with respect to any Pension Plan which is a Multiemployer Plan.
. Borrower hereby covenants and agrees to promptly notify Agent if Borrower learns that any of the information contained in the Architect's Certificate is untrue, inaccurate or incomplete. If such deficiency requires correction of the Plans and/or the Improvements, Borrower shall thereupon correct the Plans and/or the Improvements so as to ensure that the Improvements are or will be constructed in accordance with all Governmental Requirements. Provided there exists no Event of Default, Borrower shall have the right to determine the best course of action to address such deficiency, including whether or not to bring suit against the Architect therefor, provided that Borrower shall give prior notice thereof to Agent and, to the extent Agent's consent is otherwise required under this Agreement, has obtained Agent's consent with respect thereto. Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default continues to exist, Agent shall have the right, with respect to any errors or omissions in the Architect's Certificate, to (x) pursue its remedies under the Assignment of the Plans and Related Agreements, (y) take such action against Architect in Borrower's name under the contract with the Project Architect (the "") as may be appropriate in Agent's sole discretion or (z) to collect amounts payable by Architect to Borrower pursuant to any claim made by Borrower under the Architect's Contract, which amounts are hereby assigned to Agent as additional collateral for the Loan, provided that Borrower shall have the right to retain and apply such amounts as it determines prior to an Event of Default. For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this Section, Borrower irrevocably appoints Agent its attorney-in-fact, with full power of substitution, to execute and deliver all such documents, to pay and receive such funds, and to take such action as may be necessary, in the judgment of Agent, to pursue said claims against Architect which rights shall be exercisable only after the occurrence of an Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default exists. This power of attorney is coupled with an interest and is irrevocable. Agent, however, shall have no obligation to undertake any of the foregoing.
5.17
Claim Against Architect
Architect's Contract
The parties hereby agree that any amounts payable pursuant to a claim (the "") against the Architect or its insurer to Borrower pursuant to the Architect's Contract shall, after an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing under the Loan, be payable directly to Agent from the Architect or its insurer. Borrower hereby authorizes and directs the Architect to pay or cause its insurer to pay the Claim Payment to Agent upon written notice from Agent that an Event of Default has occurred under the Loan Documents, without the need to obtain further consent of Borrower, without any obligation to determine whether a default has in fact occurred and regardless of whether Agent has taken possession of any portion of the Property or assumed Borrower's rights and obligations under the Architect's Contract. Any such payment to Agent shall constitute payment to Borrower under the Architect's Contract.
Claim Payment
 
Any amounts collected by Agent under this shall be deemed additional collateral for the Loan and may be applied by Agent, during any time when an Event of Default exists under the Loan, to the secured indebtedness in such manner and order as Agent may elect.
Section 5.17
Without the prior written consent of Agent and the Majority Lenders, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed, Borrower shall not enter into, or amend any material economic term of, any agreement providing for the management, leasing or operation of the Property or Improvements. Any other amendment of any such agreement shall require the prior written consent of Agent, not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed. If required by Agent, Borrower shall assign, pursuant to an agreement in form and substance reasonably acceptable to Agent, its interest under any such agreement to Agent as security for Borrower's obligations under the Loan Documents, and, if required by Agent, Borrower shall cause the management party to such agreement to consent to such assignment and subordinate its interest in the Property to the Deed of Trust and the Loan.
5.18 .
Management Agreements
5.19 .
Private Restrictions
(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in Section 1.9 of the Deed of Trust, the following language is hereby added to the end of the first (1st) sentence of such Section:
; and provided further, however, that with respect to any Private Restrictions for which the Title Company has issued affirmative coverage as part of the Title Policy, Grantor's failure to comply with such Private Restrictions shall not constitute a breach of, or default under, this Deed of Trust until such time (if at all) as (i) a court of competent jurisdiction shall have issued a binding order or judgment (the execution of which has not been stayed pending appeal) enjoining further non-compliance with such Private Restrictions (an ""), and (ii) Grantor fails to comply with such Private Restrictions in compliance with the terms of such order or judgment. For so long as Borrower is not in strict compliance with such Private Restrictions, Borrower shall (w) provide written notice to Agent within two (2) Business Days of receiving written notice of the commencement or threatened commencement of any action or proceeding to enforce such Private Restrictions, (x) at all times from and after the commencement of any such action or proceeding, diligently pursue a full, final and favorable resolution of any such action or proceeding, (y) upon Agent's written request from time to time, furnish to Agent cash or other security reasonably satisfactory to Agent for payment of Agent's anticipated costs and expenses to be incurred in connection with such action or proceeding, and (z) keep Agent fully informed of the progress of any such action or proceeding until the final, non-appealable disposition thereof. In no event shall the foregoing limit Borrower's obligation to comply at all times with Governmental Requirements.
Order
(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in Section 1.19 of the Deed of Trust, the following language is hereby added to the end of the first (1st) sentence of such Section:
; or (v) Grantor's failure to comply with any Private Restrictions for which the Title Company has issued affirmative coverage as part of the Title Policy.
(c) At any time after issuance of an Order (which remains binding), Agent may, at its option and at Borrower's expense, prepare or obtain a revised valuation of the Property based on the then-most recent appraisal of the Property (assuming completion and stabilization). The value shown in such appraisal shall be referred to herein as the "." Such revised valuation shall assume that any specific space within the Property then being used (or immediately prior to issuance of the Order
Unrestricted Value
 
was being used) by a restaurant or other user serving alcohol in alleged violation of the Private Restrictions is, instead, used for general retail purposes and shall assume a market rental for such general retail use, taking into account (a) down time, (b) demolition/reconstruction costs (tenant improvement costs), (c) leasing commissions, (d) marketing costs, (e) management expenses and overhead, (f) any other applicable expenses. The value thus determined for the Property shall be referred to herein as the "." If Agent reasonably determines that the Loan to Value Ratio (as defined below) is less than or equal to seventy-five percent (75%), then Borrower shall amend the Loan Documents to reduce the Committed Amount (but in no event shall the amount of such reduction in the Committed Amount exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the amount by which the Restricted Value is less than the Unrestricted Value) and, if necessary, pay a principal curtailment on the Loan, within ninety (90) days after receipt of notice from Agent that such principal curtailment is required, in an amount sufficient to reduce the Principal Balance to the reduced Committed Amount. If, after any such amendment, such Order expires, is terminated or otherwise no longer remains binding (in Agent's reasonable determination), then at Borrower's written request and provided that no Event of Default then exists, and subject to the other terms and conditions of this Agreement, the parties hereto shall amend the Loan Documents to increase the Committed Amount by the amount of the prior curtailment, upon which amendment such previously curtailed amount shall be available to be re-disbursed to Borrower in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement. For purposes of the foregoing, the term "" shall mean the ratio obtained by dividing (i) the Committed Amount by (ii) the Restricted Value, as reasonably determined by Agent in accordance with this subsection (c).
Restricted Value
Loan to Value Ratio
. The USA Patriot Act of 2001 (Public Law 107-56) and federal regulations issued with respect thereto require all financial institutions to obtain, verify and record certain information that identifies individuals or business entities which open an "account" with such financial institution. Consequently, Agent (for itself and/or as Agent for all Lenders hereunder) may from time-to-time request, and Borrower shall provide to Lender, Borrower's name, address, tax identification number and/or such other identification information as shall be necessary for Lender to comply with federal law. An "account" for this purpose may include, without limitation, a deposit account, cash management service, a transaction or asset account, a credit account, a loan or other extension of credit, and/or other financial services product.
5.20
USA Patriot Act Notice; Compliance
.Guarantor shall not amend its articles of incorporation without the prior written consent of Agent (except as may be expressly required by law or regulation).
5.21
Guarantor Articles of Incorporation
VI.
DEFAULTS
. Any of the following events shall constitute an "" under this Agreement:
6.1
Events of Default
Event of Default
(a) Default by Borrower in the payment of any payment of principal and/or interest required to be paid pursuant to the Note or default in the payment of any other amounts due under the Loan Documents, which default is not cured within five (5) days after the due date thereof.
(b) Default by Borrower in the performance or observance of any term, covenant or condition of this Agreement, the Deed of Trust, the Note or any of the other Loan Documents, other than a default described in above, which default continues for thirty (30) days after Agent has given written notice of such failure to Borrower. In the event that such default is susceptible of cure but is not cured within said thirty (30) days, so long as Borrower is diligently and continuously pursuing such
Subsection (a) 
 
cure, as evidenced to Agent's satisfaction, Agent shall permit Borrower an additional thirty (30) days to effectuate such cure.
(c) Any representation or warranty made by Borrower in this Agreement, in any of the other Loan Documents, or in any certificate or document furnished under the terms of this Agreement or in connection with the Loan, shall be untrue or incomplete in any material respect.
(d) (i) Work on the Improvements shall be substantially abandoned, or shall, by reason of Borrower's fault, be delayed or discontinued for a period of fifteen (15) consecutive days, or construction shall be delayed for any reason whatsoever, in each instance to the extent that Completion of the Improvements cannot, in the reasonable judgment of Agent, be accomplished prior to the Completion Date and (ii) Borrower fails to cure such delay or to establish to the satisfaction of Agent that Completion of the Improvements can be accomplished prior to the Completion Date, within thirty (30) days after notice of such default from Agent.
(e) Borrower shall commit an act of bankruptcy; or shall apply for, consent to or permit the appointment of a receiver, custodian, trustee or liquidator for it or any of its property or assets; or shall fail to, or admit in writing its inability to, pay its debts as they mature; or shall make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors or shall be adjudicated bankrupt or insolvent; or shall take other similar action for the benefit or protection of its creditors; or shall give notice to any governmental body of insolvency or pending insolvency or suspension of operations; or shall file a voluntary petition in bankruptcy or a petition or an answer seeking reorganization or an arrangement with creditors, or to take advantage of any bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, readjustment of debt, rearrangement, dissolution, liquidation or other similar debtor relief law or statute; or shall file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any proceeding under any such law or statute; or shall be dissolved, liquidated, terminated or merged; or shall effect a plan or other arrangement with creditors; or a trustee, receiver, liquidator or custodian shall be appointed for it or for any of its property or assets and shall not be discharged within ninety (90) days after the date of his appointment; or a petition in involuntary bankruptcy or similar proceedings is filed against it and is not dismissed within ninety (90) days after the date of its filing.
(f) Agent determines that the Loan is not in balance and, at Agent's option, Borrower (i) fails to deposit with Agent, promptly upon demand, sufficient funds to permit Agent to pay excess costs of the Property as the same become payable or (ii) does not pay said excess costs directly and deliver to Agent unconditional mechanics' lien waivers therefor (or paid receipts for non-lienable items), at Agent's option.
(g) A trustee or receiver is appointed for the Property or any portion thereof, for Borrower, for any assets, or an involuntary petition in bankruptcy or insolvency is filed against Borrower and is not discharged within ninety (90) days after such appointment or filing.
(h) Any assignment of this Agreement or the proceeds of the Loan by Borrower voluntarily, by operation of law or otherwise, without the unanimous prior written consent of the Lenders.
Upon the occurrence of any Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default continues to exist, unless such Event of Default is subsequently waived in writing by Agent, Agent shall be entitled, at the option of Agent, to exercise any or all of the following rights and remedies, consecutively or simultaneously, and in any order:
6.2
Rights and Remedies.
(a) Lenders may make one (1) or more further advances of Loan proceeds, without liability to make any subsequent advances thereof.
 
(b) Lenders may suspend their obligation to make advances under this Agreement, without notice to Borrower.
(c) Lenders may terminate their obligation to make advances under this Agreement, and Agent may declare the entire unpaid principal balance of the advances made under this Agreement to be immediately due and payable, together with accrued and unpaid interest on such advances, without notice to or demand on Borrower.
(d) Agent may exercise any or all remedies specified herein and in the other Loan Documents, including (without limiting the generality of the foregoing) the right to foreclose the Deed of Trust, and/or any other remedies which it may have therefor at law, in equity or under statute.
(e) Agent may cure the Event of Default on behalf of Borrower, and, in doing so, may enter upon the Property, and may expend such sums as it may deem desirable in Agent's good faith judgment (provided that such amount shall not exceed $2,000,000 in the aggregate with the prior written consent of the Majority Lenders), including attorneys' fees, all of which shall be deemed to be advances hereunder, even though causing the Loan to exceed the face amount of the Note, shall bear interest at the Default Rate and shall be payable by Borrower on demand.
. In addition, in case of the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default caused by, or which results in, Borrower's failure, for any reason, to continue with construction of the Improvements as required by this Agreement, then Agent may (but shall not be obligated to), in addition to, or in concert with, the other remedies referred to above, take over and complete construction of the Improvements in accordance with the Plans, with such changes therein as Agent may, in its discretion exercised in good faith, deem appropriate, all at the risk, cost and expense of Borrower. Agent may assume or reject any contracts entered into by Borrower in connection with the Property, may enter into additional or different contracts for work, services, labor and materials required, in the judgment of Agent, to complete the Property, and may pay, compromise and settle all claims in connection with the Property. All sums, including attorneys' fees, and charges or fees for supervision and inspection of the construction and for any other necessary or desirable purpose in the discretion of Agent expended by Agent and/or the Lenders in completing or attempting to complete the Improvements (whether aggregating more, or less, than the face amount of the Note), shall be deemed advances made by the Lenders to Borrower hereunder, and Borrower shall be liable to Agent on behalf of the Lenders, on demand, for the repayment of such sums, together with interest on such sums from the date of their expenditure at the rates provided herein. Agent may, in its discretion, at any time abandon work on the Property, after having commenced such work, and may recommence such work at any time, it being understood that nothing in this Section shall impose any obligation on Agent or any Lender either to complete or not to complete the Improvements. For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this Section, Borrower irrevocably appoints Agent its attorney-in-fact, with full power of substitution, to execute and deliver all such documents, to pay and receive such funds, and to take such action as may be necessary, in the judgment of Agent, to complete the construction of the Improvements which rights shall be exercisable only after the occurrence of an Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default exists. This power of attorney is coupled with an interest and is irrevocable. Agent, however, shall have no obligation to undertake any of the foregoing, and, if Agent does undertake any of the same, neither Agent nor the Lenders shall have any liability for the adequacy, sufficiency or completion thereof.
6.3
Completion of Property by Agent
 
VII.
MISCELLANEOUS
. The provisions of this Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, personal representatives, legal representatives, successors and assigns; provided, however, that neither this Agreement nor the proceeds of the Loan may be assigned by Borrower voluntarily, by operation of law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of Agent. No delay on the part of Agent in exercising any right, remedy, power or privilege hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any right, remedy, power or privilege hereunder constitute such a waiver or exhaust the same, all of which shall be continuing. The rights and remedies of Agent specified in this Agreement shall be in addition to, and not exclusive of, any other rights and remedies which Agent would otherwise have at law, in equity or by statute, and all such rights and remedies, together with Agent's rights and remedies under the other Loan Documents, are cumulative and may be exercised individually, concurrently, successively and in any order.
7.1
Binding Effect; Waivers; Cumulative Rights and Remedies
. All agreements, representations and warranties made in this Agreement shall survive the execution of this Agreement, the making of the advances by the Lenders, and the execution of the other Loan Documents, and shall continue until Agent on behalf of the Lenders receives payment in full of all indebtedness of Borrower incurred under this Agreement and under the other Loan Documents.
7.2
Survival
. This Agreement, the rights of the parties hereunder and the interpretation hereof shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia in all respects. Borrower hereby waives any right to a trial by jury in any action relating to the Loan and/or the Loan Documents.
7.3
Governing Law; Waiver of Jury Trial
. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, all of which shall constitute a single agreement.
7.4
Counterparts
. Any notice required or permitted to be given by either party hereto to the other under the terms of this Agreement, or documents related hereto, may be given by personal delivery or recognized overnight courier, and shall be deemed to have been received one business day after the date the same is sent. Such notice shall be addressed to the party to which the notice is to be given at the address set forth opposite its name on the signature page below (or, as applicable, in the Assignment and Assumption Agreement by virtue of which an Assignee Lender becomes a party to this Agreement), or at any other address specified in a notice given by such party to the other not less than ten (10) days prior to the date on which such address change becomes effective for purposes of this Agreement.
7.5
Notices
. Agent may, if it so desires, place a sign of reasonable size on the Land, indicating that Agent and the Lenders are providing financing for the Property, and/or may otherwise publicize its involvement with the Property, including, but not limited to, issuing press releases.
7.6
Agent's Sign
. No third party shall be entitled to rely upon this Agreement or to have any of the benefits of Agent's and the Lenders' interest hereunder, unless such third party is an express assignee of all or a portion of the interest of Agent and/or any Lender hereunder.
7.7
No Third Party Reliance
. Time is of the essence hereof with respect to the dates, terms and conditions of this Agreement.
7.8
Time of the Essence
 
. This Agreement, the other Loan Documents and the other documents mentioned herein set forth the entire agreement of the parties with respect to the Loan and supersede all prior written or oral understandings and agreements with respect thereto. No modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement shall be effective unless set forth in writing and signed by the parties hereto.
7.9
Entire Agreement; No Oral Modifications
. The headings or captions of the Articles and Sections set forth herein are for convenience only, are not a part of this Agreement and are not to be considered in interpreting this Agreement.
7.10
Captions
. If Borrower consists of more than one (1) individual and/or entity, each of said individuals and/or entities shall be jointly and severally liable for each covenant, agreement, representation and warranty of Borrower hereunder.
7.11
Joint and Several Liability
. The relationship between Borrower, Agent and the Lenders created hereby and by the other Loan Documents shall be that of a borrower and a lender only, and in no event shall Agent and/or the Lenders be deemed to be a partner of, or a joint venturer with, Borrower.
7.12
Borrower's Relationship with Agent and the Lenders
. As additional security for the payment of the Obligations, Borrower hereby grants to each Lender a security interest in, a lien on and an express contractual right to Set-Off. The Lenders may, at any time upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default hereunder or under the other Loan Documents Set-Off against the Obligations whether or not the Obligations (including future installments) are then due or have been accelerated, all without any advance or contemporaneous notice or demand of any kind to Borrower, such notice and demand being expressly waived.
7.13
Right of Set-Off
VIII.
AGENCY PROVISIONS
.
8.1
Agency
(a) . Each Lender hereby appoints and authorizes Agent to act as sole administrative agent under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, authorizes and directs Agent to enter into the Loan Documents other than this Agreement for the benefit of the Lenders, and authorizes the Agent to take such action on its behalf under the provisions of this Agreement and the Loan Documents and to exercise such powers as are set forth herein or therein, together with such other powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. In furtherance thereof, Lenders hereby ratify the execution and delivery by Agent of this Agreement, the acceptance by Agent of all of the other Loan Documents and the terms and conditions of the Loan Documents. The Agent hereby accepts such appointment as administrative agent. Agent shall exercise all rights and powers of Agent under this Agreement, including the administration of the Loan and disbursement of Advances, except as otherwise expressly provided in this Agreement. The Borrower, without further inquiry or investigation, shall, and is hereby authorized by the Lenders to, assume that all actions taken by the Agent hereunder and in connection with or under the Loan Documents are duly authorized by the Lenders.
Appointment and Authorization
Each Lender hereby agrees that, except as set forth in Section 8.4(a) or as otherwise set forth herein, any action taken by the Majority Lenders in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement or the other Loan Documents, and the exercise by the Majority Lenders of the powers set forth herein or therein, together with such other powers as are reasonably incidental thereto, shall be authorized and binding upon all of the Lenders.
 
(b) .
Non-Liability of Agent and Indemnity; Non-Liability for Force Majeure
(1) Agent shall have no duties or responsibilities except those expressly set forth in this Agreement or in the other Loan Documents. Agent shall administer the Loan in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement in the same manner as it customarily does for similar loans for its own account. The duties of the Agent shall be mechanical and administrative in nature; the Agent shall not have by reason of this Agreement a fiduciary relationship in respect of any Lender; and nothing in this Agreement or any Loan Document, expressed or implied, is intended to or shall be so construed as to impose upon the Agent any obligations in respect of this Agreement or any Loan Document except as expressly set forth herein or therein. Neither Agent nor any of its respective directors, officers, agents or employees shall be liable to any Lender for any action taken or not taken by them under or in connection with this Agreement or under any of the other Loan Documents. In this regard, Agent may consult with independent legal counsel, accountants and other professionals or experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it or them in good faith in accordance with the advice of such legal counsel, accountants or other professionals or experts. In the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, Agent shall not be liable for any apportionment or distribution of payments made by it in good faith pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, and if any such apportionment or distribution is subsequently determined to have been made in error, the sole recourse of any person to whom payment was due, but not made, shall be to recover from the recipients of such payments any payment in excess of the amount to which they are determined to have been entitled.
(2) In the event the Agent is not reimbursed and indemnified by the Borrower, within ten (10) Business Days of demand therefor by Agent, each Lender will reimburse and indemnify the Agent, and its directors, officers, agents and employees, in proportion to its respective Commitment Percentage of the Loan, for and against any claims, actions, judgments, costs, expenses or disbursements of whatsoever kind or nature which may be imposed on, asserted against or incurred by the Agent, or its directors, officers, agents, or employees in performing its duties hereunder or under any Loan Document; provided, however, that no Lender shall be liable for any of the foregoing to the extent that they arise from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the party to be indemnified. The obligations of the Lenders under this shall survive the payment in full of all obligations of Borrower and the termination of this Agreement.
Section 8.1(b)(2)
(3) No Lender or Agent shall be liable in any way to Borrower or any third party for Agent's or such Lender's failure to perform or delay in performing under the Loan Documents (and Agent or any Lender may suspend or terminate all or any portion of Agent's or such Lender's obligations under the Loan Documents) if such failure to perform or delay in performing results directly or indirectly from, or is based upon, the action, inaction, or purported action, of any governmental or local authority, or because of war, rebellion, insurrection, strike, lock-out, boycott or blockade, or from any act of God or other cause or event beyond Agent's or such Lender's control.
8.2 .
Resignation of Agent; Removal
(a) U.S. Bank National Association or any successor agent may resign as Agent at any time by written notice delivered to the Borrower and the Lenders (if any). Such resignation shall be effective upon the earlier to occur of thirty (30) days following such notice or a successor's acceptance of appointment as the Agent. In addition, in the event of Agent's gross negligence or willful misconduct, Agent may be removed pursuant to the unanimous approval of all Lenders by giving thirty (30) days prior written notice to Agent and Borrower; provided, however, for purposes of calculating such unanimous approval in this context, Agent, in its capacity as a Lender, shall be deemed a Defaulting Lender and its Commitment Percentage shall therefore be disregarded and excluded for voting purposes only.
 
(b) In the case of any of the events described in , (A) the Majority Lenders shall appoint a successor Agent from among the Lenders so long as such successor meets the requirements described in and hereof; provided, however, that the resigning Agent shall be entitled to appoint a successor agent who, so long as no Event of Default exists hereunder, has been approved by Borrower, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed, and who meets the requirements of and as Agent, if the Majority Lenders have not appointed a successor within thirty (30) days after the date the resigning Agent gave notice of resignation; (B) upon a successor's acceptance of appointment (and assumption of the Agent's obligations hereunder arising after the date of such appointment), the successor will thereupon succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the resigning or removed Agent; (C) upon the effectiveness of any resignation or removal, the resigning or removed Agent will thereupon be discharged from the duties and obligations of Agent which thereafter arise under this Agreement; and (D) any resigning Agent shall have the benefit of any indemnities provided in the Loan Documents and this Agreement.
Section 8.2(a)
Sections 8.9(a)(2)
8.9(a)(3)
Sections 8.9(a)(2)
8.9(a)(3)
8.3 .
Administration
(a) . Each Lender shall reimburse the Agent for its Commitment Percentage of any expenses with respect to the administration, enforcement or collection of the Loan which are not reimbursed by the Borrower pursuant to and within the period required by the Loan Documents, or if not specified in the Loan Documents, promptly after the date of demand therefor made by the Agent. The Agent shall have the right, but not the obligation, to incur such expenditures prior to reimbursement therefor by the Lenders.
Expenses
(b) . Except for the Note executed in favor of each Lender and for Loan Documents sent for filing or recording (which are not returned following recording), Agent shall hold and maintain a duplicate set of all original Loan Documents. The Agent shall promptly deliver to each Lender a duplicate original of this Agreement and a copy or counterpart execution copy of each Loan Document (other than any fee letter solely between Agent and Borrower). The Agent shall promptly forward to each Lender a copy of each financial statement of Borrower or other financial statement for the Property received from Borrower. Agent shall promptly forward to such Lender each financial statement of Borrower and Guarantor received by Agent. The Lenders may, upon reasonable prior notice and during the Agent's normal business hours, inspect and make copies of such books and records of Agent that relate to this Loan.
Documents; Information; Inspection
8.4 .
Actions by Agent; Required Consents
(a) Except as specified below, Agent shall exercise its sole discretion to act or not to act under the Loan Documents and the appropriate action with respect thereto. Such discretion may be exercised with respect to the granting of approvals, consents, and modifications under the Loan Documents and with respect to the exercise or refraining from exercise of rights under the Loan Documents.
(b) Notwithstanding , the following matters shall require the prior consent of all of the Lenders:
Section 8.4(a)
(1) any change (other than as currently contemplated in the Loan Documents) in the interest rate under the Loan;
 
(2) any reduction in the amount of any payment of any fees other than fees paid solely to the Agent;
(3) release of any portion of the Property or other collateral;
(4) release of any guarantor or other obligor under any Loan Document;
(5) any change (other than by operation of the Loan Documents) in the Maturity Date of the Loan or in the conditions for any extension of the Maturity Date;
(6) any release, termination, modification or amendment of any indemnity provided in the Loan Documents;
(7) any forgiveness of principal, interest or other amounts payable under the Loan (other than late fees up to three (3) times per annum) or any extension of time for payment of principal or interest;
(8) any increase in the Committed Amount or the Loan;
(9) any amendment to this ;
Section 8.4(b)
(10) any amendment to the definitions of Majority Lenders or Commitment Percentages;
(11) any change in Commitment Percentages (excluding any change as a result of assignments permitted under )
Section 8.9
(c) Notwithstanding , the prior consent of the Majority Lenders shall be required for (1) any proposal from Borrower that Agent approve a Contractor under a contract with a value in excess of $1,500,000.00 to the extent such contract will not be bonded and (2) the acceleration of any indebtedness under the Loan Documents, or the pursuit of remedies against the Borrower or Guarantor;
Section 8.4(b)
(d) In case one or more Events of Default have occurred and shall be continuing, and whether or not acceleration of the Loan shall have occurred, the Agent shall, if (a) so requested by the Majority Lenders and (b) the Lenders have provided to the Agent such additional indemnities and assurances against expenses and liabilities as the Agent may reasonably request, proceed to enforce the provisions of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and exercise all or any such other legal and equitable and other rights or remedies as it may have in respect of enforcement of the Lenders' rights against the Borrower under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents. The Majority Lenders may direct the Agent in writing as to the method and the extent of any such enforcement, the Lenders (including any Lender which is not one of the Majority Lenders so directing the Agent in writing) hereby agreeing to ratably and severally indemnify and hold the Agent harmless from all liabilities incurred in respect of all actions taken or omitted in accordance with such directions, provided that the Agent need not comply with any such direction to the extent that the Agent reasonably believes the Agent's compliance with such direction to be unlawful or commercially unreasonable in any applicable jurisdiction.
.
8.5
Payments
 
(a) . Lenders and Agent specifically agree to the following operational and administrative procedures as between themselves:
Interest Rates and Disbursement Matters
(1) that the LIBOR Rate (as established from time to time) shall in each instance be the rate established from time to time by U.S. Bank National Association.
(2) Agent shall notify each Lender by telephone or facsimile of the LIBOR Rate two (2) Business Days prior to the date on which the LIBOR Rate shall be effective. Agent shall notify each Lender by telephone or facsimile of its Commitment Percentage of a proposed Advance of the Loan and the date of such disbursement two (2) Business Days prior to such disbursement with respect to disbursements which are to bear interest at the LIBOR Rate, such notice to be delivered by facsimile. Each Lender shall deposit by wire transfer of immediately available funds to Agent's account as specified on hereto the amount of such Commitment Percentage no later than 10:00 a.m. (Central time) on the date of such disbursement.
Exhibit H
Unless Agent shall have been notified by any Lender not later than the close of business (Central time) on the Business Day immediately preceding the date for funding in respect of any Advance that such Lender does not intend to make available to Agent such Lender's Commitment Percentage of such Advance, Agent may assume that such Lender has made such amount available to Agent. In any case where a Lender does not for any reason make available to Agent such Lender's Commitment Percentage of such Advance, Agent, in its sole discretion, may, but shall not be obligated to, fund to Borrower such Lender's Commitment Percentage of such Advance. If the amount so funded by Agent is not in fact made available to Agent by the responsible Lender, then such Lender hereby assigns to Agent any payments received by Agent from Borrower in repayment of such amount, together with interest thereon at the rate applicable to such Advance.
(3) If any Lender fails to deliver funds to Agent for a disbursement by the time required by above, such Lender shall pay to Agent interest on such funds (x) at the Federal Funds Rate, as announced by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, for each day (or portion thereof) until such funds are delivered. Any interest paid pursuant to this section shall be divided among the Lenders which funded the applicable disbursement.
subsection (2) 
(4) Agent shall wire transfer to each Lender at such Lender's account as designated on hereto its Commitment Percentage of any payments (to the extent payable pursuant to ) within one (1) Business Day of Agent's receipt of such payment. Agent shall pay to the Lenders interest thereon, at the Federal Funds Rate from the Business Day following receipt of such funds by Agent until such funds are paid in immediately available funds to the Lender.
Exhibit H
Section 8.5(b)
(5) Any Lender desiring to make a claim for costs or taxes payable by Borrower shall deliver a certificate to Agent setting forth the basis and calculation thereof and the Agent shall forward such certificate to the Borrower. Except as provided in the Loan Documents, each Lender shall be responsible for any taxes payable in respect of amounts paid hereunder. All payments made by Agent to Lenders shall be made without withholding for taxes, charges, or levies, except as may be required by law. Each Lender shall on demand from Agent provide completed and signed copies of certificates required to show exemption of such Lender from United States withholding taxes.
(b) . Except to the extent otherwise provided in hereof, all payments made and actually received by the Agent in respect of the Loan (from any person or source) shall be applied in the following order of priority (based on Commitment Percentages thereof):
Application of Recoveries
Section 8.6
 
(1) to the reimbursement of any costs incurred by the Agent to administer, enforce, collect or deal with the Loan (including payments made pursuant to hereof (or to reimbursement of the Lenders to the extent such costs have been paid by the Lenders);
Sections 8.5(a)(2) and (3) 
(2) to the repayment of any Protective Advances (to the extent not paid pursuant to  above);
clause (1)
(3) to the payment of all interest (including interest calculated at the Default Rate) due and payable on the Note;
(4) to the payment of fees payable under the Loan Documents; and
(5) to the payment of principal of the Note.
(c) . If any Lender shall obtain any payment (whether voluntary, involuntary, through the exercise of any right of set-off or otherwise) on account of its interest in the Loan in excess of its Commitment Percentage in the Loan, such Lender will make such disposition and arrangements with the other Lenders with respect to such excess, either by way of distribution, pro tanto assignment of claims, subrogation or otherwise, as shall result in each Lender receiving in respect of the Note held by it its proportionate payment as contemplated by this Agreement; provided, however, that if all or any portion of such excess payment is thereafter recovered by the Borrower or other party entitled thereto through legal action or otherwise, each Lender shall reimburse the party returning such excess payment in an amount equal to such Lender's Commitment Percentage of the excess payment.
Excess Payments
(d) . If in the reasonable opinion of the Agent the distribution of any amount received by it in such capacity hereunder or under any of the other Loan Documents might involve it in material liability, it may refrain from making distribution until its right to make distribution shall have been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction, provided that the Agent shall invest any such undistributed amounts in overnight obligations on behalf of the Lenders and interest thereon shall be paid pro rata to the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitment Percentages. If a court of competent jurisdiction shall adjudge that any amount received and distributed by the Agent is to be repaid, each Person to whom any such distribution shall have been made shall either repay to the Agent its proportionate share of the amount so adjudged to be repaid or shall pay over the same in such manner and to such Persons as shall be determined by such court.
Liability for Advances
. If, following any Event of Default, Agent acquires title to the Property by foreclosure under the Deed of Trust (or by deed in lieu of such foreclosure) or Agent realizes upon any other collateral for the Loan, Agent shall hold title to such collateral in its own name as Agent for the Lenders to the extent of their Commitment Percentages. Each Lender hereby irrevocably waives any right to seek a partition of any interests in the Property. Agent shall have the sole and exclusive right to make (or to refrain from making) all decisions with respect to, and to perform (or refrain from performing) all actions with respect to, the leasing, encumbering, use, operation, maintenance, improvement, repair and restoration of the Property (and any Improvements located thereon) or disposition of any other collateral; provided, however, that, notwithstanding anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary, Agent shall not, without the prior written consent of the Majority Lenders, (a) sell (or lease as a whole) the Property or encumber the Property with a mortgage, deed of trust or similar instrument securing indebtedness for borrowed money, or (b) make any single expenditure with respect to the Property in an amount in excess of $500,000 (exclusive of taxes and assessments, insurance premiums, utility charges and expenditures required to comply with applicable laws), or (c) dispose of any other collateral. Subject to the foregoing, each Lender, pro rata in accordance with its Commitment Percentage, shall reimburse
8.6
Management of Acquired Collateral
 
Agent, on demand, for all costs and expenses actually incurred by Agent in connection with the sale, lease, encumbering, use, operation, maintenance, improvement, repair and restoration of the Property (including all costs and expenses incurred by Agent to pay taxes and assessments, utility charges, insurance premiums, common area maintenance charges, leasing commissions, tenant improvement costs, repair costs and restoration costs). The indemnity provisions contained in above shall apply equally to actions (and omissions) by Agent with respect to the Property so acquired by Agent. Each Lender shall participate pro rata in accordance with their respective Commitment Percentage in all income, expenses, profits and losses of the Property.
Section 8.1(b)
.
8.7
Defaulting Lender
(a) . If for any reason any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then in addition to the rights and remedies that may be available to the Agent and the other Lenders at law and in equity, such Defaulting Lender's right to participate in the administration of the Loan and the Loan Documents, including, without limitation, any rights to consent to or direct any action or inaction of the Agent, shall be suspended during the pendency of such failure or refusal. Borrower acknowledges and agrees that (a) the obligations of the Lenders under this Agreement are several, (b) no Lender is or will be obligated to lend Borrower more than the amount set forth in hereto for such Lender, nor to fund any part of any advance except upon fulfillment of all applicable conditions precedent provided herein and in the other Loan Documents, (c) except to the extent expressly provided in this Agreement, Borrower shall have no recourse or claim against a non-defaulting Lender nor against Agent (so long as the same have otherwise complied with their obligations under this Agreement), for any deficiency or any liability, loss, damage or expense resulting from the default of a Defaulting Lender, and (d) the Commitment Percentage of the Committed Amount of any Lender shall not be increased or decreased as a result of the failure by any other Lender to perform its obligation to make an advance.
Defaults
Exhibit I
(b) . If for any reason the Defaulting Lender fails to make timely payment to any other party to this Agreement of any amount required to be paid to it hereunder, in addition to other rights and remedies which such other party may have under or otherwise, such other party shall be entitled (1) to collect interest from the Defaulting Lender for the period from the date on which the payment was due until the date on which the payment is made for each day during such period at the Federal Funds Rate, (2) to withhold or set off, and to apply to the payment of the defaulted amount and any related interest, any amounts to be paid to the Defaulting Lender under this Agreement, (3) to bring an action or suit against the Defaulting Lender in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover the defaulted amount and any related interest, (4) to arrange for the purchase of the Commitment Percentage of the Defaulting Lender as provided in , and (5) to advance funds on behalf of the Defaulting Lender as provided in .
Remedies
Section 8.7(a)
Section 8.7(d)
Section 8.7(e)
(c) . The Defaulting Lender shall indemnify, defend, and hold Agent and each of the other Lenders harmless from and against any and all losses, damages, liabilities, and expense (including attorneys' fees) which they may actually sustain or incur by reason of or in consequence of the Defaulting Lender's failure or refusal to abide by the terms of this Agreement.
Indemnity
(d) . If a Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, the other Lenders who are not Defaulting Lenders shall have the right, but not the obligation, in their sole discretion, to acquire (pro rata based on the Commitment Percentages of the Lenders exercising such right) all of such Defaulting Lender's right, title, and interest in and to the Loan. The purchase price shall be the principal and accrued interest allocable to the Defaulting Lender's Commitment Percentage of the Loan and shall be paid on the closing day of such purchase. On the date of closing of such purchase, the Defaulting Lender shall pay the Agent a processing fee of $3,500. The Defaulting Lender shall retain liability for all obligations in respect of the Loan and this Agreement arising prior to the date of transfer (but releasing
Purchase Right
 
Defaulting Lender's liability for all obligations in respect of the Loan and this Agreement arising from and after the date of transfer) and shall execute and deliver such documents as may be reasonably necessary to effect such transfer.
(e) . If a Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, the other Lenders may (pro rata based on the Commitment Percentages of the Lenders exercising such right), but are not obligated to, make advances to the Agent in the aggregate amount that the Defaulting Lender is obligated to advance under this Agreement. Such advances shall be treated as loans made to the Defaulting Lender, shall bear interest at the Default Rate (payable on demand), shall be due and payable upon demand, and shall be paid prior to any payment being made to the Defaulting Lender.
Default Loans
(f) . The exercise of the above remedies shall not reduce, diminish or liquidate the Defaulting Lender's obligation for the sharing of losses and reimbursement of costs, liabilities, and expenses under the Loan Documents and this Agreement. The obligations of the Defaulting Lender arising prior to any purchase pursuant to shall survive any such purchase.
Cumulative Remedies and Survival
Section 8.7(d)
.
8.8
Representations, Warranties and Acknowledgments
(a) . Each Lender represents and warrants, as of the date hereof, as follows:
Authorization, etc
(1) Such Lender has all necessary corporate power and authority to own its interest in the Loan and the Loan Documents, and has all necessary corporate power and authority to perform its obligations with respect to this Agreement and the Loan Documents;
(2) The execution and delivery of this Agreement and all other instruments and documents executed and delivered in connection therewith by such Lender have been duly authorized by all requisite corporate action of such Lender; and
(3) No approval, authorization, order, license or consent of, or registration of filing with, any governmental authority or other person is required in connection with such Lender's execution and delivery of this Agreement by such Lender.
(b) . Each Lender agrees that it has, independently and without reliance upon any other party hereto, or upon the directors, officers, agents or employees of any other party hereto, but only in reliance upon information supplied to it by or on behalf of the Borrower and upon such other information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own independent credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement and the Loan Documents. Without limiting the foregoing, each Lender acknowledges that it has received copies of the Loan Documents and financial statements, certificates, instruments, documents, affidavits, resolutions and agreements as it deems necessary to make its credit analysis and decisions in respect of the Loan. Each Lender also agrees that it shall, independently and without reliance upon any other party hereto, continue to make its own independent credit analyses and decisions in acting or not acting under the Loan Documents. Except as specifically provided herein, the Agent shall have no duty or responsibility, either initially or on a continuing basis, to provide any Lender with any credit or other information with respect thereto, whether coming into its possession before the Closing Date or at any time or times thereafter.
Independent Decision
(c) . Each Lender hereby acknowledges that, except as specifically set forth herein, Agent (i) makes no warranty or representation to Lenders for any statements, warranties or representations (written or otherwise, express or implied) made in or in connection with the Loan
No Reliance
 
Documents or for the financial condition of the Borrower or for the title or the value of any of the collateral for the Loan, and (ii) shall not be responsible to the Lenders for any recitals, statements, representations or warranties herein or for the due execution, effectiveness, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency, or collectibility of any of the Loan Documents or any other instrument or document furnished pursuant thereto or in connection with the Loan or the legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency, perfection or priority of any rights in all or any portion of the collateral for the Loan. The Agent shall not be bound to ascertain whether any notice, consent, waiver or request delivered to it by the Borrower or any holder of any Note shall have been duly authorized or is true, accurate and complete. Agent shall not be required to make any inquiry concerning either the performance or observance of any of the terms, provisions or conditions of this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents or the financial condition of the Borrower or any of its Affiliates, or the existence or possible existence of any Event of Default or any default which, with the giving of notice, passage of time, or both, would become an Event of Default.
.
8.9
Assignments; Participation
(a) . Any Lender may assign, without Agent or Borrower approval, to (i) any affiliate of such Lender all or a portion of its respective Commitment Percentage of the Loan, in such a manner as to create privity of contract between such affiliate and the Borrower and to make such affiliate a Lender for all purposes hereunder, or (ii) to any other Lender. Any Lender may assign to any entity which meets the following conditions ("") all or a portion of its respective Commitment Percentage of the Loan, in such a manner as to create privity of contract between such person and the Borrower and to make such person a Lender for all purposes hereunder:
Permitted Assignments
Assignee Lender
(1) The minimum portion of the total commitment which the assigning Lender may assign to an Assignee Lender shall be Five Million and 00/100ths Dollars ($5,000,000.00).
(2) An Assignee Lender (or its direct or indirect parent) shall be either (A) a commercial lender organized under the laws of the United States, or any state thereof, and having total assets in excess of Ten Billion Dollars ($10,000,000,000) or (B) a U.S. branch of a commercial bank organized under the laws of any other country which has total assets in excess of Ten Billion Dollars ($10,000,000,000) or (C) any other U.S. financial institution which has total assets in excess of Ten Billion Dollars ($10,000,000,000).
(3) The senior unsecured debt of an Assignee Lender (or its direct or indirect parent) shall have a rating of Baa-2 or higher from Moody's Investors Service, Inc. or a comparable rating agency.
(4) Such assignment shall have been approved by Agent and, so long as no Event of Default exists hereunder or under the other Loan Documents, by Borrower, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed.
(5) The Assignee Lender shall have paid to the Agent an administrative fee of $3,500.00 to process the admission of such Assignee Lender.
(6) The Assignee Lender shall not be Borrower or any of Borrower's Affiliates.
(b) . The Borrower and Agent may continue to deal solely and directly with the assigning Lender in connection with the interest so assigned to an Assignee Lender (or to an affiliate of such Lender) until such time as (i) written notice of such assignment, together
Assignment and Assumption
 
with payment instructions, addresses and related information with respect to the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) shall have been given to the Borrower and Agent by the assigning Lender and the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate); (ii) the assigning Lender and the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) shall have delivered to the Borrower and Agent an Assignment and Assumption.
Promptly following a request therefor, Borrower will execute and deliver to Agent an appropriate replacement promissory note or replacement promissory notes, in each case designated as such, in favor of each assignee (and assignor, if such assignor is retaining a portion of its Commitment Percentage and advances) reflecting such assignee's (and assignor's) Commitment Percentage Committed Amount. Promptly following the execution and delivery of such replacement promissory note(s) the original promissory note or notes evidencing all or a portion of the Commitment Percentage of the Committed Amount and advances being assigned shall be canceled and returned to Borrower.
(c) . Promptly following receipt by Agent of an executed Assignment and Assumption, Agent shall give notice to the Borrower and to the Lenders of: (i) the effectiveness of the assignment by the assigning Lender to the Assignee Lender (or the affiliate of the Lender); and (ii) the revised percentages and maximum amounts of the Commitment Percentage of the Committed Amount in effect as a result of such assignment.
Notice by Agent
(d) . Immediately upon delivery of the Assignment and Assumption to Agent, this Agreement shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, but only to the extent, necessary to reflect the addition of the Assignee Lender (or affiliate of the Lender) and the resulting adjustment of the Commitment Percentage arising therefrom. The Commitment Percentage of the Committed Amount assigned to each Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) shall reduce the Commitment Percentage of the Committed Amount of the assigning Lender by a like amount.
Adjustment of Shares
(e) . From and after the date upon which Agent notifies the assigning Lender that it has received an executed Assignment and Assumption: (1) the Assignee Lender (or the Lender's affiliate) thereunder shall be a party to this Agreement and, to the extent that rights and obligations hereunder have been assigned to it pursuant to such Assignment and Assumption, shall have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement; and (2) the assigning Lender shall, to the extent that rights and obligations under this Agreement have been assigned by it pursuant to such Assignment and Assumption, relinquish its rights and be released from its obligations under this Agreement.
Rights of Assignee
(f) . By executing and delivering an Assignment and Assumption, the Assignee Lender (or the Lender's affiliate) thereunder confirms and agrees as follows: (1) other than as provided in such Assignment and Assumption, the assigning Lender makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility with respect to any statements, warranties or representations made in or in connection with this Agreement or the execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of this Agreement, the Note or any other instrument or document furnished pursuant to the Loan; (2) the assigning Lender makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility with respect to the financial condition of the Borrower or any other parties or the performance or observance by the Borrower of any of its obligations under the Note and this Agreement; (3) the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) has received a copy of this Agreement, together with such other documents and information as the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into the Assignment and Assumption; (4) the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) will, independently and without reliance upon Agent, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under this Agreement; (5) the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) hereby appoints and authorizes Agent to take such action as administrative
Assignee's Agreements
 
agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under the Loan Documents and this Agreement as are delegated to Agent thereunder and hereunder, together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto; and (6) the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) agrees that it will perform all of the obligations which by the terms of this Agreement are required to be performed by it as a Lender and confirms the representations and warranties of the assigning Lender under this Agreement.
(g) . Any Lender may sell a participation interest in all or any portion of the Loan without the prior consent of the Agent and the other Lenders; provided, however, such participants shall have no independent voting rights. Such selling Lender shall remain responsible for the performance of it obligations hereunder, and the Borrower and Agent shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement.
Participations
. The Agent and each Lender may accept deposits from, lend money to, and generally engage in any kind of banking, trust or other business with Borrower or any affiliate of Borrower as if it were not performing the duties specified herein, and may accept fees and other considerations from the Borrower or any such affiliate for services in connection with this Agreement and otherwise without having to account for the same to the other parties hereto.
8.10
Other Business
. If the Agent requests in writing the consent or approval from the Lenders and any Lender does not respond to such request within ten (10) Business Days (or such other period as may be provided herein, including, without limitation, under Section 5.9), such Lender shall be deemed to have given such consent or approval.
8.11
Consents
. In its individual capacity as a Lender, U.S. Bank shall have the same obligations and the same rights, powers and privileges in respect to its Commitment Percentage and the Advances made by it, and as the holder of any Note as it would have were it not also the Agent.
8.12
Agent as Lender
. Agent and each Lender hereby agree that, upon learning of the existence of a default or an Event of Default, it shall (to the extent notice has not previously been provided) promptly notify the other parties to this Agreement (other than Borrower) thereof. The Agent hereby agrees that upon receipt of any notice under this provision it shall promptly notify the other Lenders of the existence of such default or Event of Default. Agent shall provide to Lenders copies of any notice of a default or an Event of Default which Agent delivers to Borrower.
8.13
Notification of Defaults and Events of Default
. The provisions of this are for the benefit of Agent, the Lenders, and other than the portions of and that pertain specifically to Borrower, Borrower shall have no right to rely on or enforce any of the provisions hereof; provided, however, the foregoing shall in no way limit Borrower's obligations under this . In performing its functions and duties under this Agreement, Agent shall act solely as Agent of the Lenders and does not assume and shall not be deemed to have assumed any obligation toward or relationship of agency or trust with or for Borrower or any other person.
8.14
No Reliance by Borrower
Article VIII
Sections 8.9(a)
8.9(b)
Article VIII
. Agent shall be entitled to rely upon any written notices, statements, certificates, orders or other documents, telecopies or any telephone message believed by it in good faith to be genuine and correct and to have been signed, sent or made by the proper person, and with respect to all matters pertaining to this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents and its duties hereunder or thereunder, upon advice of legal counsel (including counsel for Borrower), independent public accountants and other experts selected by it.
8.15
Reliance
 
. Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, without the need to comply with any of the formal or procedural requirements of this Agreement, including this , any Lender may at any time and from time to time pledge and assign all or any portion of its rights under all or any of the Loan Documents to a Federal Reserve Bank; provided that no such pledge or assignment shall release such Lender from its obligations thereunder. To facilitate any such pledge or assignment, Agent shall, at the request of such Lender, enter into a letter agreement with the Federal Reserve Bank in, or substantially in, the form of the exhibit to Appendix C to the Federal Reserve Bank of New York Operating Circular No. 10.
8.16
Pledge to Federal Reserve Bank
Section 8.16
.
8.17
Limitation of Liability
(a) Borrower shall be fully and personally liable for the payment of the indebtedness evidenced by or created or arising under the Loan Documents, and any judgment or decree in any action brought to enforce the obligation of the Borrower to pay such indebtedness shall be enforceable against the Borrower and any such judgment or decree shall be subject to execution upon and be a lien upon the assets of the Borrower; provided, however, that, recourse of Agent on behalf of the Lenders to the Borrower's assets other than any property encumbered by the Deed of Trust and the other Loan Documents (the "") for the repayment of the Loan shall be limited as follows:
Other Assets
(i) Upon satisfaction of the Pre-Leasing Test, recourse to the Other Assets for the repayment of outstanding principal under the Note ("") shall not exceed One Hundred Eighteen Million One Hundred Twenty-Five Thousand and 00/100ths Dollars ($118,125,000.00).
Principal
(ii) Upon Completion of the Improvements, recourse to the Other Assets for the repayment of Principal shall not exceed Ninety-Four Million Five Hundred Thousand and 00/100ths Dollars ($94,500,000.00).
(iii) Upon satisfaction of the Recourse Reduction Debt Service Test, recourse to the Other Assets for the repayment of Principal shall not exceed Sixty-Three Million and 00/100ths Dollars ($63,000,000.00).
In no event shall the preceding subparagraphs (i)(iii) be deemed to limit Borrower's obligations with respect to accrued interest or any other amounts other than Principal owing under the Loan Documents or hereunder.
The personal liability of Borrower for the repayment of Principal pursuant to this shall not be reduced as a result of Agent realizing upon any collateral furnished to Agent and the Lenders in connection with the Loan (except that there shall be only one satisfaction of all amounts due to the Lenders with respect to the Loan).
Section 8.17(a)
(b) Notwithstanding above, in no event shall recourse to the Other Assets be limited with respect to, and Borrower shall at all times remain fully and personally liable, and shall indemnify and reimburse Agent and the Lenders for, all actual liabilities, costs, losses, damages, expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees and disbursements, and court costs, if any), and claims suffered or incurred by Agent and/or the Lenders, to the extent of actual monetary loss, in connection with the Loan or the Property by reason of or in connection with any of the following:
Section 8.17(a)
(i) any misapplication or misappropriation of (A) rents received by Borrower from the Property after the occurrence of an Event of Default under the Loan Documents; (B) insurance proceeds, condemnation proceeds or tenant security deposits, in each case relating to the Property; or (C) proceeds from any sale of all or a portion of the Property;
 
(ii) any fraud or intentional misrepresentation of Borrower, Guarantor or any affiliated property manager or leasing agent in connection with the Loan, the Property or any request for any action or consent by Agent;
(iii) any sale, conveyance, mortgage, grant, lien, encumbrance, security interest, pledge, assignment or transfer of the Property (or any part or portion thereof) or any ownership interest in Borrower (direct or indirect, legal or equitable) in violation of Section 1.14 of the Deed of Trust;
(iv) any event or circumstance for which Borrower indemnifies Agent and/or the Lenders under the Indemnification Agreement;
(v) the failure of Borrower to apply operating revenues generated by the Property and received by Borrower or any affiliated property manager or leasing agent to pay any debt service, impounds, operating expenses and emergency capital expenditures or costs;
(vi) intentional removal or physical destruction of property (without the concurrent replacement thereof with property of at least equivalent value and utility) constituting any material portion of the Property, or any other intentional and material waste of any portion of the Property by Borrower;
(vii) Borrower or Guarantor (i) filing a voluntary petition under the Bankruptcy Code or any other Federal or state bankruptcy or insolvency law, or (ii) making an assignment for the benefit of creditors; or
(viii) Borrower (1) filing, or joining in the filing of, an involuntary petition against Borrower or Guarantor under the Bankruptcy Code or any other Federal or state bankruptcy or insolvency law, or (2) soliciting or causing to be solicited petitioning creditors for any involuntary petition against Borrower or Guarantor, or (3) filing an answer consenting to or otherwise acquiescing in or joining in any involuntary petition filed against Borrower or Guarantor by any other Person under the Bankruptcy Code or any other Federal or state bankruptcy or insolvency law, or (4) voting adversely to Agent's and/or the Lenders' interest in any proceeding under the Bankruptcy Code or any other state or Federal bankruptcy or insolvency law which involves Borrower or Guarantor or any portion of the Property, or (5) consenting to or acquiescing or joining in an application for the appointment of a custodian, receiver, trustee or examiner for Borrower or Guarantor or any portion of the Property (unless such action is at the written request of Agent and/or the Lenders).
(c) Nothing contained in this shall affect or limit the ability of Agent on behalf of the Lenders to enforce any of their rights or remedies with respect to any property encumbered by the Deed of Trust and the other Loan Documents, nor shall anything contained in this affect or limit the rights of Agent and the Lenders to proceed against any person or entity, including the Borrower or any partner in the Borrower with respect to the enforcement of any guarantees of payment or guarantees of performance and completion or other similar rights.
Section 8.17
Section 8.17
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, intending to be legally bound, the parties have executed and delivered this Agreement, under seal, as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20080624173455.txt.gz
TIME:20080624173455
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On June 19, 2008, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Registrant"), Saul Holdings Limited Partnership and B.F. Saul Real Estate Investment Trust (the "Selling Stockholder") entered into an underwriting agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") with Raymond James & Associates, Inc., as underwriter (the "Underwriter"). Pursuant to the Underwriting Agreement, the Selling Stockholder agreed to sell, and the Underwriter agreed to purchase, 1,350,000 shares of the Registrant's common stock ("Common Stock"), par value $0.01 per share (the "Offering"). The Selling Stockholder also agreed to sell up to 150,000 additional shares of Common Stock to the Underwriter solely to cover over-allotments. The Underwriter notified the Selling Stockholder of its intent to exercise the over-allotment option of 150,000 shares of Common Stock on June 19, 2008. The Registrant will not sell any shares of Common Stock and will not receive any proceeds from the sale of shares of Common Stock in the Offering.
The Offering has been registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, by a registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-151515). A copy of the Underwriting Agreement is filed as Exhibit 1.1 hereto.
 
 
The exhibits listed in the following index relate to the Registration Statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-151515) of the Registrant and are filed herewith for incorporation by reference in such Registration Statement.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: June 24, 2008
 

Exhibit 1.1
Execution Copy
June 19, 2008
Raymond James & Associates, Inc.
880 Carillon Parkway
St. Petersburg, FL 33716
As the Representative of the
several Underwriters named in hereto
Schedule I
Ladies and Gentlemen:
B.F. Saul Real Estate Investment Trust (the ""), a stockholder of Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the "") and the sole general partner of Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, a Maryland limited partnership (the ""), proposes to sell to the several underwriters named in (the "") an aggregate of 1,350,000 shares (the "") of common stock of the Company, par value $0.01 per share (the ""). In addition, the Selling Stockholder has granted to the Underwriters an option to purchase up to an additional 150,000 shares of Common Stock solely to cover over-allotments (the ""; the Option Shares, together with the Firm Shares, hereinafter called the ""), all as provided in Section 2 hereof. Raymond James & Associates, Inc. has agreed to act as representative of the several Underwriters (in such capacity, the "") in connection with the offering and sale of the Shares. If the Representative is the only firm serving as underwriter, then the terms "Underwriters" and "Representative," as used herein, shall each be deemed to refer to such firm.
Selling Stockholder
Company
Operating Partnership
Schedule I
Underwriters
Firm Shares
Common Stock
Option Shares
Shares
Representative
As the Representative, you have advised the Company (a) that you are authorized to enter into this underwriting agreement (the "") on behalf of the several Underwriters, and (b) that the several Underwriters are willing, acting severally and not jointly, to purchase the number of Shares set forth opposite their names in .
Agreement
Schedule I
The Company, the Selling Stockholder and the Operating Partnership wish to confirm as follows their agreement with you in connection with the purchase of the Shares by the several Underwriters.
1. . The Company has prepared and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") in accordance with the provisions of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the ""), a shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (file number 333-151515) under the Act (""), which registration statement included a Prospectus dated June 16, 2008 (the ""), relating to up to 2,000,000
Registration Statement and Prospectus
Commission
Act
Registration Statement 333-151515
Basic Prospectus
shares of Common Stock, and has filed with, or transmitted for filing to, or shall promptly hereafter file with or transmit for filing to, the Commission a supplement to the prospectus included in such registration statement (the "") specifically relating to the Shares and the plan of distribution thereof pursuant to Rule 424. Registration Statement 333-151515, including any amendments thereto filed prior to the Execution Time, was declared effective on June 16, 2008. Except where the context otherwise requires, Registration Statement 333-151515 on each date and time that such registration statement and any post-effective amendment or amendments thereto became or becomes effective (each, an ""), including all documents filed as part thereof and including any information contained in a Prospectus (as defined below) subsequently filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) and deemed part of such registration statement, collectively, are herein called the "," and the Basic Prospectus, as supplemented by the final Prospectus Supplement, in the form first used by the Company in connection with confirmation of sales of the Shares, is herein called the "" The Basic Prospectus, as amended or supplemented, immediately prior to the date and time that this Agreement is executed and delivered by the parties hereto (the "") is hereafter called the "," and any "Issuer Free Writing Prospectus" (as defined in Rule 433) relating to the Shares is hereafter called an "." The Pricing Prospectus, as supplemented by the Issuer Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, attached and listed in hereto or that the parties hereto shall hereafter expressly agree in writing to treat as part of the Disclosure Package (as defined below), if any, taken together, are hereafter collectively called the "." Any reference in this Agreement to the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Act (the ""), as of each Effective Date or the Execution Time or the date of the Prospectus, as the case may be (it being understood that the several specific references in this Agreement to documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus are for clarifying purposes only and are not meant to limit the inclusiveness of any other definition herein). For purposes of this Agreement, all references to the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto shall be deemed to include the copy filed with the Commission pursuant to its Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis and Retrieval system ("").
Prospectus Supplement
Effective Date
Registration Statement
Prospectus.
Execution Time
Pricing Prospectus
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
Schedule II
Disclosure Package
Incorporated Documents
EDGAR
All references in this Agreement to financial statements and schedules and other information which is "contained," "included," "stated" or "described" in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus (and all other references of like import) shall be deemed to mean and include all such financial statements and schedules and other information which is or is deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, as the case may be; and all references in this Agreement to amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus shall be deemed to include the filing of any document under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission promulgated thereunder (the ""), which is or is deemed to be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus, as the case may be.
Exchange Act
 
2. .
Agreement to Sell and Purchase
(a) The Selling Stockholder hereby agrees, subject to all the terms and conditions set forth herein, to issue and sell to the Underwriters and, upon the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements of the Company, the Operating Partnership and the Selling Stockholder herein contained and subject to all the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Underwriter agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Selling Stockholder, at a purchase price of $46.50 per Share, the number of Firm Shares set forth opposite their respective names on to this Agreement.
Schedule I
(b) Subject to the terms and conditions and in reliance upon the representations and warranties herein set forth, the Selling Stockholder hereby grants an option to the several Underwriters to purchase, severally and not jointly, up to the number of Option Shares set forth in hereto at the same purchase price set forth in Section 2(a). Said option may be exercised only to cover over-allotments in the sale of the Firm Shares by the Underwriters. Said option may be exercised in whole or in part at any time on or before the 30th day after the date hereof upon written or telegraphic notice by the Representative to the Selling Stockholder and the Company setting forth the number of the Option Shares as to which the several Underwriters are exercising the option and the settlement date (each, an ""). Each purchase date must be at least one business day after the written notice is given and may not be earlier than the Closing Date for the Firm Shares nor later than ten (10) Business Days after the date of such notice. The number of Option Shares to be purchased by each Underwriter shall be the same percentage of the total number of the Option Shares to be purchased by the several Underwriters as such Underwriter is purchasing of the Firm Shares.
Schedule I
Option Closing Date
3. . It is understood that the several Underwriters propose to offer the Shares for sale to the public as soon after this Agreement has become effective as in their judgment is advisable and initially to offer the Shares upon the terms set forth in the Prospectus. Each Underwriter, severally and not jointly, represents and agrees as follows:
Offering by Underwriters
Each Underwriter, unless it has or shall have obtained, as the case may be, the prior written consent of the Selling Stockholder, has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Shares that would constitute an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or that would otherwise constitute a "free writing prospectus" (as defined in Rule 405) required to be filed by the Company with the Commission or retained by the Company under Rule 433, other than the free writing prospectus containing the information contained in the final term sheet prepared and filed pursuant to Section 5.1(s) hereto; that the prior written consent of the parties hereto shall be deemed to have been given in respect of the Free Writing Prospectuses included in hereto and any electronic road show.
provided
Schedule II
4. . Delivery of and payment for the Shares shall be made at 10:00 A.M., New York City time, on June 24, 2008, or at such time on such later date not more than three (3) Business Days after the foregoing date as the Representative shall designate, which date and time may be postponed by mutual written agreement of the Representative, the Company, and the Selling Stockholder (such date and time of delivery and payment for the Shares being herein called the "") or on the applicable Option Closing Date (or at such other time on the same or on such other date, in any
Delivery of the Shares and Payment Therefor
Closing Date
 
event not later than the third business day thereafter, as the Representative, the Company, and the Selling Stockholder may agree in writing). Delivery of the Shares shall be made against payment by the Representative of the purchase price thereof, to or upon the order of the Selling Stockholder by wire transfer payable in same-day funds to an account specified by the Selling Stockholder. The Shares will be delivered to the Representative for the respective accounts of the several Underwriters through the book-entry facilities of The Depository Trust Company ("").The Shares shall be in global form registered in the name of Cede & Co., as nominee for DTC. Any certificate(s) representing some or all of the Shares shall be delivered to the Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company (the "") and registered in the name of Cede & Co., as nominee for DTC, and in such denominations as the Representative shall request prior to 1:00 P.M., New York City time, on the second Business Day preceding the Closing Date or any Option Closing Date, as the case may be. Such certificates shall be made available to, or at the direction of, the Representative in New York City for inspection and packaging not later than 9:30 A.M., New York City time, on the Business Day next preceding the Closing Date or any Option Closing Date, as the case may be.
DTC
Transfer Agent
The Selling Stockholder hereby agrees that it will pay all stock transfer taxes, stamp duties and other similar taxes, if any, payable upon the sale or delivery of the Shares to be sold by the Selling Stockholder to the several Underwriters, or otherwise in connection with the performance of the Selling Stockholder's obligations hereunder.
5. .
Covenants and Agreements
5.1 . The Company agrees with each Underwriter as follows:
Of the Company
(a) If, at the time this Agreement is executed and delivered, it is necessary for a post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement to be declared effective before the offering of the Shares may commence, the Company will use its best efforts to cause such post-effective amendment to become effective as soon as possible and will advise the Representative promptly and, if requested by the Representative, will confirm such advice in writing, immediately after such post-effective amendment has become effective.
(b) If, at any time prior to the filing of the Prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b), any event occurs as a result of which the Disclosure Package would (x) include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein in the light of the circumstances under which they were made or the circumstances then prevailing not misleading or (y) conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement, the Company will (i) notify promptly the Representative so that any use of the Disclosure Package may cease until it is amended or supplemented; (ii) amend or supplement the Disclosure Package to correct such statement, omission or conflicting information; and (iii) supply any amendment or supplement to the Representative in such quantities as may be reasonably requested.
(c) The Company will advise the Representative promptly and, if requested by the Representative, will confirm such advice in writing: (i) of any review, issuance of comments, or request by the Commission or its staff on or for an amendment of or a supplement to the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or for additional
 
information regarding the Company, its affiliates or its filings with the Commission, whether or not such filings are incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus; (ii) of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or of the suspension of qualification of the Shares for offering or sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation of any proceeding for such purpose or any examination pursuant to Section 8(e) of the Act relating to the Registration Statement or Section 8A of the Act in connection with the offering of the Shares; (iii) of the receipt by the Company of any notification with respect to the suspension of the qualification of the Shares for sale in any jurisdiction or the institution or threatening of any proceeding for such purpose; and (iv) within the period of time referred to in the first sentence in subsection (f) below, of any change in the Company's condition (financial or other), business, prospects, properties, net worth or results of operations, or of the happening of any event, which results in any statement of a material fact made in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus (as then amended or supplemented) being untrue or which requires the making of any additions to or changes in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus (as then amended or supplemented) in order to state a material fact required by the Act to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading, or of the necessity to amend or supplement the Prospectus (as then amended or supplemented) to comply with the Act or any other law. If at any time the Commission shall issue any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, the Company will make every reasonable effort to obtain the withdrawal of such order at the earliest possible time.
(d) The Company will furnish to the Representative and counsel to the Representative, without charge: (i) ten (10) signed copies of the Registration Statement as originally filed with the Commission and of each amendment thereto, including financial statements and all exhibits to the Registration Statement; (ii) such number of conformed copies of the Registration Statement as originally filed and of each amendment thereto, but without exhibits, as the Underwriters may request; (iii) such number of copies of the Incorporated Documents, without exhibits, as the Representative may request; and (iv) ten copies of the exhibits to the Incorporated Documents. The Selling Stockholder will pay all of the expenses of printing or other production of all documents relating to the offering.
(e) The Company will not file any amendment to the Registration Statement or make any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus or, prior to the end of the period of time referred to in the first sentence in subsection (f) below, file any document which upon filing becomes an Incorporated Document, of which the Representative shall not previously have been advised or to which, after the Representative shall have received a copy of the document proposed to be filed, the Representative shall reasonably object; and no such further document, when it is filed, will contain an untrue statement of a material fact or will omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading. The Company will give the Representative notice of its intention to make any other filing pursuant to the Exchange Act from the Execution Time to the Closing Time and will furnish the Representative with copies of any such documents a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing.
(f) As soon after the execution and delivery of this Agreement as possible and thereafter from time to time for such period as in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriters a prospectus is required by the Act to be delivered (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule
 
173(a) under the Act) in connection with sales by the Underwriters or any dealer (including circumstances where such requirement may be satisfied pursuant to Rule 172), the Company will file promptly all reports and any definitive proxy or information statements required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the Company will expeditiously deliver to the Underwriters and each dealer, without charge, as many copies of the Prospectus (and of any amendment or supplement thereto), the Disclosure Package and any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus as the Representative may request. The Company consents to the use of the Prospectus (and of any amendment or supplement thereto) in accordance with the provisions of the Act and with the securities or blue sky laws of the jurisdictions in which the Shares are offered by the several Underwriters and by all dealers to whom Shares may be sold, both in connection with the offering and sale of the Shares and for such period of time thereafter as the Prospectus is required by the Act to be delivered (or in lieu thereof, the notice referred to in Rule 173(a) under the Act) in connection with sales by any Underwriters or dealers. If during such period of time: (i) any event shall occur as a result of which, in the judgment of the Company, or in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriters, the Prospectus as supplemented would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances when the Prospectus is delivered to a purchaser, not misleading; or (ii) if it is necessary to supplement the Prospectus or amend the Registration Statement (or to file under the Exchange Act any document which, upon filing, becomes an Incorporated Document) in order to comply with the Act, the Exchange Act or any other law, the Company will promptly notify the Representative of such event and forthwith prepare and, subject to the provisions of paragraph (e) above, file with the Commission an appropriate supplement or amendment thereto (or to such document), and will expeditiously furnish to the Underwriters and dealers a reasonable number of copies thereof. In the event that the Company and the Representative agree that the Prospectus should be amended or supplemented, the Company, if requested by the Representative, will promptly issue a press release announcing or disclosing the matters to be covered by the proposed amendment or supplement.
(g) The Company will: (i) cooperate with the Underwriters and with counsel for the Underwriters in connection with the registration or qualification of the Shares for offering and sale by the Underwriters and by dealers under the securities or blue sky laws of such jurisdictions as the Underwriters may designate; (ii) maintain such qualifications in effect so long as required for the distribution of the Shares; (iii) pay any fee of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, in connection with its review of the offering; and (iv) file such consents to service of process or other documents necessary or appropriate in order to effect such registration or qualification; that in no event shall the Company be obligated to qualify to do business in any jurisdiction where it is not now so qualified or to take any action which would subject it to service of process in suits, other than those arising out of the offering or sale of the Shares, in any jurisdiction where it is not now so subject.
provided
(h) The Company agrees that, unless it has or shall have obtained the prior written consent of the Representative, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Shares that would constitute an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or that would otherwise constitute a "Free Writing Prospectus" (as defined in Rule 405) required to be filed by the Company with the Commission or retained by the Company under Rule 433, other than the free writing prospectus containing the information contained in the final term sheet prepared and filed
 
pursuant to Section 5.1(s) hereto; that the prior written consent of the parties hereto shall be deemed to have been given in respect of the Free Writing Prospectuses included in hereto and any electronic road show. Any such free writing prospectus consented to by the Representative or the Company is hereafter referred to as a "." The Company agrees that (x) it has treated and will treat, as the case may be, each Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, and (y) it has complied and will comply, as the case may be, with the requirements of Rules 164 and 433 applicable to any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, including in respect of timely filing with the Commission, legending and record keeping.
provided
Schedule II
Permitted Free Writing Prospectus
(i) The Company will make generally available to its security holders and to the Representative a consolidated earnings statement, which need not be audited, covering a 12-month period commencing after the effective date of this Agreement and ending not later than 15 months thereafter, as soon as practicable after the end of such period, which consolidated earnings statement shall satisfy the provisions of Section 11(a) of the Act and Rule 158 under the Act.
(j) During the period commencing on the date hereof and ending on the date occurring three (3) years hereafter, the Company will furnish to the Representative: (i) as soon as available, if requested, a copy of each report of the Company mailed to stockholders or filed with the Commission; and (ii) from time to time such other information concerning the Company as the Representative may reasonably request.
(k) If this Agreement shall terminate or shall be terminated after execution pursuant to any provisions hereof, or if this Agreement shall be terminated by the Underwriters because of any inability, failure or refusal on the part of the Company to comply with the terms or fulfill any of the conditions of this Agreement, the Company shall reimburse the Underwriters for all out-of-pocket expenses (including fees and expenses of counsel for the Underwriters) incurred by the Underwriters in connection herewith.
(l) If Rule 430A, 430B or 430C of the Act is employed, the Company will timely file the Prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act and will advise the Underwriters of the time and manner of such filing.
(m) The Company has not taken, nor will it take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to, or that might reasonably be expected to cause or result in, under the Exchange Act or otherwise, stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of the Shares.
(n) The Company will comply and will use its best efforts to cause its tenants to comply in all material respects with all applicable Environmental Laws (as hereinafter defined).
(o) The Company will use its best efforts to continue to qualify as a real estate investment trust (a "") under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the ""), and to continue to have each of its corporate subsidiaries (other than its taxable REIT
REIT
Code
 
subsidiaries) comply with all applicable laws and regulations necessary to maintain a status as a "qualified REIT subsidiary" under the Code.
(p) The Company will use all reasonable best efforts to do or perform all things required to be done or performed by the Company prior to the Closing Date to satisfy all conditions precedent to the delivery of the Shares pursuant to this Agreement.
(q) For a period of ninety (90) days after the date of this Agreement (the ""), the Company agrees not to, directly or indirectly, (1) offer for sale, sell, pledge or otherwise dispose of (or enter into any transaction or device that is designed to, or could be expected to, result in the disposition by any person at any time in the future of) any shares of Common Stock or securities convertible into or exchangeable for Common Stock (other than the Common Stock issued pursuant to employee benefit plans, dividend reinvestment plans, stock purchase plans, qualified stock option plans or other employee compensation plans existing on the date hereof or pursuant to currently outstanding options, warrants or rights), or sell or grant options, rights or warrants with respect to any shares of Common Stock or securities convertible into or exchangeable for Common Stock (other than the grant of options pursuant to option plans existing on the date hereof); (2) enter into any swap or other derivatives transaction that transfers to another, in whole or in part, any of the economic benefits or risks of ownership of such shares of Common Stock, whether any such transaction described in clause (1) or (2) above is to be settled by delivery of Common Stock or other securities, in cash or otherwise; (3) file or cause to be filed a registration statement, including any amendments, with respect to the registration of any shares of Common Stock or securities convertible, exercisable or exchangeable into Common Stock or any other securities of the Company; or (4) publicly disclose the intention to do any of the foregoing, in each case without the prior written consent of the Representative on behalf of the Underwriters. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if (1) during the last seventeen (17) days of the Lock-Up Period, the Company issues an earnings release or announces material news or a material event relating to the Company occurs or (2) prior to the expiration of the Lock-Up Period, the Company announces that it will release earnings results during the 16-day period beginning on the last day of the Lock-Up Period, then the restrictions imposed in the preceding paragraph shall continue to apply until the expiration of the 18-day period beginning on the date of issuance of the earnings release or the announcement of the material news or the occurrence of the material event, unless the Representative, on behalf of the Underwriters, waives such extension in writing.
Lock-Up Period
(r) The Company will comply with all applicable securities and other applicable laws, rules and regulations, including, without limitation, the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (the ""), and will use its best efforts to cause the Company's directors and officers, in their capacities as such, to comply with such laws, rules and regulations, including, without limitation, the provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act.
Sarbanes-Oxley Act
(s) Unless requested otherwise by the Representative, the Company will prepare a final term sheet, containing solely a description of final terms of the Shares and the offering thereof, in the form and substance approved by the Representative and attached as hereto and will file such final term sheet with the Commission as soon as practical after the Execution Time. The Company will file any other Issuer Free Writing Prospectus to the extent required by Rule 433 under the Securities Act within the time period required by such
Exhibit A
 
rule. The Company will retain, pursuant to reasonable procedures developed in good faith, copies of each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is not filed with the Commission in accordance with Rule 433(g) under the Securities Act.
5.2 . The Selling Stockholder covenants and agrees with each Underwriter as follows:
Of the Selling Stockholder
(a) The Selling Stockholder will execute and deliver a lock-up agreement, in the form of attached hereto (a "").
Exhibit B
Lock-Up Agreement
(b) The Selling Stockholder will review the Disclosure Package and will comply with all agreements and satisfy all conditions on its part to be complied with or satisfied pursuant to this Agreement on or prior to the Closing Date and will advise the Representative prior to the Closing Date if any statements to be made on behalf of the Selling Stockholder in the certificate contemplated by Section 8(h) hereof would be inaccurate if made as of the Closing Date.
(c) On or prior to the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as applicable, the Selling Stockholder shall pay all stock transfer and other taxes (other than income taxes) that are required to be paid in connection with the sale and transfer of the Shares to be sold by the Selling Stockholder to the Underwriters hereunder on such date and shall fully comply with all laws imposing such taxes.
(d) In order to document the Underwriters' compliance with the reporting and withholding provisions of the Code, and the regulations promulgated thereunder, with respect to the transactions herein contemplated, the Selling Stockholder shall deliver to the Representative at least two days prior to the Closing Date a properly completed and executed United States Treasury Department Substitute Form W-9.
(e) If this Agreement shall terminate or shall be terminated after execution pursuant to any provisions hereof, or if this Agreement shall be terminated by the Underwriters because of any inability, failure or refusal on the part of the Selling Stockholder to comply with the terms or fulfill any of the conditions of this Agreement, the Selling Stockholder shall reimburse the Underwriters for all out-of-pocket expenses (including fees and expenses of counsel for the Underwriters) incurred by the Underwriters in connection herewith.
(f) The Selling Stockholder has not taken, nor will it take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to, or that might reasonably be expected to cause or result in, under the Exchange Act or otherwise, stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of the Shares.
6. .
Representations and Warranties
6.1 . As of the date hereof, the Company and the Operating Partnership, jointly and severally, represent, warrant and covenant to each Underwriter as follows:
Of the Company and the Operating Partnership
 
(a) The Basic Prospectus, included as part of the registration statement as originally filed or as part of any amendment or supplement thereto, or filed pursuant to Rule 424 under the Act, complied when so filed in all material respects with the provisions of the Act.
(b) The Company and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement meet all of the requirements for using Form S-3 under the Act pursuant to the standards for such form in effect currently and immediately prior to October 21, 1992. The Registration Statement, including any amendments thereto filed prior to the Execution Time, was declared effective on June 16, 2008. No stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement is in effect, and no proceedings or examination under Section 8(d) or 8(e) of the Act are pending before or, to the best of the Company's knowledge, threatened by the Commission. The Company is not the subject of a pending proceeding under Section 8A of the Act in connection with the offering of the Shares. The Registration Statement meets the requirements set forth in Rule 415(a)(1)(x) under the Act and complies in all other material respects with such Rule. The Registration Statement, in the form in which it was declared effective, and also in such form as it may be when any post-effective amendment thereto shall become effective, and the Prospectus and any supplement or amendment thereto, each when filed with the Commission under Rule 424(b) under the Act, complied or will comply in all material respects with the provisions of the Act and the Exchange Act. The Company has not received from the Commission any notice objecting to the use of the shelf registration statement form. On each Effective Date and at the Execution Time, the Registration Statement did not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements made therein not misleading. On the date of any filing pursuant to Rule 424(b) and on the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date, the Prospectus (together with any supplement thereto) will not, include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The representation and warranty contained in this Section 6.1(b) does not apply to statements in or omissions from the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus made in reliance upon and in conformity with information relating to the Underwriters furnished to the Company in writing by or on behalf of the Underwriters expressly for use therein.
(c) (i) The Disclosure Package, and (ii) each electronic road show when taken together as a whole with the Disclosure Package, did not at the Execution Time, and will not on the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The preceding sentence does not apply to statements in or omissions from the Disclosure Package made in reliance upon and in conformity with information relating to the Underwriters furnished to the Company in writing by or on behalf of the Underwriters expressly for use therein.
(d) (i) At the earliest time after the filing of the Registration Statement that the Company or another offering participant made a offer (within the meaning of Rule 164(h)(2)) of the Shares and (ii) as of the Execution Time (with such date being used as the determination date for purposes of this clause (ii)), the Company was not and is not an Ineligible Issuer (as defined in Rule 405), without taking account of any determination by the Commission pursuant to Rule 405 that it is not necessary that the Company be considered an Ineligible Issuer.
bona fide
 
(e) Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and the final term sheet prepared and filed pursuant to Section 5.1(s) hereof does not include any information that conflicts with the information contained in the Registration Statement, including any Incorporated Document by reference therein and any prospectus supplement deemed to be a part thereof that has not been superseded or modified. The foregoing sentence does not apply to statements in or omissions from any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus based upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter through the Representative specifically for use therein, it being understood and agreed that the only such information furnished by or on behalf of any Underwriter consists of the information described as such in Section 12 hereof.
(f) The Incorporated Documents heretofore filed, when they were filed (or, if any amendment with respect to any such document was filed, when such amendment was filed), conformed in all material respects with the requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder. The Company has given the Representative notice of any filings made pursuant to the Exchange Act within 48 hours prior to the Execution Time. No such document when it was filed (or, if an amendment with respect to any such document was filed, when such amendment was filed), contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(g) The Shares issued to the Selling Stockholder to be purchased by the Underwriters were duly authorized for issuance and are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable and conform in all material respects to the description of the Shares contained in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus. The form of certificate for the Shares is in valid and sufficient form in compliance with the New York Stock Exchange requirements.
(h) Each of the Company, the Operating Partnership and their subsidiaries is a corporation, limited liability company or limited partnership, as applicable, duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the state of its formation, as set forth on hereto, with full corporate, limited liability company or partnership power, as applicable, and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, and each is duly registered and qualified to conduct its business, and is in good standing, in each jurisdiction or place where the nature of its properties or the conduct of its business requires such registration or qualification, except where the failure to so register or qualify does not have a material adverse effect on the condition (financial or other), prospects, earnings, business, properties, net worth or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, whether or not arising from transactions in the ordinary course of business (a "").
Schedule III
Material Adverse Effect
(i) Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries does any business in Cuba.
(j) Other than as set forth on hereto, the Company has no subsidiary or subsidiaries, and does not control, directly or indirectly, any corporation, partnership, joint venture, association or other business association. The issued shares of capital stock of each of the Company's subsidiaries have been duly authorized and validly issued, are
Schedule III
 
fully paid and non-assessable and, other than as set forth on hereto, are owned legally and beneficially by the Company free and clear of any security interests, liens, encumbrances, equities or claims.
Schedule III
(k) There are no legal or governmental actions, suits or proceedings pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened, against the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries, or to which the Company or the Operating Partnership or any properties of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries is subject, that (A) are required to be described in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus but are not described as required; (B) could reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the performance of this Agreement or the consummation of any of the transactions contemplated hereby; or (C) could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, except as set forth in or contemplated in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (exclusive of any supplement thereto). There are no statutes, regulations, capital expenditures, off-balance sheet transactions, contingencies or agreements, contracts, indentures, leases or other instruments or documents of a character that are required to be described in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or to be filed or incorporated by reference as an exhibit to the Registration Statement or any Incorporated Document that are not described, filed or incorporated as required by the Act or the Exchange Act (and the Pricing Prospectus contains in all material respects the same description of the foregoing matters contained in the Prospectus). The statements in the final term sheet contemplated by Section 5.1(s) hereof and the Prospectus under the captions "Federal Income Tax Considerations" and "Certain Provisions of Maryland Law and the Articles of Incorporation and Bylaws fairly and accurately summarize the matters therein described.
."
(l) None of the Company, the Operating Partnership or their subsidiaries is: (A) in violation of (i) its respective articles of incorporation, partnership agreement, operating agreement or by-laws (or analogous governing instruments), (ii) any law, ordinance, administrative or governmental rule or regulation applicable to the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries, which violation would have a Material Adverse Effect, or (iii) any decree of any court or governmental agency or body having jurisdiction over the Company or its subsidiaries; or (B) in default in any material respect in the performance of any obligation, agreement, condition or covenant (financial or otherwise) contained in any bond, debenture, note or any other evidence of indebtedness or in any material agreement, indenture, lease or other instrument to which the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries or any of their respective properties may be bound, and no such default is foreseeable.
(m) (A) As of the date of this Agreement, the Company owns either directly or indirectly through its subsidiaries, 57 properties (the ""). To the best of the Company's knowledge, none of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries is in violation of any municipal, state or federal law, rule or regulation concerning any of their Properties, which violation would have a Material Adverse Effect; (B) to the best of the Company's knowledge, each of the Properties complies with all applicable zoning laws, ordinances and regulations in all material respects and, if and to the extent there is a failure to comply, such failure does not materially impair the value of any of such Properties and will not result in a forfeiture or reversion of title thereof; (C) none of the Company, the Operating
Properties
 
Partnership or any of their subsidiaries has received from any governmental authority any written notice of any condemnation of, or zoning change affecting any of, the Properties, and the Company does not know of any such condemnation or zoning change which is threatened and which if consummated would have a material adverse effect on the Company or any of such Properties; (D) the leases under which the Company or any of its subsidiaries leases the Properties as lessor (the "") are in full force and effect and have been entered into in the ordinary course of business of such entity; (E) the Company and each of its subsidiaries has complied with its respective obligations under the Leases in all material respects and the Company does not know of any default by any other party to the Leases which, alone or together with other such defaults, would have a Material Adverse Effect or material adverse effect on any of the properties subject to a Lease; and (F) all liens, charges, encumbrances, claims or restrictions on or affecting the Properties and assets (including the Properties) of the Company and its subsidiaries that are required to be disclosed in the Prospectus are disclosed therein.
Leases
(n) Neither the execution, delivery or performance of this Agreement by the Company or the Operating Partnership, nor the consummation by the Company or the Operating Partnership of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby, nor the fulfillment of the terms hereof or thereof: (A) requires any consent, approval, authorization or other order of, or registration or filing with, any court, regulatory body, administrative agency or other governmental body, agency or official (except such as may be required for the registration of the Shares under the Act and compliance with the securities or blue sky laws of various jurisdictions), or conflicts or will conflict with or constitutes or will constitute a breach or violation of, or a default under, the articles of incorporation or by-laws (or analogous governing documents) of the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries; or (B) conflicts or will conflict with or constitutes or will constitute a breach of, or a default under, any agreement, indenture, lease or other instrument to which the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or the Operating Partnership or any properties of the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries may be bound, or violates or will violate any statute, law, regulation or filing or judgment, injunction, order or decree applicable to the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries or any properties of the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries, or will result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries pursuant to the terms of any agreement or instrument to which the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries may be bound, or to which any property or assets of the Company or the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries is subject.
(o) To the Company's knowledge, Ernst & Young LLP, who has certified or shall certify the financial statements and schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), is and was, as of the date of this Agreement and during the periods covered by the financial statements on which it reported, an independent registered public accounting firm with respect to the Company as required by the Act and the Exchange Act and the applicable published rules and regulations thereunder and by the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board.
 
(p) The financial statements, together with related schedules and notes, included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus (and any amendment or supplement thereto), present fairly in all material respects the financial position, results of operations and changes in financial position of the Company and its subsidiaries on the basis stated in the Registration Statement and the Incorporated Documents at the respective dates or for the respective periods to which they apply. Such statements and related schedules and notes have been prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied throughout the periods involved, except as disclosed therein. The other financial and statistical information and data included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus (and any amendment or supplement thereto) are accurately presented and prepared on a basis consistent with such financial statements and the books and records of the Company and its subsidiaries. The pro forma financial statements and other pro forma financial information included, or incorporated by reference, in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus include assumptions that provide a reasonable basis for presenting the significant effects directly attributable to the transactions and events described therein, the related pro forma adjustments give appropriate effect to those assumptions, and the pro forma adjustments reflect the proper application of those adjustments to the historical financial statement amounts in the pro forma financial statements included in the Prospectus, the Pricing Prospectus and the Registration Statement. The pro forma financial statements included in the Prospectus , the Pricing Prospectus and the Registration Statement comply as to form in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements of Regulation S-X under the Act and the pro forma adjustments have been properly applied to the historical amounts in the compilation of those statements. The Company has filed with the Commission all financial statements, together with related schedules and notes, required to be filed pursuant to Regulation S-X under the Act.
(q) The execution and delivery of, and the performance by the Company of its obligations under, this Agreement have been duly and validly authorized by the Company, and this Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Company and constitutes the valid and legally binding agreement of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, except as may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and by general principles of equity and to the extent that rights to indemnity and contribution hereunder may be limited by federal or state securities laws; the execution and delivery of, and the performance by the Operating Partnership of its obligations under, this Agreement have been duly and validly authorized by the Operating Partnership, and this Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Operating Partnership and constitutes the valid and legally binding agreement of the Operating Partnership, enforceable against the Operating Partnership in accordance with its terms, except as may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and by general principles of equity and to the extent that rights to indemnity and contribution hereunder may be limited by federal or state securities laws.
(r) Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), subsequent to the respective dates as of which such information is given in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), none of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries has incurred any liability or obligation (financial or
 
other), direct or contingent, or entered into any transaction (including any off-balance sheet activities or transactions), not in the ordinary course of business, that is material to the Company and its subsidiaries, and there has not been any change in the capital stock, or material increase in the short-term debt or long-term debt (including any off-balance sheet activities or transactions), of any of the Company or the Operating Partnership or their subsidiaries, or any material adverse change, or any development involving or which may reasonably be expected to involve, a prospective material adverse change, in the condition (financial or other), business, prospects, net worth or results of operations of any of the Company or the Operating Partnership or their subsidiaries.
(s) The Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries has good and marketable title to all property (real and personal) described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus as being owned by each of them (including the Properties), free and clear of all liens, claims, security interests or other encumbrances that would materially and adversely affect the value thereof or materially interfere with the use made or presently contemplated to be made thereof by them as described in the Prospectus, except such as are described in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, or in any document filed as an exhibit to the Registration Statement, and each property described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus as being held under lease by the Company or any of its subsidiaries is held by it under a valid, subsisting and enforceable lease.
(t) The "significant subsidiaries" of the Company as defined in Section 1-02(w) of Regulation S-X are set forth in hereto (the "").
Schedule III
Significant Subsidiaries
(u) The Company has not distributed and, prior to the later to occur of (x) the Closing Date and (y) completion of the distribution of the Shares, will not distribute, any offering material in connection with the offering and sale of the Shares other than the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus. The Company has not, directly or indirectly: (i) taken any action designed to cause or to result in, or that has constituted or which might reasonably be expected to constitute, the stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of the Shares; or (ii) since the filing of the Registration Statement, (A) sold, bid for, purchased, or paid anyone any compensation for soliciting purchases of, the Shares, or (B) paid or agreed to pay to any person any compensation for soliciting another to purchase any other securities of the Company.
(v) The Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries possess all certificates, permits, licenses, franchises and authorizations of governmental or regulatory authorities (the "") as are necessary to own their respective properties and to conduct their respective businesses in the manner described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, where such failure to possess could have a Material Adverse Effect, subject to such qualifications as may be set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus. The Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries has fulfilled and performed all of their respective material obligations with respect to such permits, and no event has occurred which allows, or after notice or lapse of time would allow, revocation or termination thereof or which would result in any other material impairment of the rights of the holder of any such permit, subject in each case to such qualification as may be set forth in the Disclosure Package and the
permits
 
Prospectus. Except as described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, exclusive of any supplement thereto, neither the revocation or modification of any permit singly or in the aggregate, nor the announcement of an unfavorable decision, ruling or finding with respect to any permit, would have a Material Adverse Effect.
(w) The Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries have established and maintain disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported, within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms and is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management, including its chief executive officer and chief financial officer, or persons performing similar functions, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure; and the Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries maintain a system of internal control over financial reporting sufficient to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and which includes policies and procedures that (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries, (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and that receipts and expenditures of the Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries are being made only in accordance with the authorization of management, and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisitions, use or dispositions of assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements. The Company's disclosure controls and procedures have been evaluated for effectiveness as of the end of the most recent period required to be evaluated by the Company which precedes the date of the Prospectus and were effective in all material respects to perform the functions for which they were established. Based on the most recent evaluation of its internal control over financial reporting, the Company was not aware of (i) any material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting or (ii) any fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the Company's internal control over financial reporting. There has been no change in the Company's internal control over financial reporting that has occurred during its most recently completed fiscal quarter that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company's internal control over financial reporting.
(x) There is and has been no failure on the part of the Company and any of the Company's directors or officers, in their capacities as such, to comply with any provision of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and the rules and regulations promulgated in connection therewith, including, without limitation, Section 402 related to loans to insiders and Sections 302 and 906 related to certifications.
(y) To the Company's knowledge, none of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries nor any employee or agent of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries has made any payment of funds of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries or received or retained any
 
funds in violation of any law, rule or regulation, which payment, receipt or retention of funds is of a character required to be disclosed in the Prospectus.
(z) No labor problem or dispute with the employees of the Company and/or any of its subsidiaries or any of the Company's or its subsidiaries' principal suppliers, contractors or customers, exists, is threatened or imminent that could result in a Material Adverse Effect. To the Company's knowledge, no labor problem or dispute with the Company's or its subsidiaries' tenants exists, is threatened or imminent that could result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(aa) The Company has filed all foreign, federal, state and local tax returns that are required to be filed, which returns are complete and correct, or has requested extensions thereof (except in any case in which the failure to so file would not have a Material Adverse Effect, except as set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus) and has paid all taxes required to be paid by it and any other assessment, fine or penalty levied against it, to the extent that any of the foregoing is due and payable, except for any such assessment, fine or penalty that is currently being contested in good faith or as would not have a material adverse effect on the condition (financial or otherwise), prospects, earnings, business or properties of the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, whether or not arising from transactions in the ordinary course of business, except as set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (exclusive of any supplement thereto).
(bb) No holder of any security of the Company or the Operating Partnership has any right to require registration of the shares of Common Stock or any other security of the Company or the Operating Partnership because of the filing of the Registration Statement or consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, which right has not been waived in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. The holders of outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company and the Operating Partnership are not entitled to preemptive or other rights to subscribe for the Shares.
(cc) The Company and its subsidiaries own or possess all patents, trademarks, trademark registrations, service marks, service mark registrations, trade names, copyrights, licenses, inventions, trade secrets and rights described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus as being owned by them or necessary for the conduct of their respective businesses. The Company is not aware of any claim to the contrary or any challenge by any other person to the rights of the Company and its subsidiaries with respect to the foregoing.
(dd) The Company is not now, and after sale of the Shares to be sold by the Selling Stockholder hereunder will not be, an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
(ee) (i) To the best of the Company's knowledge, the Company, the Operating Partnership, their subsidiaries, the Properties and the operations conducted thereon comply and heretofore have complied with all applicable Environmental Laws, and no expenditures are required or advisable to maintain or achieve such compliance.
 
(ii) None of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries has at any time and, to the best of the Company's knowledge, no other party has at any time, handled, buried, stored, retained, refined, transported, processed, manufactured, generated, produced, spilled, allowed to seep, leak, escape or leach, or be pumped, poured, emitted, emptied, discharged, injected, dumped, transferred or otherwise disposed of or dealt with, Hazardous Materials (as defined below) on, to, under or from the Properties, except as disclosed in environmental site assessment reports obtained by the Company on or before the date hereof in connection with the purchase of any of the Properties and directly provided to the Underwriters or their counsel (collectively, the "") and except for those circumstances that have not had and will not have a material adverse effect on the relevant Property. None of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries intends to use the Properties or any subsequently acquired properties for the purpose of handling, burying, storing, retaining, refining, transporting, processing, manufacturing, generating, producing, spilling, seeping, leaking, escaping, leaching, pumping, pouring, emitting, emptying, discharging, injecting, dumping, transferring or otherwise disposing of or dealing with Hazardous Materials.
Environmental Reports
(iii) To the best of the Company's knowledge, no seepage, leak, escape, leach, discharge, injection, release, emission, spill, pumping, pouring, emptying or dumping of Hazardous Materials into any surface water, groundwater, soil, air or other media on or adjacent to the Properties has occurred, is occurring or is reasonably expected to occur, except as is disclosed in the Environmental Reports and except for those circumstances not likely to have a material adverse effect on the relevant Property.
(iv) None of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries has received notice from any Governmental Authority or other person of, or has knowledge of, any occurrence or circumstance which, with notice, passage of time, or failure to act, would give rise to any claim under or pursuant to any Environmental Law or under common law pertaining to Hazardous Materials on or originating from the existing Properties or any act or omission of any party with respect to the existing Properties, except as disclosed in the Environmental Reports.
(v) To the best of the Company's knowledge, none of the Properties is included or proposed for inclusion on any federal, state, or local lists of sites which require or might require environmental cleanup, including, but not limited to, the National Priorities List or CERCLIS List issued pursuant to CERCLA (as defined below) by the United States Environmental Protection Agency or any analogous state list, except as is disclosed in the Environmental Reports and except for those circumstances not likely to have a material adverse effect on the relevant Property.
(vi) In the ordinary course of its business, the Company periodically reviews the effect of Environmental Laws on the business, operations and properties of the
 
Company and its subsidiaries, in the course of which it identifies and evaluates associated costs and liabilities (including, without limitation, any capital or operating expenditures required for clean-up, closure of properties or compliance with Environmental Laws, or any permit, license or approval, any related constraints on operating activities and any potential liabilities to third parties). On the basis of such review, the Company has reasonably concluded that such associated costs and liabilities would not, singly or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect, whether or not arising from transactions in the ordinary course of business, except as set forth in or contemplated in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
As used herein, "" shall include, without limitation, any flammable explosives, radioactive materials, hazardous materials, hazardous wastes, hazardous or toxic substances, or related materials, asbestos, polychlorinated biphenyls (""), petroleum products and by-products and substances defined or listed as "hazardous substances," "toxic substances," "hazardous waste," or "hazardous materials" in any Federal, state or local Environmental Law.
Hazardous Material
PCBs
As used herein, "" shall mean all laws, common law duties, regulations or ordinances (including any orders or agreements) of any Federal, state or local governmental authority having or claiming jurisdiction over any of the Properties (a "") that are designed or intended to protect the public health and the environment or to regulate the handling of Hazardous Materials, including, without limitation, the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as amended (42 U.S.C. Section 9601 et seq.) (""), the Hazardous Material Transportation Act, as amended (49 U.S.C. Section 1801 et seq.), the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, as amended (42 U.S.C. Section 6901 et seq.), the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended (33 U.S.C. Section 1251 et seq.), and the Clean Air Act, as amended (42 U.S.C. Section 7401 et seq.), and any and all analogous future federal or present or future state or local laws.
Environmental Law
Governmental Authority
CERCLA
(ff) The Company is organized in conformity with the requirements for qualification as a real estate investment trust under Sections 856 through 860 of the Code and the rules and regulations thereunder. As of the close of every taxable year during the Company's existence, the Company has had no earnings and profits accumulated in a non-REIT year within the meaning of Section 857(a)(2)(B) of the Code. The Company's past and proposed method of operation have enabled it, and will enable it, to meet the requirements for taxation as a REIT under the Code.
(gg) Each of the Company's corporate subsidiaries is in compliance with all requirements applicable to a REIT or a "qualified REIT subsidiary" within the meaning of Section 856(i) of the Code and all applicable regulations under the Code, and the Company is not aware of any fact that would negatively impact such qualifications. Each of the Company's non-corporate subsidiaries qualifies as a partnership or a disregarded entity for federal income tax purposes.
 
(hh) The Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries is insured by insurers of recognized financial responsibility against such losses and risks and in such amounts as are prudent and customary in the businesses in which they are engaged and the value of their properties. All policies of insurance and fidelity or surety bonds insuring the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries or their respective businesses, assets, employees, officers and directors are in full force and effect. The Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries are in compliance with the terms of such policies and instruments in all material respects and there are no claims by the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries under any such policy or instrument as to which any insurance company is denying liability or defending under a reservation of rights clause. None of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries has been refused any insurance coverage sought or applied for, and the Company does not have any reason to believe that the Company, the Operating Partnership and each of their subsidiaries will not be able to renew its respective existing insurance coverage as and when such coverage expires or to obtain similar coverage from similar insurers as may be necessary to continue their respective businesses at a cost that would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(ii) The Company, the Operating Partnership and their subsidiaries have title insurance on each of the Properties owned in fee simple in amounts at least equal to the cost of acquisition of such property; with respect to an uninsured loss on any of the Properties, the title insurance shortfall would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
(jj) No subsidiary of the Company is currently prohibited, directly or indirectly, from paying any dividends to the Company, from making any other distribution on such subsidiary's capital stock, from repaying to the Company any loans or advances to such subsidiary from the Company or from transferring any of such subsidiary's assets or property to the Company or any other subsidiary of the Company, except as described in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus; the Company has not declared, paid or made any dividend or distribution of any kind on any class of its capital stock, except as set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (exclusive of any supplement thereto).
(kk) There are no transfer taxes or other similar fees or charges under Federal law or the laws of any state, or any political subdivision thereof, required to be paid in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the transfer by the Selling Stockholder of the Shares.
(ll) Each of the Company and its subsidiaries has fulfilled its obligations, if any, under the minimum funding standards of Section 302 of the United States Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 ("") and the regulations and published interpretations thereunder with respect to each "plan" (as defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA and such regulations and published interpretations) in which employees of the Company and its subsidiaries are eligible to participate. Each such plan is in compliance in all material respects with the presently applicable provisions of ERISA and such regulations and published interpretations. Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has incurred any unpaid liability to the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation (other than for the payment of premiums in the ordinary course) or to any such plan under Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA
 
(mm) To the knowledge of the Company, no stock options awards granted by the Company have been retroactively granted, or the exercise or purchase price of any stock option award determined retroactively.
(nn) The Company's authorized capitalization is as set forth in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus; the capital stock of the Company conforms in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus; the outstanding shares of Common Stock and preferred stock of the Company have each been duly and validly authorized and issued in compliance with all Federal and state securities laws, and are fully paid and non-assessable.
(oo) The Shares have been duly authorized for listing on the New York Stock Exchange. On the Closing Date and the Option Closing Date, the Shares will be duly listed and freely tradable on the New York Stock Exchange.
(pp) Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), there are no outstanding (i) securities or obligations of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries convertible into or exchangeable for any equity interests of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries, (ii) warrants, rights or options to subscribe for or purchase from the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries any such equity interests or any such convertible or exchangeable securities or obligations (except for (a) units of partnership interest in the Operating Partnership (""), (b) Common Stock issuable upon the redemption of outstanding Partnership Units, (c) Common Stock issuable in connection with the Company's dividend reinvestment and share purchase plan, (d) 120,578 shares of Common Stock issuable upon the exercise of the options issued under the Company's 1993 Stock Option Plan), or (e) 485,675 shares of Common Stock issuable upon exercise of the options issues under the Company's 2004 Stock Option Plan), or (iii) obligations of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their subsidiaries to issue any equity interests, any such convertible or exchangeable securities or obligation, or any such warrants, rights or options. Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), there are no persons with registration or other similar rights to have any equity or debt securities, including securities which are convertible into or exchangeable for equity securities, registered pursuant to the Registration Statement or otherwise registered by the Company under the Act or included in the offering contemplated by this Agreement. The Company is the sole general partner of each of the Operating Partnership, Saul Subsidiary I Limited Partnership and Saul Subsidiary II Limited Partnership. The Company's wholly-owned subsidiary, Saul QRS, Inc., is the sole general partner of Saul Subsidiary I Limited Partnership.
Partnership Units
6.2 . The Selling Stockholder hereby represents and warrants to each Underwriter on the date hereof, and shall be deemed to represent and warrant to each Underwriter on the Closing Date and the Option Closing Date, that:
Of the Selling Stockholder
(a) The Selling Stockholder is the lawful owner of the Shares to be sold by the Selling Stockholder pursuant to this Agreement and has, and on the Closing Date and the Option
 
Closing Date, as the case may be, will have, good and valid title to such Shares, free of all restrictions on transfer, liens, encumbrances, security interests, equities and claims whatsoever.
(b) The Selling Stockholder has, and on the Closing Date and the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, will have, full legal right, power and authority, and all authorization and approval required by law or otherwise, to enter into this Agreement and to sell, assign, transfer and deliver the Shares to be sold by the Selling Stockholder in the manner provided herein.
(c) The Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Selling Stockholder and is a valid and binding agreement of the Selling Stockholder, enforceable as to the Selling Stockholder in accordance with its terms, except to the extent enforceability may be limited by (i) the application of bankruptcy, reorganization, moratorium, insolvency and other laws affecting creditors' rights generally and (ii) equitable principles being applied at the discretion of a court before which a proceeding may be brought, except as rights to indemnity and contribution hereunder may be limited by federal or state securities laws.
(d) None of the sale of the Shares by the Selling Stockholder, the execution, delivery or performance by the Selling Stockholder of this Agreement, the compliance by the Selling Stockholder with all the provisions hereof and thereof nor the consummation by the Selling Stockholder of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby (i) requires any consent, approval, authorization or other order of, or registration or filing with, any court, regulatory body or administrative agency or other governmental body, agency or official (except such as may be required under the securities or blue sky laws of the various states), (ii) conflicts with or will conflict with or constitutes or will constitute a breach of or a default under, the organizational documents of the Selling Stockholder or any agreement, indenture, lease or other instrument to which the Selling Stockholder is a party or by which the Selling Stockholder or any property of the Selling Stockholder is bound, or (iii) violates any statute, law, regulation, ruling, filing, judgment, injunction, order or decree applicable to the Selling Stockholder or any property of the Selling Stockholder.
(e) No consent, approval or waiver is required under any instrument or agreement to which the Selling Stockholder is a party or by which it is bound or under which it is entitled to any right or benefit, in connection with the offering, sale or purchase by the Underwriters of any of the Shares which may be sold by the Selling Stockholder under this Agreement or the consummation by the Selling Stockholder of any of the other transactions contemplated hereunder.
(f) The information in the Prospectus and the Disclosure Package under the caption "Selling Shareholders" that specifically relates to the Selling Stockholder does not, and will not on the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, if as the case may be, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(g) At any time prior to the Closing Date or the Option Closing Date, as the case may be, if there is any change in the information referred to in Section 6.2(f) hereof, the
 
Selling Stockholder will immediately notify the Representative of such change. The Selling Stockholder has not distributed and, prior to the later to occur of (x) the Closing Date and (y) completion of the distribution of the Shares, will not distribute, any offering material in connection with the offering and sale of the Shares other than the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus.
(h) Other than excepted activity pursuant to Regulation M under the Exchange Act, the Selling Stockholder has not taken and will not take, directly or indirectly, any action that constituted, or any action designed to, or that might reasonably be expected to cause or result in or constitute, under the Act or otherwise, stabilization or manipulation of the price of the Common Stock to facilitate the sale or resale of the Shares.
(i) Upon delivery of and payment for the Shares to be sold by the Selling Stockholder pursuant to this Agreement, good and valid title to the Shares will pass to the Underwriters, free of all restrictions on transfer, liens, encumbrances, security interests, equities and claims whatsoever.
(j) The Selling Stockholder is not prompted to sell shares of Common Stock by any material information concerning the Company that is not set forth in the Registration Statement.
(k) Upon payment for the Shares to be sold by the Selling Stockholder as provided herein, delivery of the Shares, as directed by the Underwriters, to Cede & Co. ("") or such other nominee as may be designated by DTC, registration of the Shares in the name of Cede or such other nominee and on the Company's share registry in accordance with the Company's Articles of Incorporation, Bylaws and applicable law and as required by Section 8-401 of the Uniform Commercial Code as in effect in the State of New York (the "") and an indication from DTC by book entry that in the case of each Underwriter, the Shares being purchased by or on behalf of such Underwriter have been credited to "securities accounts" (as defined in Section 8-501 of the UCC) of such Underwriter with DTC (assuming that neither DTC nor any such Underwriter has notice of any adverse claim (as such phrase is defined in Section 8-105 of the UCC) to such Shares), (i) DTC shall be a "protected purchaser" of the Shares within the meaning of Section 8-303 of the UCC, and (ii) under Section 8-501 of the UCC, each Underwriter will acquire a valid "security entitlement" (as defined in Section 8-102 of the UCC) to the Shares being so purchased by or on behalf of such Underwriter, and, to the extent governed by the UCC, no action based on any "adverse claim" (as defined in Section 8-102 of the UCC) (a "") to such Shares (or security entitlement with respect thereto) may properly be asserted against such Underwriter with respect to such security entitlement; it being understood that for the purpose of this representation and warranty, the Selling Stockholder may assume that when such payment, delivery, registration and crediting occur, (w) Cede or such other nominee is not a "securities intermediary" (as defined in Section 8-102 of the UCC), (x) registration of the Shares in the name of Cede or another nominee designated by DTC is effective to register the Shares in the name of DTC for purposes of Section 8-106(b)(2) of the UCC, and (y) DTC is a "clearing corporation" (as defined in Section 8-102 of the UCC), and (z) appropriate entries to the account of the Underwriter on the records of DTC will have been made pursuant to the UCC.
Cede
UCC
UCC Adverse Claim
 
(l) The certificates of Common Stock in negotiable form, together representing all of the Shares in certificated form to be sold by the Selling Stockholder hereunder, have been delivered to the Transfer Agent, in the form heretofore furnished to you.
(m) Any certificate signed by or on behalf of the Selling Stockholder and delivered to the Representative or to counsel for the Underwriters shall be deemed to be a representation and warranty by the Selling Stockholder to each Underwriter as to the matters covered thereby. The Selling Stockholder acknowledges that the Underwriters and, for purposes of the opinion to be delivered pursuant to Section 8 hereof, counsel to the Company and counsel to the Underwriters, will rely upon the accuracy and truthfulness of the foregoing representations and hereby consents to such reliance.
(n) The Selling Stockholder has made an irrevocable commitment for payment of any transfer or related taxes and set aside sufficient funds for such payment or has paid such taxes.
(o) Except as disclosed to the Representative in writing, neither the Selling Stockholder nor any of its affiliates directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, or has any other association with (within the meaning of Article I, Section 1(m) of the By-laws of Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc.), any Underwriter.
(p) The Selling Stockholder represents and agrees that, without the prior consent of the Representative, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Shares that would constitute a "free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 405 (any such "free writing prospectus" of the Selling Stockholder, a ""), and it has not used, referred to, or distributed, and will not use, refer to or distribute, any such Selling Stockholder Free Writing Prospectus. Any Selling Stockholder Free Writing Prospectus consented to by the Representative is hereinafter referred to as a Selling Stockholder Permitted Free Writing Prospectus. The Selling Stockholder represents that it has treated or agrees that it has complied and will comply with the requirements of Rule 433 applicable to any Selling Shareholder Permitted Free Writing Prospectus of such Selling Shareholder, including timely filing with the Commission where required, legending and record keeping.
Selling Stockholder Free Writing Prospectus
7. .
Indemnification and Contribution
7.1 The Company and the Operating Partnership, jointly and severally, agree:
(a) to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter and each person, if any, who controls such Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the Act, against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which such Underwriter or any such controlling person may become subject under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon (i) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in (A) the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto, or (B) any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act, (ii) the omission or alleged omission to state therein a
 
material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, or (iii) any alleged act or failure to act by any Underwriter in connection with, or relating in any manner to, the Shares or the offering contemplated hereby, and which is included as part of or referred to in any loss, claim, damage, liability or action arising out of or based upon matters covered by clause (i) or (ii) above (, , that neither the Company nor the Operating Partnership shall be liable under this clause (iii) to the extent that it is determined in a final judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction that such loss, claim, damage, liability or action resulted directly from any such acts or failures to act undertaken or omitted to be taken by such Underwriter through its gross negligence or willful misconduct); , , that neither the Company nor the Operating Partnership will be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement, or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or such amendment or supplement, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by or through the Representative specifically for use in the preparation thereof, such information being listed in Section 12 below, and
provided
however
provided
however
(b) to reimburse each Underwriter and each such controlling person upon demand for any legal or other out-of-pocket expenses reasonably incurred by such Underwriter or such controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage or liability, action or proceeding or in responding to a subpoena or governmental inquiry related to the offering of the Shares, whether or not such Underwriter or controlling person is a party to any action or proceeding; , that neither the Company nor the Operating Partnership will be liable to reimburse such expenses incurred in connection with any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement, or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or such amendment or supplement, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by or through the Representative specifically for use in the preparation thereof, such information being listed in Section 12 below. In the event that it is finally judicially determined that the Underwriters were not entitled to receive payments for legal and other expenses pursuant to this subparagraph, the Underwriters will promptly return all sums that had been advanced pursuant hereto.
provided,
however
7.2 The Selling Stockholder agrees:
(a) to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter and each person, if any, who controls such Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the Act, against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which such Underwriter or any such controlling person may become subject under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon (i) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in (A) the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto, or (B) any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act, (ii) the omission or alleged omission to state therein a
 
material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, or (iii) any alleged act or failure to act by any Underwriter in connection with, or relating in any manner to, the Shares or the offering contemplated hereby, and which is included as part of or referred to in any loss, claim, damage, liability or action arising out of or based upon matters covered by clause (i) or (ii) above (, , that the Selling Stockholder shall not be liable under this clause (iii) to the extent that it is determined in a final judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction that such loss, claim, damage, liability or action resulted directly from any such acts or failures to act undertaken or omitted to be taken by such Underwriter through its gross negligence or willful misconduct); , , that the Selling Stockholder will not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement, or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or such amendment or supplement, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act in reliance upon and in conformity with information not expressly relating to the Selling Stockholder or the offering by it of the Shares. This indemnification shall be in addition to any liability that the Selling Stockholder may otherwise have; and
provided
however
provided
however
(b) to reimburse each Underwriter and each such controlling person upon demand for any legal or other out-of-pocket expenses reasonably incurred by such Underwriter or such controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage or liability, action or proceeding or in responding to a subpoena or governmental inquiry related to the offering of the Shares, whether or not such Underwriter or controlling person is a party to any action or proceeding; , that the Selling Stockholder will not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement, or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or such amendment or supplement, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any "issuer information" filed or required to be filed pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Securities Act in reliance upon and in conformity with information not expressly relating to the Selling Stockholder or the offering by it of the Shares. In the event that it is finally judicially determined that the Underwriters were not entitled to receive payments for legal and other expenses pursuant to this subparagraph, the Underwriters will promptly return all sums that had been advanced pursuant hereto.
provided,
however
7.3 Each Underwriter, severally and not jointly, will indemnify and hold harmless each of the Company, the Operating Partnership and the Selling Stockholder, each of their respective directors, each of their respective officers who have signed the Registration Statement and each person, if any, who controls the Company, the Operating Partnership or the Selling Stockholder within the meaning of Section 15 of the Act, against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company or the Selling Stockholder or any such director, officer or controlling person may become subject under the Securities Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon (i) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto, or in any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus (ii) the omission or the alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading in the light of the circumstances under which they
 
were made; and will reimburse any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company, the Operating Partnership or the Selling Stockholder or any such director, officer or controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability, action or proceeding; , , that each Underwriter will be liable in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission has been made in the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto, or in any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company, the Operating Partnership or the Selling Stockholder by or through the Representative specifically for use in the preparation thereof, such information being listed in Section 15 below.
provided
however
7.4 In case any proceeding (including any governmental investigation) shall be instituted involving any person in respect of which indemnity may be sought pursuant to this Section, such person (the "") shall promptly notify the person against whom such indemnity may be sought (the "") in writing. No indemnification provided for in Section 7.1, 7.2 or 7.3 shall be available to any party who shall fail to give notice as provided in this Subsection if the party to whom notice was not given was unaware of the proceeding to which such notice would have related and was materially prejudiced by the failure to give such notice, but the failure to give such notice shall not relieve the indemnifying party or parties from any liability which it or they may have to the indemnified party for contribution or otherwise than on account of the provisions of Section 7.1, 7.2 or 7.3. In case any such proceeding shall be brought against any indemnified party and it shall notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party shall be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it shall wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel satisfactory to such indemnified party and shall pay as incurred the fees and disbursements of such counsel related to such proceeding. In any such proceeding, any indemnified party shall have the right to retain its own counsel at its own expense. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the indemnifying party shall pay as incurred (or within 30 days of presentation) the fees and expenses of the counsel retained by the indemnified party in the event (i) the indemnifying party and the indemnified party shall have mutually agreed to the retention of such counsel, (ii) the named parties to any such proceeding (including any impleaded parties) include both the indemnifying party and the indemnified party and representation of both parties by the same counsel would be inappropriate due to actual or potential differing interests between them or (iii) the indemnifying party shall have failed to assume the defense and employ counsel acceptable to the indemnified party within a reasonable period of time after notice of commencement of the action.
indemnified party
indemnifying party
It is understood that the indemnifying party shall not, in connection with any proceeding or related proceedings in the same jurisdiction, be liable for the reasonable fees and expenses of more than one separate firm for all such indemnified parties. Such firm shall be designated in writing by the Representative in the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 7.1 or 7.2 and by the Company in the case of parties indemnified pursuant to Section 7.3. The indemnifying party shall not be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent but if settled with such consent or if there be a final judgment for the plaintiff, the indemnifying party agrees to indemnify the indemnified party from and against any loss or liability by reason of such settlement or judgment. In addition, the indemnifying party will not, without the prior written consent of the indemnified party, settle or compromise or consent to the
 
entry of any judgment in any pending or threatened claim, action or proceeding of which indemnification may be sought hereunder (whether or not any indemnified party is an actual or potential party to such claim, action or proceeding) unless such settlement, compromise or consent includes an unconditional release of each indemnified party from all liability arising out of such claim, action or proceeding.
7.5 If the indemnification provided for in this Section is unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under Section 7.1, 7.2 or 7.3 above in respect of any losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) referred to therein, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Selling Stockholder, the Company and the Operating Partnership on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other from the offering of the Shares. If, however, the allocation provided by the immediately preceding sentence is not permitted by applicable law then each indemnifying party shall contribute to such amount paid or payable by such indemnified party in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only such relative benefits but also the relative fault of the Selling Stockholder, the Company and the Operating Partnership on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities, (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof), as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Selling Stockholder, the Company and the Operating Partnership on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other shall be deemed to be in the same proportion as the total net proceeds from the offering (before deducting expenses) received by the Selling Stockholder, the Company and the Operating Partnership bear to the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by the Underwriters, in each case as set forth in the final term sheet contemplated by Section 5.1(s) hereof. The relative fault shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Selling Stockholder, the Company and the Operating Partnership on the one hand or the Underwriters on the other and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission.
The Company, the Operating Partnership, the Selling Stockholder and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contributions pursuant to this Subsection were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this Subsection. The amount paid or payable by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions or proceedings in respect thereof) referred to above in this Subsection shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Subsection, (i) no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the underwriting discounts and commissions applicable to the Shares purchased by such Underwriter and (ii) no person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent
 
misrepresentation. The Underwriters' obligations in this Subsection to contribute are several in proportion to their respective underwriting obligations and not joint.
7.6 In any proceeding relating to the Registration Statement, the Pricing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any supplement or amendment thereto, or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, each party against whom contribution may be sought under this Section hereby consents to the jurisdiction of any court having jurisdiction over any other contributing party, agrees that process issuing from such court may be served upon him or it by any other contributing party and consents to the service of such process and agrees that any other contributing party may join him or it as an additional defendant in any such proceeding in which such other contributing party is a party.
7.7 Any losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses for which an indemnified party is entitled to indemnification or contribution under this Section shall be paid by the indemnifying party to the indemnified party as such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses are incurred. The indemnity and contribution agreements contained in this Section and the representations and warranties of the Selling Stockholder, the Company and the Operating Partnership set forth in this Agreement shall remain operative and in full force and effect, regardless of (i) any investigation made by or on behalf of any Underwriter or any person controlling any Underwriter, the Selling Stockholder, the Company, the Operating Partnership, their directors or officers or any persons controlling the Selling Stockholder, the Company or the Operating Partnership, (ii) acceptance of any Shares and payment therefor hereunder, and (iii) any termination of this Agreement. A successor to any Underwriter, or to the Selling Stockholder, the Company, the Operating Partnership, their directors or officers, or any person controlling the Selling Stockholder, the Company or the Operating Partnership, shall be entitled to the benefits of the indemnity, contribution and reimbursement agreements contained in this Section.
8. . The obligations of the Underwriters to purchase the Shares hereunder are subject to the following conditions:
Conditions of Underwriters' Obligations
(a) (i) The Prospectus, and any supplement thereto, have been filed in the manner and within the time period required by Rule 424(b) (without reference to Rule 424(b)(8)); the final term sheet contemplated by Section 5.1(s) hereof and any other material required to be filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 433(d) shall have been filed with the Commission within the applicable time periods prescribed for such filings by Rule 433 and (ii) any request of the Commission for additional information (to be included in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or otherwise) shall have been complied with to the satisfaction of the Underwriters.
(b) Subsequent to the Execution Time, or, if earlier, the dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement (exclusive of any amendment thereto), the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (exclusive of any amendment thereof), there shall not have occurred: (i) any change, or any development involving a prospective change, in or affecting the condition (financial or otherwise), earnings, business, properties, net worth, or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries, whether or not arising from transactions in the ordinary course of business, except as set forth in the Disclosure Package and
 
the Prospectus (exclusive of any amendments or supplements thereto subsequent to the date of this Agreement), the effect of which, in the sole judgment of the Representative is so material and adverse as to make it impractical or inadvisable to proceed with the offering or delivery of the Shares as contemplated by the Registration Statement (exclusive of any amendments thereto), the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (exclusive of any supplement thereto); or (ii) any event or development relating to or involving the Company and its subsidiaries or any officer or director of the Company and its subsidiaries which makes any statement made in the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus untrue or which, in the opinion of the Company and its counsel or the Representative and its counsel, requires the making of any addition to or change in the Disclosure Package in order to state a material fact required by the Act or any other law to be stated therein, or necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading, if amending or supplementing the Disclosure Package to reflect such event or development would, in the opinion of the Representative, adversely affect the market for the Shares.
(c) The Representative shall have received on the Closing Date and, if applicable, each Option Closing Date an opinion of Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP, counsel for the Company, dated as of such date and addressed to the Representative, to the effect that:
(i) The Company and each of the Significant Subsidiaries: (x) is a corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership or trust duly incorporated and validly existing in good standing under the laws of its state of formation, with full corporate, partnership or trust power, as applicable, and authority to own, lease and operate its properties and to conduct its business as described in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (and any amendment or supplement thereto); and, (y) based solely on certificates of public officials and officers of the Company and the Significant Subsidiaries, are duly registered and qualified to conduct their business; and (z) based solely on certificates of public officials, are in good standing in each jurisdiction or place where the nature of its properties or the conduct of its business requires such registration or qualification, except where the failure so to register or qualify does not have a material adverse effect on the condition (financial or other), business, properties, net worth or results of operations of the Company and the Significant Subsidiaries, taken as a whole;
(ii) To the knowledge of such counsel, the Company has no subsidiary or subsidiaries and does not control, directly or indirectly, any corporation, partnership, joint venture, association or other business association other than as set forth on hereto. To the knowledge of such counsel, the subsidiaries that meet the definition of "Significant Subsidiary," as such term is defined in Section 210.1-02 of Regulation S-X are set forth on hereto. All of the outstanding equity interests of each subsidiary on the Company (including the Operating Partnership) have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and nonassessable, were not issued and are not owned or held in
Schedule III
Schedule III
 
violation of any preemptive rights, and, except as otherwise set forth in the Pricing Prospectus and the Prospectus, to such counsel's knowledge, all outstanding equity interests of the subsidiaries owned of record by the Company either directly or through subsidiaries are free of any security interest, claim, lien or encumbrance;
(iii) The authorized capital stock of the Company conforms in all material respects as to legal matters to the description thereof contained in the description of such matters (a) incorporated by reference into the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus and (b) as set forth under the caption "Certain Provisions of Maryland Law and our Articles of Incorporation and Bylaws" in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus;
(iv) All the shares of capital stock of the Company outstanding prior to the sale of the Shares have been duly authorized and validly issued, and are fully paid and non-assessable;
(v) The Shares have been duly authorized and are fully paid and non-assessable; the Shares and the Common Stock conform in all material respects as to legal matters to the description thereof (a) contained in the description of the Common Stock incorporated by reference into the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus and (b) as set forth under the caption "Certain Provisions of Maryland Law and our Articles of Incorporation and Bylaws" in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus;
(vi) The holders of outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company are not entitled to statutory preemptive or other statutory rights to subscribe for the Shares and, except as set forth in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, to the knowledge of such counsel, no options, warrants or other rights to purchase, agreements or other obligations to issue, or rights to convert any obligations into or exchange any securities for, shares of capital stock of or ownership interests in the Company are outstanding;
(vii) To the knowledge of such counsel, no holder of securities of the Company is entitled to have such securities registered under the Registration Statement which right has not been waived in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement;
(viii) The form of certificate for the Shares conforms to the requirements of the articles of incorporation, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Company, the New York Stock Exchange and Maryland General Corporation Law, if any; the Shares have been duly authorized for listing on the New York Stock Exchange;
(ix) The Registration Statement is effective under the Act; any required filing of the Basic Prospectus or the Prospectus, and any supplements thereto, pursuant to Rule 424(b) or any required filing of an Issuer Free
 
Writing Prospectus has been made in the manner and within the time period required by Rule 424(b) and Rule 433, respectively; to the knowledge of such counsel, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued, no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or threatened;
(x) The Company has the corporate power and authority to enter into this Agreement. This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company;
(xi) The Operating Partnership has the partnership power and authority to enter into this Agreement and this Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Operating Partnership. The Company is the sole general partner of each of the Operating Partnership and Saul Subsidiary II Limited Partnership. The Company's wholly-owned subsidiary, Saul QRS, Inc., is the sole general partner of Saul Subsidiary I Limited Partnership;
(xii) To the knowledge of such counsel, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is or with the giving of notice or the lapse of time or both, would be: (A) in violation of its respective articles of incorporation, by-laws or other organizational documents; or (B) in default in the performance of any agreement set forth on hereto (each a ""), except as disclosed in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus;
Schedule IV
Material Agreement
(xiii) Neither the issue, offer, sale or delivery of the Shares by the Selling Stockholder, the execution, delivery or performance by the Company of this Agreement, compliance by the Company with the provisions hereof nor consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated hereby: (A) conflicts or will conflict with or constitutes or will constitute or result in a breach of, or a default under, (1) the articles of incorporation, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Company or any of the Significant Subsidiaries or (2) any material agreement, indenture, lease or other instrument to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any properties of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is bound (other than any financial covenants contained therein as to which such counsel needs express no opinion) (x) that is a Material Agreement or (y) which is otherwise known to such counsel; or (B) results or will result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or its subsidiaries, pursuant to any of the Material Agreements; or (C) violates or will violate any statute, law, rule or regulation of the United States of America, the State of Maryland, or the State of New York, or judgment, order or decree applicable to the Company or any of its subsidiaries of any court, regulatory body, administrative agency,
 
governmental body, arbitrator or other authority having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its subsidiaries or any of its or their properties;
(xiv) Neither the execution, delivery or performance by the Operating Partnership of this Agreement, compliance by the Operating Partnership with the provisions hereof or thereof nor consummation by the Operating Partnership of the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby: (A) conflicts or will conflict with or constitutes or will constitute or result in a breach of, or a default under, (1) the Agreement of Limited Partnership or other organizational documents of the Operating Partnership or (2) any material agreement, indenture, lease or other instrument to which the Operating Partnership or any of its subsidiaries is a party or by which the Operating Partnership or any properties of the Operating Partnership or any of its subsidiaries is bound (other than any financial covenants contained therein as to which such counsel needs express no opinion) (x) that is a Material Agreement or (y) which is otherwise known to such counsel; or (B) results or will result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Operating Partnership or its subsidiaries, pursuant to any of the Material Agreements; or (C) violates or will violate any statute, law, rule or regulation of the United States of America, the State of Maryland, or the State of New York, or judgment, order or decree applicable to the Operating Partnership or any of its subsidiaries of any court, regulatory body, administrative agency, governmental body, arbitrator or other authority having jurisdiction over the Operating Partnership or any of its subsidiaries or any of its or their properties;
(xv) No consent, approval, authorization or other order of, or registration or filing with, any court, regulatory body, administrative agency or other governmental body, agency, or official is required on the part of the Company or the Operating Partnership (except as have been obtained under the Act or such as may be required under state securities or blue sky laws governing the purchase and distribution of the Shares) for the transactions contemplated by this Agreement;
(xvi) (A) The Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, and any supplements or amendments thereto (except for the financial statements and the notes thereto and the schedules and other financial and statistical data included therein), comply as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Act; and (B) each of the Incorporated Documents (except for the financial statements and the notes thereto and the schedules and other financial and statistical data included therein, as to which counsel need not express any opinion) complies as to form in all material respects with the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder;
 
(xvii) To the knowledge of such counsel, (A) there is no action, suit or proceeding pending or threatened by or before any court or governmental agency, authority or body or any arbitrator involving the Company or any of its subsidiaries or any of its or their property of a character required to be described in the Registration Statement or Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), and (B) there are no agreements, contracts, indentures, leases or other instruments or documents that are required to be described in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or to be filed or incorporated by reference as an exhibit to the Registration Statement or any Incorporated Document that are not described, filed or incorporated as required, as the case may be;
(xviii) Such counsel is not aware of any certificates, authorizations, licenses or permits required by any federal regulatory authority which are necessary for the Company and/or its subsidiaries to conduct their respective businesses other than any such certificates, authorizations, licenses or permits which have been obtained or where such failure to possess such certificates, authorizations, licenses or permits could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. To the knowledge of such counsel, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any certificate, authorization, license or permit issued by any federal, state, municipal or foreign regulatory authority which, singly or in the aggregate, if the subject of an unfavorable decision, ruling or finding, would result in a Material Adverse Effect;
(xix) The Company is not subject to registration as an investment company under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, and the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, will not cause the Company to become an investment company subject to registration under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended;
(xx) The Company was a "real estate investment trust" as defined by Section 856(a) of the Code for its taxable years ended December 31, 1993 through December 31, 2007, and its current and proposed method of operation and ownership will enable it to meet the requirements for qualification and taxation as a REIT under the Code for its taxable year ending December 31, 2008 and for all future taxable years; and the statements in the final term sheet prepared and filed pursuant to Section 5.1(s) hereto and the Prospectus Supplement set forth under the caption "Federal Income Tax Considerations," insofar as they purport to describe or summarize certain provisions of the agreements, statutes or regulations referred to therein, are accurate descriptions or summaries in all material respects, and the discussion thereunder expresses the opinion of Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP insofar as it relates to matters of United
 
States federal income tax law and legal conclusions with regard to those matters.
(xxi) The statements in the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, insofar as they are descriptions of contracts or agreements or constitute statements of law or legal conclusions, are accurate and present fairly the information required to be shown in all material respects; and
(xxii) Although counsel has not undertaken, except as otherwise indicated in its opinion, to determine independently, and does not assume any responsibility for, the accuracy, completeness or fairness of the statements in the Registration Statement, such counsel has participated in the preparation of the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, including review and discussion of the contents thereof (including review and discussion of the contents of all Incorporated Documents), and nothing has come to the attention of such counsel that has caused it to believe that the Registration Statement (including the Incorporated Documents), at the time the Registration Statement became effective, or the Disclosure Package, at the Execution Time and as of the date of such opinion, or the Prospectus, as of its date and as of the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading or that any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus, as of its respective date, and as of the date of such opinion contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading (it being understood that such counsel need express no opinion with respect to the financial statements and the notes thereto and the schedules and other financial, accounting and statistical data included in the Registration Statement, Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or any Incorporated Document).
(d) The Representative shall have received on the Closing Date and, if applicable, each Option Closing Date an opinion of Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP, counsel for the Selling Stockholder, dated as of such date and addressed to the Representative, to the effect that:
(i) The Selling Stockholder has all requisite power and authority to enter into this Agreement and to sell and deliver the Shares to the Underwriters as provided herein. This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Selling Stockholder;
(ii) Neither the issue, offer, sale or delivery of the Shares, the execution, delivery or performance by the Selling Stockholder of this Agreement, compliance by the Selling Stockholder with the provisions hereof or thereof nor consummation by the Selling Stockholder of the
 
transactions contemplated hereby or thereby (including the application of the proceeds from the sale of the Shares): (A) conflicts or will conflict with or constitutes or will constitute or result in a breach of, or a default under, (1) the declaration of trust, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Selling Stockholder or (2) any material agreement, indenture, lease or other instrument to which the Selling Stockholder or by which the Selling Stockholder or any properties of the Selling Stockholder is bound (other than any financial covenants contained therein as to which such counsel needs express no opinion) (x) that is a material to the Selling Stockholder or (y) which is otherwise known to such counsel; or (B) results or will result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Selling Stockholder or its subsidiaries, pursuant to any of the agreements that are material to the Selling Stockholder; or (C) violates or will violate any statute, law, rule or regulation of the United States of America, the State of Maryland, or the State of New York, or judgment, order or decree applicable to the Company or any of its subsidiaries of any court, regulatory body, administrative agency, governmental body, arbitrator or other authority having jurisdiction over the Selling Stockholder or any of its properties;
(iii) No consent, approval, authorization or other order of, or registration or filing with, any court, regulatory body, administrative agency or other governmental body, agency, or official is required on the part of the Selling Stockholder (except as have been obtained under the Act or such as may be required under state securities or blue sky laws governing the purchase and distribution of the Shares) for the valid sale of the Shares to the Underwriters as contemplated by this Agreement; and
(iv) Good and valid title to the Shares, free and clear of any claim, encumbrance or defect in title of any nature (other than any arising by or through the Underwriters), will pass to each Underwriter that has purchased any portion of the Shares in good faith and without knowledge of any such claim, encumbrance or defect.
(e) The Representative shall have received on the Closing Date and, if applicable, each Option Closing Date an opinion of Hunton & Williams LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, dated as of such date and addressed to the Representative with respect to such matters as the Underwriters may request.
(f) The Representative shall have received a letter addressed to the Underwriters and dated as of the date hereof, the Closing Date and, if applicable, each Option Closing Date from Ernst & Young, independent registered public accounting firm, substantially in the form heretofore approved by the Underwriters; that the letter delivered on the Closing Date or any applicable Option Closing Date shall use a "cut-off" date no more than three (3) Business Days prior to the Closing Date or such Option Closing Date, as the case may be.
provided
 
(g) (i) No stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued and no proceedings for that purpose shall have been taken or, to the knowledge of the Company, shall be contemplated by the Commission at or prior to the Closing Date or any Option Closing Date; (ii) there shall not have been any change in the capital stock of the Company nor any material increase in the short-term or long-term debt (including any off-balance sheet activities or transactions) of the Company and its subsidiaries (other than in the ordinary course of business) from that set forth or contemplated in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto); (iii) there shall not have been, since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), except as may otherwise be stated in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), any material adverse change in the condition (financial or other), business, prospects, properties, net worth or results of operations of the Company or its subsidiaries; (iv) the Company and its subsidiaries shall not have any liabilities or obligations (financial or other), direct or contingent (whether or not in the ordinary course of business), that are material to the Company or its subsidiaries, other than those reflected in the Registration Statement or the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto); and (v) all the representations and warranties of the Company and the Operating Partnership contained in this Agreement shall be true and correct at and as of the Execution Time and on and as of the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date as if made at and as of such time or on and as of such date, and the Representative shall have received a certificate, dated the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date and signed by either the chief executive officer or president and the chief financial officer of the Company (or such other officers as are acceptable to the Representative), confirming the conditions set forth in this Section 8(g) and in Section 8(i) hereof.
(h) On each of the Closing Date and the Option Closing Date, if any, the Representative shall receive a written certificate, dated the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date and signed by either the chief executive officer or president and the chief financial officer of the Selling Stockholder, to the effect that: (i) the representations, warranties and covenants of the Selling Stockholder set forth in this Agreement are shall be true and correct at and as of the Execution Time and on and as of the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date as if made at and as of such time or on and as of such date; and (ii) the Selling Stockholder has performed or complied with its agreements herein contained and required to be performed or complied with by it hereunder, as of the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date.
(i) The Company shall not have failed at or prior to the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date to have performed or complied with any of its agreements herein contained and required to be performed or complied with by it hereunder, at or prior to the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date.
(j) The Selling Stockholder shall not have failed at or prior to the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date to have performed or complied with any of its agreements herein contained and required to be performed or complied with by it hereunder, at or prior to the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date.
 
(k) On or prior to the date hereof, the Company shall have furnished to the Representative Lock-Up Agreement in the form of hereto from stockholders of the Company identified on attached hereto, and such agreement shall be in full force and effect on each of the Closing Date and the Option Closing Date, if any.
Exhibit B
Schedule V
(l) Subsequent to the Execution Time, there shall not have been any decrease in the rating of any of the Company's debt securities by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" (as defined for purposes of Rule 436(g) under the Act) or any notice given of any intended or potential decrease in any such rating or of a possible change in any such rating that does not indicate the direction of the possible change.
(m) The Company shall have completed all required filings with the New York Stock Exchange and other necessary actions in order to cause the Shares to be listed and admitted and authorized for trading on the New York Stock Exchange.
(n) The Company and the Selling Stockholder shall have furnished or caused to be furnished to the Representative such further certificates and documents as the Representative shall have requested.
(o) On the Closing Date and, if applicable, each Option Closing Date, all stock transfer and other taxes (other than income taxes) that are required to be paid in connection with the sale and transfer of the Shares to be sold by the Selling Stockholder to the Underwriters hereunder on such date will have been fully paid for by the Selling Stockholder and all laws imposing such taxes will have been fully complied with.
All such opinions, certificates, letters and other documents will be in compliance with the provisions hereof only if they are satisfactory in form and substance to the Representative and its counsel.
Any certificate or document signed by any officer of the Selling Stockholder, the Company or the general partner of the Operating Partnership and delivered to the Underwriters, or to counsel for the Underwriters, shall be deemed a representation and warranty by the Selling Stockholder, the Company or the Operating Partnership, as the case may be, to the Underwriters as to the statements made therein.
If any of the conditions specified in this Section 8 shall not have been fulfilled in all material respects when and as provided in this Agreement, or if any of the opinions and certificates mentioned above or elsewhere in this Agreement shall not be in all material respects reasonably satisfactory in form and substance to the Representative and counsel for the Underwriters, this Agreement and all obligations of the Underwriters hereunder may be canceled by the Representative at, or at any time prior to, the Closing Date or any Option Closing Date, with respect to any Option Shares remaining to be purchased. Notice of such cancellation shall be given to the Company and the Selling Stockholder in writing or by telephone or facsimile confirmed in writing.
With respect to the Closing Date and each Option Closing Date, the documents required to be delivered by this Section 8 shall be delivered at the offices of Hunton & Williams
 
LLP, Attn: Andrew A. Gerber, Esq., counsel for the Underwriters, at 101 South Tryon Street, Suite 3500, Charlotte, North Carolina on or prior to such date.
9. . The Selling Stockholder agrees to pay the following costs and expenses and all other costs and expenses incident to the performance by the Company and the Selling Stockholder of their respective obligations hereunder: (i) the preparation, printing or reproduction, and filing with the Commission of the registration statement (including financial statements and exhibits thereto), the Disclosure Package, the Prospectus, each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus and each amendment or supplement to any of them; (ii) the printing (or reproduction) and delivery (including postage, air freight charges and charges for counting and packaging) of such copies of the registration statement, the Prospectus, each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus , the Incorporated Documents, and all amendments or supplements to any of them, as may be reasonably requested for use in connection with the offering and sale of the Shares; (iii) the preparation, printing, authentication, issuance and delivery of certificates for the Shares, including any stamp or other taxes in connection with the original issuance and sale and the transfer of the Shares; (iv) the printing (or reproduction) and delivery of this Agreement, the preliminary and supplemental blue sky memoranda and all other agreements or documents printed (or reproduced) and delivered in connection with the offering of the Shares; (v) the registration or qualification of the Shares for offer and sale under the securities or blue sky laws of the several states as provided in Section 5.1(g) hereof (including the reasonable fees, expenses and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters relating to the preparation, printing or reproduction, and delivery of the preliminary and supplemental blue sky memoranda and such registration and qualification); (vi) the filing fees and the fees and expenses of counsel for the Underwriters in connection with any filings required to be made with the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority; (vii) the transportation and other expenses incurred by or on behalf of Company representatives in connection with presentations to prospective purchasers of the Shares; and (viii) the fees and expenses of the Company's accountants, counsel (including local and special counsel) for the Company and the Selling Stockholder (including the fees and expenses of their counsels).
Expenses
10. Intentionally Omitted.
11. . This Agreement may be terminated:
Termination of Agreement
(a) by the Representative at any time prior to the Closing Date if any of the following has occurred: (i) since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, any material adverse change or any development involving a prospective change, which (A) in the absolute discretion of any group of Underwriters that has agreed to purchase in the aggregate at least 50% of the Firm Securities, or (B) in the absolute discretion of Raymond James & Associates, Inc. (whether or not the condition of clause (A) is satisfied) has had or is reasonably likely to have a Material Adverse Effect, (ii) any outbreak, attack, or escalation of hostilities or declaration of war, national emergency, act of terrorism or other national or international calamity or crisis or change in economic, financial or political conditions if the effect of such outbreak, escalation, declaration, emergency, calamity, crisis or change on the financial markets of the United States would, in (A) the absolute discretion of any group of Underwriters that has agreed to purchase in the aggregate at least 50% of the Firm Shares, or (B) in the absolute discretion of
 
Raymond James & Associates, Inc. (whether or not the condition of clause (A) is satisfied), make it impracticable or inadvisable to market the Shares or to enforce contracts for the sale of the Shares, or (iii) suspension of trading in securities generally on the New York Stock Exchange or the American Stock Exchange or limitation on prices (other than limitations on hours or numbers of days of trading) for securities on either such Exchange, (iv) the enactment, publication, decree or other promulgation of any statute, regulation, rule or order of any court or other governmental authority which in your opinion materially and adversely affects or may materially and adversely affect the business or operations of the Company, (v) declaration of a banking moratorium by United States or New York State authorities, (vi) any downgrading, or placement on any watch list for possible downgrading, in the rating of the Company's debt securities by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" (as defined for purposes of Rule 436(g) under the Exchange Act); (vii) the suspension of trading of the Company's common stock by New York Stock Exchange, the Commission, or any other governmental authority or, (viii) the taking of any action by any governmental body or agency in respect of its monetary or fiscal affairs which in your reasonable opinion has a material adverse effect on the securities markets in the United States; or
(b) as provided in Sections 8 of this Agreement.
Notice of such termination may be given to the Company and the Selling Stockholder by electronic mail, telegram, telecopy or telephone and shall be subsequently confirmed by letter.
12. . The statements in the fourth and seventh paragraphs and the last two sentences of the eighth paragraph under the caption "Underwriting" in the final term sheet contemplated by Section 5.1(s) hereof and the Prospectus, constitute the only information furnished by or on behalf of the Underwriters as such information is referred to in Sections 6 and 7 hereof.
Information Furnished by the Underwriters
13. . The respective agreements, representations, warranties, indemnities and other statements of the Company, the Operating Partnership or any of their officers and of the Underwriters set forth in or made pursuant to this Agreement will remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation made by or on behalf of the Underwriters or the Company, the Selling Stockholder, the Operating Partnership or any of the officers, directors, employees, agents or controlling persons referred to in Section 7 hereof, and will survive delivery of and payment for the Shares. The provisions of Sections 5(k), 7 and 9 hereof shall survive the termination or cancellation of this Agreement.
Representations and Indemnities to Survive
14. . Each of the Company, the Operating Partnership and the Selling Stockholder acknowledges and agrees that:
Absence of Fiduciary Relationship; Research Independence
(a) the Underwriters have been retained solely to act as underwriters in connection with the sale of the Shares and that no fiduciary, advisory or agency relationship between the Company, the Operating Partnership and the Selling Stockholder and the Underwriters has been created in respect of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or the process leading thereto, irrespective of whether any of the Underwriters has advised or is advising the Company, the Operating Partnership and the Selling Stockholder on other matters;
 
(b) the price of the Shares set forth in this Agreement was established by the Selling Stockholder following discussions and arms-length negotiations with the Representative, and the Selling Stockholder is capable of evaluating and understanding and understands and accepts the terms, risks and conditions of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement;
(c) it has been advised that the Underwriters and their affiliates are engaged in a broad range of transactions which may involve interests that differ from those of the Company, the Operating Partnership and the Selling Stockholder and that the Underwriters have no obligation to disclose such interests and transactions to the Company, the Operating Partnership and the Selling Stockholder by virtue of any fiduciary, advisory or agency relationship; and
(d) it waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any claims they may have against the Underwriters for breach of fiduciary duty or alleged breach of fiduciary duty.
(e) In addition, the Company, the Operating Partnership and the Selling Stockholder acknowledge that the Underwriters' research analysts and research departments are required to be independent from their respective investment banking divisions and are subject to certain regulations and internal policies, and that such Underwriters' research analysts may hold and make statements or investment recommendations and/or publish research reports with respect to the Company, the Operating Partnership and the Selling Stockholder and/or the offering that differ from the views of its investment bankers. The Company, the Operating Partnership and the Selling Stockholder hereby waives and releases, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any claims that the Company, the Operating Partnership and the Selling Stockholder may have against the Underwriters with respect to any conflict of interest that may arise from the fact that the views expressed by their independent research analysts and research departments may be different from or inconsistent with the views or advice communicated to the Company, the Operating Partnership and the Selling Stockholder by such Underwriters' investment banking divisions. The Company, the Operating Partnership and the Selling Stockholder acknowledges that each of the Underwriters is a full service securities firm and as such from time to time, subject to applicable securities laws, may effect transactions for its own account or the account of its customers and hold long or short position in debt or equity securities of the companies which may be the subject to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
15. . All communications hereunder will be in writing and effective only on receipt, and, if sent to the Representative, will be mailed, delivered or telefaxed to Raymond James & Associates, Inc., 880 Carillon Parkway St. Petersburg, FL 33716, (facsimile 727-567-8058), Attention: Brad Butcher; or, if sent to the Company, will be mailed, delivered or telefaxed to the office of the Company at 7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500E, Bethesda, Maryland 20814, (fax no.: 301-986-6023), Attention: Thomas H. McCormick, Executive Vice President and General Counsel; or, if sent to the Selling Stockholder at 7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500E, Bethesda, Maryland 20814, (fax no.: 301-986-6023), Attention: Thomas H. McCormick, General Counsel.
Notices
16. . This Agreement has been made solely for the benefit of the Underwriters, the Company, the Operating Partnership, the Selling Stockholder, their directors and officers, and the other controlling persons referred to in Section 7 hereof and their respective
Successors
 
successors and assigns, to the extent provided herein. This Agreement will inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors and the officers and directors and controlling persons referred to in Section 7 hereof, and no other person shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement. Neither the term "successor" nor the term "successors and assigns" as used in this Agreement shall include a purchaser from the Underwriters of any of the Shares in his status as such purchaser.
17. . This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements and understandings (whether written or oral) between the Selling Stockholder, the Company, the Operating Partnership and the Underwriters, or any of them, with respect to the subject matter hereof.
Integration
18. . This Agreement will be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York applicable to contracts made and to be performed within the State of New York.
Applicable Law
19. . The Company, the Selling Stockholder and the Operating Partnership hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, any and all right to trial by jury in any legal proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby.
Waiver of Jury Trial
20. . This Agreement may be signed in one or more counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original, and all of which together shall constitute one and the same agreement.
Counterparts
21. . The section headings used herein are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction hereof.
Headings
22. . The term which follows, when used in this Agreement, shall have the meaning indicated.
Definition
"" shall mean any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a legal holiday or a day on which banking institutions or trust companies are authorized or obligated by law to close in New York City.
Business Day
"" shall mean a free writing prospectus, as defined in Rule 405.
Free Writing Prospectus
"," "," "," "," "," "," "," "," "" and "" refer to such rules under the Act.
Rule 158
Rule 163
Rule 164
Rule 172
Rule 401
Rule 405
Rule 415
Rule 424
Rule 433
Rule 456
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, please sign and return to us the enclosed duplicate hereof, whereupon this letter and your acceptance shall represent a binding agreement among the Selling Stockholder, the Company, the Operating Partnership and the several Underwriters.
 
 
For itself and as Representative of the other
Underwriters named on hereto.
Schedule I
 
FREE WRITING PROSPECTUSES INCLUDED IN THE DISCLOSURE PACKAGE
 
Name of Subsidiary
Saul Holdings Limited Partnership
Saul QRS, Inc.
Avenel VI Inc.
Saul Subsidiary I Limited Partnership
Saul Subsidiary II Limited Partnership
Kentlands Lot I, LLC
Briggs Chaney Plaza, LLC
Saul Monocacy, LLC
Smallwood Village Center, LLC
Westview Village Center, LLC
Significant Subsidiaries
Saul Holdings Limited Partnership
Saul QRS, Inc.
Saul Subsidiary I Limited Partnership
Saul Subsidiary II Limited Partnership
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
B. Francis Saul II
B. Francis Saul III
Scott V. Schneider
Thomas H. McCormick
B. F. Saul Real Estate Investment Trust
Dearborn LLC
Avenel Executive Park, Phase II, LLC
B. F. Saul Property Co,
B. F. Saul Company
Westminster Investing Corporation
Van Ness Square Corporation
See attached.
RAYMOND JAMES & ASSOCIATES, INC.
As Representative of the Several Underwriters
c/o Raymond James & Associates, Inc.
880 Carillon Parkway
St. Petersburg, FL 33716
 
Dear Sirs:
This letter is delivered to you pursuant to the Underwriting Agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") to be entered into by the Company, B.F. Saul Real Estate Investment Trust (the "Selling Stockholder"), Saul Holdings Limited Partnership and Raymond James & Associates, Inc., the representative (the "Representative") of certain underwriters (the "Underwriters") to be named therein. Upon the terms and subject to the conditions of the Underwriting Agreement, the Underwriters intend to effect on behalf of the Selling Stockholder a public offering of Common Stock, par value $0.01 per share, of the Company (the "Shares"), as described in and contemplated by the registration statement of the Company on Form S-3, File No. 333-151515 (the "Registration Statement"), as filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on June 6, 2008 (the "Offering").
The undersigned recognizes that it is in the best financial interests of the undersigned, as an officer or director, and/or an owner of stock, options, warrants or other securities of the Company (the "Company Securities"), that the undersigned not sell Company Securities in the public market for a reasonable period following the Offering.
The undersigned further recognizes that the Company Securities held by the undersigned are, or may be, subject to certain restrictions on transferability, including those imposed by United States federal securities laws. Notwithstanding these restrictions, the undersigned has agreed to enter into this letter agreement to further assure the Underwriters that the Company Securities of the undersigned, now held or hereafter acquired, will not enter the public market at a time that might impair the underwriting effort.
Therefore, as an inducement to the Underwriters to execute the Underwriting Agreement, the undersigned hereby acknowledges and agrees that the undersigned will not (i) offer, sell, contract to sell, pledge [], grant any option to purchase or otherwise dispose of (collectively, a "Disposition") any Company Securities, or any securities convertible into or exercisable or exchangeable for, or any rights to purchase or otherwise acquire, any
with respect to Selling Stockholder's and Dearborn, L.L.C.'s letters: (other than pursuant to the terms of B.F. Saul Real Estate Investment Trust's existing revolving line of credit with U.S. Bank National Association and Dearborn, L.L.C.'s existing revolving line of credit with Wells Fargo Bank National Association under which B.F. Saul Real Estate Investment Trust is guarantor and pledgor, as such lines of credit are in effect as of the date of this letter agreement)
Company Securities held by the undersigned or acquired by the undersigned after the date hereof, or that may be deemed to be beneficially owned by the undersigned (collectively, the "Lock-Up Shares"), pursuant to the Rules and Regulations promulgated under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Act"), and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, for a period commencing on the date hereof and ending ninety (90) days after the date of the Underwriting Agreement, inclusive (the "Lock-Up Period"), without the prior written consent of Raymond James & Associates, Inc. or (ii) exercise or seek to exercise or effectuate in any manner any rights of any nature that the undersigned has or may have hereafter to require the Company to register under the Act the undersigned's sale, transfer or other disposition of any of the Lock-Up Shares or other securities of the Company held by the undersigned, or to otherwise participate as a selling securityholder in any manner in any registration effected by the Company under the Act, including under the Registration Statement, during the Lock-Up Period, notwithstanding the foregoing, if (x) during the last 17 days of the Lock-Up Period, the company issues a release concerning earnings or material news or a material event relating to the company occurs; or (y) prior to the expiration of the Lock-Up Period, the company announces it will release earnings results during the 16 day period beginning on the last day of the Lock-Up Period; the restrictions imposed in this letter agreement shall continue to apply until the expiration of the 18 day period beginning on the issuance of the earnings release or the occurrence of the material news or material event. The foregoing restrictions are expressly agreed to preclude the undersigned from engaging in any hedging, collar (whether or not for any consideration) or other transaction that is designed to or reasonably expected to lead or result in a Disposition of Lock-Up Shares during the Lock-Up Period, even if such Lock-Up Shares would be disposed of by someone other than such holder. Such prohibited hedging or other transactions would include any short sale or any purchase, sale or grant of any right (including any put or call option or reversal or cancellation thereof) with respect to any Lock-Up Shares or with respect to any security (other than a broad-based market basket or index) that includes, relates to or derives any significant part of its value from Lock-Up Shares.
Notwithstanding the agreement not to make any Disposition during the Lock-Up Period, you have agreed that the foregoing restrictions shall not apply to any grant or exercise of options pursuant to the Company's stock option plans.
It is understood that, if the Underwriting Agreement (other than the provisions thereof that survive termination) shall terminate or be terminated prior to payment for and delivery of the Shares, you will release the undersigned from the obligations under this letter agreement.
In furtherance of the foregoing, the Company and its transfer agent and registrar are hereby authorized to decline to make any transfer of Lock-Up Shares if such transfer would constitute a violation or breach of this letter. This letter shall be binding on the undersigned and the respective successors, heirs, personal representatives and assigns of the undersigned. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein have the respective meanings assigned to such terms in the Underwriting Agreement.
 

Exhibit 5.1
Saul Centers, Inc.
7501 Wisconsin Avenue
Bethesda, MD 20814
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We have acted as counsel to you, Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the "Company"), in connection with the registration statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-151515) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") under the Securities Act of 1933 (the "Act") on June 6, 2008 (the "Registration Statement"). Pursuant to the Registration Statement, B.F. Saul Real Estate Investment Trust (the "Selling Stockholder"), a stockholder of the Company, proposes to sell up to 1,500,000 shares (the "Shares") of common stock, par value $0.01 (the "Common Stock") of the Company, including 150,000 shares of Common Stock that comprise the over-allotment option exercised by Raymond James & Associates, Inc. on June 19, 2008, in accordance with the terms set forth in an Underwriting Agreement dated June 19, 2008 (the "Underwriting Agreement") among the Company, Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, a Maryland limited partnership, the Selling Stockholder and Raymond James & Associates, Inc., as underwriter (the "Underwriter").
For purposes of giving the opinions hereinafter set forth, our examination of documents has been limited to examination of copies of the following (each, a "Document," and collectively, the "Documents"):
 
 
 
 
Saul Centers, Inc.
June 24, 2008
Page 2
 
 
 
 
 
Based upon, subject to and limited by the foregoing and the assumptions, qualifications, limitations, and exceptions set forth below, we are of the opinion that the Shares, as sold and delivered by the Selling Stockholder in accordance with the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
For purposes of this opinion letter, we have not reviewed any documents other than the Documents. In particular, we have not reviewed any document (other than the Documents) that is referred to in or incorporated by reference into any Document reviewed by us. We have assumed that there exists no provision in any document that we have not reviewed that is inconsistent with the opinions stated herein.
In connection with this opinion letter, we have considered such matters of law and fact as we, in our professional judgment, have deemed necessary or appropriate to render the opinions contained herein. In rendering this opinion letter, we have assumed without independent investigation: (i) that each entity (other than the Company) that is a party to any Document is, and has been at all times relevant to this opinion letter, duly formed or organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction in which each is formed or organized; (ii) the due authorization, execution and delivery of each Document by each of the parties thereto (other than the Company); (iii) the completeness of all Documents; (iv) the genuineness of all signatures; (v) the legal capacity of all individuals who have executed any of the Documents; (vi) the authenticity of all Documents submitted to us as originals; (vii) the conformity to the original documents of all Documents submitted to us as certified, photostatic, reproduced, facsimile or conformed copies of valid existing agreements; (viii) the authenticity of all such latter Documents; and (ix) that the statements regarding matters of fact in any of the Documents that we have examined are accurate and complete. We have further assumed that there are no oral or written modifications or amendments to any of the Documents, and that the executed versions of the Documents are identical to any unexecuted forms or versions that we may have reviewed.
This opinion is limited in all respects and for all purposes to the laws of the State of Maryland (excluding the securities laws and blue sky laws of the State of Maryland), and we
Saul Centers, Inc.
June 24, 2008
Page 3
 
express no opinion on the laws of any other jurisdiction, including federal laws and rules and regulations relating thereto. Our opinions are rendered only with respect to Maryland laws and rules, regulations and orders thereunder that are currently in effect. In rendering the opinions set forth herein, we express no opinion concerning (i) the creation, attachment, perfection or priority of any security interest, lien or other encumbrance, or (ii) the nature or validity of title to any property. The opinions set forth in this letter are limited to the matters and the transaction expressly addressed herein and no opinion is to be implied or may be inferred beyond the opinions expressly stated in this letter.
We express no opinion as to the enforceability of any provisions contained in the Underwriting Agreement that constitute waivers that are prohibited by law prior to default.
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and to the use of our name in the Free Writing Prospectus under the caption "Legal Matters." The giving of this consent, however, does not constitute an admission that we are "experts" within the meaning of Section 11 of the Act, or within the category of persons whose consent is required by Section 7 of the Act.
 

Exhibit 8.1
 
Saul Centers, Inc.
7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500
Bethesda, Maryland 20814
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") has filed a registration statement on Form S-3, as amended (File No. 333-15151) (the "Registration Statement," which term includes the prospectus dated June 6, 2008, and all documents incorporated and deemed to be incorporated by reference therein) with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In connection with the filing of a term sheet (the "Term Sheet") dated June 19, 2008 and a prospectus supplement (the "Prospectus Supplement") dated June 19, 2008, you have asked us to render an opinion with respect to the qualification of the Company as a real estate investment trust ("REIT") under sections 856 through 860 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code").
In rendering the following opinions, we have examined such statutes, regulations, records, certificates and other documents as we have considered necessary or appropriate as a basis for such opinions, including the following: (1) the Registration Statement, (2) the Term Sheet, (3) the Prospectus Supplement, (4) the Articles of Incorporation of the Company, as amended, restated or supplemented (the "Articles of Incorporation"), (5) certain written representations of the Company contained in a letter to us dated as of the date hereof, (6) representative copies of the leases entered into by the Company as of the date hereof, and (7) such other documents or information as we have deemed necessary to render the opinions set forth in this letter.
In our review, we have assumed, with your consent, that the documents listed above that we reviewed in proposed form will be executed in substantially the same form, all of the representations and statements set forth in such documents as to factual matters (but not legal conclusions) are true, correct and complete, and that all representations that speak in the future, or to the intention, or to the best of belief and knowledge of any person(s) or party(ies) are and will be true, correct and complete as if made without such qualification. Nothing has come to our attention which would cause us to believe that any of such representations are untrue, incorrect or incomplete. We have also assumed that all of the obligations imposed by any such documents on the parties thereto, including obligations imposed under the Articles of Incorporation have been or will be performed or satisfied in accordance with their terms. Further, we have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the proper execution of all documents, the authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals, the conformity to originals of documents submitted to us as copies, and the authenticity of the originals from which any copies were made.
Saul Centers, Inc.
June 24, 2008
Page 2
 
Unless facts material to the opinions expressed herein are specifically stated to have been independently established or verified by us, we have relied as to such facts solely upon the representations made by the Company. To the extent that the representations of the Company are with respect to matters set forth in the Code or the regulations promulgated thereunder (the "Treasury Regulations"), we have reviewed with the individuals making such representations the relevant provisions of the Code, the applicable Treasury Regulations and published administrative interpretations thereof.
Based upon and subject to the foregoing and to the qualifications below, we are of the opinion that:
1. The Company was a REIT under the Code for each of its taxable years ending through December 31, 2007.
2. The Company is organized in conformity with the requirements for qualification and taxation as a REIT under the Code, and its current method of operation and ownership will enable it to meet the requirements for qualification and taxation as a REIT for the current taxable year and for future taxable years.
3. The statements in the Term Sheet and in the Prospectus Supplement set forth under the caption "Federal Income Tax Considerations," to the extent that they discuss matters of law or legal conclusions or purport to describe or summarize certain provisions of the agreements, statutes or regulations referred to therein, are accurate descriptions or summaries in all material respects, and the discussion thereunder expresses the opinion of Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP insofar as it relates to matters of United States federal income tax law and legal conclusions with regard to those matters.
The opinions set forth in this letter are based on existing law as contained in the Code, Treasury Regulations (including any Temporary and Proposed Regulations), and interpretations of the foregoing by the Internal Revenue Service ("IRS") and by the courts in effect (or, in case of certain Proposed Regulations, proposed) as of the date hereof, all of which are subject to change, both retroactively or prospectively, and to possibly different interpretations. Moreover, the Company's ability to achieve and maintain qualification as a REIT depends upon its ability to achieve and maintain certain diversity of stock ownership requirements and, through actual annual operating results, certain requirements under the Code regarding its income, assets and distribution levels. No assurance can be given as to whether, for any given taxable year, the actual ownership of the Company's stock and its actual operating results and distributions satisfy the tests necessary to achieve and maintain its status as a REIT. We assume no obligation to update the opinions set forth in this letter. We believe that the conclusions expressed herein, if challenged by the IRS, would be sustained in court. Because our positions are not binding upon the IRS or the courts, however, there can be no assurance that contrary positions may not be successfully asserted by the IRS.
 
Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP
Saul Centers, Inc.
June 24, 2008
Page 3
 
The foregoing opinions are limited to the specific matters covered thereby and should not be interpreted to imply the undersigned has offered its opinion on any other matter.
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to the Registration Statement. The giving of this consent, however, does not constitute an admission that we are "experts" within the meaning of Section 11 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Act"), or within the category of persons whose consent is required by Section 7 of the Act.
 
 
Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20080807163813.txt.gz
TIME:20080807163813
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 7, 2008, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2008. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: August 7, 2008
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
August 7, 2008, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended June 30, 2008. Total revenue for the three months ended June 30, 2008 ("2008 Quarter") increased 8.2% to $40,105,000 compared to $37,077,000 for the three months ended June 30, 2007 ("2007 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before gain on property disposition, minority interests and preferred stock dividends, increased 9.9% to $12,175,000 for the 2008 Quarter compared to $11,077,000 for the 2007 Quarter. This $1,098,000 increase in operating income was offset by the $1,786,000 increase in preferred stock dividends from the Company's issuance of approximately $79,300,000 of Series B preferred stock in March 2008. As a result, net income available to common stockholders was $6,443,000 or $0.36 per diluted share for the 2008 Quarter, compared to $6,926,000 or $0.39 per diluted share for the 2007 Quarter.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 3.2% for the 2008 Quarter compared to the 2007 Quarter and same property operating income increased 1.2%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 1.0% for the 2008 Quarter compared to the 2007 Quarter. The quarter over quarter shopping center operating income increase resulted primarily from base rent growth at Southdale and several core shopping centers as well as the stabilization of Lansdowne Town Center. The same center operating income increases were offset in part by increased property operating expenses and real estate taxes, net of tenant recoveries, and an increase in credit loss reserves. Same property operating income in the office portfolio increased 2.0% for the 2008 Quarter compared to the 2007 Quarter.
 
For the six months ended June 30, 2008 ("2008 Period"), total revenue increased 6.9% to $78,827,000 compared to $73,761,000 for the six months ended June 30, 2007 ("2007 Period") and operating income increased 5.3% to $23,248,000 compared to $22,086,000 for the 2007 Period. This $1,162,000 increase in operating income was offset by the $1,883,000 increase in preferred stock dividends from the Company's Series B preferred stock issue. As a result, net income available to common stockholders was $13,476,000 or $0.75 per diluted share for the 2008 Period, compared to $13,800,000 or $0.78 per diluted share for the 2007 Period. Overall same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 3.7% for the 2008 Period compared to the 2007 Period and same property operating income increased 2.2%. For the 2008 Period, shopping center same property operating income increased 2.7% due to the stabilization of Lansdowne Town Center and rental rate growth at Southdale, Seven Corners and several core shopping centers. The same center operating income increases were offset in part by increased property operating expenses and real estate taxes, net of tenant recoveries, and an increase in credit loss reserves. Same property operating income in the office portfolio remained relatively stable, increasing 0.7% for the 2008 Period.
As of June 30, 2008, 94.8% of the operating portfolio was leased compared to 95.7% for June 30, 2007. On a same property basis, 94.8% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 95.8%. The 2008 same property leasing percentages decreased due to a net decrease of approximately 74,000 square feet of leased space. The majority of this leasing decrease, approximately 49,000 square feet, occurred at South Dekalb Plaza in Atlanta, Georgia. Leasing also decreased approximately 13,000 square feet at Smallwood Village Center where the Company is engaged in a major renovation.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) decreased 1.3% to $15,378,000 in the 2008 Quarter compared to $15,580,000 for the 2007 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders decreased 1.5% to $0.66 per share for the 2008 Quarter compared to $0.67 per share for the 2007 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains from property dispositions. FFO
 
available to common shareholders for the 2008 Period increased 0.8% to $31,297,000 from $31,037,000 during the 2007 Period. Per share FFO available to common shareholders for the 2008 Period remained level with the 2007 Period at $1.34 per diluted share. Improved property operating results were offset by increased preferred stock dividends of $1,786,000 ($0.08 per diluted share) and $1,883,000 ($.08 per diluted share), for the 2008 Quarter and 2008 Period, respectively, arising from the Company's Series B preferred stock issue.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 50 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 8.2 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20081003180754.txt.gz
TIME:20081003180754
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") is filing as an exhibit to this Form 8-K the Shared Services Agreement between the Company and B.F. Saul Company in response to comments received from the staff of the Securities and Exchange Commission on the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 and Proxy Statement relating to its 2008 Annual Meeting of Stockholders.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: October 3, 2008
 

Exhibit 10(a)
This SHARED SERVICES AGREEMENT, dated July 1, 2004, is between B.F. Saul Company, a corporation organized under the laws of the District of Columbia ("" which definition shall be deemed to include, for purposes of this Agreement, all consolidated subsidiaries of Saul Company), and Saul Centers, Inc., a corporation organized under the laws of the State of Maryland ("" which definition shall be deemed to include, for purposes of this Agreement, Saul Holdings Limited Partnership and all of its subsidiaries).
Saul Company,
Saul Centers,
A.    Both of the parties hereto are engaged in various businesses involving real estate. The headquarters locations and most executive officers of each of the parties are located at the same address, designated below as "Headquarters." Saul Company has certain experienced employees, programs and procedures the use of which could be of benefit to Saul Centers.
B.    In order to recognize that certain costs of operating their businesses are most efficiently accounted for on a shared basis, the parties have agreed to establish and recognize certain standards and procedures for such shared costs as set forth below in this Agreement.
C.    Further, in order to make its business operations more cost-effective and efficient, and otherwise to facilitate such operations, Saul Centers has requested that Saul Company make available to Saul Centers certain time and services of Saul Company employees, and certain goods and services accessible through Saul Company.
D.    Saul Company has agreed to make such employee time and services and other goods and services available to Saul Centers, on the terms and conditions hereinafter set forth, both parties agreeing that such terms represent a fair and equitable treatment of the costs and benefits to each of the parties with respect to such time, goods and services.
E.    The parties confirm that this Agreement is intended to confirm and clarify the practices and procedures that have been agreed to and in effect since January 1, 2004, and thus should be deemed to be effective from and after January 1, 2004.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and of the mutual covenants and agreements contained herein, and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows.
 
 
(a)    The head offices of both Saul Company and Saul Centers are currently located on the 13
th
through 15
th
floors of the East Tower at 7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Bethesda, Maryland 20814 (such location, until changed by written agreement of an authorized officer of each of the parties, to be referred to herein as ""). The parties agree that certain costs of the operation of, and company operations run from, the Headquarters, as set forth on attached to this Agreement ("") shall be split between Saul Company and Saul Centers on a percentage basis proportionate to the number of employees ("") employed by each such party whose primary place of employment is Headquarters. The costs included on Schedule 1-A shall be reviewed by authorized officers of each of the parties on an annual basis (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by such authorized officers). Any changes therein made by mutual agreement of such authorized officers shall be deemed amendments to this Agreement, and shall be attached to the original copy of this Agreement held by each such party. [In this connection, the parties acknowledge and agree that certain occupancy costs that might otherwise be deemed included in the definition of Headquarters Shared Costs under this Agreement are, instead, already covered by and included in one or more separate agreements such as a sublease. Costs covered by such separate agreements are not intended to be treated under this Shared Services Agreement.]
Headquarters
Schedule 1-A
Headquarters Shared Costs
Employees
(b)    For purposes of determining the respective number of Employees of Saul Company and Saul Centers for any purpose under this Agreement, (i) some employees perform services for both Saul Company and Saul Centers, the name and respective portion of each such employee's time allocated to each company to be set forth on Schedule 1-B; and (ii) the parties may agree (and shall so set forth on Schedule 1-B) that all or a designated portion of the time of a particular employee or employees ("") is to be allocated to Saul Centers, even though that employee may technically be an employee of Saul Company. As to item (ii) in the preceding sentence, the parties agree that such procedure is intended to provide a more efficient way of accounting for time of various employees spent for the benefit of Saul Centers that may vary from period to period than attempting actually to track the specific allocation of such time.
Allocated Employees
(c)    The respective number of Saul Company and Saul Centers Headquarters Employees and their allocated percentages shall be determined annually (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by authorized officers of each company). For each calendar year, such number shall be determined, "in arrears," by using the number of Employees employed by each party on the first business day of the last month in the preceding calendar year. For example, for the period from January 1, 2005 through December 31, 2005, such number shall be based on the number of Employees of each party on the first business day of December, 2004. The parties acknowledge that the number of
 
Employees may fluctuate from time to time within any quarterly annual, but, subject to the provisions set forth above for more frequent determinations by mutual agreement) have agreed that the system of computation described above in this Section 1 substantially captures the agreement of the parties and is fair and equitable on an overall basis.
(d)    Headquarters Shared Costs may, based on the mutual agreement of the parties, be paid, in proportion, directly by each party, or be paid by Saul Company and reimbursed by Saul Centers monthly. The supporting documentation for any such request shall be made available to Saul Centers at any reasonable time at Headquarters.
 
(a)    Both Saul Company and Saul Centers have offices in locations other than Headquarters, and Employees who work at locations other than Headquarters. The parties agree that certain "company-wide" costs of the operation of the respective businesses of Saul Company and Saul Centers, whether relating to officers and Employees at Headquarters or other offices, as set forth on attached to this Agreement ("") shall be split between Saul Company and Saul Centers on a percentage basis proportionate to the number of Employees employed by each such party, including both Employees whose principal place of business is Headquarters and Employees whose principal place of business is one or more other offices of either party. The costs included on Schedule 2 shall be reviewed by authorized officers of each of the parties on an annual basis (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by such authorized officers). Any changes therein made by mutual agreement of such authorized officers shall be deemed amendments to this Agreement, and shall be attached to the original copy of this Agreement held by each such party.
Schedule 2
Company-Wide Shared Costs
(b)    Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, the parties acknowledge that the Company-Wide Shared Costs are not intended to cover certain Employees (such as Employees whose sole work for the relevant party is performed at and for the benefit of a particular property) (""), whose compensation and other related expenses are determined and paid on a different basis from direct Employees of the parties.
Excluded Employees
(c)    The proportionate share of the Company-Wide Shared Costs and the method and timing of payment or reimbursement therefor shall be determined on the same basis as set forth in Sections 1(c) and 1(d) above.
 
(a) The parties acknowledge that (i) certain costs of the operation of each of the parties are incurred under programs (the "") that apply only to certain segments of the employee population, based on the needs of the employers and the terms of their employment (including by way of
Designated Programs
 
example and not limitation, use of "company cars"); and (ii) the cost and administrative activities related to such programs ("") can reasonably be expected to be reduced if such Designated Programs are operated on a shared basis. The Designated Programs covered by this Agreement are as set forth on attached to this Agreement. The costs included on Schedule 3 shall be reviewed by authorized officers of each of the parties on an annual basis (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by such authorized officers). Any changes therein made by mutual agreement of such authorized officers shall be deemed amendments to this Agreement, and shall be attached to the original copy of this Agreement held by each such party.
Shared Program Costs
Schedule 3
(b)    The portion of the Shared Program Costs allocated to each of the parties hereto shall be calculated on an annual basis, and shall be determined by mutual agreement of an authorized officer of each party, on the basis of the percentage of the actual cost of each shared program attributable to the officers and employees of each of the parties.
(c)    The method and timing of payment of the Shared Program Costs by each of the parties shall be determined as set forth in Section 1(d) above.
 
(a)    The parties acknowledge that information technology services ("") can be provided more efficiently and cost effectively to Saul Company and Saul Centers on a shared basis. The parties further acknowledge that the level of usage of IT by Saul Company and Saul Centers, respectively, varies over time, but can be projected on an annual basis within a reasonable range of accuracy. All employees providing IT are employees of Saul Company. Accordingly, the parties agree that, after the allocations of Headquarters Shared Costs and Company-Wide Shared Costs set forth in Sections 1 and 2 above are made between Saul Company and Saul Centers, a further allocation shall be made as follows.
IT
(b)    The percentage of the Headquarters Shared Costs and Company-Wide Shared Costs allocated to Saul Company in effect as of the first day of each fiscal year of Saul Company, pursuant to Sections 1 and 2 above, shall be determined. Thereafter, the portion of such Saul Company-allocated costs attributable to personnel providing IT and to certain system-wide licensing, maintenance, and operating costs (the "") shall be determined and set forth on attached hereto. Such determination shall be made by mutual agreement of an authorized officer of each of the parties. Such authorized officers shall then, by mutual agreement, determine and set forth on such Schedule 4, a percentage of the IT Shared Costs to be paid by Saul Centers for the fiscal year then beginning (the ""). Such percentage shall be determined on the basis of the projected use of IT by Saul Centers and Saul Company during such year, taking into consideration the status, activities and business plan of each such party.
IT Shared Costs
Schedule 4
Annual SCI IT Percentage
 
(c)    Thereafter, during such fiscal year, Saul Centers shall pay to Saul Company the Annual SCI IT Percentage of the IT Shared Costs monthly at such times as may be determined by mutual agreement of the parties.
(d)    The Annual SCI IT Percentage included on Schedule 4 shall be reviewed by authorized officers of each of the parties on an annual basis (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by such authorized officers). Any changes therein made by mutual agreement of such authorized officers shall be deemed amendments to this Agreement, and shall be attached to the original copy of this Agreement held by each such party.
(e)    The parties acknowledge that each of Saul Company and Saul Centers will from time to time purchase computer, telephony, and other IT-related equipment and software for individual employees (including by way of example and not limitation, desktop computers, PDAs, and office telephones). All such costs shall be borne directly by the entity for whom that person works (subject to splitting as a cost associated with an Allocated Employee, as set forth in Section 1(b) above), and shall not be included in IT Shared Costs.
 
(a)    The parties acknowledge that certain other administrative and "in-house" services ("") are provided to Saul Centers by employees of Saul Company on an on-going basis for purposes of efficiency and cost effectiveness. Such services, as of the date hereof, are as set forth on attached hereto.
Administrative Services
Schedule 5
(b)    For all of such Administrative Services other than legal services, Saul Centers shall pay to Saul Company a monthly payment, the current amount of which is set forth on such Schedule 5. For legal services, Saul Centers shall pay to Saul Company, on a monthly basis, a fixed fee for each hour of legal services performed by Saul Company employees for Saul Centers. Such fee for each legal employee shall be determined by mutual agreement of the parties, and based upon the "all-in" employment costs to Saul Company for such employee.
(c)    The Administrative Services, monthly payment for non-legal services, and hourly rate for legal services, as set forth on Schedule 5, shall be reviewed by authorized officers of each of the parties on an annual basis (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by such authorized officers). Any changes therein made by mutual agreement of such authorized officers shall be deemed amendments to this Agreement, and shall be attached to the original copy of this Agreement held by each such party.
 
(a)    The parties acknowledge that a number of operational and other costs are billed by outside vendors directly to Saul Company and Saul Centers. The parties will make all reasonable efforts to confirm that such costs are billed to
 
and paid by the correct party in each case. On a quarterly basis (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by authorized officers of each of the parties), any misapplied invoices and payments shall be reconciled and appropriate payments shall be made by each party to the other.
(b)    The parties also agree that they will make all reasonable efforts to ensure that all allocations, charges and payments made pursuant to Sections 1 through 5 of this Agreement are accurate. On an annual basis (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by authorized officers of each of the parties), such allocations, charges and payments shall be reviewed and reconciled, and any appropriate payments shall be made by each party to the other.
 
(a)    Nothing herein contained shall prevent employees of Saul Company from engaging in other activities, including, without limitation, the rendering of advice to, and performance of services for, other entities engaged in similar lines of business to Saul Centers.
(b)    This Agreement shall have a term of one year from the date set forth above, and thereafter shall automatically continue for additional one-year terms unless terminated by either party upon not less than thirty (30) days' notice to the other party. The parties may terminate this Agreement at any time by mutual written agreement. Within 30 days after the effective date of such termination (i) all unpaid payments or reimbursements for services performed by Saul Company officers or employees prior to such termination shall be paid by Saul Centers, and (ii) a reconciliation pursuant to Section 6 above shall be agreed upon and paid.
(c)    Any notice, report or other communication required or permitted to be given hereunder shall be in writing and shall be provided by personal delivery, interoffice mail or recognized overnight courier. Any such notices to either party shall be given to the Headquarters address unless a party has provided the other party with notice, pursuant to this subsection (c), of a different notice address.
(d)    This Agreement shall not be changed, modified, terminated, or discharged, in whole or in part, except by an instrument in writing signed by all parties hereto, or their respective successors or assignees.
(e)    The provisions of this Agreement are independent of and severable from each other, and no provision shall be affected or rendered invalid or unenforceable by virtue of the fact that for any reason any other or others of them may be invalid or unenforceable in whole or in part.
(f)    This Agreement shall be construed and interpreted in accordance with the laws of the State of Maryland, without regard to conflict of law principles.
 
(g)    This Agreement contains the entire agreement and understanding among the parties hereto with respect to the subject matter hereof, and supersedes all prior and contemporaneous agreements, understandings, inducements and conditions, express or implied, oral or written, of any nature whatsoever with respect to the subject matter hereof. The express terms hereof control and supersede any course of performance and/or usage of the trade inconsistent with any of the terms hereof.
(h)    Neither the failure nor any delay on the part of a party to exercise any right, remedy, power or privilege under this Agreement shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any right, remedy, power or privilege preclude any other or further exercise of the same or of any other right, remedy, power or privilege, nor shall any waiver of any right, remedy, power or privilege with respect to any occurrence be construed as a waiver of such right, remedy, power or privilege with respect to any other occurrence. No waiver shall be effective unless it is in writing and is signed by the party asserted to have granted such waiver
(i)    The titles of paragraphs and subparagraphs contained in this Agreement are for convenience only, and they neither form a part of this Agreement nor are they to be used in the construction or interpretation hereof.
(j)    This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original as against any party whose signature appears thereon, and all of which shall together constitute one and the same instrument. This Agreement shall become binding when one or more counterparts hereof, individually or taken together, shall bear the signatures of all of the parties reflected hereon as the signatories.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have executed this Agreement as of the date and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20081110105950.txt.gz
TIME:20081110105950
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On November 7, 2008, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2008. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: November 10, 2008
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
November 7, 2008, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended September 30, 2008. Total revenue for the three months ended September 30, 2008 ("2008 Quarter") increased 7.7% to $40,947,000 compared to $38,014,000 for the three months ended September 30, 2007 ("2007 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before gain on property disposition, minority interests and preferred stock dividends, decreased 5.8% to $11,264,000 for the 2008 Quarter compared to $11,956,000 for the 2007 Quarter. This $692,000 decrease in operating income includes a one-time $1,112,000 non-cash depreciation charge resulting from the demolition of a portion of the Smallwood Village Center in conjunction with the Company's redevelopment of the property. The Company issued approximately $79,300,000 of Series B preferred stock in March 2008, which increased the 2008 Quarter preferred stock dividends by $1,785,000. Primarily as a result of these two events, net income available to common stockholders decreased to $5,736,000 or $0.32 per diluted share for the 2008 Quarter, compared to $7,624,000 or $0.43 per diluted share for the 2007 Quarter.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 3.9% for the 2008 Quarter compared to the 2007 Quarter and same property operating income increased 0.7%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 1.9% for the 2008 Quarter compared to the 2007 Quarter. This shopping center operating income increase resulted primarily from base rent growth and to a lesser extent, an increase in lease termination fees. These increases were offset in part by increased real estate
 
taxes and property operating expenses, net of tenant recoveries, and an increase in credit loss reserves. Same property operating income in the office portfolio decreased 3.2% for the 2008 Quarter compared to the 2007 Quarter. This decrease resulted primarily from the 1.2% leasing percentage decrease, from 96.5% at the 2007 Quarter end to 95.3% at the 2008 Quarter end.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2008 ("2008 Period"), total revenue increased 7.2% to $119,774,000 compared to $111,775,000 for the nine months ended September 30, 2007 ("2007 Period") and operating income increased 1.4% to $34,512,000 compared to $34,042,000 for the 2007 Period. This $470,000 increase in operating income includes a one-time $1,112,000 non-cash depreciation charge resulting from the demolition of a portion of the Smallwood Village Center in conjunction with the Company's redevelopment of the property. Preferred stock dividends increased by $3,668,000 in the 2008 Period due to the Company's Series B preferred stock issue. Primarily as a result of these two events, net income available to common stockholders decreased to $19,212,000 or $1.07 per diluted share for the 2008 Period, compared to $21,424,000 or $1.21 per diluted share for the 2007 Period. Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 3.8% for the 2008 Period compared to the 2007 Period and same property operating income increased 1.8%. For the 2008 Period, shopping center same property operating income increased 2.5% due to the stabilization of Lansdowne Town Center, rental rate growth at Southdale and several other shopping centers, and to a lesser extent, an increase in lease termination fees. These increases were offset in part by increased property operating expenses and real estate taxes, net of tenant recoveries, and an increase in credit loss reserves. Same property operating income in the office portfolio remained relatively stable, decreasing 0.6% for the 2008 Period.
As of September 30, 2008, 94.7% of the operating portfolio was leased compared to 95.4% for September 30, 2007. On a same property basis, 94.6% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 95.4%. The 2008 same property leasing percentages decreased due to a net decrease of approximately 65,000 square feet of leased space. The majority of this leasing decrease, approximately 37,000 square feet, occurred at South Dekalb Plaza in Atlanta, Georgia. Leasing also decreased approximately 12,000 square feet at Avenel Business Park in Gaithersburg, Maryland and approximately 11,000 square feet at Seabreeze Plaza in Palm Harbor, Florida.
 
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) decreased 3.1% to $15,966,000 in the 2008 Quarter compared to $16,481,000 for the 2007 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders decreased 4.2% to $0.68 per share for the 2008 Quarter compared to $0.71 per share for the 2007 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains from property dispositions. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2008 Period decreased 0.5% to $47,263,000 from $47,518,000 during the 2007 Period. Per share FFO available to common shareholders for the 2008 Period decreased 1.5% to $2.02 from $2.05 per diluted share, for the 2007 Period. Improved property operating results were offset by increased preferred stock dividends of $1,785,000 ($0.08 per diluted share) and $3,668,000 ($0.16 per diluted share), for the 2008 Quarter and 2008 Period, respectively, arising from the Company's Series B preferred stock issue.
Approximately 97% of the Company's debt consists of fixed rate, amortizing non-recourse mortgage loans, none of which mature until December 2011. The mortgage maturing December 2011 will have a remaining balance of $62,233,000, or only 54% of the original amount borrowed, as a result of loan principal repaid monthly over the term of the loan. The Company has no outstanding borrowings on its $150 million revolving credit facility.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 50 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 8.2 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20090223161912.txt.gz
TIME:20090223161912
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 23, 2009, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended December 31, 2008. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: February 23, 2009
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
February 23, 2009, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended December 31, 2008. Total revenue for the three months ended December 31, 2008 ("2008 Quarter") increased 4.5% to $40,571,000 compared to $38,810,000 for the three months ended December 31, 2007 ("2007 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before gain on property dispositions, minority interests and preferred stock dividends, increased 4.5% to $11,853,000 for the 2008 Quarter compared to $11,340,000 for the 2007 Quarter. For the 2008 Quarter, the Company recognized a non-operating, gain on property dispositions of $1,096,000, arising from insurance proceeds related to minor fire damage sustained at two shopping centers during 2008. These insurance proceeds are expected to fund substantially all of the restoration. The gain recognized was measured as the difference between insurance proceeds and the depreciated carrying value of the assets replaced. The Company issued approximately $79,300,000 of Series B preferred stock in March 2008, which increased the 2008 Quarter preferred stock dividends by $1,785,000. Net income available to common stockholders decreased to $7,029,000 or $0.39 per diluted share for the 2008 Quarter, compared to $7,279,000 or $0.41 per diluted share for the 2007 Quarter.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 1.2% for the 2008 Quarter compared to the 2007 Quarter but same property operating income decreased 1.7%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio decreased 2.6% for the 2008 Quarter compared to the 2007 Quarter. This shopping center operating income decrease resulted primarily from an increase in the provision for credit loss reserves on delinquent tenant rents and to a lesser extent, a decrease in lease termination fee income. Same property operating income in the office portfolio increased 1.1% for the 2008 Quarter compared to the 2007 Quarter. This office portfolio operating income increase resulted primarily from the 0.6% leasing percentage increase, from 95.2% at the 2007 Quarter end, to 95.8% at the 2008 Quarter end.
 
 
For the year ended December 31, 2008 ("2008 Year"), total revenue increased 6.5% to $160,345,000 compared to $150,585,000 for the year ended December 31, 2007 ("2007 Year") and operating income increased 2.2% to $46,365,000 compared to $45,382,000 for the 2007 Year. This $983,000 increase in operating income was impacted by a one-time $1,112,000, non-cash depreciation charge resulting from the demolition of a portion of the Smallwood Village Center in conjunction with the Company's redevelopment of the property. The increase in operating income combined with the previously mentioned $1,096,000 gain, was more than offset by an increase in preferred stock dividends of $5,453,000 for the 2008 Year. As a result, net income available to common stockholders decreased to $26,241,000 or $1.46 per diluted share for the 2008 Year, compared to $28,703,000 or $1.62 per diluted share for the 2007 Year. Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 3.1% for the 2008 Year compared to the 2007 Year and same property operating income increased 0.9%. For the 2008 Year, shopping center same property operating income increased 1.2% due primarily to the stabilization of operations at Lansdowne Town Center and rental rate growth at Southdale and several other shopping centers. These increases were offset in part by an increase in credit loss reserves and increased property operating expenses and real estate taxes, net of tenant recoveries. Same property operating income in the office portfolio remained relatively stable, decreasing 0.2% for the 2008 Year compared to the 2007 Year.
As of December 31, 2008, 94.2% of the operating portfolio was leased compared to 95.3% for December 31, 2007. On a same property basis, 94.1% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 95.4%. The 2008 same property leasing percentages decreased due to a net decrease of approximately 99,000 square feet of leased space. The largest contributor to the leasing decrease, approximately 29,000 square feet, occurred at South Dekalb Plaza in Atlanta, Georgia. Leasing also decreased approximately 14,000 square feet at Village Center, approximately 13,000 square feet at Broadlands Village and approximately 10,000 square feet at Ashburn Village, located in the Northern Virginia suburbs of Washington, DC.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) decreased 5.5% to $15,432,000 in the 2008 Quarter compared to $16,328,000 for the 2007 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders decreased 5.7% to $0.66 per share for the 2008 Quarter compared to $0.70 per share for the 2007 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus minority interests, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains from property dispositions. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2008 Year decreased 1.8% to $62,695,000 from $63,846,000 for the 2007 Year. Per share FFO available to common shareholders for the 2008 Year decreased 2.5% to $2.68 from $2.75 per diluted share, for the 2007 Year. Increased property operating results were offset by increased preferred stock dividends of $1,785,000
 
 
($0.08 per diluted share) and $5,453,000 ($0.23 per diluted share), for the 2008 Quarter and 2008 Year, respectively, arising from the Company's Series B preferred stock issue.
At December 31, 2008, approximately 97% of the Company's debt consists of fixed rate, amortizing non-recourse mortgage loans, none of which mature until December 2011. The mortgage maturing December 2011 will have a remaining balance of $62,233,000, or only 54% of the original amount borrowed, as a result of loan principal repaid monthly over the term of the loan. The Company had no outstanding borrowings on its $150 million revolving credit facility as of December 31, 2008.
During 2008, the Company paid quarterly dividends to its common stockholders totaling $1.88 per share, compared to $1.77 paid per share in 2007. On January 31, 2009, the Company paid a quarterly dividend of $0.39 per share to its common stockholders ($1.56 per share annual rate).
During 2008, the Company acquired three shopping centers, the first of which was the 92,000 square foot Great Falls Center located in Great Falls, Virginia, and anchored by a Safeway grocery store and a CVS pharmacy. The Company also purchased a 116,000 square foot single tenant property leased by the BJ's Wholesale Club, located in Alexandria, Virginia. The third property is the 22,000 square foot Marketplace at Sea Colony, located in Bethany Beach, Delaware. In January 2008, the Company acquired a 15.4 acre land parcel in Warrenton, Virginia, and is constructing the 103,000 square foot, Harris Teeter grocery anchored Northrock shopping center. The development is 62% pre-leased and construction is expected to be completed during the second quarter of 2009. The Company is nearing the completion of construction at Westview Village, a 105,000 square foot neighborhood shopping center in Frederick, Maryland. Westview Village is 18% leased. The Company also commenced construction in 2008 of Clarendon Center in Arlington, Virginia. Clarendon Center is located adjacent to the Clarendon Metro Station and will provide 45,000 square feet of retail space, 170,000 square feet of office space and 244 residential units. Substantial completion of the building shell is scheduled for late 2010.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 50 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 8.2 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
(301) 986-6220
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20090422170313.txt.gz
TIME:20090422170313
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 22, 2009, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2009. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: April 22, 2009
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
April 22, 2009, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended March 31, 2009. Total revenue for the three months ended March 31, 2009 ("2009 Quarter") increased 2.5% to $39,689,000 compared to $38,722,000 for the three months ended March 31, 2008 ("2008 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before gain on property dispositions, income attributable to the noncontrolling interest and preferred stock dividends, increased 4.3% to $11,550,000 for the 2009 Quarter compared to $11,073,000 for the 2008 Quarter. The Company issued approximately $79,300,000 of Series B preferred stock in March 2008, which increased the 2009 Quarter preferred stock dividends by $1,688,000 as compared to the 2008 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $5,956,000 or $0.33 per diluted share for the 2009 Quarter, compared to net income available to common stockholders of $7,033,000 or $0.39 per diluted share for the 2008 Quarter.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio decreased 0.5% for the 2009 Quarter compared to the 2008 Quarter and same property operating income decreased 3.3%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio decreased 5.5% for the 2009 Quarter compared to the 2008 Quarter. The primary cause of this decrease were vacancies during the quarter at three shopping centers; small shop space at Broadlands Village in Ashburn, Virginia; an anchor space at Seven Corners in Falls Church, Virginia; and an anchor space at White Oak in Silver Spring, Maryland. The vacant anchor space at both Seven Corners and White Oak has been re-leased but is not yet producing rental income. Increased property operating expenses and real estate taxes, net of recovered amounts and increased credit loss reserves also contributed to the decrease in property operating income for the 2009 Quarter. Same property operating income in the office portfolio increased 3.8% for the 2009 Quarter largely due to increased lease termination fees.
 
 
As of March 31, 2009, 92.9% of the operating portfolio, including the Northrock development project which is phasing into service, was leased compared to 95.4% at March 31, 2008. On a same property basis, 93.3% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 95.5%. The 2009 leasing percentages decreased due to a net decrease of approximately 178,000 square feet of leased space.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) decreased 7.0% to $14,806,000 in the 2009 Quarter compared to $15,919,000 for the 2008 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders decreased 5.9% to $0.64 per share for the 2009 Quarter compared to $0.68 per share for the 2008 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus income attributable to the noncontrolling interest, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains from property dispositions. FFO decreased in the 2009 Quarter primarily due to the increase in preferred stock dividends of $1,688,000 ($0.07 per diluted share) which was slightly offset by lower interest expense and lower general and administrative expense.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 51 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 8.3 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20090429210849.txt.gz
TIME:20090429210849
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") has posted on its web site, www.saulcenters.com, a presentation given by management at the Company's annual meeting of stockholders. The presentation is Exhibit 99 (a) to this current report on Form 8-K.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: April 29, 2009
 

Exhibit 99(a)
 
Annual Meeting of Shareholders
 
Overall Portfolio Leasing Percentage
100.0%
96.3% 95.9%
95.7% 95.4% 95.3% 95.4%
94.8% 94.7%
95.0% 94.2%
Percentage 92.9%
90.0%
Leasing
85.0%
80.0%
Dec'06 Mar'07 Jun'07 Sep'07 Dec'07 Mar'08 Jun'08 Sep'08 Dec'08 Mar'09
Annual Average of Space Leased
The financial crisis which has engulfed our country and the world over the past few years has impacted our portfolio's occupancy as shown here
Since reaching an all-time high level in 2006 at 97%, our leasing percentage declined to 95.3% at the end of 2007, 94.2% at year end 2008 and as of the end of March 2009 is at 92.9%.
 
Geographic Mix & Property Type
Shopping Centers DC. / Baltimore 77% 82%
Other Office 18% 23%
2008 Property Operating Income
Our geographic focus continues to be in the metropolitan Washington DC market.
Approximately 82% of the year-end 2008 property operating income is from the metropolitan Washington DC/Baltimore area. This focus is our strength in this period of economic crisis. The Washington, DC metropolitan area unemployment rate of approximately 6.1% in February 2009 remains among the lowest of the Country's major metropolitan areas.
The retail component of our portfolio's income was 77% in 2008.
 
Retail Same Space Leasing Highlights
300 30.0%
274
253 24.3% 250
238
20.0% thousands) 200
168 (Percentage) 13.2% (in 11.0%
Signed 150 Increase 10.0% 5 yr Avg. = 8.7%
Feet
Rate 2.8% 100
79
Square Rental 0.0% 50
-5.8%
-10.0%
08 08 08 08 09'08'08'08'08'09
1Q 2Q 3Q 4Q 1Q 1Q 2Q 3Q 4Q 1Q
With the decline in overall consumer spending, retailers continue to struggle with declining sales and limited access to capital. Declining retail sales lead to lower leasing volume and rental rates.
Rental rate increases on a year over year basis averaged 11% in 2007 and 10.1% in 2008.
The first 3 quarters of 2008 were strong, with a very sharp drop-off in the 2008 fourth quarter and the first quarter of 2009.
 
Retail Same Property NOI Growth
10.0%
5.0% 4.5%
5 yr. avg. = 2.9%
1.9%
1.0% Percentage 0.0%
Growth -2.6%
-5.0%
-5.5%
-10.0%
08  08  08 08 09 4Q
1Q 2Q 3Q 1Q
We have achieved average annual retail net operating income growth on a same property basis of 2.9% over the past 5 years.
The 2008 growth was 1.2%, with quarterly growth rates slowing throughout the year.
The rate of increase slowed as a result of increased small shop vacancy and higher credit loss reserves for tenants struggling to make rent payments.
Declines in average rental rates and property NOI are likely to continue over the next few years.
 
Funds From Operations (FFO) &
Dividends Current dividend of $.39/share 5-year annual FFO growth equates to an $2.75 annual dividend of
7.5% absolute $2.68
5.0% per share $2.57 $1.56/share. $2.50 $2.42
$2.20
$2.10 FFO
$2.00 Dividends
1.88
1.77
1.68
1.60
1.56 1.56 $1.50
2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008
Operating results over the past 5 years are highlighted here.
Over this period, absolute FFO has grown by a compounded average of 7.5% annually. Compounded annual growth per share was 5.0%, from $2.10 per share in 2003 to $2.68 in 2008.
After increasing the common stock dividend from 2005 to 2008, we reduced the January 2009 dividend by 17%, from a quarterly amount of $0.47 per share to $0.39 per share.
With credit market conditions continuing to slow, we chose this course, because we believe retaining capital in this very uncertain economic climate was the prudent strategy.
 
Dividend as a % of FFO
100%
Low FFO
90% payout ratio:
61% of FFO
Payout 80%
was paid out
71% 70% Dividend 70%
66% 65% in dividends.
64%
61% 60%
50%
2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 1Q 09
Over the past 5 years, we were paying out an average of 67% of our FFO as dividends.
As you may know, REITs are required to pay out 90% of taxable income. It is our philosophy to pay out dividends only as required, to meet taxable income requirements. This allows us to retain cash.
With taxable income projected to decline in 2009, we lowered our dividend in the 2009 first quarter to $0.39, or 61% of our FFO.
 
Mortgage Debt Maturities
December 31, 2008
Weighted average maturity of mortgage debt is 7.4 years
$100 $96
Millions $62 $61 $50 $39 $37 $28 $27 $13 $15 $11 $9 $0 $1
2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017
2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024
Year Debt Matures
(Excludes scheduled amortization)
Liquidity and debt maturities are two of the most critical metrics in times of frozen credit.
Of our $548 million of fixed-rate mortgage debt, there is no debt scheduled to mature before December 2011. As a result, we have no roll-over financing requirements until that time.
Our $62 million and $96 million balloons in 2011 and 2012 represent very manageable levels on the properties securing these loans, as both are maturing 15 year, amortizing loans.
The $62 million of mortgages maturing December 2011 are only 54% of the original amount borrowed in 1997 as a result of loan principal repaid monthly over the term of the loan.
Maturities of our mortgage debt are staggered from 2011 until 2024.
 
Commercial Real Estate Valuation
Price declines of 35-45% (or more) expected from 2007 peak levels, exceeding those of the early 1990's Rents declining and vacancies rising across all property types and markets Conduit loan delinquency rate likely to exceed 3.5% by the end of 2009 and may reach 5-6% by 2010 Large % of loans originated during 2005-2008 will likely require substantial equity infusion to refinance
Source: Deutsche Bank-Commercial Real Estate Outlook Q1 2009
A recent report published by Deutsche Bank's real estate research group highlights the dramatically weaker commercial real estate fundamentals across most property segments and markets. It reports that price declines of 35-45% are expected, exceeding those of the early 1990's.
Loan defaults are increasing as many loans originated in 2005-2008 will not be refinancable without substantial equity contributions, where there were a high concentration of risky 5-year interest-only loans.
 
Commercial Real Estate Financing
Sample Underwriting
2007 Today Cash flow $5 MM $5 MM Cap rate 4.8% 7.4% Property value $105 MM $68 MM LTV 85% 66% Equity $16 MM $23 MM Loan amount $89 MM $45 MM Amortization None 30 yr. All-in rate 5.6% 8.1% Yr. 1 d/s coverage 1.0x 1.25x Implied value decline 35%
Source: Deutsche Bank-Commercial Real Estate Outlook Q1 2009
According to the Deutsche Bank report, commercial real estate pricing peaked in October 2007 after appreciating 30% since 2005 and 90% since 2001. The above shows how a representative property with $5 million in cash flow may have been underwritten for financing back in 2007 and today. A dramatic implied value decline of approximately 35%.
 
Total Shareholder Return
(assumes reinvestment of dividends)
$250
Saul Centers' compounded annual return: 5 year = 11.5% Invested $200 10 year = 17.3%
100 -22.9% $ Return $150 Total
-37.5% $100
-34.0% -36.6%
Dec. 2003 Dec. 2004 Dec. 2005 Dec. 2006 Dec. 2007 Dec. 2008
Saul Centers NAREIT Equity S & P 500 Russell 2000
Our long tenured team of professionals have been tested through prior periods of economic stress and will be tested once again.
After a tough 23% total return decline in 2008, our 10-year compounded total return now averages 17% per year. Our 5-year total return of 11.5% per year.
 
Capital Structure Highlights
3/31/2009 closing price
= $22.97/sh $2,000 Common Equity Preferred Equity Debt
$1,500
$1,263 Millions $1,000 $866 $530 $485 $148 $500
$584 $381
2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 3/31/09 Year End
At March 31, 2008, we had a total combined debt and equity capitalization of approximately $1.3 billion, compared to just under $900 million 5 years ago, and down from our high levels of approximately $1.9 billion.
Total debt is currently $584 million, represented here in blue.
Preferred stock, shown here in yellow, represents about 11.5% of our capital base. We did our first offering of $100 million in 2003 and completed a very timely $80 million public offering last March, one of the last REIT preferred offerings to be done prior to the deterioration of the credit markets. We completed this capital offering in order to strengthen the balance sheet and increase liquidity as we face a potentially prolonged economic downturn.
Our capital structure now has a leverage ratio of approximately 46% debt to total capitalization.
 
Prudent Capital Structure
March 31, 2009
93% fixed rate, nonrecourse debt
No fixed rate debt maturing in the next 2.5 years Weighted average mortgage maturity = 7.4 years Average mortgage debt interest rate is 6.7% Interest coverage = 3.3 times $150 million credit line, $15 million outstanding
93% of our debt is now fixed rate and all of this is nonrecourse property debt. No debt will mature until December 2011, over 2.5 years from now.
The weighted average maturity is 7.4 years, and the average interest rate is 6.7%. Our property operating income provided an interest expense coverage of 3.3 times in 2008.
Our $150 million credit line currently has $15 million borrowed.
 
Preferred Stock Offerings
2 issues totaling $180 MM November 2003 - $100 MM
March 2008 - $80 MM
Perpetual with no investor redemption rights
Callable at par by the company 5 years from issue date
Our $100 million preferred stock offering in late 2003 was a catalyst for our recent acquisition and development growth.
Last March, we completed an $80 million preferred offering. Both issues are perpetual and are callable at par by the Company 5 years from the issue date.
This equity capital provided additional capacity to fund our remaining development commitments and to provide liquidity during these times of declining property level performance.
 
Shopping Centers
(2008)
Boca Valley Plaza, Boca Raton, Florida
45 retail properties generate over 77% of property operating income
30 centers are grocery anchored & produce 86% of retail operating income
Tenants reported sales averaging $322 a square foot
Grocers reported sales averaging $467 per square foot
During 2008, property operating income from our 45 retail properties produced more than 77% of overall operating income.
30 of our centers are anchored by a food store, and these grocery-anchored properties produce 86% of our retail operating income.
Total retail sales for the portfolio, from tenants who report sales, were $321 per square foot in 2008, a decrease of 1% from 2007 levels.
Grocery store sales are a key driver of customer traffic in neighborhood centers. The overall sales volume reported by our grocery stores averaged a solid $467 per square foot, an increase of 2% over 2007. This came at the expense of struggling small shop restaurant tenants, one of our hardest hit use categories over the past year.
 
Favorable Demographics
Average household income within three mile radius of Saul Centers' retail properties exceeds the national average
$110,000
$100,000
$90,000
National Avg. - $73,800 $80,000 Saul Centers Avg. - $104,600
$70,000
Source: U.S. Census Bureau, Census 2000 $60,000 ESRI 2008 forecasts.
$50,000
National Avg. Saul Centers
Long-term success of our core portfolio hinges largely on prime infill locations.
Saul Centers demographics are well above the national averages.
Saul Centers' properties 3-mile trade areas have average household incomes of $104,600, compared to the national average of $73,800.
Our 3 and 5 mile population counts total 98,000, and 236,000, respectively, which are representative of very strong infill locations.
Our top 20 properties in terms of household income average over $137,000.
 
Core Shopping Centers
(2008)
Leesburg Pike, Baileys Crossroads, Virginia
190 retail leases signed
10.1% increase in rents on new leases signed vs. 11.1% in 2007 66% renewal rate in 2008 compared to over 73% previous 5 years 94.8% average occupancy in 2008 vs. over 95% past 5 years
While anchor tenants provide the traffic to the centers, small shop leasing is a major driver of growth in our business.
During 2008, we executed over 190 new and renewal leases representing 933,000 square feet of space. New lease rents increased 10.1%, on a cash basis, over the amounts paid on the same space expiring leases.
73% of the tenants whose leases expired during the past 5 years have renewed their leases, a strong retention rate. The 2008 number was 66%, reflecting store closings in the face of lower consumer demand.
Currently our occupancy is at a 5-year low of 92.9%, compared to our 5 year average leasing percentage of approximately 95%, which is evidence of the quality and desirable locations of our centers.
 
Top 10 retail tenants
Major Retail Tenants provided only 19%
of 2008 Revenue
Tenant Name Locations SF % 2008 Revenue
Giant Food 9 6.8% 4.4% Safeway 8 4.7% 3.1% Chevy Chase Bank 20 0.8% 2.2% Publix 5 2.9% 1.8% CVS 6 1.5% 1.7% Lowe's Home Center 2 3.1% 1.6% Home Depot 2 2.9% 1.3% Super Fresh 2 1.2% 1.1% Office Depot 4 1.1% 1.1% Harris Teeter 2 1.1% 1.0% Totals 60 25.9% 19.3%
A diverse retail tenant base minimizes exposure to any one tenant's credit.
Only Giant Food, at 4.4%, Safeway at 3.1% and Chevy Chase Bank at 2.2% of 2008 rental revenue, accounted for more than 2% of total Company revenue.
Our top 10 tenants comprise only 19% of total revenue.
We had only one Circuit City store, at our Southdale shopping center outside of Baltimore. The 43,000 square foot store closed in mid-March, when the company completed liquidation.
 
53 % of base
Retail Lease Expirations rents in place to
2013 & beyond
Year Square Feet S F % Base Rent $ Base Rent %
2009 * 350,000 5.3% $ 5,408,000 5.7% 2010 756,000 10.7% 10,521,000 11.1% 2011 1,056,000 14.9% 14,227,000 15.0% 2012 857,000 12.1% 14,345,000 15.2% 2013 & beyond 3,577,000 49.9% 50,152,000 53.0% Totals 6,596,000 92.9% $ 94,653,000 100.0%
* As of April 1, 2009
Retail lease expirations for the balance of 2009 total 350,000 SF. Over 55% of the space that expired in 2009 has been successfully renewed or re-leased as of the end of the 1st quarter.
Approximately half of our base rents are contracted under leases expiring in 2013 and beyond.
 
Seven Corners
Seven Corners, Falls Church, Virginia
Seven Corners is a 568,000 square foot community shopping center in Falls Church, Virginia.
It is anchored by a Shoppers Food Warehouse and a Home Depot.
During the fourth quarter of 2008, we replaced an expiring and dark 50,000 square foot anchor tenant lease with a Syms clothing store lease.
Syms will relocate from nearby and plans to be open at Seven Corners by the summer.
The center is our largest retail property as measured by both square footage and operating income, and remains 100% leased.
 
Thruway
Thruway, Winston Salem, North Carolina
Thruway is a 354,000 square foot community shopping center located in Winston-Salem, North Carolina, anchored by a Harris Teeter supermarket, Bed, Bath and Beyond and Borders.
During 2008, we successfully re-tenanted a 20,000 square foot space, carving it up and adding Talbot's and two small shops to the center.
Also, in 2008, Hanes Brand opened a 20,000 square foot store in lower level space that had not been leased for nearly 10 years.
This center is one of our top five in size and operating income and is 96.2% leased.
 
Southdale
Southdale, Glen Burnie, Maryland
Southdale is a 484,000 square foot community shopping center located in Glen Burnie, Maryland, south of Baltimore.
The center is anchored by Home Depot, Marshall's and Value City Furniture.
Southdale had our only Circuit City store, which vacated 43,000 square feet in mid-March with their corporate liquidation.
In the fall of 2008, we replaced an expiring Giant grocery store with a Fresh World International Supermarket.
Southdale is currently 91.1% leased, with only 1 small shop vacancy in addition to the Circuit City box.
 
Lansdowne Town Center
Lansdowne Town Center, Leesburg, Virginia
Lansdowne Town Center is a 189,000 square foot, Harris Teeter anchored lifestyle shopping center, with a village green and various outdoor seating and dining options, located off Route 7 in Loudoun County, Virginia.
Completed in 2007, the center is currently 96.2% leased. Street-level retail tenants include CVS Pharmacy, Panera Bread, Starbucks and many other eating establishments. The development also includes 38,000 square feet of professional office space.
Lansdowne is our fourth center in Loudoun, for a total of over 700,000 square feet of space. Loudoun has been one of our most impacted markets, as the turmoil in the housing market has caused dramatically decreased retail sales, and often tenant difficulties at many restaurants, health fitness centers and other discretionary type retail uses.
 
Hunt Club Corners
Before renovation After renovation Hunt Club Corners, Apopka, Florida
Hunt Club Corners is a 101,000 square foot, Publix anchored neighborhood center located in metropolitan Orlando, Florida.
We acquired Hunt Club in 2006 and just completed a faade renovation in late 2008.
We have five centers in Florida, totaling over 590,000 square feet. Stress in the housing markets has greatly impacted retail sales, and small shop vacancies in our Florida properties have increased.
Our 5 grocers continue strong, with an overall 5% sales increase in 2008, but many of the small shop retailers are struggling.
 
Development Property
Northrock Center, Warrenton, Virginia
In January 2008, we acquired approximately 15.4 acres of undeveloped land in Warrenton, Virginia. The site is located in the City of Warrenton on the heavily traveled U. S. Route 29.
We have substantially completed construction for Northrock Shopping Center, a neighborhood center totaling approximately 103,000 square feet of leasable area.
Harris Teeter has leased 52,700 square feet and is scheduled to open in early June.
A total of 62% of the center is pre-leased.
 
Development Property
Westview Village, Frederick, Maryland
In November 2007, we purchased a 10.4 acre site, adjacent to the Westview Promenade shopping center, on Buckeystown Pike (MD Route 85) in Frederick, Maryland.
We have substantially completed construction of approximately 90,000 square feet of space, including 60,000 square feet of retail shop space and 30,000 square feet of professional office space. An additional 15,000 square feet of pad space will complete the 105,000 square foot development.
We have executed leases totaling 12,000 square feet, or 20% of the retail shop space.
A pad has been ground leased to Mimi's, for a 7,500 square foot restaurant.
Leasing activity is slow for the remainder of the space.
 
Office Properties
Washington Square, Alexandria, Virginia
1.2 million square feet
3 properties produce 75% of office operating income 95% average occupancy since 2003 - currently 92.5% 94% of leases have fixed annual escalations
Our office space totals over 1.2 million square feet.
Approximately 73% of the office portfolio operating income is produced from our 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, Van Ness Square and Washington Square office buildings, all located in metropolitan Washington, DC.
Our office portfolio is currently 92.5% leased.
Over 90% of the office leases have fixed annual base rent escalations averaging over 2.5% per year, resulting in built-in cash flow growth.
Only 68,000 square feet of the office space is scheduled to expire during the remainder of 2009.
 
601 Pennsylvania Avenue, Washington, DC
Our 227,000 square foot 601 Pennsylvania Avenue office building, which we built in 1984, is a Class-A asset located near the U.S. Capitol.
The building is 100% leased. It is the single largest asset in our portfolio, generating over 36% of our office property operating income and over 8.2% of total operating income.
601's significant tenants include the National Gallery of Art, the American Association of Health Plans, the Credit Union National Association and the Capital Grille.
Only 2 leases expired in 2009, totaling 26,000 square feet. New leases were signed for all of the space at base rents averaging $20 per square foot over expiring rents.
 
Development Property - Clarendon
Projected 405,000 SF
244 luxury apartments 42,000 SF ground floor retail 170,000 SF Class "A" office
2 city blocks adjacent to Metro station
Desirable "Urban Village" neighborhood
Our Clarendon Center development will be comprised of a residential tower with 244 luxury apartment units, 42,000 square feet of street-level retail stores and 170,000 square feet of office space, all located right at the Clarendon Metro station in Arlington County, Virginia.
This is one of the premier residential and commercial submarkets in the metropolitan Washington, DC area.
 
Development Property
Clarendon Center,
Arlington, Virginia
Here is a recent construction photo of the development.
We are completing the 4-level subsurface garage structure in the next 30 days.
The development is on schedule, with construction to be completed by the end of 2010.
 
NYSE Symbol: B F S
Annual Meeting of Shareholders
White Oak, Silver Spring, Maryland
We remain committed to, and confident in, the long-term performance of our core retail and office properties.
We are prepared to endure the potential for a prolonged period of economic stress.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20090714161320.txt.gz
TIME:20090714161320
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On July 9, 2009, Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, the operating partnership for Saul Centers, Inc., entered into a Second Modification Agreement (the "Modification") to its $120,000,000 unsecured revolving credit facility originally entered into and effective as of December 19, 2007 (the "Facility"), with a syndicate of lenders led by U.S. Bank National Association. U.S. Bank National Association acts as Administrative Agent and Sole Lead Arranger for the Facility, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, acts as Syndication Agent. For purposes of this Form 8-K, all references to the "Company" refer, collectively, to Saul Centers, Inc., together with Saul Holdings Limited Partnership and the wholly owned subsidiaries of Saul Holdings Limited Partnership.
The Modification extends the maturity date of the Facility from December 19, 2010 to June 30, 2012, which term may be extended by the Company for one additional year subject to the Company's satisfaction of certain conditions. Until December 31, 2010, certain or all of the lenders may, upon request by the Company, increase the revolving credit facility line by $30,000,000.
The Modification reduces the Interest Expense Coverage for the Facility from 2.50x to 2.20x, reduces the existing Debt Service Coverage from 1.5x to 1.4x (and recharacterizes such test as Fixed Charge Coverage) and creates a new Debt Service Coverage (exclusive of preferred stock dividends) of 1.6x. The Modification also replaces the bank's reference rate with a daily rate based on a one-month LIBOR rate.
Each of U.S. Bank National Association, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association and Compass Bank is a lender under the Facility. Some of the lenders or their affiliates from time to time have provided in the past and may provide in the future commercial lending services to the Company and its affiliates in the ordinary course of business.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: July 14, 2009


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20090806161226.txt.gz
TIME:20090806161226
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On August 6, 2009, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2009. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release, dated August 6, 2009, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: August 6, 2009
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
August 6, 2009, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended June 30, 2009. Total revenue for the three months ended June 30, 2009 ("2009 Quarter") decreased 1.7% to $39,416,000 compared to $40,105,000 for the three months ended June 30, 2008 ("2008 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before gain on property dispositions, loss on early extinguishment of debt, income attributable to the noncontrolling interest and preferred stock dividends, decreased 13.1% to $10,574,000 for the 2009 Quarter compared to $12,175,000 for the 2008 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $3,934,000 or $0.22 per diluted share for the 2009 Quarter, compared to net income available to common stockholders of $6,443,000 or $0.36 per diluted share for the 2008 Quarter. During the 2009 Quarter, the Company refinanced mortgage debt on four properties. As a result of these refinancings, the Company incurred expense totaling $1,660,000 related to the early retirement of the existing mortgage debt due to mature December 2011. The Company also modified its existing revolving credit agreement which was due to expire in December 2010. Interest expense and amortization of deferred debt costs includes $280,000 associated with the modification. Total expense recognized in the 2009 Quarter for these financing activities was $1,940,000.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio decreased 1.5% for the 2009 Quarter compared to the 2008 Quarter and same property operating income decreased 4.0%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio decreased 4.6% for the 2009 Quarter compared to the 2008 Quarter. The primary cause of this decrease were vacancies at four shopping centers; small shop space at Lansdowne Town Center and Broadlands Village, both located in Loudoun County, Virginia; an anchor space at Seven Corners in Falls Church, Virginia; and an anchor space at White Oak in Silver Spring, Maryland. The vacant anchor spaces at both Seven Corners and White Oak have been re-leased with rents commencing in June and July, 2009, respectively. Increased property operating expenses and real estate taxes, net of recovered amounts, also contributed to the decrease in property operating income for the 2009 Quarter. Same property operating income in the office portfolio decreased 2.0% for the 2009 Quarter largely due to increased tenant vacancy at Avenel Business Park.
For the six months ended June 30, 2009 ("2009 Period"), total revenue increased 0.4% to $79,105,000 compared to $78,827,000 for the six months ended June 30, 2008 ("2008 Period") and operating income decreased 4.8% to $22,124,000 compared to $23,248,000 for the 2008 Period. Net income available to common stockholders was $9,890,000 or $0.55 per diluted share for the 2009 Period, compared to $13,476,000 or $0.75 per diluted share for the 2008 Period. Overall same property revenue for the total portfolio decreased 1.1% for the 2009 Period compared to the 2008 Period and same property operating income decreased 3.7%. For the 2009 Period, shopping center same property operating income decreased 5.1% due to overall increases in tenant vacancies and credit loss reserves. Same property operating income in the office portfolio remained relatively stable, increasing 0.9% for the 2009 Period, due primarily to lease termination fees received, which were largely offset by increased tenant vacancy at Avenel Business Park.
As of June 30, 2009, 91.8% of the operating portfolio, including the Northrock and Westview Village development projects which are phasing into service, was leased compared to 94.8% at June 30, 2008. On a same property basis, 93.1% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 94.8%. The 2009 leasing percentages declined due to a net decrease of approximately 144,000 square feet of leased space.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) decreased 20.6% to $12,212,000 in the 2009 Quarter compared to $15,378,000 for the 2008 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders decreased 21.2% to $0.52 per share for the 2009 Quarter compared to $0.66 per share for the 2008 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus income attributable to the noncontrolling interest, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains from property dispositions. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2009 Period decreased 13.7% to $27,018,000 from $31,297,000 during the 2008 Period. Per share FFO available to common shareholders for the 2009 Period decreased 13.4% to $1.16 per diluted share compared to $1.34 per diluted share for the 2008 Period. FFO decreased in the 2009 Period primarily due to $1,940,000 ($0.08 per diluted share) of expense associated with the previously discussed second quarter financing activities, increased preferred stock dividends and to a lesser extent, decreased property operating income.
During the 2009 Quarter, Saul Centers refinanced a significant portion of its $62.7 million of fixed-rate mortgage debt due to mature December 2011. The Company closed on four new 15-year, non-recourse mortgage loans totaling $85 million, which require monthly payments at a weighted average interest rate of 7.6% and 25-year amortization schedule. These refinancings provided the Company with net cash proceeds of over $25 million. As a result of the refinancing of this debt, only $19 million of the Company's remaining fixed-rate mortgage debt will mature prior to 2012. Saul Centers also modified its revolving line of credit facility and in July increased the facility to $150 million and extended the maturity date to June 2012, with a one-year extension at the Company's option. As of August 6, 2009, the Company had no balance outstanding on the line.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 52 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 8.4 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
Contact:    Scott V. Schneider
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20090917161115.txt.gz
TIME:20090917161115
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Effective September 15, 2009, Joel A. Friedman was appointed Senior Vice President and Chief Accounting Officer of Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company"). Mr. Friedman replaces Kenneth D. Shoop in such position.
Mr. Friedman, 51, served in a variety of accounting positions at Chevy Chase Bank, F.S.B., a federally chartered savings bank, from June 1983 to July 2009, at which time he served as Senior Vice President and Controller, the bank's chief accounting officer. Until its acquisition by Capital One Financial Corporation in February 2009, Chevy Chase Bank, F.S.B. was owned by entities controlled by the Company's Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, B. Francis Saul II.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20091106105255.txt.gz
TIME:20091106105255
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On November 5, 2009, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2009. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: November 6, 2009
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
November 5, 2009, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended September 30, 2009. Total revenue for the three months ended September 30, 2009 ("2009 Quarter") decreased 1.6% to $40,273,000 compared to $40,947,000 for the three months ended September 30, 2008 ("2008 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before gain on property dispositions, loss on early extinguishment of debt, income attributable to the noncontrolling interest and preferred stock dividends, increased 0.8% to $11,349,000 for the 2009 Quarter compared to $11,264,000 for the 2008 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $5,822,000 or $0.32 per diluted share for the 2009 Quarter, compared to net income available to common stockholders of $5,736,000 or $0.32 per diluted share for the 2008 Quarter. Results for the 2008 Quarter were impacted by a one-time non-cash depreciation charge of $1,112,000 arising from the demolition of a portion of the Smallwood Village Center in conjunction with the Company's redevelopment of the property.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio decreased 2.3% for the 2009 Quarter compared to the 2008 Quarter and same property operating income decreased 2.0%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio decreased 2.9% for the 2009 Quarter compared to the 2008 Quarter. The primary cause of this decrease was a decline in base rent due to decreased leasing levels, and to a lesser extent, reduced other income, primarily due to reduced lease termination fees collected during the 2009 Quarter. Same property operating income in the office portfolio increased 1.4% for the 2009 Quarter.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2009 ("2009 Period"), total revenue decreased 0.3% to $119,378,000 compared to $119,774,000 for the nine months ended September 30, 2008 ("2008 Period") and operating income decreased 3.0% to $33,473,000 compared to $34,512,000 for the 2008 Period. Net income available to common stockholders was $15,712,000 or $0.88
 
per diluted share for the 2009 Period, compared to $19,212,000 or $1.07 per diluted share for the 2008 Period. Overall same property revenue for the total portfolio decreased 1.5% for the 2009 Period compared to the 2008 Period and same property operating income decreased 3.1%. For the 2009 Period, shopping center same property operating income decreased 4.3% due to overall increases in tenant vacancies and credit loss reserves. Same property operating income in the office portfolio increased 1.1% for the 2009 Period, due primarily to lease termination fees received, which were largely offset by increased tenant vacancy at Avenel Business Park.
As of September 30, 2009, 91.8% of the operating portfolio, including the Northrock and Westview Village development projects which are phasing into service, was leased compared to 94.7% at September 30, 2008. On a same property basis, 92.9% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 94.7%. The 2009 leasing percentages declined due to a net decrease of approximately 147,000 square feet of leased space.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) decreased 8.3% to $14,648,000 in the 2009 Quarter compared to $15,966,000 for the 2008 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders decreased 7.4% to $0.63 per share for the 2009 Quarter compared to $0.68 per share for the 2008 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus income attributable to the noncontrolling interest, extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains from property dispositions. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2009 Period decreased 11.8% to $41,666,000 from $47,263,000 during the 2008 Period. Per share FFO available to common shareholders for the 2009 Period decreased 11.4% to $1.79 per diluted share compared to $2.02 per diluted share for the 2008 Period. FFO decreased in the 2009 Period primarily due to the expense associated with the second quarter financing activities ($2,023,000 or $0.09 per diluted share), increased preferred stock dividends ($1,687,000 or $0.07 per diluted share), and to a lesser extent, decreased property operating income. During the 2009 second quarter, the Company refinanced mortgage debt on four properties. As a result of these refinancings, the Company incurred expense totaling $1,660,000 related to the early retirement of the existing mortgage debt due to mature December 2011. The Company also modified its existing revolving credit agreement which was due to expire in December 2010. Interest expense and amortization of deferred debt costs includes $363,000 associated with the modification. Therefore, total expense recognized in the 2009 Period for these financing activities was $2,023,000.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 52 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 8.4 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20100223163933.txt.gz
TIME:20100223163933
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 23, 2010, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2009. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
99.1 Press Release, dated February 23, 2010, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: February 23, 2010
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
February 23, 2010, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2009. Total revenue for the three months ended December 31, 2009 ("2009 Quarter") increased 2.9% to $41,735,000 compared to $40,571,000 for the three months ended December 31, 2008 ("2008 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before gain on property dispositions, loss on early extinguishment of debt, income attributable to the noncontrolling interest and preferred stock dividends, decreased 1.8% to $11,638,000 for the 2009 Quarter compared to $11,853,000 for the 2008 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders decreased to $5,861,000 or $0.33 per diluted share for the 2009 Quarter, compared to $7,029,000 or $0.39 per diluted share for the 2008 Quarter. During the 2009 Quarter, the Company refinanced mortgage debt which was due to mature December 2011 and incurred expense totaling $550,000 related to the early retirement of the existing mortgage debt. Gains on property dispositions were $329,000 for the 2009 Quarter compared to $1,096,000 for the 2008 Quarter, primarily related to insurance proceeds received as a result of minor damage sustained at three shopping center properties.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 1.8% for the 2009 Quarter compared to the 2008 Quarter but same property operating income decreased 0.7%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio decreased 1.5% for the 2009 Quarter compared to the 2008 Quarter, primarily due to increased property operating expenses (net of expenses recoverable from tenants) and, to a lesser extent, a decrease in percentage rent. Same property operating income in the office portfolio increased 2.1% for the 2009 Quarter compared to the 2008 Quarter, primarily due to increased base rent and parking revenue.
For the year ended December 31, 2009 ("2009 Year"), total revenue increased 0.5% to $161,113,000 compared to $160,345,000 for the year ended December 31, 2008 ("2008 Year") and operating income decreased 2.7% to $45,111,000 compared to $46,365,000 for the 2008
Year. Net income available to common stockholders decreased to $21,573,000 or $1.20 per diluted share for the 2009 Year, compared to $26,241,000 or $1.46 per diluted share for the 2008 Year. Same property revenue for the total portfolio decreased 0.6% for the 2009 Year compared to the 2008 Year and same property operating income decreased 2.4%. For the 2009 Year, same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio decreased 3.5% due primarily to decreased base rent, as a result of tenant vacancies, and increased property operating expenses (net of expenses recoverable from tenants). Same property operating income in the office portfolio increased 1.3% for the 2009 Year compared to the 2008 Year.
As of December 31, 2009, 91.5% of the operating portfolio was leased compared to 94.2% at December 31, 2008. On a same property basis, 92.7% of the portfolio was leased compared to the prior year level of 94.1%, a net decrease of approximately 130,000 square feet of leased space.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) decreased 7.0% to $14,359,000 in the 2009 Quarter compared to $15,432,000 for the 2008 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders decreased 7.6% to $0.61 per share for the 2009 Quarter compared to $0.66 per share for the 2008 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus extraordinary items and real estate depreciation and amortization, excluding gains from property dispositions. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2009 Year decreased 10.6% to $56,025,000 from $62,695,000 for the 2008 Year. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders decreased 10.4% to $2.40 per share for the 2009 Year from $2.68 per share for the 2008 Year. The FFO decrease for the 2009 Quarter was primarily caused by 1) expenses associated with refinancing activity ($550,000), 2) increased interest expense ($370,000) and 3) increased general and administrative expense ($210,000), partially offset by increased property operating income ($140,000). The FFO decrease for the 2009 Year was caused by 1) expenses associated with refinancing activities ($2,490,000) , 2) the full-year effect of dividends on the Company's Series B preferred stock issued in March 2008 ($1,690,000), 3) decreased property operating income ($1,145,000), 4) increased general and administrative expenses ($635,000) and 5) reduced investment income ($580,000).
At December 31, 2009, approximately 90% of the Company's debt consisted of fixed rate, amortizing non-recourse mortgage loans, none of which mature before October 2012. The Company's $150 million revolving credit facility matures June 2012, can be extended for one year at the Company's option, and had no outstanding borrowings as of December 31, 2009.
During 2009, the Company paid quarterly dividends to its common stockholders totaling $1.53 per share, compared to $1.88 per share in 2008. On January 29, 2010, the Company paid a quarterly dividend of $0.36 per share to its common stockholders ($1.44 per share annual rate).
During 2009, the Company completed construction of the 103,000 square foot Northrock shopping center, which is currently 67% leased, located in Warrenton, Virginia, and anchored by Harris Teeter. The Company also completed construction of the 105,000 square foot Westview Village neighborhood shopping center which is currently 27% leased and located in Frederick, Maryland. The Company continues construction of Clarendon Center adjacent to the Clarendon Metro Station in Arlington, Virginia. Clarendon Center will provide 45,000 square feet of retail space, 170,000 square feet of office space and 244 residential units. Substantial completion of the building shell is scheduled for late 2010.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 52 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 8.4 million square feet of leasable area. Approximately 82% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
(301) 986-6220
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20100503170553.txt.gz
TIME:20100503170553
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 3, 2010, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2010. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: May 3, 2010
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
May 3, 2010, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended March 31, 2010. Total revenue for the three months ended March 31, 2010 ("2010 Quarter") increased 10.0% to $43,648,000 compared to $39,689,000 for the three months ended March 31, 2009 ("2009 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before income attributable to the noncontrolling interest and preferred stock dividends, increased 8.9% to $12,574,000 for the 2010 Quarter compared to $11,550,000 for the 2009 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $6,768,000, or $0.37 per diluted share, for the 2010 Quarter compared to net income available to common stockholders of $5,956,000, or $0.33 per diluted share, for the 2009 Quarter.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 8.6% for the 2010 Quarter compared to the 2009 Quarter and same property operating income increased 4.2%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 7.3% for the 2010 Quarter compared to the 2009 Quarter. The primary cause of this increase was the collection of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant. Excluding this one-time revenue, same property shopping center operating income declined 1.3% from the prior year. Same property operating income in the office portfolio decreased 5.7% for the 2010 Quarter compared to the 2009 Quarter primarily due to a decrease in lease termination fees.
As of March 31, 2010, 91.6% of the operating portfolio was leased compared to 92.9% at March 31, 2009. On a same property basis, 92.7% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 93.3%. The 2010 leasing percentages decreased due to a net decrease of approximately 52,000 square feet of leased space, of which approximately 30,000 square feet was attributable to Avenel Business Park.
 
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 7.1% to $15,862,000 in the 2010 Quarter compared to $14,806,000 for the 2009 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 4.7% to $0.67 per share for the 2010 Quarter compared to $0.64 per share for the 2009 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus real estate depreciation and amortization, and excluding gains from property dispositions and extraordinary items. FFO increased in the 2010 Quarter primarily due to the collection of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant ($1,939,000 or $0.08 per diluted share) offset in part by a decline in property operating income largely due to snow removal expense, net of tenant recoveries, from severe winter storms impacting the Mid-Atlantic region primarily in February 2010 (approximately $1,200,000 or $0.05 per diluted share).
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 52 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 8.4 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
(301) 986-6220
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20100511165609.txt.gz
TIME:20100511165609
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 7, 2010, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") held its Annual Meeting of Stockholders, at which General P.X. Kelley, Charles R. Longsworth, Patrick F. Noonan and B. Francis Saul III were reelected to the Board of Directors for three year terms expiring at the 2013 Annual Meeting. The terms of the remaining Board members did not expire as of the May 7, 2010 meeting and those individuals continue as directors of the Company. Holders of 17,042,944 shares of the Company's common stock voted in person at the meeting or by proxy (representing 94.6% of the 17,891,820 shares eligible to vote) as follows:
 
In addition, stockholders voted for the ratification of Ernst & Young as independent public accountants as follows:
 
 
The Company posted on its web site, , a presentation given by management at the Company's annual meeting of stockholders. The presentation is Exhibit 99. (a) to this current report on Form 8-K.
www.saulcenters.com
 
99.(a) Annual Meeting Presentation.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: May 11, 2010
 
 

Exhibit 99. (a)
 
 
Exhibit 99. (a)
Annual
Meeting of
Shareholders
We have prepared a brief slide show to present highlights of 2009 including sucessful activity in the debt markets, our core operating performance, financial results and recent development activities.
 
Debt Maturities Entering 2009
No mortgage debt maturing in 2009 or 2010
Loans maturing in December 2011
$78 million balance outstanding
8.1% interest rate
Secured by 6 shopping centers
Liquidity and debt maturities are two critical metrics in times of uncertain credit.
We started 2009 with $548 million of fixed-rate mortgage debt, none of which was scheduled to mature before December 2011.
With interest rates remaining low and the prospect of rising rates following on the heels of economic recovery, we felt that it was prudent to address all of our 2011 maturities during the past year.
These loans totaled $78 million, were secured by 6 properties and had a weighted average interest rate of 8.1%.
2
 
Debt Transactions - 2009
5 new non-recourse loans totalling $118 million
Each loan generated net cash proceeds, $35 million in total
One of the six properties remains unencumbered by debt
Shopping center generating over $1.8 million in NOI
All 15-year terms, 25-year amortization, 7.5% rate
During 2009, we closed on 5 new 15-year non-recourse mortgage loans totalling $118 million to pay-off all of the $78 million in loans maturing in 2011.
After loan closing costs and early pre-payment penalties, we netted $35 million of cash proceeds, and one asset remains free and clear.
The new loans mature in 2024 and 2025, and the weighted average interest rate is 7.5%, slightly better than the 8.1% rate for the debt that was paid-off.
3
 
Mortgage Debt Maturities
December 31, 2009
Millions
$0
$50
$100
Weighted average maturity of mortgage debt is 8.7 years
2010
2011
2012
2013
2014
2015
2016
2017
2018
2019
2020
2021
2022
2023
2024
2025
$96
$39
$13
$15
$28
$61
$27
$11
$9
$37
$60
$20
Year Debt Matures
(Excluded scheduled amortization)
The $96 million maturity in October 2012 is now the next one we face.
This represents a very manageable level of debt on the 9 properties securing this 15 year, amortizing loan placed in 1997. Three of our prime retail assets - Seven Corners, Thruway and White Oak - are part of this pool.
The $96 million due at maturity in 2012 represents only 65% of the original amount borrowed, as a result of a healthy loan paydown schedule.
Beyond 2012, maturities of our mortgage debt are staggered from 2013 until 2025, with no individual year during this period exceeding $65 million.
4
 
Debt Summary
March 31, 2010
90% fixed rate, nonrecourse debt
Weighted average mortgage maturity = 8.7 years
Average mortgage debt interest rate is 6.7%
Interest coverage = 3.3 times
$150 million credit line, none drawn
Over $10 million in cash balances
90% of our debt is fixed rate and nonrecourse property debt. The balance is construction debt.
The weighted average maturity is 8.7 years, and the average interest rate is 6.7%.
Our property operating income provided an interest expense coverage of 3.3 times in 2009.
During 2009, we modified our $150 million revolving credit line to extend the maturity from December 2010 to June 2012, with a one-year extension to June 2013.
The $150 million credit line is available for borrowing, and we currently have over $10 million in cash reserves and an additional $11 million in unfunded draws available under our Clarendon construction loan.
5
 
Capital Structure Highlights
3/31/2010 closing price = $41.40/sh
Common Equity Preferred Equity Debt
$2,000 $1,500 $1,000 $500
$1,380 $826 $100 $454
2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009
$1,787 $965 $177 $644
3/31/10
Year End
At March 31, 2010, we had a total combined debt and equity capitalization of approximately $1.8 billion, compared to $1.4 billion 5 years ago, and 15% down from our high levels of approximately $1.9 billion from two years ago.
Total debt is currently $644 million, represented here in blue.
Preferred stock, shown here in yellow, represents about 10% of our capital base. Our first preferred stock offering of $100 million was completed in 2003 and we completed a very timely $80 million public offering in March 2008, one of the last REIT preferred offerings prior to the deterioration of the credit markets. Both issues are perpetual and callable by the Company 5 years from the issue dates.
Our capital structure now has a leverage ratio of approximately 36% debt to total capitalization.
6
 
Overall Portfolio Leasing Percentage
(Excluding properties under development)
Quarterly Average Leasing Percentage
95.5% 95.4% 95.3% 94.7% 94.3% 93.6% 93.3% 92.9% 92.8% 92.7%
Dec.'07 Mar.'08 Jun.'08 Sep.'08 Dec.'08 Mar.'09 Jun.'09 Sep.'09 Dec.'09 Mar.'10
The financial crisis which has engulfed our country and the world over the past few years has impacted our portfolio's operating performance, primarily as a result of decreased leasing percentage as shown here.
Our leasing percentage declined from an average of 95.5% during the 2007 fourth quarter, to 94.3% for the 2008 fourth quarter, 92.8% at year end 2009, and 92.7% during the 2010 1st quarter.
Deal volume in the retail portfolio has increased since mid-2009, causing stabilization of retail leasing percentages over the past 3 quarters.
7
 
Retail Leasing Summary
(Excluding properties under development)
Average Leasing Percentage
95.7% 94.8% 93.4% 93.2%
2007 2008 2009 1Q10
Same Space Rental Rate Change
11.1% 12.5% -1.3% 2.2%
5-yr avg prior to 2008 = 8.7%
2007 2008 2009 1Q10
With the decline in overall consumer spending, retailers continue to struggle with declining sales and limited access to capital. Declining retail sales lead to lower rental rates. We expect rental rate pressures to remain until occupancies rebound and tenant sales begin to increase.
On a same space basis, retail rental rate increases over expiring rents averaged 8.7% for the 5 year period prior to 2008. Same space rents decreased by 1.3% in 2009 and increased 2.2% in the first quarter of 2010.
 
Retail Same Property NOI Growth
Percentage Change
4.5% 1.0% 1.9% -2.6% -5.5% -4.6% -2.9% -1.5% -1.3%
5yr avg prior to 2008 = 2.9%
1Q'08 2Q'08 3Q'08 4Q'08 1Q'09 2Q'09 3Q'09 4Q'09 1Q'10
Over the five years from 2003 to 2008, we achieved average annual retail net operating income growth of 2.9% on a same property basis.
Retail same property growth averaged 2.5% during the 1st three quarters of 2008. Since the 2008 4th quarter, property income has declined each quarter through the 1st quarter of this year.
The declines were primarily the result of increased small shop vacancy and higher credit loss reserves for tenants struggling to make rent payments.
Most of the increased vacancies were closings of shop tenants consisting primarily of restaurants, tanning salons, small fitness centers and video stores. Much of this weakness was concentrated in our Loudoun County, Virginia and our Florida properties.
9
 
Funds From Operations (FFO) & Dividends
5-yr avg FFO per share growth prior to 2008 = 4.6%/yr
$2.20 1.56 $2.42 1.60 $2.57 1.68 $2.75 1.77 $2.68 1.88 $ 2.40 1.53
Current dividend of $.36/share equates to an annual dividend of $1.44/share.
2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009
FFO Dividends
FFO results for the past 6 years are highlighted here.
Over this period, absolute FFO has grown by a compounded average of 3.6% annually.
Compounded annual growth per share was 1.8%, from $2.20 per share in 2004 to $2.40 in 2009, much lower than our 5-year average of 4.6% per year prior to 2008.
After increasing the common stock dividend from 2005 to 2008, we reduced the January 2009 dividend by 17%, from a quarterly amount of $0.47 per share to $0.39 per share. In October 2009 we again decreased the payout to the current $0.36 per share.
10
 
Dividend as a % of FFO
Dividend Payout
71% 66% 65% 64% 70% 64% 54%
2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 1Q'10
Low FFO
payout ratio;
64% of 2009
FFO was paid out in dividends.
Over the past 5 years, we paid out an average of 66% of our FFO as dividends.
As you may know, REITs are required to pay out 90% of taxable income. We have followed a policy of setting the common stock dividend approximately equal to taxable income, to comply with these REIT regulations, and not pay federal corporate income tax. In this uncertain economic climate, this practice has allowed us to maintain the maximum amount of excess cash flow to fund development activities or to retire debt.
As taxable income declined in 2009, we lowered our dividend, paying out 64% of our FFO in 2009.
11
 
Geographic Mix & Property Type
DC. / Baltimore 82%
Other 18%
2009 Property Operating Income
Shopping Centers 77%
Office 23%
Our geographic focus continues to be in the metropolitan Washington DC market.
Over 82% of our 2009 property operating income was generated in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area. This focus is our strength in this period of economic crisis. When nationwide unemployment peaked at 10.1% in October 2009, the Washington area jobless rate was 6.2%.
The retail component of our portfolio's income was 77%, with office producing 23%.
12
 
Office Properties
1.2 million square feet
3 mid-rise properties produce 74% of office operating income
Operating income grew by over 3% in 2009
Only 65,900 square feet of space expires in 2010
Washington Square, Alexandria, Virginia
601 Pennsylvania Ave, Washington DC
Van Ness Square, Washington DC
Our office space totals over 1.2 million square feet.
Approximately 74% of the office portfolio operating income is produced from our 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, Van Ness Square and Washington Square office buildings, all located in metropolitan Washington, DC.
Operating income at these 3 buildings grew by over 3% in 2009. Looking forward, only 65,900 square feet of space, approximately 11% of the total square feet in these properties, expires during 2010, therefore minimizing near term lease roll-over risk.
13
 
Avenel Business Park, Gaithersburg, Maryland
Weakness continues in our 1-story office flex properties, the largest being the 391,000 square foot Avenel Business Park, located in the I - 270 corridor in Gaithersburg, Maryland.
The park, at 84.1% leased, is currently at its historically low leasing percentage.
Prior to 2009, about 50% of the park's square footage was leased to biotech tenants, many of which rely on the scarce venture capital funding for their early stage life science businesses.
14
 
Shopping Centers
(2009)
Harris Teeter, Lansdowne Town Center
47 retail properties generate 77% of property operating income
31 centers are grocery anchored & produce 84% of retail operating income
Tenants reported sales averaging $325 per square foot
Grocers reported sales averaging $450 per square foot
During 2009, property operating income from our 47 retail properties produced 77% of overall operating income.
31 of our centers are anchored by a food store, and these grocery-anchored properties produced 84% of our retail operating income.
Total retail sales for the portfolio, from tenants who report sales, were $325 per square foot in 2009, a decrease of 3.1% from 2008.
Grocery store sales are a key driver of customer traffic in neighborhood centers. The overall sales volume reported by our grocery stores averaged $450 per square foot, a decrease of 3.5% from 2008.
15
 
Favorable Demographics
$110,000
$100,000
$90,000
$80,000
$70,000
$60,000
$50,000
Saul Centers Avg.
National Avg.
Average household income within three mile radius of Saul Centers' retail properties exceeds the national average
Saul Centers' Avg. $99,700
National Avg. $71,400
Source U.S. Census Bureau, Census 2000
ESRI forecasts for 2009.
Saul Centers
The long-term success of our core portfolio hinges largely on prime infill locations.
Saul Centers' demographics are well above the national averages.
Saul Centers' properties 3-mile trade areas have average household incomes of $99,700, compared to the national average of $71,400.
Our 3 and 5 mile population counts average 94,000, and 228,000, respectively, which are representative of very strong infill locations.
Our top 20 properties in terms of household income average over $131,000.
16
 
 
Major Retail Tenants
Top 10 retail tenants provided only 20% of 2009 Revenue
Tenant Name
Locations
SF %
2009 Revenue
Giant Food
9 6.1% 4.4%
Safeway
8 4.7% 3.2%
Chevy Chase Bank
20 0.8% 2.3%
CVS
6 1.3% 1.8%
Publix
5 2.9% 1.7%
Lowe's Home Center
23.1% 1.6%
Home Depot
2 2.9% 1.4%
Harris Teeter
3 1.7% 1.3%
Super Fresh
2 1.2% 1.1%
Office Depot
4 1.5% 1.0%
Totals
61 26.1% 19.8%
Saul Centers
A diverse retail tenant base minimizes exposure to any one tenant's credit.
Of 2009 rental revenue, only Giant Food, at 4.4%, Safeway at 3.2% and Chevy Chase Bank at 2.3% accounted for more than 2% of total Company revenue.
Our top 10 tenants comprise only 20% of total revenue, with 60% of this revenue generated by supermarkets, a very stable source of income.
18
 
Retail Lease Expirations
Over 50 % of base rents in place to 2014& beyond
Year
Square Feet
S F %
Base Rent $
Base Rent %
2010*
381,000
5.3%
$ 5,631,000
5.8%
2011
867,000
12.0%
12,745,000
13.2%
2012
800,000
11.1%
13,965,000
14.5%
2013
625,000
8.7%
10,936,000
11.3%
2014 & beyond
3,964,000
54.9%
53,306,000
55.2%
Totals
6,637,000
92.0%
$ 96,583,000
100.0%
* As of April 1, 2010
Saul Centers
Retail lease expirations for the balance of 2010 total 381,000 SF. Over 45% of the space that expired in 2010 has been successfully renewed or re-leased as of the end of the 1st quarter.
More than half of our base rents are contracted under leases expiring in 2014 and beyond.
19
 
Seven Corners
Seven Corners, Falls Church, Virginia
Seven Corners is a 568,000 square foot community shopping center in Falls Church, Virginia.
It is anchored by a Shoppers Food Warehouse and a Home Depot.
During late 2008, we signed a lease with Syms clothing store, replacing a dark 50,000 square foot anchor space. Syms opened in June 2009.
We just signed a ground lease with Red Robin gourmet burger restaurant. They will construct a 6,000 square foot family restaurant on the Route 7 side of the center, and plan on opening in early 2011.
The center is our largest retail property as measured both by square footage and operating income, and is our top producing shopping center with over $150 million in annual sales reported by our tenants.
20
 
White Oak
White Oak, Silver Spring, Maryland
Saul Centers
White Oak is a 354,000 square foot community shopping center located in Silver Spring, Maryland anchored by a Giant supermarket, and a Sears.
During 2009, we successfully re-tenanted an expiring Rite Aid and adjacent former Blockbuster store, by signing a 13,000 square foot Walgreens lease. Walgreens opened in the spring of 2009, and the center is currently 99% leased.
This property is one of our top five in size, operating income, and retail sales reported by our tenants.
21
 
Southdale
Southdale, Gen Burnie, Maryland
Saul Centers
Southdale is a 484,000 square foot community shopping center located in Glen Burnie, Maryland, south of Baltimore.
The center is anchored by Home Depot, Marshall's, Value City Furniture, and a Fresh World grocery store.
Circuit City vacated their 37,000 square foot store in mid-March 2009 due to their corporate liquidation.
Just last month, we released 20,000 square feet of this box to Gallo
Clothing, a chain of 18 off-price clothing stores in the Mid-Atlantic region.
This was our only anchor size retail vacancy which resulted from the recent
economic downturn.
Southdale is currently 94% leased.
22
 
Ashburn Village
Ashburn Village, Ashburn, Virginia
Saul Centers
Ashburn Village is a 222,000 square foot, Giant anchored shopping center, located off Route 7 in Loudoun County, Virginia.
We developed the initial phase of Ashburn Village in 1994, our first entry into Loudoun County.
While one of the dominant centers in Loudoun County, small shop retailers have struggled for the past few years.
Occupancy fell to a low point of 90% in the fourth quarter of 2008. Leasing activity has rebounded somewhat throughout 2009, and the center is currently 94% leased.
We own four centers in Loudoun County, totaling over 700,000 square feet of space. Loudoun has been one of our most impacted markets, as the turmoil in the housing market has caused dramatically decreased retail sales, and tenant delinquencies at many restaurants, health fitness centers and other discretionary type retail uses.
23
 
Seabreeze Plaza
Seabreeze Plaza, Palm Harbor, Florida
Saul Centers
Seabreeze is a 147,000 square foot, Publix anchored neighborhood center located in Palm Harbor, Florida, just outside of Tampa.
This Publix has the highest sales per square foot of any grocery store in our portfolio, with sales volume in excess of $775 per square foot.
We acquired Seabreeze in 2005 and it is the largest of our Florida shopping centers. The center is now 95% leased with the recent addition of a 15,000 square foot Petco store.
We have five centers in Florida, totaling over 590,000 square feet. While over 7% of our portfolio's square footage, these 5 properties produce less than 5% of our overall property operating income. Stress in the housing markets has greatly impacted retail sales, and small shop vacancies in our Florida properties continue to increase.
24
 
Northrock
Northrock, Warrenton, Virginia
In early 2009, we completed construction of Northrock shopping center, a neighborhood center totaling approximately 103,000 square feet of leasable area. The center is in Warrenton, Virginia along heavily traveled US Route
29.
In June, 2009, Harris Teeter opened a 52,700 square foot grocery store. Two pad buildings have been completed and 12,000 square feet of in-line shop space is leased.
The center is 71% leased
25
 
Westview Village
Westview Village, Frederick Maryland
We also just completed construction of Westview Village on MD Route 85 in Frederick, Maryland.
This development includes 60,000 square feet of retail shop space, 30,000 square feet of professional office space, and 11,000 square feet of pad space.
The 101,000 square foot center is 30% leased, with activity continuing to be very slow.
26
 
Clarendon Center
244 luxury apartments
42,000 SF ground floor retail
170,000 SF Class "A" office
2 city blocks adjacent to Metro station
Amenities include indoor pool, fitness center, community room
Our Clarendon Center development will be comprised of a residential tower with 244 luxury apartment units, 42,000 square feet of street-level retail stores and 170,000 square feet of office space, all located adjacent to the Clarendon Metro station in Arlington County, Virginia.
Clarendon is one of the premier residential and commercial submarkets in the metropolitan Washington, DC area.
The above photo captures just one of the many fantastic views of downtown Washington from the upper floors of the project.
27
 
Clarendon Center
South Block
Here is a recent construction photo of the development.
Construction has topped out on the South block and interior work is proceeding.
The development is on schedule, with construction to be completed by the end of 2010.
A total of 14,000 square feet of the 42,000 square feet of ground floor retail space is leased - tenants include Circa Restaurant, Burke & Herbert Bank, Pete's New Haven Pizza and Tangy Sweet Garden. Leases are under negotiation for much of the remainder of the retail space.
Apartment pre-leasing will commence in September with occupancy scheduled for December, 2010.
28
 
Clarendon Center
North Block
The North block will contain ground floor retail under 5 stories of office space. Several office leases are under negotiation, but there are no signed leases yet to report.
A total of $130 million of the estimated $195 million of total project cost has been incurred to date.
29
 
Total Shareholder Return
(assumes reinvestment of dividends)
Total Return $100 Invested
$180 $160 $140 $120 $100 $80
Saul Centers' compounded annual return:
5 year= 9.9%
10 year= 16.4%
Dec 2004 Dec 2005 Dec 2006 Dec 2007 Dec 2008 Dec 2009 Mar 2010
Saul Centers
NAREIT Equity
Russell 2000
S & P 500
During the past twelve months, we have rebounded from a tough total return decline during 2008 and through the 1st quarter of 2009.
Our 10-year compounded total return now averages more than 16% per year and our 5-year total return is just under 10% per year.
30
 
Saul Centers
NYSE Symbol: B F S
Annual Meeting of Shareholders
Boulevard, Fairfax City, Virginia
Saul Centers
We remain committed to, and confident in, the long-term performance of our core retail and office properties.
We feel we are prepared to endure the potential for continued economic stress, with cash reserves and a strong balance sheet.
31


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20100804161658.txt.gz
TIME:20100804161658
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On August 4, 2010, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2010. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: August 4, 2010
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
August 4, 2010, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended June 30, 2010. Total revenue for the three months ended June 30, 2010 ("2010 Quarter") increased 1.8% to $40,121,000 compared to $39,416,000 for the three months ended June 30, 2009 ("2009 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before loss on early extinguishment of debt, income attributable to the noncontrolling interest and preferred stock dividends, increased 1.4% to $10,717,000 for the 2010 Quarter compared to $10,574,000 for the 2009 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $1,888,000, or $0.10 per diluted share, for the 2010 Quarter compared to net income available to common stockholders of $3,934,000, or $0.22 per diluted share, for the 2009 Quarter. In light of the current favorable interest rate environment and the potential for continued volatility in the credit markets, in June 2010, the Company refinanced its Thruway shopping center, located in Winston-Salem, North Carolina. The new $45.6 million loan requires principal and interest payments calculated using a 5.83% interest rate and a 25-year amortization schedule, and matures in ten years. This loan refinanced a portion of a 7.67%, multi-property loan scheduled to mature in October 2012. In conjunction with the refinancing, the Company incurred $4,479,000 of expense related to the early extinguishment of debt. The transaction substantially reduced the Company's refinancing risk by decreasing the amount of debt maturing in 2012 from $98,300,000 to $69,000,000, and provided net cash proceeds of approximately $10,500,000.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 0.8% for the 2010 Quarter compared to the 2009 Quarter and same property operating income increased 2.2%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not fully in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio increased 2.6% for the 2010 Quarter compared to the 2009 Quarter, due primarily to the commencement of rent in the third quarter of 2009 under an anchor tenant lease at each of Seven Corners in Falls Church, Virginia and White Oak in Silver Spring, Maryland. Same property operating income in the office portfolio increased 0.7% for the 2010 Quarter compared to the 2009 Quarter.
 
For the six months ended June 30, 2010 ("2010 Period"), total revenue increased 5.9% to $83,769,000 compared to $79,105,000 for the six months ended June 30, 2009 ("2009 Period") and operating income increased 5.3% to $23,291,000 compared to $22,124,000 for the 2009 Period. Net income available to common stockholders was $8,656,000 or $0.47 per diluted share for the 2010 Period, compared to $9,890,000 or $0.55 per diluted share for the 2009 Period. Overall same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 4.7% for the 2010 Period compared to the 2009 Period and same property operating income increased 3.2%. For the 2010 Period, shopping center same property operating income increased 5.0%, the primary cause of which was the collection of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant. Excluding this one-time revenue, same property shopping center operating income increased 0.7% compared to the prior year. Same property operating income in the office portfolio decreased 2.5% for the 2010 Period, due primarily to lease termination fees received in 2009 from a tenant that vacated Avenel Business Park prior to its lease expiration.
As of June 30, 2010, 91.9% of the operating portfolio was leased compared to 91.8% at June 30, 2009. On a same property basis, 92.9% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 93.1%.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) decreased 20.0% to $9,770,000 in the 2010 Quarter compared to $12,212,000 for the 2009 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders decreased 21.2% to $0.41 per share for the 2010 Quarter compared to $0.52 per share for the 2009 Quarter. FFO decreased in the 2010 Quarter primarily due to $4,479,000 ($0.19 per diluted share) of expense associated with the Thruway refinancing compared to $1,940,000 ($0.08 per diluted share) of financing costs in the 2009 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus real estate depreciation and amortization, and excluding gains from property dispositions and extraordinary items. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2010 Period decreased 5.1% to $25,632,000 from $27,018,000 during the 2009 Period. Per share FFO available to common shareholders for the 2010 Period decreased 6.9% to $1.08 per diluted share compared to $1.16 per diluted share for the 2009 Period. FFO decreased in the 2010 Period primarily due to the 2
nd
quarter financing activities described above and by a decline in property operating income during the 1
st
quarter 2010, due to increased snow removal expense, net of tenant recoveries, from severe winter storms impacting the Mid-Atlantic region (approximately $1,200,000 or $0.05 per diluted share), offset in part by the one-time collection of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant ($1,939,000 or $0.08 per diluted share) during the 1
st
quarter 2010.
 
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 52 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 8.4 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
Contact:            Scott V. Schneider
                            (301) 986-6220
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20100811170403.txt.gz
TIME:20100811170403
EVENTS:	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") is re-filing as exhibits to this Form 8-K the agreements listed below in response to comments received from the staff of the Securities and Exchange Commission on the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009 and Proxy Statement relating to its 2010 Annual Meeting of Stockholders.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: August 11, 2010
 

Exhibit 10. (a)
 
 
(this "") is made and entered into as of the 14th day of May, 2008, by and among (i) , a Maryland limited partnership (""), (ii) , a national banking association, as agent (""), and (iii) , a national banking association, as lender, and any other lenders who are now or who may hereafter become parties to this Agreement (collectively, the "").
THIS CONSTRUCTION LOAN AGREEMENT
Agreement
SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
Borrower
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
Agent
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
Lenders
, in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements hereinafter set forth, the parties hereto agree as follows:
WITNESSETH THAT
For the purposes of this Agreement, the following terms shall have the following respective meanings, unless the context hereof clearly requires otherwise:
: Any portion of the Loan advanced to or for the benefit of Borrower in accordance with the terms hereof.
Advance
: The date on which an Advance requested by Borrower hereunder is to be made.
Advance Date
: Any parent of Borrower, subsidiary of Borrower or entity controlled by or under common control with Borrower.
Affiliate
: U. S. Bank National Association, its successors and assigns as agent for the Lenders.
Agent
: This Construction Loan Agreement, including any amendments hereof and supplements hereto executed by Borrower and Agent.
Agreement
: That certain Certificate of Architect regarding the Property from the Project Architect.
Architect's Certificate
: As defined in .
Assignee Lender
Section 8.9(a)
: An instrument in the form of , duly completed and executed and delivered.
Assignment and Assumption Agreement
Exhibit A
: An Interest Rate Hedge which is provided by any Lender and which meets the following requirements: such Interest Rate Hedge (i) is documented in a standard International Swap Dealer Association Agreement, (ii) provides for the method of calculating the reimbursable amount of the provider's credit exposure in a reasonable and customary manner, and (iii) is entered into for hedging (rather than speculative) purposes. If Borrower elects to obtain a Bank-Provided Interest Rate Hedge, and provided that Agent confirms that such Interest Rate Hedge meets the foregoing requirements, the liabilities of the Borrower to the provider of any Bank-Provided Interest Rate Hedge shall be a part of Borrower's obligations hereunder, guaranteed by the Guaranty and secured by the Deed of Trust and other Loan Documents.
Bank-Provided Interest Rate Hedge
: Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, a Maryland limited partnership, and its permitted successors and assigns.
Borrower
 
: Any day, other than a Saturday, a Sunday, or a legal holiday on which Agent is not open for business.
Business Day
: The date of this Agreement.
Closing Date
: The Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and applicable U.S. Department of Treasury regulations issued pursuant thereto in temporary or final form.
Code
With respect to each Lender's share of all right, title and interest in the Loan and the Loan Documents, as set forth on attached hereto, as amended and modified by unilateral action of Agent from time to time to reflect the sale or assignment of a portion of the Loan.
:
Commitment Percentage
Exhibit I
: One Hundred Fifty-Seven Million Five Hundred Thousand and 00/100ths Dollars ($157,500,000.00).
Committed Amount
: All Improvements have achieved Substantial Completion (as defined in the Construction Contract), free of all mechanics', labor, materialmen's and other similar lien claims; said Substantial Completion has been approved by the Inspecting Architect; Borrower and Project Architect have delivered a certification to Agent on AIA Form G704 that the Property has been substantially completed in accordance with the approved Plans; Borrower has obtained and delivered to Agent copies of all licenses and permits needed to operate the Property; Agent has received photographs of the completed Improvements, copies of all warranties from suppliers covering materials, equipment and appliances included within the Property and evidence that all insurance required hereby is in full force and effect; and no Event of Default exists hereunder.
Completion
: December 24, 2010, provided however that such Completion Date shall be subject to extension by reason of acts of God (including hurricanes, tornadoes, cyclones, other severe storms, high winds, lightning, floods or earthquakes); action or inaction of governmental authorities having jurisdiction over the Project; strikes; shortages or unavailability of labor or materials; lockouts or labor difficulty; explosion; sabotage; accident; riot or civil commotion; act of war, fire or other casualty; legal requirements; and causes beyond the reasonable control of Borrower; provided, Borrower provides written notice to Agent immediately upon becoming aware of the occurrence of any of the foregoing conditions and provided further that the aggregate period of such delay(s) shall not extend beyond April 26, 2011.
Completion Date
: As defined in hereof.
Construction Contract
Section 2.1(c)
: Third party experts retained by Agent to assist it in connection with closing, advancing, disbursing or administering the Loan.
Consultants
: A reserve of Loan proceeds to pay costs of the Property which are in excess of the amounts thereof anticipated on the date hereof, whether as a result of price increases, changes in the Plans or otherwise, the initial amount of which shall be Seven Million Four Hundred and Five Thousand and Two Hundred Eighteen and 00/100ths Dollars ($7,405,218.00).
Contingency Reserve
: Any person, party or entity (other than the Project Architect) which has a contract or subcontract under which payment may be required for any work done, material supplied or services furnished in connection with acquiring, constructing, financing, equipping and/or developing the Property.
Contractor
 
: An amount equal to (x) the amount of the Loan outstanding at the time of determination multiplied by (y) the greater of (i) a debt constant calculated using a rate of interest equal to 2.25% per annum in excess of the then prevailing T-Note Rate and assuming a thirty (30) year principal amortization schedule, or (ii) seven percent (7.0%) per annum.
Debt Service
: The determination by Agent, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, that the Property has generated Net Operating Income during the immediately preceding three (3) months which, when annualized, equals or exceeds the product of (a) with respect to a proposed reduction in the Interest Rate payable under the Loan Documents, as contemplated in the definition of "LIBOR Rate" below, 1.00 times Debt Service (the ""), (b) with respect to the condition set forth in hereof for the Second Extension Period, as determined as of the first day of such Extension Period, 1.00 times Debt Service (the ""), and (c) with respect to a proposed reduction in the liability of Borrower under the Loan Documents, as contemplated in Section 8.17 hereof, 1.00 times Debt Service (the "").
Debt Service Test
Interest Rate Reduction Debt Service Test
Section 1.4(b)
Extension Debt Service Test
Recourse Reduction Debt Service Test
: The Combination Credit Line Deed of Trust, Security Agreement and Fixture Financing Statement of even date herewith covering the Property, executed by Borrower in favor of Agent for the benefit of the Lenders to secure the Loan, including any amendments thereof and supplements thereto executed by Borrower and Agent.
Deed of Trust
: As defined in hereof.
Default Rate
Section 1.11
: Any Lender who for any reason shall fail or refuse to abide by its obligations under the Loan Documents or this Agreement within the time periods specified for performance of such obligation or, if no time frame is specified, if such failure or refusal continues for a period of five (5) Business Days. Agent shall notify Lender of its determination that such Lender is a Defaulting Lender. Any such Defaulting Lender shall have a period of five (5) Business Days after Agent's notice within which to cure such Defaulting Lender's failure or refusal to comply with its obligations hereunder and the under the Loan Documents.
Defaulting Lender
: Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, a Maryland limited partnership.
Developer
: A sum equal to $8,500,000.00, representing the fee payable by Borrower to Developer. The Development Fee shall not be a part of any Advance hereunder.
Development Fee
: A written request by Borrower, in the form of hereto, or such other form as may be reasonably requested by Agent, for an advance of Loan proceeds under this Agreement.
Draw Request
Exhibit K
: Any employee benefit or other plan establishing benefits or compensation for employees established or maintained, or to which contributions have been made, by Borrower.
Employee Benefit Plan
: A written environmental review, audit, assessment or report addressed to Agent, setting forth the results of an investigation of the Property, including an historical investigation of the uses and ownership of the Land, contacts with appropriate governmental agencies and any Tests which may be requested by Agent, prepared by a competent environmental engineer or consultant who is acceptable to Agent and is licensed, bonded and insured in accordance with all applicable statutes.
Environmental Audit
: Any judgment, decree, order, law, license, rule or regulation pertaining to environmental matters, including without limitation, those arising under the Resource Conservation and
Environmental Laws
 
Recovery Act (""), the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980 as amended (""), the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 (""), the Federal Clean Water Act, the Federal Clean Air Act, the Toxic Substances Control Act, or any state or local statute, regulation, ordinance, order or decree relating to health, safety or the environment.
RCRA
CERCLA
SARA
: All fixtures, equipment and personal property owned by Borrower and located or to be located in or on, and used in connection with, the construction, management, maintenance or operation of the Land and the Improvements.
Equipment
: An aggregate amount of Fifty-Three Million Five Hundred Thousand and 00/100ths Dollars ($53,500,000.00), consisting of (i) Twenty Nine Million Seven Hundred Thirty Five Thousand Three Hundred Thirty One and 00/100ths Dollars ($29,735,331.00) which shall be contributed on or prior to the Closing Date, (ii) the Development Fee, and (iii) Fifteen Million Two Hundred Sixty Four Thousand Six Hundred Sixty Nine and 00/100th Dollars ($15,264,669.00) which shall be contributed on a pari passu (50/50) basis with the Loan proceeds until all such additional Fifteen Million Two Hundred Sixty Four Thousand Six Hundred Sixty Nine and 00/100th Dollars ($15,264,669.00) has been contributed. The Equity Requirement shall not be deemed satisfied unless and until confirmed by Agent in writing, in its sole discretion, upon Borrower's written request.
Equity Requirement
: As defined in .
ERISA
Section 5.16
: Any corporation which is a member of the same controlled group of corporations (within the meaning of Section 414(b) of the Code) as Borrower or any trade or business which is under common control (within the meaning of Section 414(c) of the Code) with Borrower or any organization which is required to be treated as a single employer with Borrower under Section 414(m) or 414(o) of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
: Any event set forth in .
Event of Default
Section 6.1
: As defined in the definition of Debt Service Test.
Extension Debt Service Test
: Fifteen hundredths of one percent (0.15%) of the then outstanding principal balance of the Loan.
Extension Fee
: As defined in .
Extension Periods
Section 1.4
: As defined in .
Extension Request
Section 1.4
: As of any date of determination, the rate set forth in the weekly statistical release designated as H.15(519), or any successor publication, published by the Federal Reserve Board (including any such successor, "H.15(519)") for such date opposite the caption "". If for any relevant date such rate is not yet published in H.15(519), the rate for such date will be the rate set forth in the daily statistical release designated as the Composite 3:30 p.m. Quotations for U.S. Government Securities, or any successor publication, published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York (including any such successor, the "") for such date under the caption "". If on any relevant date the appropriate rate for such date is not yet published in either H.15(519) or the Composite 3:30 p.m. Quotation, the rate for such date will be the arithmetic mean of the rates for the last transaction in overnight Federal funds arranged prior to 9:00 a.m. (New York City time) on that date by each of three leading brokers of Federal funds transactions in New York City selected by Agent.
Federal Funds Rate
Federal Funds (Effective)
Composite 3:30 p.m. Quotation
Federal Funds Effective Rate
 
: That certain Fee Letter between Borrower and Agent of even date herewith.
Fee Letter
: As defined in .
First Extension Period
Section 1.4
: Generally accepted accounting principles set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or in such other statements by such other entity as may be approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession, which are applicable to the circumstances as of any date of determination. Except as may be expressly provided to the contrary herein, all accounting terms used herein shall be interpreted, and all accounting determinations hereunder shall be made, in accordance with GAAP. To the extent any change in GAAP affects any computation or determination required to be made pursuant to this Agreement, such computation or determination shall be made as if such change in GAAP had not occurred, unless Borrower and Agent agree in writing on an adjustment to said computation or determination to account for such change in GAAP.
GAAP
: Clark Residential, LLC.
General Contractor
: All laws, statutes, codes, ordinances, and governmental rules, regulations and requirements (including, without limitation, the Proffers) applicable to Borrower and the Property.
Governmental Requirements
: Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation.
Guarantor
: That certain Guaranty of even date herewith given by Guarantor in favor of Agent and the Lenders.
Guaranty
: Any hazardous waste, as defined by 42 U.S.C.  9601(5), any hazardous substances as defined by 42 U.S.C.  9601(14), any pollutant or contaminant as defined by 42 U.S.C. 9601(33) or any toxic substances, oil or hazardous materials or other chemicals or substances regulated by any Environmental Laws.
Hazardous Substances
: The buildings and improvements that are now or are hereafter placed or constructed upon the Land, as more particularly described on attached hereto (including all sitework, utilities, infrastructure, paving, striping, signage, curb and gutter, landscaping and installation of all "common area" improvements required under any covenants encumbering the Property, required by applicable law, or zoning approvals entered into by Borrower).
Improvements
Exhibit B
: The first advance of Loan proceeds.
Initial Advance
: EMJ Construction Consultants and/or any other independent architect, engineer or consultant selected by Agent.
Inspecting Architect
: An interest rate exchange, collar, cap, swap, adjustable strike cap, adjustable strike corridor or similar agreements entered into by Borrower to provide protection to, or minimize the impact upon, the Borrower of increasing floating rates of interest applicable to the Loan
Interest Rate Hedge
.
: As defined in the definition of Debt Service Test.
Interest Rate Reduction Debt Service Test
 
: A reserve of Loan proceeds to pay interest on the Loan through Completion of the Improvements, the initial amount of which shall be Twenty Million Nine Hundred Forty Eight Thousand Nine Hundred Eighty Nine and 00/100ths Dollars ($20,948,989.00).
Interest Reserve
: The land legally described on attached hereto and hereby made a part hereof, together with all additions thereto and substitutions therefor agreed to by Borrower and Agent.
Land
Exhibit C
: Any federal, state or local law, statute, rule, regulation, ordinance, order, decree, directive, requirement, code, notice of violation or rule of common law, now or hereafter in effect, and in each case as amended, and any judicial or administrative interpretation thereof by a governmental authority or otherwise, including any judicial or administrative order, determination, consent decree or judgment.
Law
: Leadership Institute, a Virginia non-stock corporation
Leadership
: Collectively, those certain documents by and between Borrower and Leadership relating to the Project, as may be amended, modified, supplemented or replaced from time to time, including, without limitation, (i) that certain Development Agreement dated as of June 7, 2006, as amended by that certain First Amendment to Development Agreement dated as of September 5, 2007; (ii) that certain Lease dated as of June 7, 2006; and (iii) that certain Temporary Construction Easement and Crane Swing License Agreement dated as of June 7, 2006.
Leadership Agreements
: Any lease, sublease or sub-sublease, letting, license, concession or other agreement (whether written or oral and whether now or hereafter in effect), pursuant to which any Person is granted a possessory interest in, or right to use or occupy, all or any portion of any space in the Project, and every modification, amendment or other agreement relating to such lease, sublease, sub-sublease or other agreement entered into in connection with such lease, sublease, sub-sublease or other agreement and every guarantee of the performance and observance of the covenants, conditions and agreements to be performed and observed by the other party thereto; provided, however, that such term shall not include any agreements, instruments or other documents that are necessary to satisfy the Proffers.
Lease
: As set forth on attached hereto and hereby made a part hereof.
Leasing Guidelines
Exhibit N
: Each Lender that is a party to this Agreement and which hereafter becomes party to this Agreement, collectively, and each of their respective permitted successors and assigns.
Lenders
: With respect to any requested LIBOR Rate Advance, the one month LIBOR Rate quoted by Agent from Reuters Screen LIBOR01 or any successor thereto, which shall be that one-month LIBOR Rate in effect two New York Banking Days prior to the beginning of each calendar month, adjusted for any reserve requirement and any subsequent costs arising from a change in government regulation, such rate to be reset monthly on the first day of each calendar month.
LIBOR
(a) For the period commencing on the date of this Agreement and continuing thereafter unless and until the effective date of any reduction in such rate in accordance with clause (b) below, LIBOR Rate shall mean a rate of interest equal to two and one-half percent (2.5%) per annum plus LIBOR; (b) if, upon Borrower's written request, Agent determines, in its sole discretion acting in good faith, that Completion has occurred, LIBOR Rate shall mean a rate of interest equal to two and thirty-five hundredths percent (2.35%) per annum plus LIBOR, and (c) if, upon Borrower's written request, Agent determines, in its sole discretion acting in good faith, that the Interest Rate Reduction Debt Service Test is satisfied, LIBOR Rate shall mean a rate of interest equal to two and twenty hundredths percent (2.20%) per annum plus LIBOR. In no event shall the LIBOR Rate ever exceed the maximum lawful rate.
:
LIBOR Rate
 
: Any portion of the Principal Balance which bears interest at a LIBOR Rate; provided, however, that any LIBOR Rate Advance must be in the aggregate principal amount of at least $500,000.00.
LIBOR Rate Advance
: The loan of the proceeds of the Note by the Lenders to Borrower in advances to be made pursuant to the terms of this Agreement.
Loan
: The documents enumerated in of this Agreement, which evidence and secure the Loan, including, but not limited to, the Note, the Deed of Trust, this Agreement, the Assignment of Leases and Rents and the Indemnification Agreement, and including any amendments thereof and supplements thereto executed by Borrower and Agent.
Loan Documents
Section 2.2
: Lenders holding Notes representing, in the aggregate, not less than sixty six and sixty seven hundredths percent (66.67%) of the Committed Amount or, if no such principal amount is then outstanding, Lenders representing not less than sixty six and sixty seven hundredths percent (66.67%) of the Commitment Percentages.
Majority Lenders
: November 14, 2011, as such date may be extended in accordance with the provisions of hereof.
Maturity Date
Section 1.4
: One or more wholesale funding markets available to Agent, including negotiable certificates of deposit, commercial paper, eurodollar deposits, bank notes, federal funds and others.
Money Markets
: Any plan defined as such in Section 3(37) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
: For any period of determination, net operating income generated by the Property for such period (, gross operating income determined in accordance with GAAP, less (x) all operating expenses payable in the ordinary course of operating the Property, determined in accordance with GAAP (exclusive of debt service, capital expenditures, leasing costs, tenant improvement costs, depreciation and amortization) and (y) reserves calculated for the first year on the basis of (1) for apartments units, $250.00 per unit per year, or $61,000.00, (2) for office space, $0.25 per rentable square foot per year, or $42,600.00; and (3) for retail space, $0.25 per rentable square foot per year, or $10,575, for a total reserve deduction in the first year of operations of $114,175. After completing the first full year of operations, reserves shall be escalated at 4% per annum. Borrower shall provide Agent with all information and materials required by Agent necessary for the determination of Net Operating Income.
Net Operating Income
i.e.
: Any day (other than a Saturday or Sunday) on which commercial Lenders are open for business in New York, New York.
New York Banking Day
: Individually or collectively, as the context may require, the Promissory Notes, of even date herewith, executed and delivered by Borrower to the Lenders in the aggregate maximum principal amount of One Hundred Fifty-Seven Million Five Hundred Thousand and 00/l00ths Dollars ($157,500,000.00), to evidence the Loan, as the same may be amended, modified or replaced from time to time.
Note
: The obligations of Borrower to Agent and the Lenders described in the Loan Documents.
Obligations
: A detailed listing of all anticipated annual income and expenses from and for managing, maintaining and operating the Property, prepared by Borrower or its agent and in form and substance acceptable to Agent.
Operating Budget
 
: A current, detailed statement of income and expenses from and for managing, maintaining and operating the Property, in form and substance acceptable to Agent, certified as true, correct and complete by the chief financial officer of Borrower (or officer acting in a similar such capacity), and expressly showing all variations from the Operating Budget for the period covered thereby.
Operating Statement
: Any employee pension benefit plan within the meaning of Section 3(2) of ERISA with respect to which Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate at any relevant time has liability or an obligation to contribute.
Pension Plan
: The liens, charges and encumbrances on title to the Property listed on hereto, if any, or otherwise approved by the Agent in writing.
Permitted Encumbrances
Exhibit D
: The following transfers, pledges and other changes in the direct or indirect ownership interests in Borrower and/or Guarantor (which shall be permitted without payment of any fee to Agent or the Lenders):
Permitted Transfer
(a) transfers of interests, admissions of additional members, limited partners or shareholders, and other structural changes, in Borrower, Guarantor, or any owner of a direct or indirect legal or beneficial interest in either of them, including, but not limited to, their respective partners, members or shareholders, provided that after giving effect thereto (i) B. Francis Saul II, B. Francis Saul III, members of their respective families, trusts for the benefit of any of the same and/or companies or other entities controlled directly or indirectly by any of the same, continue to (A) own and control, directly or indirectly, at least ten percent (10%), in the aggregate, of (x) the limited partnership units of Borrower, and (y) the common stock of Guarantor on a fully diluted basis, and (B) retain responsibility for the day-to-day management of the Property; and (ii) Guarantor continues to be the sole managing general partner of Borrower; and
(b) transfers of the publicly traded stock of Guarantor, provided that after giving effect thereto, B. Francis Saul II, B. Francis Saul III, members of their respective families, trusts for the benefit of any of the same and/or companies or other entities controlled directly or indirectly by any of the same, continue to (i) own and control, directly or indirectly, at least ten percent (10%), in the aggregate, of the common stock of Guarantor on a fully diluted basis, and (ii) retain responsibility for the day-to-day management of the Property.
For purposes of the foregoing, a pledge of any interest shall not constitute a transfer of such interest unless and until the interest so pledged has been transferred pursuant to a foreclosure of the lien of such pledge, provided that any such pledge shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%), in the aggregate, of the limited partnership interests in Borrower. As necessary, all representations and warranties of Borrower and Guarantor in the Loan Documents shall be deemed modified to conform to any such transfers, pledges or other changes.
: Any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, partnership (general or limited), limited liability partnership, joint venture, firm, association, trust, unincorporated organization, government or governmental agency or political subdivision or any other entity, whether acting in an individual, fiduciary or other capacity.
Person
: As defined in .
Plan
Section 5.16
: The construction documents for the Improvements, including the plans, drawings and specifications, as approved (or deemed approved) by Agent from time to time.
Plans
 
: Any hazardous or toxic substance, waste or material, or other pollutant or contaminant (including but not limited to radioactive materials, gasoline, asbestos, ureaformaldehyde and polychlorinated biphenyls), as those terms are defined or used in any Environmental Law.
Pollutant
: As defined on hereto.
Pre-Leasing Test
Exhibit Q
: The rate publicly announced by Agent from time to time as its prime rate, as and when such rate changes; provided, however, that Agent may lend to its customers at interest rates that are above or below the Prime Rate.
Prime Rate
: Any portion of the Principal Balance which bears interest at the Prime Rate.
Prime Rate Advance
: One Hundred Fifty-Seven Million Five Hundred Thousand and 00/100ths Dollars ($157,500,000.00) or so much thereof as may have been advanced to or for the benefit of Borrower and remains unpaid from time to time.
Principal Balance
: As defined in .
Prior Advance
Section 3.5(d)(2)
: The approved development conditions of Arlington County special exception site plan no. 397, and all agreements contemplated thereby, whether or not existing in separate written form as of the date of this Agreement.
Proffers
: A mixed use development located on two parcels of land straddling the North and South sides of Clarendon Boulevard between North Garfield and North Highland Streets comprised of approximately 244 rental apartment units, approximately 170,400 square feet of office space, approximately 42,300 square feet of ground floor and retail space and an underground parking garage containing approximately 600 spaces.
Project
: Torti Gallas and Partners, or such other architectural firm that may be selected by Borrower, subject to the approval of Agent, such approval not to be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed.
Project Architect
: As defined in .
Projected Sources
Section 5.3
: The Land, the Improvements and the Equipment.
Property
: Any amount advanced or expended by the Agent and/or the Lenders pursuant to the Loan Documents to preserve or protect the Lenders' rights with respect to the Loan.
Protective Advances
: As defined in the definition of Debt Service Test.
Recourse Reduction Debt Service Test
: Regulations D and U, respectively (or any substitute regulations), of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor thereto), together with all amendments from time to time thereto.
Regulation D; Regulation U
: Any change, after the date of the initial funding of the Note, in United States federal, state or foreign laws, regulations or treaties, or the adoption or making after such date of any interpretations, directives or requests applying to Agent and/or the Lenders of or under any United States federal, state or foreign laws or regulations (whether or not having the force of law) by any court or
Regulatory Change
 
governmental or monetary authority charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, excluding, however, for purposes of LIBOR Rate Advances, any such change which results in an adjustment of the reserve requirement specified by Regulation D and the effect of which is reflected in a change in rate applicable to any such LIBOR Rate Advance.
: The Interest Reserve, Contingency Reserve and Tenant Improvement Reserve.
Reserves
: As defined in .
Revolving Credit Agreement
Section 5.14
: As defined in .
Second Extension Period
Section 1.4
: A security interest granted by Borrower to Agent and the Lenders, a lien on and an express contractual right to set off against all depository account balances, cash and any other property of the Borrower now or hereafter in the possession of Agent or the Lenders and the right to refuse to allow withdrawals from any account, subject to the terms of the Loan Documents and applicable law.
Set-Off
: An itemized, certified statement of actual and estimated costs of the Property, in the form of attached hereto or to be attached hereto within ninety (90) days after the date hereof and hereby made a part hereof, signed and sworn to by Borrower (as indicated on hereto), as the same may be amended or supplemented with the approval of Agent from time to time, Section I of which is referred to as the "".
Sworn Construction Cost Statement
Exhibit E
Exhibit E
Summary Sworn Construction Cost Statement
: All finish improvements to the basic building shell of the Improvements for tenant space within the Improvements, as shown on the schedule thereof delivered by Borrower to Agent.
Tenant Improvements
: A reserve of Loan proceeds to pay the costs of Tenant Improvements for retail and office space, the initial amounts of which shall be $2,750,085.00 and $10,310,760.00, respectively.
Tenant Improvement Reserve
: Such soil tests, chemical tests, materials tests and other tests and analyses as are appropriately required to confirm, with relative certainty, the absence of Pollutants from the Property.
Tests
: Commonwealth Land Title Insurance Company.
Title Company
: A loan policy of title insurance in favor of Agent for the benefit of the Lenders issued by the Title Company and complying with the requirements of attached hereto and hereby made a part hereof.
Title Policy
Exhibit F
: The annualized yield on ten (10) year United States Treasury notes having a maturity date closest to the Maturity Date, as determined by Agent in its sole discretion.
T-Note Rate
I.
LOAN
. Subject to the terms, provisions and conditions of this Agreement, each Lender severally, but not jointly, agrees to lend to Borrower pro rata in accordance with its Commitment Percentage, and Borrower agrees to borrow from the Lenders, the proceeds of the Loan, from time to time, in accordance with the terms hereof until the Maturity Date, for the purpose of constructing the Improvements and otherwise developing the Property. All advances of Loan proceeds shall be evidenced by the Note. Notwithstanding the expressed principal amount of the Note, Borrower shall not be obligated to repay more than the unpaid balance of advances made to or for the
1.1
Principal
 
benefit of Borrower by Agent and the Lenders pursuant hereto and to the other Loan Documents, together with interest thereon at the rates specified below, computed on each Advance from the date it is made by the Lenders. In no event shall the Lenders be obligated hereunder to lend to Borrower more than Borrower has qualified to receive under the terms of hereof.
Article III
. Interest shall accrue on the Principal Balance from and after the date hereof. All interest payable hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a 360 day year, but shall be charged for the actual number of days principal is unpaid. Interest accruing in accordance herewith shall be payable, as accrued, on the first Business Day of each calendar month, commencing with the first Business Day of the next calendar month following the calendar month in which the Initial Advance is made to Borrower, and continuing on the first Business Day of each and every calendar month thereafter until the Principal Balance and all accrued interest thereon are paid in full. Agent shall provide a monthly notice to Borrower setting forth the amount of interest due and the due date thereof, which notice shall be mailed on or prior to the tenth (10th) day preceding the first day of each month; provided, however, that Borrower shall be obligated to pay interest on the Loan when due regardless of the date Borrower receives such notice. All unpaid, accrued interest shall be paid in full at the time the Principal Balance is paid in full.
1.2
Payment of Interest
In the event that the interest and/or charges in the nature of interest, if any, provided for by this Agreement or by any other Loan Document, shall contravene a legal or statutory limitation applicable to the Loan, if any, Borrower shall pay only such amounts as would legally be permitted; provided, however, that if the defense of usury and all similar defenses are unavailable to Borrower, Borrower shall pay all amounts provided for herein. If, for any reason, amounts in excess of the amounts permitted in the foregoing sentence shall have been paid, received, collected or applied hereunder, whether by reason of acceleration or otherwise, then, and in that event, any such excess amounts shall be applied to principal, unless principal has been fully paid, in which event such excess amount shall be refunded to Borrower.
. The Principal Balance and accrued interest thereon may be prepaid in full or in part at any time, without premium or penalty, after a minimum of three (3) Business Days' prior written notice from Borrower to Agent of the date of prepayment. In the event that Borrower shall fail to provide at least such three (3) Business Days' notice when herein required, Agent will charge, and Borrower shall pay, additional interest on the amount prepaid, at the LIBOR Rate or at the Default Rate, whichever is then applicable, from the earlier of the date such notice is given or the date the prepayment is made through the date three (3) Business Days after the date of such notice or, if no notice is given, such prepayment. Each prepayment shall be in an amount not less than the lesser of $100,000.00 or the Principal Balance.
1.3
Prepayment
. If not sooner paid in accordance with the terms hereof, the Principal Balance, together with all unpaid interest accrued thereon, shall be due and payable, in full, on the Maturity Date; provided, however, the Maturity Date may be extended for two (2) additional periods of nine (9) months each (individually, the "" and the "" and collectively, the ) upon the written request (the ) of Borrower given not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days prior to the Maturity Date then existing, each such extension being subject to satisfaction of all of the following conditions:
1.4
Maturity Date; Extension
First Extension Period
Second Extension Period
"Extension Periods"
"Extension Request"
(a) Payment on or before the first day of each Extension Period of the Extension Fee;
 
(b) With respect to the Second Extension Period, the Extension Debt Service Test shall be satisfied as of the first day of such Extension Period, as determined by Agent in its sole discretion exercised in good faith (assuming that all principal and interest payments due hereunder are paid in a timely manner after receipt by Agent of the Extension Request); provided, however, if the Extension Debt Service Test is not satisfied, Borrower may elect to satisfy this condition by paying a principal curtailment in an amount sufficient to reduce the Principal Balance as of the first day of the Second Extension Period such that the Extension Debt Service Test shall be satisfied as of such date, as determined by Agent in its sole discretion exercised in good faith (assuming that all principal and interest payment due hereunder are paid in a timely manner after receipt by Agent of the Extension Request);
(c) At the time of each Extension Request and on the first day of each Extension Period, there shall exist no uncured Event of Default (as hereinafter defined);
(d) Borrower shall deliver to Agent a title bringdown or, in the event Agent requires that any documentation be recorded in connection with such extension, an endorsement to the existing title insurance policy held by Agent on behalf of the Lenders in connection with the Loan, bringing current the effective date of such coverage setting forth no liens or encumbrances other than Permitted Encumbrances and stating that the coverage afforded by such title insurance policy, or the agreements thereunder, shall not be affected because of such extension;
(e) Completion of the Improvements has been achieved to the satisfaction of Agent and all certificates of occupancy and use permits shall have been issued in connection therewith;
(f) Borrower shall deliver to Agent all financial information relating to Borrower and the Guarantor required hereunder, and such information shall reflect that no Materially Adverse Effect (as defined in the Deed of Trust), financial or otherwise, as determined by Agent, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, shall have occurred with respect to Borrower;
(g) Borrower shall deliver to Agent on or before the then existing Maturity Date such documentation as Agent may reasonably require in connection with such proposed extension, all of which shall be in form and substance acceptable to Agent;
(h) Borrower shall pay all costs and expenses reasonably incurred by or on behalf of Agent in connection with such extension, including appraisal fees, internal or external appraisal review fees, inspection fees, legal fees and such other professional services which Agent requires; Borrower shall also pay survey costs and costs of environmental studies and reports if such survey(s) and/or environmental studies or reports are deemed necessary by Agent pursuant to Agent's internal policies or pursuant to applicable laws, rules or regulations; the payment by Borrower of these costs and expenses shall not be credited, in any way or to any extent, against any portion of the outstanding balance of the Loan; and
(i) At the time of each Extension Request and on the first day of each Extension Period, Agent shall have determined that the Loan is in balance pursuant to .
Section 3.2
Notwithstanding Borrower's right to extend the Maturity Date of the Loan as set forth above, Borrower hereby agrees that Agent and the Lenders shall have no commitment or obligation to extend the Maturity Date unless each of the foregoing conditions shall have been satisfied.
. From and after the date hereof, and until the date on which the Note is paid in full, Borrower shall pay interest only on the outstanding Principal Balance at the
1.5
Calculation of Interest
 
rate per annum equal to the LIBOR Rate, except as otherwise provided in this Agreement and the Loan Documents.
. Notwithstanding any other provision herein, if any Regulatory Change shall change the basis of taxation of payments to the Lenders of the principal of or interest on any LIBOR Rate Advance or any other fees or amounts payable hereunder (other than taxes imposed on the overall net income of the Lenders by the jurisdiction in which the Lenders have their principal offices or by any political subdivision or taxing authority therein), or shall subject the Lenders to any new or additional charge, fee, withholding or tax of any kind with respect to the Loan hereunder or change the method of taxation of the Loan or impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit or loan commitments extended by, the Lenders (except any such reserve requirement which is reflected in LIBOR) or shall impose on the Lenders or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement, the Note or the LIBOR Rate Advances made by the Lenders, and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to the Lenders of making or maintaining any LIBOR Rate Advance or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by the Lenders hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise) in respect thereof, by an amount deemed by such Lender to be material, then Borrower shall pay to Agent for the benefit of such Lender upon demand, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender for such additional costs or reduction, including lost income resulting therefrom as reasonably determined by such Lender. A statement from such Lender setting forth such amount or amounts as shall be necessary to so compensate such Lender shall be delivered to Borrower and shall, in the absence of manifest error, be conclusive and binding upon Borrower. Borrower shall pay Agent on behalf of such Lender the amount shown as due on any such statement within ten (10) Business Days after its receipt of the same. Failure on the part of any Lender to demand compensation for any increased costs, lost income or reduction in amounts received or receivable shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's rights to demand compensation for any increased costs or reduction in amounts received or receivable. The protection under this section shall be available to the Lenders regardless of any possible contention of the invalidity or inapplicability of any law, regulation or directive which shall give rise to any demand by the Lenders.
1.6
Regulatory Costs
. In the event that on any date for determining the LIBOR Rate, Agent shall determine (which determination shall be conclusive in the absence of manifest error) that, by reason of circumstances affecting the London interbank market, adequate and fair means do not exist for ascertaining the LIBOR Rate, Agent shall promptly give to Borrower notice (confirmed as soon as practicable in writing) of the nature and effect of such circumstances, and the Principal Balance shall bear interest at a rate based upon an alternate index selected by the Agent, reasonably comparable to that of LIBOR, intended to generate a return substantially the same as that generated by the LIBOR Rate. If at any time subsequent to Agent's giving of such notice, Agent determines that because of a change in circumstances the LIBOR Rate is again available to Borrower, Agent shall so notify Borrower and shall convert the rate of interest payable with respect to such portion of the Principal Balance from such alternative rate to the LIBOR Rate. Nothing in this Section shall affect the LIBOR Rate then in effect on any LIBOR Rate Advance outstanding at the time of receipt by Borrower of such notice until the expiration of the LIBOR Rate period in effect with respect to such LIBOR Rate Advance at such time.
1.7
Inability to Determine LIBOR
. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein contained, if any Regulatory Change shall make it unlawful for Agent and/or the Lenders to make or maintain any LIBOR Rate Advance or to give effect to its obligations as contemplated hereby, then, by written notice to Borrower, Agent may:
1.8
Illegality
 
(a) declare that LIBOR Rate Advances will not thereafter be made hereunder, in which event Borrower shall be prohibited from requesting LIBOR Rate Advances, and the Lenders shall not be required to make LIBOR Rate Advances to Borrower, hereunder unless such declaration is subsequently withdrawn; and
(b) require, but only to the extent and for so long as the Regulatory Change affects outstanding LIBOR Rate Advances, that all outstanding LIBOR Rate Advances made by Lenders be converted to Prime Rate Advances as of the effective date of such notice as is hereinafter provided for (notwithstanding any provisions of the Note or this Agreement to the contrary), and interest shall accrue thereon, from and after said date, at the Prime Rate or the Default Rate, whichever is then applicable. For purposes of this Section, a notice to Borrower by Agent shall be effective, if lawful, on the date of receipt by Borrower.
. Borrower shall also pay to the applicable Lenders from time to time on demand such amounts as such Lender may determine to be necessary to compensate such Lender for any costs which such Lender determines are attributable to the extension of credit hereunder in respect of any amount of capital maintained by such Lender or any of its affiliates pursuant to any law, guideline or regulation of any jurisdiction or any interpretation, directive or request (whether or not having the force of law) of any court or governmental or monetary authority enacted, whether proposed on the date of this Agreement or enacted, promulgated or issued after the date of this Agreement, but only to the extent that such costs are charged generally by such Lender to similarly situated borrowers in similar loan transactions; provided, however, that the applicable Lender(s) shall use good faith efforts to provide Borrower with notice of such amounts not later than ten (10) Business Days after the date on which such Lender(s) learn of the same. Without limiting the foregoing, such compensation shall include an amount equal to any reduction in return on assets or return on equity to a level below that which the Lenders could have achieved absent their extension of credit hereunder and but for such law, regulation, interpretation, directive or request. Each Lender will notify Agent as promptly as practicable after it determines to demand such compensation.
1.9
Capital Adequacy
.
1.10
[Intentionally Omitted]
. If a default shall occur and continue beyond any applicable notice, cure or grace period under the Note, this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents or the entire Principal Balance, all interest accrued thereon, and all other amounts payable under the Loan have not been repaid on or before the Maturity Date, then the entire Principal Balance shall (without notice to or demand upon Borrower) become due and payable on said date, together with all unpaid, accrued interest thereon and all other amounts payable under the Loan, and with interest computed thereon from and after that date at a rate which is five percent (5%) per annum in excess of the current rate of interest accruing on the Principal Balance, or at the maximum lawful rate of interest which may be charged thereon by Agent, if any, whichever is less (hereinafter called ""), until all such amounts are paid in full.
1.11
Default Rate
Default Rate
. In the event that any required payment of principal and/or interest hereunder (other than full payment at maturity) is not made within five (5) days of the due date thereof, Borrower shall pay to Agent an additional payment of a late payment charge to compensate for Lenders' loss of use of funds and for the expenses of handling the delinquent payment, in an amount equal to five percent (5.0%) of such delinquent payment. In the event the maturity of the indebtedness hereunder is accelerated by Agent, this section shall apply only to payments overdue prior to the time of such acceleration.
1.12
Late Payment Charge
 
. Borrower, Agent and the Lenders agree that no payment of interest or other consideration made or agreed to be made by Borrower to Agent and/or the Lenders pursuant to this Agreement, the Note, the Deed of Trust or any other instrument referring to or securing the Note shall, at any time, be deemed to have been computed at an interest rate in excess of the maximum rate of interest permissible by law, if any. In the event such payments of interest or other consideration provided for in this Agreement, the Note, the Deed of Trust or any other instrument referring to or securing the Note shall result in payment of an effective rate of interest which, for any period of time, is in excess of the limit of the usury law or any other law applicable to the Loan evidenced by the Note, all sums in excess of those lawfully collectible as interest for the period in question shall, without further agreement or notice between or by any party or parties hereto, be applied to the Principal Balance immediately upon receipt of such monies by Agent with the same force and effect as though Borrower had specifically designated, and Agent had agreed to accept, such extra payments as a principal payment, without premium or penalty. If principal has been fully paid, any such excess amount shall be refunded to Borrower. This provision shall control over every other obligation of Borrower, Agent and the Lenders hereunder and under the Note, the Deed of Trust and any other instrument which secures the Note.
1.13
Effective Rate
. All payments made under the Note shall be applied to any late payment charge then due, to accrued interest, to the Principal Balance and, if Agent and the Lenders have advanced any sums under the terms of any instrument which secures the Note, to repayment of the funds so advanced, even though the same have become part of the Principal Balance, together with interest thereon at the Default Rate, in such order as Agent, at its option, may elect. All payments made under the Loan shall be made in immediately available funds, without counterclaim or set off and free and clear of, and without any deduction or withholding for any taxes or other payments.
1.14
Payments
. On the date hereof and on or before the dates set forth therein, Borrower shall pay Agent all fees, costs and expenses referenced in the Fee Letter. The agency fee set forth in the Fee Letter is for the services to be performed by Agent in acting as Agent and is fully earned on the date paid. The agency fee paid to the Agent is solely for its own account and is nonrefundable.
1.15
Fees
. Agent shall not by any act, delay, omission or otherwise be deemed to have waived any of its rights or remedies, and no waiver of any kind shall be valid unless in writing and signed by Agent. All rights and remedies of Agent under the terms of this Agreement, the Note, or any of the other Loan Documents, and under any statutes or rules of law shall be cumulative and may be exercised successively or concurrently. Any provision of this Agreement and the Note which may be unenforceable or invalid under any law shall be ineffective to the extent of such unenforceability or invalidity without affecting the enforceability or validity of any other provision hereof.
1.16
No Waiver by Agent
II.
CONDITIONS OF BORROWING
Neither Agent nor the Lenders shall be required to make any advances hereunder until the pre-closing requirements, conditions and other requirements set forth below have been completed and fulfilled to the satisfaction of Agent, at Borrower's sole cost and expense. It is agreed, however, that Agent and the Lenders may, in their discretion, make advances prior to completion and fulfillment of any or all of such pre-closing requirements, conditions and requirements, without waiving their right to require such completion and fulfillment before any additional advances are made.
. At least five (5) Business Days prior to the closing of the Loan, Borrower shall provide to Agent each of the following, in form and substance acceptable to Agent.
2.1
Pre-Closing Requirements
 
(a) A commitment for the Title Policy or a preliminary title report from the Title Company, complying with the standard requirements of Agent therefor, a copy of which has been delivered to Borrower.
(b) Two (2) complete sets of the Plans for the Improvements set forth in . All mechanical, electrical, structural and other specialized drawings for the Improvements shall be signed by licensed engineers of the respective disciplines normally responsible for such drawings. All portions of such Plans prepared by the Project Architect shall be signed by the Project Architect.
Exhibit M
(c) The General Contractor's construction contract and the guarantee given to Owner in connection therewith (collectively, the "") and a schedule of values of all trades, the Project Architect's agreement (the ""), a schedule listing all subcontracts signed to date relating to the construction of the Improvements on the Property, and such other contracts, subcontracts and schedules relating to the Property as Agent may reasonably require to the extent then executed.
Construction Contract
Architect's Agreement
(d) Three (3) copies of a current, certified ALTA/ACSM land title survey prepared in accordance with Agent's standard requirements therefor, copies of which have been delivered to Borrower.
(e) Soil reports on the Land, showing that the soil will adequately support the Improvements.
(f) An Environmental Audit running to the benefit of Agent, satisfactory to Agent, and all reports, data and other information produced in connection with the Tests. The Environmental Audit shall also specify whether or not any environmental assessment, study or statement with respect to the Property is required by any Governmental Requirement. If such an assessment, study or statement is so required, Borrower shall provide a copy thereof to Agent.
(g) Copies of insurance policies or certificates of insurance for Borrower and the General Contractor written by insurers satisfactory to Agent and in amounts satisfactory to Agent, prepared in accordance with Agent's standard requirements therefor, a copy of which has been delivered to Borrower. Agent confirms that the insurance coverage currently carried by Borrower and General Contractor, as previously provided to Agent, is currently satisfactory as to the insurer and all other requirements; provided, however, nothing contained herein shall be deemed to limit Agent's right to modify its insurance requirements from time to time.
(h) Borrower's estimated schedules for construction of the Improvements and for disbursement of the Loan proceeds.
(i) Copies of all building permits required for the then current stage of construction of the Improvements, and a schedule of all other necessary licenses and permits which must be obtained in order to occupy and operate the Property.
(j) A zoning opinion from Borrower's counsel in form and substance acceptable to Agent.
(k) An appraisal of the Property showing an "as stabilized" loan to value ratio less than or equal to seventy-five percent (75%), addressed to Agent, prepared by an M.A.I. appraiser acceptable to Agent.
 
(l) Letters addressed to Agent from the suppliers confirming the availability of water, storm and sanitary sewer, gas, electric and telephone utilities for the Improvements, prepared in accordance with Agent's standard requirements therefor, copies of which have been delivered to Borrower.
(m) A Certificate of the Project Architect (the "") addressed to Agent, prepared in accordance with Agent's standard requirements therefor, a copy of which has been delivered to Borrower. Borrower agrees that it shall not, without the prior written consent of Agent, consent to any release or settlement of any claims under the Architect's Certificate or any agreements pursuant to which the Plans and Specifications were, or are to be, prepared, including, but not limited to, any architect's contracts, which consent shall not be unreasonably conditioned, withheld, or delayed given the overall interests of constructing the Improvements and otherwise developing the Property.
Architect's Certificate
(n) UCC chattel lien searches from the Maryland State Department of Assessments and Taxation ("") in the name of Borrower.
MSDAT
(o) A Certificate of Good Standing for Borrower, currently issued by MSDAT; copies of Borrower's Limited Partnership Agreement, Certificate of Limited Partnership currently certified by MSDAT, Certificate of Fact currently issued by the Virginia State Corporation Commission, and resolutions of Borrower's general partner authorizing the transaction described herein, all currently certified by Borrower's general partner; a Certificate of Good Standing for Guarantor, currently issued by MSDAT; and copies of the Guarantor's Articles of Incorporation, currently certified by MSDAT, and Guarantor's Bylaws, all currently certified by Guarantor.
(p) A copy of each agreement relating to the management, operation or maintenance of the Property.
(q) A proposed Operating Budget for the Property.
(r) The most current available annual financial statements for Borrower and Guarantor on a consolidated basis, as well as financial statements on a consolidated basis for each of the three (3) full fiscal years of Guarantor immediately preceding the time period covered by said current financial statements;
(s) All property tax information regarding the Property requested by Agent;
(t) The Sworn Construction Cost Statement for the Property;
(u) A flood zone certification indicating that the portion of the Property on which the Improvements are located is not located in a flood plain or any other flood prone area, as designated by any governmental agency; provided, however, that if the portion of the Property on which the Improvements are so located, Borrower shall obtain and deliver to Agent evidence of flood insurance acceptable to Agent;
(v) A copy of any subdivision plat and site plan for the Property;
(w) One or more standard forms of lease to be used by Borrower in leasing residential, retail and office space within the Property;
(x) Copies of the Leadership Agreements;
 
(y) Copies of the Proffers;
(x) Other agreements, documents and exhibits, without limitation, which may be required, in Agent's judgment, exercised in good faith, to assure compliance with the requirements of this Agreement.
In addition to the above, at least five (5) Business Days prior to the initial advance of Loan Proceeds, Borrower shall provide to Agent evidence satisfactory to Agent that Borrower has contributed to the Property cash equity in an amount not less than $29,735,331.00 prior to the date hereof.
. Except to the extent expressly set forth below in this , on or before the date of closing of the Loan, Borrower shall execute and deliver (or cause to be executed and delivered) to Agent the following documents in form and substance acceptable to Agent and to its counsel, to evidence and secure the Loan:
2.2
Loan Documents
Section 2.2
(a) The Note.
(b) The Deed of Trust.
(c) This Agreement.
(d) An Assignment of Leases and Rents.
(e) An Indemnification Agreement.
(f) A first security interest in all Equipment and in all of Borrower's intangible property relating to the Property, created and evidenced by a security agreement (which may be incorporated within the Deed of Trust) and by appropriate Uniform Commercial Code financing statements.
(g) A covenant compliance certificate, in the form attached hereto as .
Exhibit O
(h) The Fee Letter.
(i) An assignment of the Plans and of the Project Architect's agreement pursuant to which the same were prepared, along with written acknowledgment from the Project Architect authorizing Agent to rely on and utilize the Plans, without additional charge, and further confirming to Agent that, if an Event of Default has occurred, the Project Architect will cooperate with Agent regarding the completion of construction of the Property.
(j) An assignment of the Construction Contract for the Property and an agreement from the General Contractor to honor and perform the same for Agent in the event of an Event of Default under the Loan Documents.
(k) Such other documents as Agent may reasonably require to evidence and secure the Loan.
Agent may designate which of the Loan Documents are to be placed of record, the order of recording thereof, and the offices in which the same are to be recorded. Borrower shall pay all documentary, recording and/or registration taxes and/or fees, if any, due upon the Loan Documents.
 
. Agent shall have received a pro forma copy of the Title Policy.
2.3
Title Insurance
. Agent shall have received from outside counsel for Borrower and Guarantor a current written opinion, subject to customary assumptions and qualifications, in scope, form and substance acceptable to Agent.
2.4
Opinion of Borrower's Attorneys
III.
ADVANCES OF LOAN PROCEEDS
. Subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, each Lender shall, pro rata according to such Lender's Commitment Percentage of the Committed Amount, make advances for the benefit of Borrower, not more frequently than once per month, in such amounts as Borrower may request, in accordance with the terms of this Agreement. All monies advanced by Agent and the Lenders (including amounts payable to Agent and the Lenders and advanced by Agent and the Lenders to themselves pursuant to the terms hereof) shall constitute loans made to Borrower under this Agreement, evidenced by the Note and this Agreement and secured by the other Loan Documents, and interest shall be computed thereon, as prescribed by this Agreement and the Note, from the date of the Advance, whether or not an Advance made to the Title Company is fully disbursed by the Title Company or is withheld in full or in part.
3.1
General
Subject to Section 6.2(e), Agent reserves the right, exercisable after the occurrence of an Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default exists, to make advances of amounts which are allocated to any of the designated items in the Sworn Construction Cost Statement for such other purposes or in such different proportions as Agent may, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, deem necessary or advisable.
No advance shall constitute a waiver of any condition precedent to the obligation of the Lenders to make any further advance. All conditions precedent to the obligation of the Lenders to make any advance are imposed hereby solely for the benefit of Agent and the Lenders, and no other party may require satisfaction of any such condition precedent or shall be entitled to assume that Agent and the Lenders will make or refuse to make any advance in the absence of strict compliance with such condition precedent.
Lenders may advance to themselves, when due after the occurrence of an Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default exists, from the proceeds of the Loan, without further order or request from Borrower, all interest payable to the Lenders under the terms hereof or of the Note, and shall, at Agent's option, advance to Agent all other sums then due under this Agreement or under any of the other Loan Documents, including but not limited to fees, attorneys' fees, Inspecting Architect's fees and all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by Agent in connection with this Agreement and the other Loan Documents. After the occurrence of an Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default exists, Agent shall also have the right, but not the obligation, to advance and directly apply the proceeds of the Loan to the satisfaction of any of Borrower's other obligations hereunder or under any of the other Loan Documents.
In the event that the total amount of the Loan exceeds the amount needed to fully pay all cost allocations set forth on the Sworn Construction Cost Statement approved by Agent, Agent and the Lenders shall not be required to advance, and Borrower shall not be entitled to receive, the excess. Upon extension of the Maturity Date as herein provided, Borrower shall not be entitled to borrow, and Agent and the Lenders shall not be obligated to advance, additional proceeds of the Loan.
 
. Agent and the Lenders shall not be obligated to make any advance of Loan proceeds unless and until Borrower has provided Agent with evidence, acceptable to Agent, that the Loan is in balance: .., that all remaining unpaid costs of the Property for the remaining period until the Maturity Date, as determined by Agent, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, including the Reserves, do not exceed the sum of the amount of the Loan proceeds not yet advanced by the Lenders, the remaining amount, if any, to be contributed in respect of the Equity Requirement, and the net operating income from the Property reasonably projected to be received during such period. The initial amount of the Reserves has been designated in the Sworn Construction Cost Statement. The required amount of said Reserves shall decline as costs and payments for which they are maintained are paid therefrom; provided, however, that the amount of any such Reserves shall never decline below an amount sufficient to pay all costs and payments for which it is maintained which then remain unpaid, as determined by Agent. If the Reserves become depleted, such depletion shall not limit Borrower's obligation hereunder to pay all sums which otherwise would have been payable from such Reserves.
3.2
Loan In Balance
i
e
Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, in the event that Agent or Borrower determines in good faith that the Loan is not in balance, it shall notify the other party hereto of such determination, and Borrower shall, within ten (10) Business Days, deposit with Agent funds equal to said insufficiency in order to bring the Loan back into balance. Said funds shall be disbursed by Agent pursuant to and in accordance with the disbursement procedures set forth in this Agreement prior to any advances by Agent or the Lenders of additional Loan proceeds.
. Agent, the Title Company, the Inspecting Architect, Consultants and their representatives shall have access to the Property at all reasonable times and shall have the right to enter the Property and to conduct such inspections thereof as they shall reasonably deem necessary or desirable for the protection of the interests of Agent and the Lenders.
3.3
Inspections
Agent may retain the Inspecting Architect, and any other consultants deemed necessary or desirable by Agent, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, at Borrower's expense, to make periodic inspections of the Property and to review all change orders relating to the Property. Agent may request the Inspecting Architect, before any advance of Loan proceeds is made, to inspect all work and materials for which payment is requested and all other work upon the Property, review the current Draw Request, approve such work and Draw Request and/or submit to Agent a progress inspection report. Agent may also retain such other Consultants as Agent reasonably deems necessary or convenient to perform such services as may, from time to time, be required by Agent in connection with the Loan, this Agreement, the other Loan Documents or the Property.
Neither Borrower nor any third party shall have the right to use or rely upon the reports of the Inspecting Architect or any other reports generated by Agent or its Consultants for any purpose whatsoever, whether made prior to or after commencement of construction. Borrower shall be responsible for making its own inspections of the Property during the course of construction and shall determine to its own satisfaction that the work done and materials supplied are in accordance with applicable contracts with its contractors. By advancing funds after any inspection of the Property by Agent or the Inspecting Architect, Agent shall not be deemed to waive any Event of Default, waive any right to require construction defects to be corrected, or acknowledge that all construction conforms with the Plans.
Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, in the event that Agent should determine in good faith that the actual quality or value of the work performed or the materials furnished does not correspond with the quality or value of the work required by the Plans, Agent shall
 
notify Borrower of its objections thereto, and, as soon as reasonably practicable, Borrower shall correct the conditions to which Agent objects if such conditions are not in accordance with the Plans.
. It is expressly understood and agreed that neither Agent nor the Lenders assume any liability or responsibility for the sufficiency of the Loan proceeds to complete the Property, for protection of the Property, for the satisfactory completion of the Property, for inspection during construction, for the adequacy or accuracy of the Sworn Construction Cost Statement, for any representations made by Borrower, or for any acts on the part of Borrower or its contractors to be performed in the construction of the Property.
3.4
Responsibility of Agent and the Lenders
.
3.5
Advance Procedures
(a) Borrower shall submit to Agent a copy of the Sworn Construction Cost Statement for the Property, and shall advise Agent of the names of each Contractor providing goods or services in connection with the development and construction of the Improvements. If requested by Agent, Borrower shall also furnish to Agent a copy of each contract with each of the Contractors. Borrower shall keep the Agent advised at all times of the names of all Contractors, and of the type of work, material or services and of the dollar amount covered by each of their respective contracts with Borrower or with the General Contractor. It is understood that only Contractors whose names, contract descriptions and, after a request therefor, contracts have been furnished to Agent shall be entitled to receive disbursements of Loan proceeds under this Agreement. Borrower shall also provide or cause to be provided to Agent a date down of the Title Policy.
(b) Borrower shall either (a) refrain from commencing construction of, and from accepting delivery of materials for, the Property prior to the recording of the Deed of Trust, or (b) provide such evidence and/or documents to the Title Company as shall be sufficient to secure from the Title Company priority insurance over all possible mechanic's lien claims, relating to construction of the Improvements that may have commenced prior to the recording of the Deed of Trust.
(c) Subject to the provisions of this Section 3.5(c), Borrower may obtain advances for disbursement to Contractors only to the extent of the amount of the contract work satisfactorily completed or materials actually incorporated into the Property by each such Contractor in accordance with his contract, less retainage determined and held in accordance with the terms of the Construction Contract. Borrower agrees that all sums requested hereunder for disbursement to each Contractor shall not exceed that amount; provided, however, Agent will, at Borrower's request, make Advances for materials, supplies and equipment purchased for the Improvements stored on-site, or off-site within the continental United States, in either case which materials will largely be those made specifically for inclusion in the Improvements rather than being stock goods, the aggregate of which Advances shall not at any time exceed $2,500,000, and otherwise in accordance with the provisions of the balance of this Section 3.5(c).
Borrower may not obtain advances for disbursement to Contractors for the cost of materials acquired for the Property and stored on-site but not yet incorporated therein, unless Agent has received and approved (i) such financing statements and other documents and evidence as Agent may reasonably require sufficient to create, perfect and protect a first lien on said materials (including, but not limited to, lien searches) which such documents and evidence Agent shall request, to the extent Agent determines them to be necessary, promptly after receipt of the applicable Draw Request Form, (ii) evidence that upon payment therefor Borrower has acquired title to the same and that the same are covered by all risk insurance covering 100% of the total value of said materials, with Agent, Borrower and the General Contractor as named insureds under the policy; (iii) such materials are reasonably protected against theft or damage as determined by the Inspecting Architect; (iv) the Inspecting Architect
 
has viewed and inspected such materials; and (v) in the opinion of the Inspecting Architect, the stored materials are physically secured and can be incorporated into the Improvements within ninety (90) days. Each request for an advance of Loan proceeds for materials to be stored on-site shall constitute Borrower's representation to Agent and Lenders that the conditions set forth in items  above in this paragraph have been satisfied.
(i) through (v)
Borrower may not obtain advances for disbursement to Contractors for the cost of materials acquired for the Property and stored off-site but not yet incorporated therein, unless Agent has received and approved (i) such security agreements, financing statements and other documents and evidence as Agent may reasonably require sufficient to create, perfect and protect a first lien on said materials including, but not limited to, lien searches which materials Agent shall request, to the extent Agent determines them to be necessary, promptly after receipt of the applicable Draw Request Form, (ii) evidence that Borrower has acquired title to the same and that the same are covered by all risk insurance covering 100% of the total value of said materials for all periods until delivery of the same to the Property, with Agent, Borrower and the General Contractor as named insureds under the policy; (iii) information regarding the place of storage therefor on the Land, in a secure or bonded warehouse or at other facilities or locations off the Property reasonably acceptable to Agent (the Agent agreeing for this purpose that the premises of the supplier or subcontractor from which the materials are being obtained shall be an acceptable location); (iv) certification from the supplier or subcontractor that the materials are stored in a secure manner at a location separate from any materials not owned by Borrower and are clearly identified as owned by Borrower and subject to a security interest in favor of Agent on behalf of the Lenders; and (v) a written statement from the holder of said materials to the effect that Borrower and/or the General Contractor, or their representatives may freely inspect said materials at all reasonable times upon reasonable advance notice (Borrower agreeing that, for this purpose, Agent and the Inspecting Architect shall be identified to such holder as such a representative). Each request for an advance of Loan proceeds for materials to be stored off-site shall constitute Borrower's representation to Agent and Lenders that the conditions set forth in items  above in this paragraph have been satisfied.
(i) through (v)
Borrower covenants to deliver to Agent, within ten (10) days of any such Advance: (A) for materials owned by Borrower outright, (x) paid bills and original warehouse receipts or other documents of title which correspond to the materials so purchased and stored, (y) a statement from the seller of said materials to the effect that title thereto has passed to Borrower outright, and that no lien has or will be filed or claimed by the seller in connection therewith and (z) a certificate of Borrower to the effect that said materials are owned by Borrower outright, free and clear of all liens other than the lien held by or on behalf of Lenders and that all of the applicable terms of this paragraph have been complied with and (B) for materials for which the advance was paid as a down payment or deposit, (1) paid bills and original warehouse receipts, as applicable, which correspond to the materials to which a deposit or down payment was made, (2) a statement from the seller of said materials to the effect that all payments due and payable with respect to such materials have been paid, together with lien waivers, if appropriate, in connection therewith, and (3) a certificate of Borrower to the effect that all of the applicable terms of this paragraph have been complied with (the representations set forth above and the statements contained in such certificates shall be deemed to be "representations and warranties" of Borrower with the same force and effect as if they had been set forth in and the accuracy thereof shall be subject to independent verification by Agent and the Inspecting Architect).
Article IV
Agent and the Lenders shall not be required to make the final advance for the payment of the full amount of each Contractor's contract until Agent is satisfied that such Contractor's portion of the work on the Improvements has been completed in accordance with the approved Plans, and compliance with all requirements set forth in this Agreement.
 
(d) Whenever Borrower desires to obtain an advance of Loan proceeds, Borrower shall submit a signed Draw Request, in the form of hereto or such other form as Agent may reasonably require, to Agent and to the Inspecting Architect at least ten (10) Business Days prior to the date on which the requested advance is to be made ("") and within three (3) Business Days after receipt thereof, Agent shall provide a complete copy of such Draw Request (including the supporting detail provided pursuant hereto) to the Lenders. Borrower shall also simultaneously submit to Agent the following:
Exhibit K
Advance Date
(1) A certificate (which may be incorporated in or attached to the Draw Request) relating to each Contractor who is to receive a disbursement from the advance, signed by the Project Architect, or by another construction supervisor approved by Agent (provided that in the case of Contractors engaged directly by Borrower, such certification shall be made by Borrower), stating that each such Contractor has satisfactorily completed the work for which disbursement (less any required retainage) is requested in such Draw Request. Such certificate shall be provided on AIA Form G702/703.
(2) An unconditional waiver of mechanic's lien and/or materialman's lien, executed by the General Contractor and each direct subcontractor of the General Contractor to which any portion of the immediately preceding advance ("") of Loan proceeds was paid, covering liens for all work done and materials supplied for which disbursement was made from the Prior Advance, in the form required by Agent and, if appropriate, the Title Company. Such waivers shall be submitted in each case, unless the Agent determines that such Advance does not include payment for any lienable work. Agent hereby approves the form of lien waiver attached hereto as .
Prior Advance
Exhibit J
(3) To the extent not yet fully contributed, evidence satisfactory to Agent of the contribution, since the date of the last Advance, of additional equity in respect of the Equity Requirement, in an amount not less than the amount of the Requested Advance.
(4) Such other supporting evidence as may be reasonably requested by the Agent to establish the cost or value of the Improvements for which disbursement is to be and has been made.
(e) Prior to the initial disbursement of Loan proceeds, upon Completion of the Improvements, and prior to the final disbursement for construction costs of the Improvements, Borrower shall furnish to Agent and the Title Company six (6) copies of an acceptable survey, showing the exact location of the Improvements. When the foundation for the Improvements is completed, Borrower shall furnish to Agent and the Title Company six (6) copies of a wall check survey in form and substance satisfactory to Agent. Disbursements shall be made by the Agent only if the Title Company has confirmed in writing its willingness to insure over any adverse matters shown by such survey (to the extent such affirmative coverage is acceptable to Agent) or such matters are otherwise addressed to the satisfaction of Agent.
Agent and/or Borrower shall provide notice to the Title Company when Agent has determined that a requested Advance is approved, at which time the Title Company shall date down its examination of title. The Title Company shall (i) give Agent immediate notice by telephone if any intervening liens are disclosed (other than those expressly listed in the Title Company's loan policy of title insurance or subsequent amendments thereto previously given to Agent), and (ii) on the date of each Advance, deliver to Agent a written continuation of said loan policy of title insurance, dated as of the relevant Advance Date, insuring the priority of the lien of the Deed of Trust in an amount equal to advances made by the Lenders through such date. If any such intervening liens or other matters, which are not bonded over by Borrower or otherwise permitted by this Agreement and may, in Agent's or the Majority Lenders' reasonable determination, jeopardize the Lenders' security interest in the Property, are
 
disclosed by said continuation or are in any other manner discovered by the Title Company or Agent, the Agent may (or shall, upon the written direction of the Majority Lenders), refrain from making further disbursements until Agent (following withdrawal of Majority Lenders' written direction to refrain from further disbursements, if applicable) notifies the Title Company that such intervening liens or other matters have been waived by the Agent or the Majority Lenders, as applicable, or satisfied. Upon demand of Agent, Borrower shall promptly cause any such liens or other matters to be satisfied of record or bonded, or shall make other arrangements with respect to the discharge thereof or other protection with respect thereto satisfactory to Agent.
On each Advance Date, if all the terms and conditions of this Agreement have been complied with by Borrower, to the satisfaction of Agent, if no default or Event of Default exists hereunder or under any of the other Loan Documents, Agent shall advance to Borrower (or, at Borrower's direction, to the General Contractor) in a manner satisfactory to the Agent, the principal amount of the requested advance (less any required retainage, if applicable, and less amounts payable to and advanced by Agent to itself and the Lenders).
(g) The provisions of this Agreement requiring submission of the Architect's Certificate and related documents and the required retainage shall not apply with respect to Loan proceeds to be disbursed for the items listed below, which may be disbursed in full upon submission of a Draw Request listing such items signed by Borrower or Agent and/or the following special documentation, if any, to Agent or as otherwise provided by this Agreement:
 
If Borrower directly pays certain costs of construction, the Agent may disburse Loan proceeds, advanced for payment of such construction costs, directly to Borrower, as a reimbursement for such payment; provided that all of the other requirements of this Agreement, including, but not limited to, the presentation of waivers of lien with respect thereto, are fulfilled.
 
(h) Agent may take such steps as it may deem appropriate, at its option, to verify the application of Loan proceeds to work done and material furnished for the Property, and to vary the disbursement procedures herein set forth, if the same becomes necessary or desirable, in Agent's sole discretion exercised in good faith, to assure the proper application of Loan proceeds and/or to preserve the first lien status of the Deed of Trust with respect to disbursements made pursuant hereto, including, but not limited to, making disbursements directly to subcontractors after the occurrence of an Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default exists. However, Agent shall not be obligated to conduct any such verification or to so vary said procedures.
(i) The Borrower shall keep records showing the names of all Contractors and other payees to whom disbursements of Loan proceeds are made, the date of each disbursement, and the amount of each disbursement, which records may be inspected by Agent.
(j) In the event that the Agent shall determine, in its reasonable judgment, that proper documentation to support a given disbursement, as required by this Agreement, has not been furnished, the Agent shall withhold payment of all or such portion of such disbursement as shall not be so supported by proper documentation, and shall promptly notify Borrower of the discrepancy in or omission of such documentation. Such funds shall remain available for advancement under this Agreement, if the requirements hereof with respect thereto are later met.
(k) Borrower shall be responsible for making inspections of the Property during the course of construction, and shall determine to its own satisfaction that the work done or material supplied by the Contractors to whom disbursements are to be made out of each advance has been properly done or supplied in accordance with applicable contracts with such Contractors. The Title Company and the Agent shall not be required to conduct any inspections of the Property.
(l) It is expressly understood and agreed that neither Agent nor any Lenders assume any liability or responsibility for the satisfactory completion of the Improvements, for the adequacy of funds advanced or disbursed pursuant hereto to complete the Improvements, for inspections during construction, or for any acts on the part of Borrower or the Contractors to be performed in the construction of the Improvements.
. Agent will not advance Loan proceeds to pay costs of Tenant Improvements for any non-residential rentable space within the Property unless and until, in addition to the other conditions to such advance as provided in this Agreement, Agent has approved the lease covering said space (to the extent required by the Loan Documents) and has received from the tenant a tenant estoppel certificate, in Agent's form, confirming the existence and terms of the lease and such other matters as Agent may request (or such other form as may be specified by the applicable lease if such lease was approved by Agent), and a budget covering the costs of such Tenant Improvements. If such costs exceed the amount set forth therefor on the schedule of standard tenant improvements furnished by Borrower and approved by Agent, Borrower shall pay said excess, in cash, before Agent will advance Loan proceeds to pay the same. As soon as practicable following the completion of the Tenant Improvements for any non-residential space within the Property, Borrower shall deliver to Agent a tenant estoppel certificate from the applicable tenant, in Agent's form, confirming the continued existence of the lease, the absence of any default thereunder, the completion of such tenant improvements to the tenant's satisfaction, the occupancy of the leased space by the tenant and such other matters as Agent may reasonably require.
3.6
Tenant Improvements
. All income from the Property shall be used first to pay operating expenses of the Property in accordance with the then applicable Operating Budget for the Property prepared by Borrower and approved by Agent and then to pay interest on the Loan, before any
3.7
Advances During Property Operation
 
proceeds of the Loan shall be advanced to pay interest on the Loan. If, as and when the income from the Property is sufficient, in the determination of Agent, to pay (i) all of the operating expenses of the Property in accordance with such approved Operating Budget, and (ii) all interest on the Loan as and when such interest becomes due and payable, then, from and after such event, no further Advances from the Interest Reserve shall be made or permitted, and any remaining balance in the Interest Reserve shall not be reallocated and shall be terminated and the Committed Amount shall be reduced accordingly.
IV.
REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF BORROWER
Borrower represents and warrants to Agent and the Lenders that:
. Borrower is a limited partnership duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Maryland, duly qualified to transact business under the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia, and has all power, authority, permits, consents, authorizations and licenses necessary to carry on its business, to construct, equip, own and operate the Property and to execute, deliver and perform this Agreement and the other Loan Documents; the Guarantor is the sole managing general partner of Borrower; all resolutions of the general partner of Borrower necessary to authorize the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and of the other Loan Documents which have been or are to be executed by and on behalf of Borrower have been duly adopted and are in full force and effect; and this Agreement and such other Loan Documents have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by and on behalf of Borrower so as to constitute this Agreement and such other Loan Documents the valid and binding obligations of Borrower, enforceable in accordance with their terms, subject only to the effects of applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium and other similar laws affecting the rights of creditors generally, principles of equity and exercise of judicial discretion.
4.1
Legal Status of Borrower
. Borrower is the owner, in fee simple, of the Land, subject to no lien, charge, mortgage, deed of trust, restriction or encumbrance, except the Permitted Encumbrances.
4.2
Title
. The consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and the execution, delivery and/or performance of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents will not result in any breach of or constitute a default under any mortgage, deed of trust, lease, bank loan, credit agreement, or other instrument or violate any Governmental Requirements, to which Borrower is a party, or by which Borrower may be bound or affected.
4.3
No Breach of Applicable Agreements or Laws
. As of the date hereof, there are no actions, suits, proceedings or investigations pending or, to the knowledge of Borrower, threatened in writing against Borrower or the Property, or involving the validity or enforceability of the Loan Documents or the priority of the lien thereof, at law or in equity; in any court or before any federal, state, municipal or other governmental agency, in an amount greater than or equal to $500,000, except as previously disclosed to Lender; and Borrower is not in default with respect to any order of any court or governmental agency having jurisdiction over Borrower.
4.4
No Litigation or Defaults
. The financial statements of Borrower and the Guarantor previously or hereafter delivered to Agent fairly and accurately present, or will fairly and accurately present, the financial condition of Borrower and the Guarantor, as of the dates of such statements, and neither this Agreement nor any document, financial statement, financial or credit information, certificate or statement referred to herein or furnished to Agent by Borrower or the Guarantor contains, or will contain, any untrue statement of a material fact or omits, or will omit, a material fact, or is or will be misleading in any material respect.
4.5
Financial and Other Information
 
. There is, and, until the Lenders have been fully repaid the entire indebtedness evidenced or to be evidenced by the Note, there will be, no default or Event of Default on the part of Borrower under the Loan Documents or under any other document, including, without limitation, the Proffers and the Leadership Agreements, to which Borrower is a party and which relates to the ownership, occupancy, use, development, construction or management of the Property. Neither Borrower nor Guarantor is, nor will be, in default beyond applicable notice, grace or cure periods under any instrument or agreement under and subject to which any recourse indebtedness in excess of $100,000.00 in the aggregate or any nonrecourse indebtedness in excess of $10,000,000.00 in the aggregate for borrowed money has been issued or is secured.
4.6
No Defaults under Loan Documents or Other Agreements
. The exterior lines of the Improvements are, and at all times will be, within the boundary lines of the Land (except for such encroachments as are otherwise addressed to the satisfaction of Agent), and Borrower has examined and is familiar with all applicable covenants, conditions, restrictions and reservations, and with all applicable Governmental Requirements, including, but not limited to, building codes and zoning, environmental, hazardous substance, energy and pollution control laws, ordinances and regulations affecting the Property, and the Property will in all material respects conform to and comply with said covenants, conditions, restrictions, reservations and Governmental Requirements. All Governmental Requirements necessary for the subdivision, development and construction of the Improvements as contemplated by the Plans and this Agreement have been obtained, or with respect to construction will be obtained before the applicable phase of construction commences.
4.7
Boundary Lines; Conformance with Governmental Requirements and Restrictions
. The Loan is in balance, or, if not, Borrower is prepared to deposit with Agent, immediately upon demand by Agent, sufficient funds to bring the Loan into balance.
4.8
Loan in Balance
. To the best of Borrower's knowledge, the information set forth in the Architect's Certificate is true, accurate and complete.
4.9
Architect's Certificate
4.10 .
Anti-Terrorism Regulations
(a) . None of Borrower, Guarantor or any Affiliate is in violation of any Anti-Terrorism Law or engages in or conspires to engage in any transaction that evades or avoids, or has the purpose of evading or avoiding, or attempts to violate, any of the prohibitions set forth in any Anti-Terrorism Law.
General
(b) . None of Borrower, Guarantor or any Affiliate, or their respective agents acting or benefiting in any capacity in connection with the Loan or other transactions hereunder, is any of the following (each a ""):
Executive Order No. 13224
Blocked Person
(1) a Person that is listed in the annex to, or is otherwise subject to the provisions of, Executive Order No. 13224;
(2) a Person owned or controlled by, or acting for or on behalf of, any Person that is listed in the annex to, or is otherwise subject to the provisions of, Executive Order No. 13224;
(3) a Person or entity with which any Bank is prohibited from dealing or otherwise engaging in any transaction by any Anti-Terrorism Law;
 
(4) a Person or entity that commits, threatens or conspires to commit or supports "terrorism" as defined in Executive Order No. 13224;
(5) a Person or entity that is named as a "specially designated national" on the most current list published by the U.S. Treasury Department Office of Foreign Asset Control at its official website or any replacement website or other replacement official publication of such list; or
(6) a Person or entity who is affiliated or associated with a person or entity listed above.
(c) None of Borrower, Guarantor or any Affiliate, nor any of their agents acting in any capacity in connection with the Loan, any letters of credit or other transactions hereunder (i) conducts any business or engages in making or receiving any contribution of funds, goods or services to or for the benefit of any Blocked Person, or (ii) deals in, or otherwise engages in any transaction relating to, any property or interests in property blocked pursuant to Executive Order No. 13224.
(d) Neither the Borrower nor any Affiliate, nor any person owning an interest therein, are a "Special Designated National" or "Blocked Person" as those terms are defined in the office of Foreign Asset Control Regulations (31 C.F.R.  500 .).
et. seq
. is a true, correct and complete list of all plans and specifications for the Project as of the date hereof.
4.11
Plans and Specifications
Exhibit M
THE WARRANTIES AND REPRESENTATIONS IN THIS , AND ANY ADDITIONAL WARRANTIES AND REPRESENTATIONS CONTAINED HEREIN AND IN THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS, SHALL BE DEEMED TO HAVE BEEN RENEWED AND RESTATED BY BORROWER AT THE TIME OF EACH REQUEST BY BORROWER FOR AN ADVANCE OF LOAN PROCEEDS.
ARTICLE IV
V.
COVENANTS OF BORROWER
While this Agreement is in effect, and until the Lenders have been paid in full the principal of and interest on all advances made by the Lenders hereunder and under the other Loan Documents:
. The parties hereto acknowledge that construction of the Project has commenced. Borrower shall become a party to no contract for an amount in excess of $500,000, or more than one contract for any one contractor for an amount in excess of $1,000,000 in the aggregate, including the General Contractor's construction contract, for the performance of any work on the Property or for the supplying of any labor, materials or services for the construction of the Improvements and the Tenant Improvements, except upon such terms and with such parties as shall be approved in writing by Agent. No approval by Agent of any contract or change order shall make Agent and/or the Lenders responsible for the adequacy, form or content of such contract or change order. Borrower shall expeditiously complete the development and construction of the Improvements in a good and workmanlike manner and in accordance with the contracts, subcontracts and Plans submitted to and approved by Agent (to the extent required by this Agreement), and in compliance with all applicable Governmental Requirements, and any covenants, conditions, restrictions and reservations applicable thereto, so that Completion of the Improvements occurs on or before the Completion Date. Borrower shall not permit any approvals issued pursuant to applicable Governmental Requirements in connection with the development and construction of the Improvements to expire. Borrower assumes full responsibility for paying in full for the development and construction of the Improvements and for the compliance of the Plans and the Property with all
5.1
Completing Construction
 
Governmental Requirements and with sound building and engineering practices, and, notwithstanding any approvals by Agent, neither Agent nor any Lenders shall have any obligation or responsibility whatsoever for the Plans or any other matter incident to the Property or the construction of the Improvements. Borrower shall correct or cause to be corrected (a) any defect in the Improvements, (b) any departure in the construction of the Improvements from the Plans or Governmental Requirements, and (c) any encroachment by any part of the Improvements or any other structure located on the Land on any building line, easement, property line or restricted area unless such encroachment is either (i) contemplated by a Permitted Encumbrance or (ii) both minor in nature and addressed to the satisfaction of Agent. Borrower shall cause all roads necessary for the utilization of the Property for its intended purposes to be completed and dedicated (if dedication thereof is required by any governmental authority or pursuant to any Governmental Requirements), the bearing capacity of the soil on the Land to be made sufficient to support the Improvements, and sufficient local utilities to be made available to the Property and installed at costs (if any) set out in the Sworn Construction Cost Statement, on or before the Completion Date.
. Borrower shall deliver to Agent revised sworn statements of estimated costs of the Improvements, showing changes in or variations from the original Sworn Construction Cost Statement, as soon as reasonably practicable after such changes are known to Borrower. Borrower shall deliver to Agent a revised construction schedule, if and when there has been one or more delays in construction resulting in a net aggregate delay of thirty (30) days or more.
5.2
Changing Costs, Scope or Timing of Work
Borrower shall promptly furnish Agent with two (2) copies of all changes or modifications in the Plans, contracts or subcontracts for the Property, as approved by Agent, prior to incorporation of any such change or modification into the Property, whether or not Agent's consent to such change or modification is required hereby; provided that if Agent's prior consent was not required with respect to such change, Borrower shall deliver such change at the time of the next Draw Request. Borrower shall not make or consent to any change or modification in such Plans, contracts or subcontracts, and no work shall be performed with respect to any such change or modification, without the prior written consent of Agent, if such change or modification would in any material way alter the design or structure of the Improvements or materially change the rentable area thereof in any way, or increase or decrease the cost of the Improvements by $500,000.00 or more for any single change or modification, or if the aggregate amount of all changes and modifications increases the total amount set forth in the original Sworn Construction Cost Statement by more than $1,000,000.00; provided, however, that such increases or decreases in costs shall not include changes in the budget due to construction interest costs). Agent shall reply within ten (10) Business Days after receipt of (a) the request for approval of a change order from Borrower and (b) all information reasonably necessary for Agent and Inspecting Architect to evaluate such proposed change order. Agent shall promptly notify Borrower if the materials it has received in connection with any such request for approval are not sufficient to satisfy the condition set forth in clause (b) of the preceding sentence.
. Borrower shall furnish to Agent, within ten (10) days after a request therefor by Agent, (a) satisfactory evidence of Borrower's projected ability to pay all unpaid costs of completing the Improvements and operating the Property through the Maturity Date, which projection ("") shall include, among other things, the undisbursed Loan proceeds and net operating income from the Property reasonably projected to be received during the term of the Loan, and/or (b) except as otherwise set forth in the definition of the term "Equity Requirement", cash equal to any difference between such unpaid costs and Projected Sources, which shall be held and advanced by Agent pursuant to the terms hereof.
5.3
Balancing the Loan
Projected Sources
 
. Borrower shall pay and discharge, when due, all taxes, assessments and other governmental charges upon the Property, as well as all claims for labor and materials which, if unpaid, might become a lien or charge upon the Property; provided, however, that Borrower shall have the right to contest the amount, validity and/or applicability of any of the foregoing in strict accordance with the terms of the Deed of Trust.
5.4
Paying Costs of Property and Loan
Borrower shall also pay all costs and expenses of Agent (and, during periods when a default exists, the Lenders) and Borrower in connection with the Property, the preparation and review of the Loan Documents and the making, closing, administration and repayment of the Loan, and, reasonable costs incurred in connection with any transfer of the Loan, including, but not limited to, the fees of Agent's attorneys (which, at times when no default exists, shall be limited to reasonable attorneys' fees), fees of the Inspecting Architect, appraisal fees, environmental fees, survey and title search fees, title insurance costs, disbursement expenses, and all other costs and expenses payable to third parties incurred by Agent (and, during periods when a default exists, the Lenders), or Borrower in connection with the Loan. Such costs and expenses shall be so paid by Borrower whether or not the Loan is fully advanced or disbursed.
. Borrower shall use the Loan proceeds solely to pay, or to reimburse Borrower for paying, costs and expenses shown on the Sworn Construction Cost Statement approved by Agent and incurred by Borrower in connection with the construction of the Improvements on the Land and the equipping of the Improvements, together with other expenses set forth on the Sworn Construction Cost Statement approved by Agent and such incidental costs and expenses relating thereto as may be approved from time to time in writing by Agent.
5.5
Using Loan Proceeds
No portion of the proceeds of the Loan shall be used, in whole or in part, for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any "" as such term is defined in Regulation U of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.
margin stock
. Borrower shall set up and maintain accurate and complete books, accounts and records pertaining to the Property in a manner reasonably acceptable to Agent and to the Title Company. Upon twenty-four (24) hours prior notice and during normal business hours, Borrower will permit representatives of Agent, the Inspecting Architect and the Title Company to have free access to and to inspect and copy all books, records and contracts of Borrower (other than any such records relating to prior financing secured by the Property). Any such inspection by Agent and/or the Inspecting Architect shall be for the sole benefit and protection of Agent and the Lenders, and Agent shall have no obligation to disclose the results thereof to Borrower or to any third party other than the Lenders.
5.6
Keeping of Records
. Borrower shall furnish to Agent such financial information concerning Borrower and Guarantor, and Borrower's and Guarantor's other assets and investments, as Agent may reasonably request, and shall furnish to Agent, at Borrower's sole cost and expense the following:
5.7
Providing Financial Information
(a) . Not later than one hundred ten (110) days after the end of each fiscal year, a consolidated balance sheet, a consolidated statement of profit and loss and consolidated statement of cash flows, as of the end of such fiscal year, for the Borrower and Guarantor, on a consolidated basis certified by independent accountants satisfactory to Agent as being complete and correct and fairly presenting the financial condition and results of operations as of the end of such year and for that fiscal year for Borrower and Guarantor together with a statement from the chief financial officer for Borrower and the Guarantor, in the forms attached hereto as and .
Fiscal Year
Exhibits O
P
 
(b) .
Fiscal Quarter
(i) Not later than forty five (45) days after the end of each fiscal quarter, ending March 31, June 30 and September 30, a balance sheet, statement of profit and loss and statement of cash flows for such fiscal quarter, for the Guarantor and its consolidated subsidiaries, to be prepared on an accrual basis and certified as complete and correct by the chief financial officer of such entities; and
(ii) Not later than forty five (45) days after the end of each fiscal quarter, a statement from the chief financial officer for the Borrower and the Guarantor, in the forms attached hereto as and , together with documentation showing all calculations necessary to support such statement.
Exhibits O
P
(c) . Copies of all 8Ks, 10Ks and 10Qs filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, the Maryland State Securities Commission, and any other state regulators regarding the Guarantor, which shall be delivered to Agent as and when filed or distributed; and
Securities Filings
(d) . Such other statements or reports as the Lenders may through Agent reasonably request in form and detail satisfactory to such Lenders.
Other
All such financial statements shall be in reasonable detail, shall be prepared in general accordance with GAAP (except that assets may be valued based on market value), or in accordance with another accounting method acceptable to Agent, and shall be certified as true, correct and complete by Borrower (by its chief financial officer) or Guarantor. In addition, Borrower shall permit Agent and each Lender to examine all of Borrower's and Guarantor's books and records pertaining thereto.
. Following Completion, Borrower shall deliver to Agent prior to the commencement of each fiscal year of the Property, an Operating Budget for the Property for said fiscal year. In addition, Borrower shall, by the fifteenth (15th) day of each calendar month, deliver to Agent an Operating Statement for the Property for the preceding calendar month, which shall specifically note all variations from the current Operating Budget. Borrower shall also deliver to Agent an annual Operating Statement for the Property within one hundred twenty (120) days following the end of each fiscal year thereof. All such Operating Statements shall be certified as true, correct and complete by Borrower.
5.8
Providing Operating Budgets and Operating Statements
. As soon as available and in any event within forty-five (45) days after the close of each fiscal quarter of Borrower, Borrower shall furnish to Agent a leasing status report on the Property for the preceding fiscal quarter, which shall specifically include a summary of all letters of intent and leasing proposals received or issued by Borrower, a rent roll for Leases then in effect, and such other leasing information reasonably required by Agent. All such leasing reports shall be certified as true, correct and complete by Borrower and in the same form as previously provided to Agent.
5.9
Providing Leasing Information
All Leases entered into after the date hereof (i) which are for greater than (a) five thousand (5,000) square feet of office space, or (b) three thousand five hundred (3,500) square feet of retail space, or (ii) that do not materially conform to Borrower's standard lease form (whether for residential, office, or retail) approved by Agent in writing, or (iii) that contain terms or conditions that deviate from the Leasing Guidelines for such space, shall be upon terms and with tenants approved in writing by Agent (and by the Majority Lenders with respect to any Lease for office space in excess of 20,000 square feet or any Lease for retail space in excess of 5,000 square feet) prior to Borrower's execution of any such Lease. Borrower shall seek Agent's approval of any Lease requiring such approval
 
by delivering, via personal delivery or certified mail, a letter requesting such approval, and such financial information regarding the proposed tenant as Agent requests. If Agent has not responded to any such request for approval within seven (7) Business Days after Agent's receipt of such request together with any such requested financial information, Borrower shall have the right to send a written notice (the "") to Agent marked, in conspicuous type, "" requesting that Agent respond to such request for approval. If Agent fails to either deny or approve such request for approval in writing within three (3) Business Days from Agent's receipt of such Second Request, Agent and, where such approval is required, the Majority Lenders, shall be deemed to have approved such request. As to any Leases not requiring Agent's approval, Borrower shall, upon request, deliver financial information regarding such proposed tenant concurrently with its delivery of the first draft, as provided below. All Leases shall include estoppel, subordination, attornment and mortgagee protection provisions satisfactory to Agent. For each proposed Lease requiring Agent's consent, Borrower shall provide Agent with a copy of the final draft of such proposed Lease to be delivered to all parties thereto for execution, marked to show changes made from the form approved by Agent. Any amendment, supplement or modification of a Lease entered into solely to memorialize the exercise by a Tenant of an existing right or option set forth in the applicable Lease shall not require Agent's consent.
Second Request
Clarendon Center: Leasing Materials for Agent Review - SECOND REQUEST
. Upon completion of the foundation, and at such other times as Agent may deem appropriate in good faith, Borrower shall furnish to Agent six (6) copies of a certified survey of the Property, certifying that the Improvements are constructed within the property lines of the Land, do not encroach upon any easement affecting the Land (other than such encroachments which have been insured over to Agent's satisfaction or which have been approved as permissible by the other parties to such easement) and do comply with all applicable Governmental Requirements relating to the location of improvements, along with a letter from the Title Company confirming the acceptability of said survey.
5.10
Providing Updated Surveys
. Upon Completion of the Improvements, and prior to the final advance of Loan proceeds to pay for hard costs of construction of the Property (except for Tenant Improvements), including, but not limited to, any retainage therefor, and as a condition of the same, Borrower shall furnish Agent with all items required to evidence Completion, including unconditional occupancy permits; a final, certified Property "as-built" survey (six [6] copies); certification from the Borrower and Project Architect on AIA Form G704 that the Property has been substantially completed in accordance with the approved Plans; final lien waivers (which may be conditioned on payment) from the General Contractor, and all subcontractors with respect to the work performed in connection with the construction and equipping of the Improvements, provided that final, unconditional lien waivers shall be delivered to Agent as soon as practicable thereafter; the evidence of insurance required by hereof; copies of all warranties covering materials, equipment and appliances included within the Property; copies of all licenses and permits required for operation of the Property; and photographs of the completed Improvements.
5.11
Providing Evidence of Completion
Section 5.12
. Borrower shall, at all times until the Lenders have been fully repaid all indebtedness evidenced by the Note, maintain, or cause to be maintained, in effect (and, upon request, shall furnish to Agent copies of), insurance policies, as required under the terms of attached hereto, and shall furnish to Agent proof of payment of all premiums for such insurance.
5.12
Maintaining Insurance Coverage
Exhibit G
. Borrower shall comply with and perform, in all material respects, all of its agreements and obligations under all contracts and agreements to which Borrower is a party relating to the ownership, occupancy, use, leasing, development, construction or
5.13
Complying with Other Documents
 
management of the Property (expressly including, without limitation, the Leadership Agreements and the Proffers), and shall comply with all requests by Agent which are consistent with the terms thereof.
Borrower shall at all times comply with its covenants and agreements under Section 5.8 of that certain Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 19, 2007, by and among Borrower, as borrower, Agent, as agent, and certain other parties thereto, as it may have been and hereafter may be from time to time modified, amended, restated, supplemented or replaced (the ""), which evidences a $150,000,000 revolving credit facility, the provisions of which Section 5.8 are hereby incorporated herein by reference as if fully set forth herein. Borrower acknowledges and agrees that it shall be an Event of Default hereunder and under the Loan Documents in the event that Agent declares an "Event of Default" under the Revolving Credit Agreement for failure to comply with the covenants and obligations set forth in Section 5.8 of the Revolving Credit Agreement, within the cure periods provided therein. In the event that such facility is terminated, Borrower shall continue to be bound by the covenants set forth in Section 5.8 of the Revolving Credit Agreement in effect thereunder as of the date immediately prior to such termination, until such time as the obligations of the Borrower hereunder have been fully and finally satisfied. Borrower shall cause the Guarantor to at all times comply with its covenants and agreements under of the Guaranty.
5.14 .
Financial Covenants
Revolving Credit Agreement
Section 19
. Borrower may (but shall not be required to) purchase an Interest Rate Hedge in form and substance acceptable to Agent at the time of Closing or within ninety (90) days thereafter. Any request thereafter is subject to Agent's approval.
5.15
Interest Rate Protection Agreement
.
5.16
ERISA
(a) Borrower hereby represents and warrants that none of its assets are, for purposes of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, and any applicable regulations or guidance promulgated thereunder ("") or Section 4975 of the Code, considered assets of a Plan. Lender hereby represents and warrants that the source of funds for the Loan are not the assets of a Plan or the plan assets of a Plan. For purposes hereof, "" shall mean any "plan" as defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA that is subject to any provision of Title I of ERISA and any plan as defined in Section 4975 of the Code that is subject to any provision of such section.
ERISA
Plan
(b) Borrower hereby covenants and agrees that, for so long as the Loan remains outstanding:
(i) In addition to the prohibitions set forth in the Loan Documents, and not in limitation thereof, Borrower shall not assign, sell, pledge, encumber, transfer, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of its interest or rights in any of the Loan Documents or in the Property, or attempt to do any of the foregoing or suffer any of the foregoing, if such proposed action will result in a prohibited transaction under ERISA or the Code; and
(ii) Borrower shall take and cause to be taken all necessary actions so that at all times the assets of Borrower shall not be considered for any purpose of ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code to be assets of a Plan.
(c) Borrower shall indemnify and hold Agent and Lenders free and harmless from and against all loss, costs (including reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses), taxes, damages and expenses Agent or any Lender may suffer by reason of the investigation, defense and settlement of claims, and in obtaining any prohibited transaction exemption under ERISA necessary in Agent's reasonable judgment, by reason of the inaccuracy of the foregoing representations and warranties of
 
Borrower or a breach of the foregoing covenants of Borrower of this . The obligations of Borrower under this subparagraph (c) shall survive the payment in full of the Loan or other satisfaction thereof.
Section 5.16
(d) Lender hereby covenants and agrees that, for so long as the Loan remains outstanding, it will not (in addition to the prohibitions set forth in the Loan Documents, and not in limitation thereof), assign, sell, pledge, encumber, transfer, hypothecate or otherwise dispose of any interest in the Loan to a Plan or to an entity the assets of which constitute the plan assets of a Plan.
(e) No Pension Plan sponsored, maintained or contributed to by Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates has an accumulated funding deficiency (whether or not waived) under Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA.
(f) Neither Borrower nor any ERISA Affiliate has any unsatisfied liability for withdrawal liability with respect to any Pension Plan which is a Multiemployer Plan.
. Borrower hereby covenants and agrees to promptly notify Agent if Borrower learns that any of the information contained in the Architect's Certificate is untrue, inaccurate or incomplete. If such deficiency requires correction of the Plans and/or the Improvements, Borrower shall thereupon correct the Plans and/or the Improvements so as to ensure that the Improvements are or will be constructed in accordance with all Governmental Requirements. Provided there exists no Event of Default, Borrower shall have the right to determine the best course of action to address such deficiency, including whether or not to bring suit against the Architect therefor, provided that Borrower shall give prior notice thereof to Agent and, to the extent Agent's consent is otherwise required under this Agreement, has obtained Agent's consent with respect thereto. Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default continues to exist, Agent shall have the right, with respect to any errors or omissions in the Architect's Certificate, to (x) pursue its remedies under the Assignment of the Plans and Related Agreements, (y) take such action against Architect in Borrower's name under the contract with the Project Architect (the "") as may be appropriate in Agent's sole discretion or (z) to collect amounts payable by Architect to Borrower pursuant to any claim made by Borrower under the Architect's Contract, which amounts are hereby assigned to Agent as additional collateral for the Loan, provided that Borrower shall have the right to retain and apply such amounts as it determines prior to an Event of Default. For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this Section, Borrower irrevocably appoints Agent its attorney-in-fact, with full power of substitution, to execute and deliver all such documents, to pay and receive such funds, and to take such action as may be necessary, in the judgment of Agent, to pursue said claims against Architect which rights shall be exercisable only after the occurrence of an Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default exists. This power of attorney is coupled with an interest and is irrevocable. Agent, however, shall have no obligation to undertake any of the foregoing.
5.17
Claim Against Architect
Architect's Contract
The parties hereby agree that any amounts payable pursuant to a claim (the "") against the Architect or its insurer to Borrower pursuant to the Architect's Contract shall, after an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing under the Loan, be payable directly to Agent from the Architect or its insurer. Borrower hereby authorizes and directs the Architect to pay or cause its insurer to pay the Claim Payment to Agent upon written notice from Agent that an Event of Default has occurred under the Loan Documents, without the need to obtain further consent of Borrower, without any obligation to determine whether a default has in fact occurred and regardless of whether Agent has taken possession of any portion of the Property or assumed Borrower's rights and obligations under the Architect's Contract. Any such payment to Agent shall constitute payment to Borrower under the Architect's Contract.
Claim Payment
 
Any amounts collected by Agent under this shall be deemed additional collateral for the Loan and may be applied by Agent, during any time when an Event of Default exists under the Loan, to the secured indebtedness in such manner and order as Agent may elect.
Section 5.17
Without the prior written consent of Agent and the Majority Lenders, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed, Borrower shall not enter into, or amend any material economic term of, any agreement providing for the management, leasing or operation of the Property or Improvements. Any other amendment of any such agreement shall require the prior written consent of Agent, not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed. If required by Agent, Borrower shall assign, pursuant to an agreement in form and substance reasonably acceptable to Agent, its interest under any such agreement to Agent as security for Borrower's obligations under the Loan Documents, and, if required by Agent, Borrower shall cause the management party to such agreement to consent to such assignment and subordinate its interest in the Property to the Deed of Trust and the Loan.
5.18 .
Management Agreements
5.19 .
Private Restrictions
(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in Section 1.9 of the Deed of Trust, the following language is hereby added to the end of the first (1st) sentence of such Section:
; and provided further, however, that with respect to any Private Restrictions for which the Title Company has issued affirmative coverage as part of the Title Policy, Grantor's failure to comply with such Private Restrictions shall not constitute a breach of, or default under, this Deed of Trust until such time (if at all) as (i) a court of competent jurisdiction shall have issued a binding order or judgment (the execution of which has not been stayed pending appeal) enjoining further non-compliance with such Private Restrictions (an ""), and (ii) Grantor fails to comply with such Private Restrictions in compliance with the terms of such order or judgment. For so long as Borrower is not in strict compliance with such Private Restrictions, Borrower shall (w) provide written notice to Agent within two (2) Business Days of receiving written notice of the commencement or threatened commencement of any action or proceeding to enforce such Private Restrictions, (x) at all times from and after the commencement of any such action or proceeding, diligently pursue a full, final and favorable resolution of any such action or proceeding, (y) upon Agent's written request from time to time, furnish to Agent cash or other security reasonably satisfactory to Agent for payment of Agent's anticipated costs and expenses to be incurred in connection with such action or proceeding, and (z) keep Agent fully informed of the progress of any such action or proceeding until the final, non-appealable disposition thereof. In no event shall the foregoing limit Borrower's obligation to comply at all times with Governmental Requirements.
Order
(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in Section 1.19 of the Deed of Trust, the following language is hereby added to the end of the first (1st) sentence of such Section:
; or (v) Grantor's failure to comply with any Private Restrictions for which the Title Company has issued affirmative coverage as part of the Title Policy.
(c) At any time after issuance of an Order (which remains binding), Agent may, at its option and at Borrower's expense, prepare or obtain a revised valuation of the Property based on the then-most recent appraisal of the Property (assuming completion and stabilization). The value shown in such appraisal shall be referred to herein as the "." Such revised valuation shall assume that any specific space within the Property then being used (or immediately prior to issuance of the Order
Unrestricted Value
 
was being used) by a restaurant or other user serving alcohol in alleged violation of the Private Restrictions is, instead, used for general retail purposes and shall assume a market rental for such general retail use, taking into account (a) down time, (b) demolition/reconstruction costs (tenant improvement costs), (c) leasing commissions, (d) marketing costs, (e) management expenses and overhead, (f) any other applicable expenses. The value thus determined for the Property shall be referred to herein as the "." If Agent reasonably determines that the Loan to Value Ratio (as defined below) is less than or equal to seventy-five percent (75%), then Borrower shall amend the Loan Documents to reduce the Committed Amount (but in no event shall the amount of such reduction in the Committed Amount exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the amount by which the Restricted Value is less than the Unrestricted Value) and, if necessary, pay a principal curtailment on the Loan, within ninety (90) days after receipt of notice from Agent that such principal curtailment is required, in an amount sufficient to reduce the Principal Balance to the reduced Committed Amount. If, after any such amendment, such Order expires, is terminated or otherwise no longer remains binding (in Agent's reasonable determination), then at Borrower's written request and provided that no Event of Default then exists, and subject to the other terms and conditions of this Agreement, the parties hereto shall amend the Loan Documents to increase the Committed Amount by the amount of the prior curtailment, upon which amendment such previously curtailed amount shall be available to be re-disbursed to Borrower in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement. For purposes of the foregoing, the term "" shall mean the ratio obtained by dividing (i) the Committed Amount by (ii) the Restricted Value, as reasonably determined by Agent in accordance with this subsection (c).
Restricted Value
Loan to Value Ratio
. The USA Patriot Act of 2001 (Public Law 107-56) and federal regulations issued with respect thereto require all financial institutions to obtain, verify and record certain information that identifies individuals or business entities which open an "account" with such financial institution. Consequently, Agent (for itself and/or as Agent for all Lenders hereunder) may from time-to-time request, and Borrower shall provide to Lender, Borrower's name, address, tax identification number and/or such other identification information as shall be necessary for Lender to comply with federal law. An "account" for this purpose may include, without limitation, a deposit account, cash management service, a transaction or asset account, a credit account, a loan or other extension of credit, and/or other financial services product.
5.20
USA Patriot Act Notice; Compliance
.Guarantor shall not amend its articles of incorporation without the prior written consent of Agent (except as may be expressly required by law or regulation).
5.21
Guarantor Articles of Incorporation
VI.
DEFAULTS
. Any of the following events shall constitute an "" under this Agreement:
6.1
Events of Default
Event of Default
(a) Default by Borrower in the payment of any payment of principal and/or interest required to be paid pursuant to the Note or default in the payment of any other amounts due under the Loan Documents, which default is not cured within five (5) days after the due date thereof.
(b) Default by Borrower in the performance or observance of any term, covenant or condition of this Agreement, the Deed of Trust, the Note or any of the other Loan Documents, other than a default described in above, which default continues for thirty (30) days after Agent has given written notice of such failure to Borrower. In the event that such default is susceptible of cure but is not cured within said thirty (30) days, so long as Borrower is diligently and continuously pursuing such
Subsection (a) 
 
cure, as evidenced to Agent's satisfaction, Agent shall permit Borrower an additional thirty (30) days to effectuate such cure.
(c) Any representation or warranty made by Borrower in this Agreement, in any of the other Loan Documents, or in any certificate or document furnished under the terms of this Agreement or in connection with the Loan, shall be untrue or incomplete in any material respect.
(d) (i) Work on the Improvements shall be substantially abandoned, or shall, by reason of Borrower's fault, be delayed or discontinued for a period of fifteen (15) consecutive days, or construction shall be delayed for any reason whatsoever, in each instance to the extent that Completion of the Improvements cannot, in the reasonable judgment of Agent, be accomplished prior to the Completion Date and (ii) Borrower fails to cure such delay or to establish to the satisfaction of Agent that Completion of the Improvements can be accomplished prior to the Completion Date, within thirty (30) days after notice of such default from Agent.
(e) Borrower shall commit an act of bankruptcy; or shall apply for, consent to or permit the appointment of a receiver, custodian, trustee or liquidator for it or any of its property or assets; or shall fail to, or admit in writing its inability to, pay its debts as they mature; or shall make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors or shall be adjudicated bankrupt or insolvent; or shall take other similar action for the benefit or protection of its creditors; or shall give notice to any governmental body of insolvency or pending insolvency or suspension of operations; or shall file a voluntary petition in bankruptcy or a petition or an answer seeking reorganization or an arrangement with creditors, or to take advantage of any bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, readjustment of debt, rearrangement, dissolution, liquidation or other similar debtor relief law or statute; or shall file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any proceeding under any such law or statute; or shall be dissolved, liquidated, terminated or merged; or shall effect a plan or other arrangement with creditors; or a trustee, receiver, liquidator or custodian shall be appointed for it or for any of its property or assets and shall not be discharged within ninety (90) days after the date of his appointment; or a petition in involuntary bankruptcy or similar proceedings is filed against it and is not dismissed within ninety (90) days after the date of its filing.
(f) Agent determines that the Loan is not in balance and, at Agent's option, Borrower (i) fails to deposit with Agent, promptly upon demand, sufficient funds to permit Agent to pay excess costs of the Property as the same become payable or (ii) does not pay said excess costs directly and deliver to Agent unconditional mechanics' lien waivers therefor (or paid receipts for non-lienable items), at Agent's option.
(g) A trustee or receiver is appointed for the Property or any portion thereof, for Borrower, for any assets, or an involuntary petition in bankruptcy or insolvency is filed against Borrower and is not discharged within ninety (90) days after such appointment or filing.
(h) Any assignment of this Agreement or the proceeds of the Loan by Borrower voluntarily, by operation of law or otherwise, without the unanimous prior written consent of the Lenders.
Upon the occurrence of any Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default continues to exist, unless such Event of Default is subsequently waived in writing by Agent, Agent shall be entitled, at the option of Agent, to exercise any or all of the following rights and remedies, consecutively or simultaneously, and in any order:
6.2
Rights and Remedies.
(a) Lenders may make one (1) or more further advances of Loan proceeds, without liability to make any subsequent advances thereof.
 
(b) Lenders may suspend their obligation to make advances under this Agreement, without notice to Borrower.
(c) Lenders may terminate their obligation to make advances under this Agreement, and Agent may declare the entire unpaid principal balance of the advances made under this Agreement to be immediately due and payable, together with accrued and unpaid interest on such advances, without notice to or demand on Borrower.
(d) Agent may exercise any or all remedies specified herein and in the other Loan Documents, including (without limiting the generality of the foregoing) the right to foreclose the Deed of Trust, and/or any other remedies which it may have therefor at law, in equity or under statute.
(e) Agent may cure the Event of Default on behalf of Borrower, and, in doing so, may enter upon the Property, and may expend such sums as it may deem desirable in Agent's good faith judgment (provided that such amount shall not exceed $2,000,000 in the aggregate with the prior written consent of the Majority Lenders), including attorneys' fees, all of which shall be deemed to be advances hereunder, even though causing the Loan to exceed the face amount of the Note, shall bear interest at the Default Rate and shall be payable by Borrower on demand.
. In addition, in case of the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default caused by, or which results in, Borrower's failure, for any reason, to continue with construction of the Improvements as required by this Agreement, then Agent may (but shall not be obligated to), in addition to, or in concert with, the other remedies referred to above, take over and complete construction of the Improvements in accordance with the Plans, with such changes therein as Agent may, in its discretion exercised in good faith, deem appropriate, all at the risk, cost and expense of Borrower. Agent may assume or reject any contracts entered into by Borrower in connection with the Property, may enter into additional or different contracts for work, services, labor and materials required, in the judgment of Agent, to complete the Property, and may pay, compromise and settle all claims in connection with the Property. All sums, including attorneys' fees, and charges or fees for supervision and inspection of the construction and for any other necessary or desirable purpose in the discretion of Agent expended by Agent and/or the Lenders in completing or attempting to complete the Improvements (whether aggregating more, or less, than the face amount of the Note), shall be deemed advances made by the Lenders to Borrower hereunder, and Borrower shall be liable to Agent on behalf of the Lenders, on demand, for the repayment of such sums, together with interest on such sums from the date of their expenditure at the rates provided herein. Agent may, in its discretion, at any time abandon work on the Property, after having commenced such work, and may recommence such work at any time, it being understood that nothing in this Section shall impose any obligation on Agent or any Lender either to complete or not to complete the Improvements. For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this Section, Borrower irrevocably appoints Agent its attorney-in-fact, with full power of substitution, to execute and deliver all such documents, to pay and receive such funds, and to take such action as may be necessary, in the judgment of Agent, to complete the construction of the Improvements which rights shall be exercisable only after the occurrence of an Event of Default and for so long as such Event of Default exists. This power of attorney is coupled with an interest and is irrevocable. Agent, however, shall have no obligation to undertake any of the foregoing, and, if Agent does undertake any of the same, neither Agent nor the Lenders shall have any liability for the adequacy, sufficiency or completion thereof.
6.3
Completion of Property by Agent
 
VII.
MISCELLANEOUS
. The provisions of this Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, personal representatives, legal representatives, successors and assigns; provided, however, that neither this Agreement nor the proceeds of the Loan may be assigned by Borrower voluntarily, by operation of law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of Agent. No delay on the part of Agent in exercising any right, remedy, power or privilege hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any right, remedy, power or privilege hereunder constitute such a waiver or exhaust the same, all of which shall be continuing. The rights and remedies of Agent specified in this Agreement shall be in addition to, and not exclusive of, any other rights and remedies which Agent would otherwise have at law, in equity or by statute, and all such rights and remedies, together with Agent's rights and remedies under the other Loan Documents, are cumulative and may be exercised individually, concurrently, successively and in any order.
7.1
Binding Effect; Waivers; Cumulative Rights and Remedies
. All agreements, representations and warranties made in this Agreement shall survive the execution of this Agreement, the making of the advances by the Lenders, and the execution of the other Loan Documents, and shall continue until Agent on behalf of the Lenders receives payment in full of all indebtedness of Borrower incurred under this Agreement and under the other Loan Documents.
7.2
Survival
. This Agreement, the rights of the parties hereunder and the interpretation hereof shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia in all respects. Borrower hereby waives any right to a trial by jury in any action relating to the Loan and/or the Loan Documents.
7.3
Governing Law; Waiver of Jury Trial
. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, all of which shall constitute a single agreement.
7.4
Counterparts
. Any notice required or permitted to be given by either party hereto to the other under the terms of this Agreement, or documents related hereto, may be given by personal delivery or recognized overnight courier, and shall be deemed to have been received one business day after the date the same is sent. Such notice shall be addressed to the party to which the notice is to be given at the address set forth opposite its name on the signature page below (or, as applicable, in the Assignment and Assumption Agreement by virtue of which an Assignee Lender becomes a party to this Agreement), or at any other address specified in a notice given by such party to the other not less than ten (10) days prior to the date on which such address change becomes effective for purposes of this Agreement.
7.5
Notices
. Agent may, if it so desires, place a sign of reasonable size on the Land, indicating that Agent and the Lenders are providing financing for the Property, and/or may otherwise publicize its involvement with the Property, including, but not limited to, issuing press releases.
7.6
Agent's Sign
. No third party shall be entitled to rely upon this Agreement or to have any of the benefits of Agent's and the Lenders' interest hereunder, unless such third party is an express assignee of all or a portion of the interest of Agent and/or any Lender hereunder.
7.7
No Third Party Reliance
. Time is of the essence hereof with respect to the dates, terms and conditions of this Agreement.
7.8
Time of the Essence
 
. This Agreement, the other Loan Documents and the other documents mentioned herein set forth the entire agreement of the parties with respect to the Loan and supersede all prior written or oral understandings and agreements with respect thereto. No modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement shall be effective unless set forth in writing and signed by the parties hereto.
7.9
Entire Agreement; No Oral Modifications
. The headings or captions of the Articles and Sections set forth herein are for convenience only, are not a part of this Agreement and are not to be considered in interpreting this Agreement.
7.10
Captions
. If Borrower consists of more than one (1) individual and/or entity, each of said individuals and/or entities shall be jointly and severally liable for each covenant, agreement, representation and warranty of Borrower hereunder.
7.11
Joint and Several Liability
. The relationship between Borrower, Agent and the Lenders created hereby and by the other Loan Documents shall be that of a borrower and a lender only, and in no event shall Agent and/or the Lenders be deemed to be a partner of, or a joint venturer with, Borrower.
7.12
Borrower's Relationship with Agent and the Lenders
. As additional security for the payment of the Obligations, Borrower hereby grants to each Lender a security interest in, a lien on and an express contractual right to Set-Off. The Lenders may, at any time upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default hereunder or under the other Loan Documents Set-Off against the Obligations whether or not the Obligations (including future installments) are then due or have been accelerated, all without any advance or contemporaneous notice or demand of any kind to Borrower, such notice and demand being expressly waived.
7.13
Right of Set-Off
VIII.
AGENCY PROVISIONS
.
8.1
Agency
(a) . Each Lender hereby appoints and authorizes Agent to act as sole administrative agent under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, authorizes and directs Agent to enter into the Loan Documents other than this Agreement for the benefit of the Lenders, and authorizes the Agent to take such action on its behalf under the provisions of this Agreement and the Loan Documents and to exercise such powers as are set forth herein or therein, together with such other powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. In furtherance thereof, Lenders hereby ratify the execution and delivery by Agent of this Agreement, the acceptance by Agent of all of the other Loan Documents and the terms and conditions of the Loan Documents. The Agent hereby accepts such appointment as administrative agent. Agent shall exercise all rights and powers of Agent under this Agreement, including the administration of the Loan and disbursement of Advances, except as otherwise expressly provided in this Agreement. The Borrower, without further inquiry or investigation, shall, and is hereby authorized by the Lenders to, assume that all actions taken by the Agent hereunder and in connection with or under the Loan Documents are duly authorized by the Lenders.
Appointment and Authorization
Each Lender hereby agrees that, except as set forth in Section 8.4(a) or as otherwise set forth herein, any action taken by the Majority Lenders in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement or the other Loan Documents, and the exercise by the Majority Lenders of the powers set forth herein or therein, together with such other powers as are reasonably incidental thereto, shall be authorized and binding upon all of the Lenders.
 
(b) .
Non-Liability of Agent and Indemnity; Non-Liability for Force Majeure
(1) Agent shall have no duties or responsibilities except those expressly set forth in this Agreement or in the other Loan Documents. Agent shall administer the Loan in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement in the same manner as it customarily does for similar loans for its own account. The duties of the Agent shall be mechanical and administrative in nature; the Agent shall not have by reason of this Agreement a fiduciary relationship in respect of any Lender; and nothing in this Agreement or any Loan Document, expressed or implied, is intended to or shall be so construed as to impose upon the Agent any obligations in respect of this Agreement or any Loan Document except as expressly set forth herein or therein. Neither Agent nor any of its respective directors, officers, agents or employees shall be liable to any Lender for any action taken or not taken by them under or in connection with this Agreement or under any of the other Loan Documents. In this regard, Agent may consult with independent legal counsel, accountants and other professionals or experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it or them in good faith in accordance with the advice of such legal counsel, accountants or other professionals or experts. In the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, Agent shall not be liable for any apportionment or distribution of payments made by it in good faith pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, and if any such apportionment or distribution is subsequently determined to have been made in error, the sole recourse of any person to whom payment was due, but not made, shall be to recover from the recipients of such payments any payment in excess of the amount to which they are determined to have been entitled.
(2) In the event the Agent is not reimbursed and indemnified by the Borrower, within ten (10) Business Days of demand therefor by Agent, each Lender will reimburse and indemnify the Agent, and its directors, officers, agents and employees, in proportion to its respective Commitment Percentage of the Loan, for and against any claims, actions, judgments, costs, expenses or disbursements of whatsoever kind or nature which may be imposed on, asserted against or incurred by the Agent, or its directors, officers, agents, or employees in performing its duties hereunder or under any Loan Document; provided, however, that no Lender shall be liable for any of the foregoing to the extent that they arise from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the party to be indemnified. The obligations of the Lenders under this shall survive the payment in full of all obligations of Borrower and the termination of this Agreement.
Section 8.1(b)(2)
(3) No Lender or Agent shall be liable in any way to Borrower or any third party for Agent's or such Lender's failure to perform or delay in performing under the Loan Documents (and Agent or any Lender may suspend or terminate all or any portion of Agent's or such Lender's obligations under the Loan Documents) if such failure to perform or delay in performing results directly or indirectly from, or is based upon, the action, inaction, or purported action, of any governmental or local authority, or because of war, rebellion, insurrection, strike, lock-out, boycott or blockade, or from any act of God or other cause or event beyond Agent's or such Lender's control.
8.2 .
Resignation of Agent; Removal
(a) U.S. Bank National Association or any successor agent may resign as Agent at any time by written notice delivered to the Borrower and the Lenders (if any). Such resignation shall be effective upon the earlier to occur of thirty (30) days following such notice or a successor's acceptance of appointment as the Agent. In addition, in the event of Agent's gross negligence or willful misconduct, Agent may be removed pursuant to the unanimous approval of all Lenders by giving thirty (30) days prior written notice to Agent and Borrower; provided, however, for purposes of calculating such unanimous approval in this context, Agent, in its capacity as a Lender, shall be deemed a Defaulting Lender and its Commitment Percentage shall therefore be disregarded and excluded for voting purposes only.
 
(b) In the case of any of the events described in , (A) the Majority Lenders shall appoint a successor Agent from among the Lenders so long as such successor meets the requirements described in and hereof; provided, however, that the resigning Agent shall be entitled to appoint a successor agent who, so long as no Event of Default exists hereunder, has been approved by Borrower, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed, and who meets the requirements of and as Agent, if the Majority Lenders have not appointed a successor within thirty (30) days after the date the resigning Agent gave notice of resignation; (B) upon a successor's acceptance of appointment (and assumption of the Agent's obligations hereunder arising after the date of such appointment), the successor will thereupon succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the resigning or removed Agent; (C) upon the effectiveness of any resignation or removal, the resigning or removed Agent will thereupon be discharged from the duties and obligations of Agent which thereafter arise under this Agreement; and (D) any resigning Agent shall have the benefit of any indemnities provided in the Loan Documents and this Agreement.
Section 8.2(a)
Sections 8.9(a)(2)
8.9(a)(3)
Sections 8.9(a)(2)
8.9(a)(3)
8.3 .
Administration
(a) . Each Lender shall reimburse the Agent for its Commitment Percentage of any expenses with respect to the administration, enforcement or collection of the Loan which are not reimbursed by the Borrower pursuant to and within the period required by the Loan Documents, or if not specified in the Loan Documents, promptly after the date of demand therefor made by the Agent. The Agent shall have the right, but not the obligation, to incur such expenditures prior to reimbursement therefor by the Lenders.
Expenses
(b) . Except for the Note executed in favor of each Lender and for Loan Documents sent for filing or recording (which are not returned following recording), Agent shall hold and maintain a duplicate set of all original Loan Documents. The Agent shall promptly deliver to each Lender a duplicate original of this Agreement and a copy or counterpart execution copy of each Loan Document (other than any fee letter solely between Agent and Borrower). The Agent shall promptly forward to each Lender a copy of each financial statement of Borrower or other financial statement for the Property received from Borrower. Agent shall promptly forward to such Lender each financial statement of Borrower and Guarantor received by Agent. The Lenders may, upon reasonable prior notice and during the Agent's normal business hours, inspect and make copies of such books and records of Agent that relate to this Loan.
Documents; Information; Inspection
8.4 .
Actions by Agent; Required Consents
(a) Except as specified below, Agent shall exercise its sole discretion to act or not to act under the Loan Documents and the appropriate action with respect thereto. Such discretion may be exercised with respect to the granting of approvals, consents, and modifications under the Loan Documents and with respect to the exercise or refraining from exercise of rights under the Loan Documents.
(b) Notwithstanding , the following matters shall require the prior consent of all of the Lenders:
Section 8.4(a)
(1) any change (other than as currently contemplated in the Loan Documents) in the interest rate under the Loan;
 
(2) any reduction in the amount of any payment of any fees other than fees paid solely to the Agent;
(3) release of any portion of the Property or other collateral;
(4) release of any guarantor or other obligor under any Loan Document;
(5) any change (other than by operation of the Loan Documents) in the Maturity Date of the Loan or in the conditions for any extension of the Maturity Date;
(6) any release, termination, modification or amendment of any indemnity provided in the Loan Documents;
(7) any forgiveness of principal, interest or other amounts payable under the Loan (other than late fees up to three (3) times per annum) or any extension of time for payment of principal or interest;
(8) any increase in the Committed Amount or the Loan;
(9) any amendment to this ;
Section 8.4(b)
(10) any amendment to the definitions of Majority Lenders or Commitment Percentages;
(11) any change in Commitment Percentages (excluding any change as a result of assignments permitted under )
Section 8.9
(c) Notwithstanding , the prior consent of the Majority Lenders shall be required for (1) any proposal from Borrower that Agent approve a Contractor under a contract with a value in excess of $1,500,000.00 to the extent such contract will not be bonded and (2) the acceleration of any indebtedness under the Loan Documents, or the pursuit of remedies against the Borrower or Guarantor;
Section 8.4(b)
(d) In case one or more Events of Default have occurred and shall be continuing, and whether or not acceleration of the Loan shall have occurred, the Agent shall, if (a) so requested by the Majority Lenders and (b) the Lenders have provided to the Agent such additional indemnities and assurances against expenses and liabilities as the Agent may reasonably request, proceed to enforce the provisions of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and exercise all or any such other legal and equitable and other rights or remedies as it may have in respect of enforcement of the Lenders' rights against the Borrower under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents. The Majority Lenders may direct the Agent in writing as to the method and the extent of any such enforcement, the Lenders (including any Lender which is not one of the Majority Lenders so directing the Agent in writing) hereby agreeing to ratably and severally indemnify and hold the Agent harmless from all liabilities incurred in respect of all actions taken or omitted in accordance with such directions, provided that the Agent need not comply with any such direction to the extent that the Agent reasonably believes the Agent's compliance with such direction to be unlawful or commercially unreasonable in any applicable jurisdiction.
.
8.5
Payments
 
(a) . Lenders and Agent specifically agree to the following operational and administrative procedures as between themselves:
Interest Rates and Disbursement Matters
(1) that the LIBOR Rate (as established from time to time) shall in each instance be the rate established from time to time by U.S. Bank National Association.
(2) Agent shall notify each Lender by telephone or facsimile of the LIBOR Rate two (2) Business Days prior to the date on which the LIBOR Rate shall be effective. Agent shall notify each Lender by telephone or facsimile of its Commitment Percentage of a proposed Advance of the Loan and the date of such disbursement two (2) Business Days prior to such disbursement with respect to disbursements which are to bear interest at the LIBOR Rate, such notice to be delivered by facsimile. Each Lender shall deposit by wire transfer of immediately available funds to Agent's account as specified on hereto the amount of such Commitment Percentage no later than 10:00 a.m. (Central time) on the date of such disbursement.
Exhibit H
Unless Agent shall have been notified by any Lender not later than the close of business (Central time) on the Business Day immediately preceding the date for funding in respect of any Advance that such Lender does not intend to make available to Agent such Lender's Commitment Percentage of such Advance, Agent may assume that such Lender has made such amount available to Agent. In any case where a Lender does not for any reason make available to Agent such Lender's Commitment Percentage of such Advance, Agent, in its sole discretion, may, but shall not be obligated to, fund to Borrower such Lender's Commitment Percentage of such Advance. If the amount so funded by Agent is not in fact made available to Agent by the responsible Lender, then such Lender hereby assigns to Agent any payments received by Agent from Borrower in repayment of such amount, together with interest thereon at the rate applicable to such Advance.
(3) If any Lender fails to deliver funds to Agent for a disbursement by the time required by above, such Lender shall pay to Agent interest on such funds (x) at the Federal Funds Rate, as announced by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, for each day (or portion thereof) until such funds are delivered. Any interest paid pursuant to this section shall be divided among the Lenders which funded the applicable disbursement.
subsection (2) 
(4) Agent shall wire transfer to each Lender at such Lender's account as designated on hereto its Commitment Percentage of any payments (to the extent payable pursuant to ) within one (1) Business Day of Agent's receipt of such payment. Agent shall pay to the Lenders interest thereon, at the Federal Funds Rate from the Business Day following receipt of such funds by Agent until such funds are paid in immediately available funds to the Lender.
Exhibit H
Section 8.5(b)
(5) Any Lender desiring to make a claim for costs or taxes payable by Borrower shall deliver a certificate to Agent setting forth the basis and calculation thereof and the Agent shall forward such certificate to the Borrower. Except as provided in the Loan Documents, each Lender shall be responsible for any taxes payable in respect of amounts paid hereunder. All payments made by Agent to Lenders shall be made without withholding for taxes, charges, or levies, except as may be required by law. Each Lender shall on demand from Agent provide completed and signed copies of certificates required to show exemption of such Lender from United States withholding taxes.
(b) . Except to the extent otherwise provided in hereof, all payments made and actually received by the Agent in respect of the Loan (from any person or source) shall be applied in the following order of priority (based on Commitment Percentages thereof):
Application of Recoveries
Section 8.6
 
(1) to the reimbursement of any costs incurred by the Agent to administer, enforce, collect or deal with the Loan (including payments made pursuant to hereof (or to reimbursement of the Lenders to the extent such costs have been paid by the Lenders);
Sections 8.5(a)(2) and (3) 
(2) to the repayment of any Protective Advances (to the extent not paid pursuant to  above);
clause (1)
(3) to the payment of all interest (including interest calculated at the Default Rate) due and payable on the Note;
(4) to the payment of fees payable under the Loan Documents; and
(5) to the payment of principal of the Note.
(c) . If any Lender shall obtain any payment (whether voluntary, involuntary, through the exercise of any right of set-off or otherwise) on account of its interest in the Loan in excess of its Commitment Percentage in the Loan, such Lender will make such disposition and arrangements with the other Lenders with respect to such excess, either by way of distribution, pro tanto assignment of claims, subrogation or otherwise, as shall result in each Lender receiving in respect of the Note held by it its proportionate payment as contemplated by this Agreement; provided, however, that if all or any portion of such excess payment is thereafter recovered by the Borrower or other party entitled thereto through legal action or otherwise, each Lender shall reimburse the party returning such excess payment in an amount equal to such Lender's Commitment Percentage of the excess payment.
Excess Payments
(d) . If in the reasonable opinion of the Agent the distribution of any amount received by it in such capacity hereunder or under any of the other Loan Documents might involve it in material liability, it may refrain from making distribution until its right to make distribution shall have been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction, provided that the Agent shall invest any such undistributed amounts in overnight obligations on behalf of the Lenders and interest thereon shall be paid pro rata to the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitment Percentages. If a court of competent jurisdiction shall adjudge that any amount received and distributed by the Agent is to be repaid, each Person to whom any such distribution shall have been made shall either repay to the Agent its proportionate share of the amount so adjudged to be repaid or shall pay over the same in such manner and to such Persons as shall be determined by such court.
Liability for Advances
. If, following any Event of Default, Agent acquires title to the Property by foreclosure under the Deed of Trust (or by deed in lieu of such foreclosure) or Agent realizes upon any other collateral for the Loan, Agent shall hold title to such collateral in its own name as Agent for the Lenders to the extent of their Commitment Percentages. Each Lender hereby irrevocably waives any right to seek a partition of any interests in the Property. Agent shall have the sole and exclusive right to make (or to refrain from making) all decisions with respect to, and to perform (or refrain from performing) all actions with respect to, the leasing, encumbering, use, operation, maintenance, improvement, repair and restoration of the Property (and any Improvements located thereon) or disposition of any other collateral; provided, however, that, notwithstanding anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary, Agent shall not, without the prior written consent of the Majority Lenders, (a) sell (or lease as a whole) the Property or encumber the Property with a mortgage, deed of trust or similar instrument securing indebtedness for borrowed money, or (b) make any single expenditure with respect to the Property in an amount in excess of $500,000 (exclusive of taxes and assessments, insurance premiums, utility charges and expenditures required to comply with applicable laws), or (c) dispose of any other collateral. Subject to the foregoing, each Lender, pro rata in accordance with its Commitment Percentage, shall reimburse
8.6
Management of Acquired Collateral
 
Agent, on demand, for all costs and expenses actually incurred by Agent in connection with the sale, lease, encumbering, use, operation, maintenance, improvement, repair and restoration of the Property (including all costs and expenses incurred by Agent to pay taxes and assessments, utility charges, insurance premiums, common area maintenance charges, leasing commissions, tenant improvement costs, repair costs and restoration costs). The indemnity provisions contained in above shall apply equally to actions (and omissions) by Agent with respect to the Property so acquired by Agent. Each Lender shall participate pro rata in accordance with their respective Commitment Percentage in all income, expenses, profits and losses of the Property.
Section 8.1(b)
.
8.7
Defaulting Lender
(a) . If for any reason any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then in addition to the rights and remedies that may be available to the Agent and the other Lenders at law and in equity, such Defaulting Lender's right to participate in the administration of the Loan and the Loan Documents, including, without limitation, any rights to consent to or direct any action or inaction of the Agent, shall be suspended during the pendency of such failure or refusal. Borrower acknowledges and agrees that (a) the obligations of the Lenders under this Agreement are several, (b) no Lender is or will be obligated to lend Borrower more than the amount set forth in hereto for such Lender, nor to fund any part of any advance except upon fulfillment of all applicable conditions precedent provided herein and in the other Loan Documents, (c) except to the extent expressly provided in this Agreement, Borrower shall have no recourse or claim against a non-defaulting Lender nor against Agent (so long as the same have otherwise complied with their obligations under this Agreement), for any deficiency or any liability, loss, damage or expense resulting from the default of a Defaulting Lender, and (d) the Commitment Percentage of the Committed Amount of any Lender shall not be increased or decreased as a result of the failure by any other Lender to perform its obligation to make an advance.
Defaults
Exhibit I
(b) . If for any reason the Defaulting Lender fails to make timely payment to any other party to this Agreement of any amount required to be paid to it hereunder, in addition to other rights and remedies which such other party may have under or otherwise, such other party shall be entitled (1) to collect interest from the Defaulting Lender for the period from the date on which the payment was due until the date on which the payment is made for each day during such period at the Federal Funds Rate, (2) to withhold or set off, and to apply to the payment of the defaulted amount and any related interest, any amounts to be paid to the Defaulting Lender under this Agreement, (3) to bring an action or suit against the Defaulting Lender in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover the defaulted amount and any related interest, (4) to arrange for the purchase of the Commitment Percentage of the Defaulting Lender as provided in , and (5) to advance funds on behalf of the Defaulting Lender as provided in .
Remedies
Section 8.7(a)
Section 8.7(d)
Section 8.7(e)
(c) . The Defaulting Lender shall indemnify, defend, and hold Agent and each of the other Lenders harmless from and against any and all losses, damages, liabilities, and expense (including attorneys' fees) which they may actually sustain or incur by reason of or in consequence of the Defaulting Lender's failure or refusal to abide by the terms of this Agreement.
Indemnity
(d) . If a Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, the other Lenders who are not Defaulting Lenders shall have the right, but not the obligation, in their sole discretion, to acquire (pro rata based on the Commitment Percentages of the Lenders exercising such right) all of such Defaulting Lender's right, title, and interest in and to the Loan. The purchase price shall be the principal and accrued interest allocable to the Defaulting Lender's Commitment Percentage of the Loan and shall be paid on the closing day of such purchase. On the date of closing of such purchase, the Defaulting Lender shall pay the Agent a processing fee of $3,500. The Defaulting Lender shall retain liability for all obligations in respect of the Loan and this Agreement arising prior to the date of transfer (but releasing
Purchase Right
 
Defaulting Lender's liability for all obligations in respect of the Loan and this Agreement arising from and after the date of transfer) and shall execute and deliver such documents as may be reasonably necessary to effect such transfer.
(e) . If a Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, the other Lenders may (pro rata based on the Commitment Percentages of the Lenders exercising such right), but are not obligated to, make advances to the Agent in the aggregate amount that the Defaulting Lender is obligated to advance under this Agreement. Such advances shall be treated as loans made to the Defaulting Lender, shall bear interest at the Default Rate (payable on demand), shall be due and payable upon demand, and shall be paid prior to any payment being made to the Defaulting Lender.
Default Loans
(f) . The exercise of the above remedies shall not reduce, diminish or liquidate the Defaulting Lender's obligation for the sharing of losses and reimbursement of costs, liabilities, and expenses under the Loan Documents and this Agreement. The obligations of the Defaulting Lender arising prior to any purchase pursuant to shall survive any such purchase.
Cumulative Remedies and Survival
Section 8.7(d)
.
8.8
Representations, Warranties and Acknowledgments
(a) . Each Lender represents and warrants, as of the date hereof, as follows:
Authorization, etc
(1) Such Lender has all necessary corporate power and authority to own its interest in the Loan and the Loan Documents, and has all necessary corporate power and authority to perform its obligations with respect to this Agreement and the Loan Documents;
(2) The execution and delivery of this Agreement and all other instruments and documents executed and delivered in connection therewith by such Lender have been duly authorized by all requisite corporate action of such Lender; and
(3) No approval, authorization, order, license or consent of, or registration of filing with, any governmental authority or other person is required in connection with such Lender's execution and delivery of this Agreement by such Lender.
(b) . Each Lender agrees that it has, independently and without reliance upon any other party hereto, or upon the directors, officers, agents or employees of any other party hereto, but only in reliance upon information supplied to it by or on behalf of the Borrower and upon such other information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own independent credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement and the Loan Documents. Without limiting the foregoing, each Lender acknowledges that it has received copies of the Loan Documents and financial statements, certificates, instruments, documents, affidavits, resolutions and agreements as it deems necessary to make its credit analysis and decisions in respect of the Loan. Each Lender also agrees that it shall, independently and without reliance upon any other party hereto, continue to make its own independent credit analyses and decisions in acting or not acting under the Loan Documents. Except as specifically provided herein, the Agent shall have no duty or responsibility, either initially or on a continuing basis, to provide any Lender with any credit or other information with respect thereto, whether coming into its possession before the Closing Date or at any time or times thereafter.
Independent Decision
(c) . Each Lender hereby acknowledges that, except as specifically set forth herein, Agent (i) makes no warranty or representation to Lenders for any statements, warranties or representations (written or otherwise, express or implied) made in or in connection with the Loan
No Reliance
 
Documents or for the financial condition of the Borrower or for the title or the value of any of the collateral for the Loan, and (ii) shall not be responsible to the Lenders for any recitals, statements, representations or warranties herein or for the due execution, effectiveness, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency, or collectibility of any of the Loan Documents or any other instrument or document furnished pursuant thereto or in connection with the Loan or the legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency, perfection or priority of any rights in all or any portion of the collateral for the Loan. The Agent shall not be bound to ascertain whether any notice, consent, waiver or request delivered to it by the Borrower or any holder of any Note shall have been duly authorized or is true, accurate and complete. Agent shall not be required to make any inquiry concerning either the performance or observance of any of the terms, provisions or conditions of this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents or the financial condition of the Borrower or any of its Affiliates, or the existence or possible existence of any Event of Default or any default which, with the giving of notice, passage of time, or both, would become an Event of Default.
.
8.9
Assignments; Participation
(a) . Any Lender may assign, without Agent or Borrower approval, to (i) any affiliate of such Lender all or a portion of its respective Commitment Percentage of the Loan, in such a manner as to create privity of contract between such affiliate and the Borrower and to make such affiliate a Lender for all purposes hereunder, or (ii) to any other Lender. Any Lender may assign to any entity which meets the following conditions ("") all or a portion of its respective Commitment Percentage of the Loan, in such a manner as to create privity of contract between such person and the Borrower and to make such person a Lender for all purposes hereunder:
Permitted Assignments
Assignee Lender
(1) The minimum portion of the total commitment which the assigning Lender may assign to an Assignee Lender shall be Five Million and 00/100ths Dollars ($5,000,000.00).
(2) An Assignee Lender (or its direct or indirect parent) shall be either (A) a commercial lender organized under the laws of the United States, or any state thereof, and having total assets in excess of Ten Billion Dollars ($10,000,000,000) or (B) a U.S. branch of a commercial bank organized under the laws of any other country which has total assets in excess of Ten Billion Dollars ($10,000,000,000) or (C) any other U.S. financial institution which has total assets in excess of Ten Billion Dollars ($10,000,000,000).
(3) The senior unsecured debt of an Assignee Lender (or its direct or indirect parent) shall have a rating of Baa-2 or higher from Moody's Investors Service, Inc. or a comparable rating agency.
(4) Such assignment shall have been approved by Agent and, so long as no Event of Default exists hereunder or under the other Loan Documents, by Borrower, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed.
(5) The Assignee Lender shall have paid to the Agent an administrative fee of $3,500.00 to process the admission of such Assignee Lender.
(6) The Assignee Lender shall not be Borrower or any of Borrower's Affiliates.
(b) . The Borrower and Agent may continue to deal solely and directly with the assigning Lender in connection with the interest so assigned to an Assignee Lender (or to an affiliate of such Lender) until such time as (i) written notice of such assignment, together
Assignment and Assumption
 
with payment instructions, addresses and related information with respect to the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) shall have been given to the Borrower and Agent by the assigning Lender and the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate); (ii) the assigning Lender and the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) shall have delivered to the Borrower and Agent an Assignment and Assumption.
Promptly following a request therefor, Borrower will execute and deliver to Agent an appropriate replacement promissory note or replacement promissory notes, in each case designated as such, in favor of each assignee (and assignor, if such assignor is retaining a portion of its Commitment Percentage and advances) reflecting such assignee's (and assignor's) Commitment Percentage Committed Amount. Promptly following the execution and delivery of such replacement promissory note(s) the original promissory note or notes evidencing all or a portion of the Commitment Percentage of the Committed Amount and advances being assigned shall be canceled and returned to Borrower.
(c) . Promptly following receipt by Agent of an executed Assignment and Assumption, Agent shall give notice to the Borrower and to the Lenders of: (i) the effectiveness of the assignment by the assigning Lender to the Assignee Lender (or the affiliate of the Lender); and (ii) the revised percentages and maximum amounts of the Commitment Percentage of the Committed Amount in effect as a result of such assignment.
Notice by Agent
(d) . Immediately upon delivery of the Assignment and Assumption to Agent, this Agreement shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, but only to the extent, necessary to reflect the addition of the Assignee Lender (or affiliate of the Lender) and the resulting adjustment of the Commitment Percentage arising therefrom. The Commitment Percentage of the Committed Amount assigned to each Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) shall reduce the Commitment Percentage of the Committed Amount of the assigning Lender by a like amount.
Adjustment of Shares
(e) . From and after the date upon which Agent notifies the assigning Lender that it has received an executed Assignment and Assumption: (1) the Assignee Lender (or the Lender's affiliate) thereunder shall be a party to this Agreement and, to the extent that rights and obligations hereunder have been assigned to it pursuant to such Assignment and Assumption, shall have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement; and (2) the assigning Lender shall, to the extent that rights and obligations under this Agreement have been assigned by it pursuant to such Assignment and Assumption, relinquish its rights and be released from its obligations under this Agreement.
Rights of Assignee
(f) . By executing and delivering an Assignment and Assumption, the Assignee Lender (or the Lender's affiliate) thereunder confirms and agrees as follows: (1) other than as provided in such Assignment and Assumption, the assigning Lender makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility with respect to any statements, warranties or representations made in or in connection with this Agreement or the execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of this Agreement, the Note or any other instrument or document furnished pursuant to the Loan; (2) the assigning Lender makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility with respect to the financial condition of the Borrower or any other parties or the performance or observance by the Borrower of any of its obligations under the Note and this Agreement; (3) the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) has received a copy of this Agreement, together with such other documents and information as the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into the Assignment and Assumption; (4) the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) will, independently and without reliance upon Agent, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under this Agreement; (5) the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) hereby appoints and authorizes Agent to take such action as administrative
Assignee's Agreements
 
agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under the Loan Documents and this Agreement as are delegated to Agent thereunder and hereunder, together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto; and (6) the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) agrees that it will perform all of the obligations which by the terms of this Agreement are required to be performed by it as a Lender and confirms the representations and warranties of the assigning Lender under this Agreement.
(g) . Any Lender may sell a participation interest in all or any portion of the Loan without the prior consent of the Agent and the other Lenders; provided, however, such participants shall have no independent voting rights. Such selling Lender shall remain responsible for the performance of it obligations hereunder, and the Borrower and Agent shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement.
Participations
. The Agent and each Lender may accept deposits from, lend money to, and generally engage in any kind of banking, trust or other business with Borrower or any affiliate of Borrower as if it were not performing the duties specified herein, and may accept fees and other considerations from the Borrower or any such affiliate for services in connection with this Agreement and otherwise without having to account for the same to the other parties hereto.
8.10
Other Business
. If the Agent requests in writing the consent or approval from the Lenders and any Lender does not respond to such request within ten (10) Business Days (or such other period as may be provided herein, including, without limitation, under Section 5.9), such Lender shall be deemed to have given such consent or approval.
8.11
Consents
. In its individual capacity as a Lender, U.S. Bank shall have the same obligations and the same rights, powers and privileges in respect to its Commitment Percentage and the Advances made by it, and as the holder of any Note as it would have were it not also the Agent.
8.12
Agent as Lender
. Agent and each Lender hereby agree that, upon learning of the existence of a default or an Event of Default, it shall (to the extent notice has not previously been provided) promptly notify the other parties to this Agreement (other than Borrower) thereof. The Agent hereby agrees that upon receipt of any notice under this provision it shall promptly notify the other Lenders of the existence of such default or Event of Default. Agent shall provide to Lenders copies of any notice of a default or an Event of Default which Agent delivers to Borrower.
8.13
Notification of Defaults and Events of Default
. The provisions of this are for the benefit of Agent, the Lenders, and other than the portions of and that pertain specifically to Borrower, Borrower shall have no right to rely on or enforce any of the provisions hereof; provided, however, the foregoing shall in no way limit Borrower's obligations under this . In performing its functions and duties under this Agreement, Agent shall act solely as Agent of the Lenders and does not assume and shall not be deemed to have assumed any obligation toward or relationship of agency or trust with or for Borrower or any other person.
8.14
No Reliance by Borrower
Article VIII
Sections 8.9(a)
8.9(b)
Article VIII
. Agent shall be entitled to rely upon any written notices, statements, certificates, orders or other documents, telecopies or any telephone message believed by it in good faith to be genuine and correct and to have been signed, sent or made by the proper person, and with respect to all matters pertaining to this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents and its duties hereunder or thereunder, upon advice of legal counsel (including counsel for Borrower), independent public accountants and other experts selected by it.
8.15
Reliance
 
. Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, without the need to comply with any of the formal or procedural requirements of this Agreement, including this , any Lender may at any time and from time to time pledge and assign all or any portion of its rights under all or any of the Loan Documents to a Federal Reserve Bank; provided that no such pledge or assignment shall release such Lender from its obligations thereunder. To facilitate any such pledge or assignment, Agent shall, at the request of such Lender, enter into a letter agreement with the Federal Reserve Bank in, or substantially in, the form of the exhibit to Appendix C to the Federal Reserve Bank of New York Operating Circular No. 10.
8.16
Pledge to Federal Reserve Bank
Section 8.16
.
8.17
Limitation of Liability
(a) Borrower shall be fully and personally liable for the payment of the indebtedness evidenced by or created or arising under the Loan Documents, and any judgment or decree in any action brought to enforce the obligation of the Borrower to pay such indebtedness shall be enforceable against the Borrower and any such judgment or decree shall be subject to execution upon and be a lien upon the assets of the Borrower; provided, however, that, recourse of Agent on behalf of the Lenders to the Borrower's assets other than any property encumbered by the Deed of Trust and the other Loan Documents (the "") for the repayment of the Loan shall be limited as follows:
Other Assets
(i) Upon satisfaction of the Pre-Leasing Test, recourse to the Other Assets for the repayment of outstanding principal under the Note ("") shall not exceed One Hundred Eighteen Million One Hundred Twenty-Five Thousand and 00/100ths Dollars ($118,125,000.00).
Principal
(ii) Upon Completion of the Improvements, recourse to the Other Assets for the repayment of Principal shall not exceed Ninety-Four Million Five Hundred Thousand and 00/100ths Dollars ($94,500,000.00).
(iii) Upon satisfaction of the Recourse Reduction Debt Service Test, recourse to the Other Assets for the repayment of Principal shall not exceed Sixty-Three Million and 00/100ths Dollars ($63,000,000.00).
In no event shall the preceding subparagraphs (i)(iii) be deemed to limit Borrower's obligations with respect to accrued interest or any other amounts other than Principal owing under the Loan Documents or hereunder.
The personal liability of Borrower for the repayment of Principal pursuant to this shall not be reduced as a result of Agent realizing upon any collateral furnished to Agent and the Lenders in connection with the Loan (except that there shall be only one satisfaction of all amounts due to the Lenders with respect to the Loan).
Section 8.17(a)
(b) Notwithstanding above, in no event shall recourse to the Other Assets be limited with respect to, and Borrower shall at all times remain fully and personally liable, and shall indemnify and reimburse Agent and the Lenders for, all actual liabilities, costs, losses, damages, expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees and disbursements, and court costs, if any), and claims suffered or incurred by Agent and/or the Lenders, to the extent of actual monetary loss, in connection with the Loan or the Property by reason of or in connection with any of the following:
Section 8.17(a)
(i) any misapplication or misappropriation of (A) rents received by Borrower from the Property after the occurrence of an Event of Default under the Loan Documents; (B) insurance proceeds, condemnation proceeds or tenant security deposits, in each case relating to the Property; or (C) proceeds from any sale of all or a portion of the Property;
 
(ii) any fraud or intentional misrepresentation of Borrower, Guarantor or any affiliated property manager or leasing agent in connection with the Loan, the Property or any request for any action or consent by Agent;
(iii) any sale, conveyance, mortgage, grant, lien, encumbrance, security interest, pledge, assignment or transfer of the Property (or any part or portion thereof) or any ownership interest in Borrower (direct or indirect, legal or equitable) in violation of Section 1.14 of the Deed of Trust;
(iv) any event or circumstance for which Borrower indemnifies Agent and/or the Lenders under the Indemnification Agreement;
(v) the failure of Borrower to apply operating revenues generated by the Property and received by Borrower or any affiliated property manager or leasing agent to pay any debt service, impounds, operating expenses and emergency capital expenditures or costs;
(vi) intentional removal or physical destruction of property (without the concurrent replacement thereof with property of at least equivalent value and utility) constituting any material portion of the Property, or any other intentional and material waste of any portion of the Property by Borrower;
(vii) Borrower or Guarantor (i) filing a voluntary petition under the Bankruptcy Code or any other Federal or state bankruptcy or insolvency law, or (ii) making an assignment for the benefit of creditors; or
(viii) Borrower (1) filing, or joining in the filing of, an involuntary petition against Borrower or Guarantor under the Bankruptcy Code or any other Federal or state bankruptcy or insolvency law, or (2) soliciting or causing to be solicited petitioning creditors for any involuntary petition against Borrower or Guarantor, or (3) filing an answer consenting to or otherwise acquiescing in or joining in any involuntary petition filed against Borrower or Guarantor by any other Person under the Bankruptcy Code or any other Federal or state bankruptcy or insolvency law, or (4) voting adversely to Agent's and/or the Lenders' interest in any proceeding under the Bankruptcy Code or any other state or Federal bankruptcy or insolvency law which involves Borrower or Guarantor or any portion of the Property, or (5) consenting to or acquiescing or joining in an application for the appointment of a custodian, receiver, trustee or examiner for Borrower or Guarantor or any portion of the Property (unless such action is at the written request of Agent and/or the Lenders).
(c) Nothing contained in this shall affect or limit the ability of Agent on behalf of the Lenders to enforce any of their rights or remedies with respect to any property encumbered by the Deed of Trust and the other Loan Documents, nor shall anything contained in this affect or limit the rights of Agent and the Lenders to proceed against any person or entity, including the Borrower or any partner in the Borrower with respect to the enforcement of any guarantees of payment or guarantees of performance and completion or other similar rights.
Section 8.17
Section 8.17
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, intending to be legally bound, the parties have executed and delivered this Agreement, under seal, as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBITS
Exhibit A - Assignment and Assumption Agreement
Exhibit B - Description of Improvements
Exhibit C - Legal Description of the Land
Exhibit D - Permitted Encumbrances
Exhibit E - Sworn Construction Cost Statement
Exhibit F - Title Insurance Requirements
Exhibit G - Insurance Requirements
Exhibit H - Notices and Wire Instructions
Exhibit I - Commitment Percentages
Exhibit J - Form of Lien Waiver
Exhibit K - Draw Request Form
Exhibit L - Intentionally Deleted
Exhibit M - Plans
Exhibit N - Leasing Guidelines
Exhibit 0 - Borrower Compliance Certificate
Exhibit P - Guarantor Compliance Certificate
Exhibit Q - Pre-Leasing Test
A/72437573.12
EXHIBIT A
ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION AGREEMENT
THIS ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION AGREEMENT (this "Agreement") is dated as of , 20 , between ("Assignor") and ("Assignee"),
RECITALS:
Assignor is a Lender under that certain Construction Loan Agreement dated as of May , 2008 (the "Loan Agreement") by and between U.S. Bank National Association in its individual capacity and as Agent (the "Agent") and certain other Lenders named therein, as modified from time to time. The Lenders have agreed to make a loan to SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, a Maryland limited partnership ("Borrower"). Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings ascribed to such terms in the Loan Agreement. Assignor desires to assign to Assignee and Assignee desires to accept and assume [a portion of] the rights and obligations of Assignor under the Loan Agreement.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual agreements herein contained, the parties hereto agree as follows:
1. Assignment. Effective on the Assignment Effective Date (as defined in Section 3 below), Assignor hereby assigns to Assignee an Assigned Share (as defined below) of all of Assignor's right, title, interest and obligations under the Loan Agreement, including without limitation those relating to the Loan. The Assigned Share of all such rights, title, interest and obligations is referred to collectively as the "Assigned Rights and Obligations".
The "Assigned Share" means (a) a $ portion of the Committed
Amount on the Assignment Effective Date, and (b) the aggregate amount of all Loans outstanding under the Loan Agreement on the Assignment Effective Date that is attributable to the percentage of the Loan represented by the Assigned Share. The percentage of the Committed Amount represented by the Assigned Share shall equal the quotient of the above portion of the Committed Amount divided by $ , expressed as a percentage rounded to eight decimal places.
2. Assumption. Effective on the Assignment Effective Date, Assignee hereby accepts the foregoing assignment of, and hereby assumes from Assignor, the Assigned Rights and Obligations.
3. Effectiveness. This Agreement shall become effective on a date (the "Assignment Effective Date") selected by Assignor, which shall be on or as soon as practicable after the execution and delivery of counterparts of this Agreement by Assignor, Assignee, Agent and Borrower. Assignor shall promptly notify Assignee, Agent and Borrower in writing of the Assignment Effective Date.
4. Payments on Assignment Effective Date. In consideration of the assignment by Assignor to and the assumption by Assignee of the Assigned Rights and Obligations, on the Assignment Effective Date (a) Assignee shall pay to Assignor such amounts as are specified in any written agreement or exchange of letters between them, and (b) Assignee shall pay to Agent an assignment processing fee of $3,500.
A-1
A/72437573.12
5. Allocation and Payment of Interest and Fees.
(a) Agent shall pay to Assignee all interest, and other amounts not constituting principal that are paid by or on behalf of Borrower pursuant to the Loan Documents and are attributable to the Assigned Rights and Obligations ("Borrower Amounts"), that accrue on and after the Assignment Effective Date, If Assignor receives or collects any such Borrower Amounts, Assignor shall promptly pay them to Assignee.
(b) Agent shall pay to Assignor all Borrower Amounts that accrue before the Assignment Effective Date when and as the same are paid by Agent to the other the Lenders. If Assignee receives or collects any such Borrower Amounts, Assignee shall promptly pay such amounts to Assignor.
(c) Unless specifically assumed by Assignee, Assignor shall be responsible and liable for all reimbursable liabilities and costs and indemnification obligations which accrue prior to the Assignment Effective Date, and such liability shall survive the Assignment Effective Date.
(d) Agent shall not be liable for any allocation or payment to either Assignor or Assignee subsequently determined to be erroneous, unless resulting from Agent's willful misconduct or gross negligence.
6. Representations and Warranties.
(a) Each of Assignor and Assignee represents and warrants' to the other and Agent as follows:
(i) It has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Agreement and to fulfill its obligations under, and to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement;
(ii) The making and performance of this Agreement and all documents required to be executed and delivered by it hereunder do not and will not violate any law or regulation applicable to it;
(iii) This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by it and constitutes its legal, valid and binding obligation enforceable in accordance with its terms; and
(iv) All approvals, authorizations or other actions by, or filings with, any governmental authority necessary for the validity or enforceability of its obligations under this Agreement have been made or obtained.
(b) Assignor represents and warrants to Assignee that Assignor owns the Assigned Rights and Obligations, free and clear of any lien or other encumbrance.
(c) Assignee represents and warrants to Assignor as follows:
(i) Assignee has made and shall continue to make its own independent investigation of the financial condition, affairs and creditworthiness of the Borrower and any other person or entity obligated under the Loan Documents (collectively, "Credit Parties"), and the value of any collateral now or hereafter securing any of the Obligations; and
A-2
A/72437573.12
(ii) Assignee has received a copy of those Loan Documents and such other documents, financial statements and information as it has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement.
7. No Assignor Responsibility. Assignor makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility to Assignee for:
(a) the execution (by any party other than Assignor), effectiveness, genuineness, validity, enforceability, collectibility or sufficiency of the Loan Documents or for any representations, warranties, recitals or statements made in the Loan Documents or in any financial or other written or oral statement, instrument, report, certificate or any other document made or furnished or made available by Assignor to Assignee or by or on behalf of Borrower to Assignor or Assignee in connection with the Loan Documents and the transactions contemplated thereby;
(b) the performance or observance of any of the. terms, covenants or agreements contained in any of the Loan Documents or as to the existence or possible existence of any default or Event of Default under the Loan Documents; or
(c) the accuracy or completeness of any information provided to Assignee, whether by Assignor or by or on behalf of Borrower.
Assignor shall have no initial or continuing duty or responsibility to make any investigation of the financial condition, affairs or creditworthiness of Borrower, in connection with the assignment of the Assigned Rights and Obligations or to provide Assignee with any credit or other information with respect thereto, whether coming into its possession before the date hereof or at any time or times thereafter.
8. Assignee Bound By Loan Agreement. Effective on the Assignment Effective Date, Assignee (a) shall be deemed to be a party to the Loan Agreement, (b) agrees to be bound by the Loan Agreement as it would have been if it had been an original Lender thereunder, and (c) agrees to perform in accordance with their respective terms all of the obligations which are required under the Loan Documents to be performed by it as a Lender. Assignee appoints and authorizes Agent to take such actions as agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under the Loan Documents as are delegated to Agent by the terms thereof, together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
9. Assignor Released From Loan Agreement. Effective on the Assignment Effective Date, Assignor shall be released from the Assigned Rights and Obligations arising on and after such date; provided, however, that Assignor shall retain all of its rights to indemnification under the Loan Agreement and the other Loan Documents for any events, acts or omissions occurring before the Assignment Effective Date, and to the extent not assumed by Assignee, Assignor shall continue to be responsible for the liabilities and obligations described in Section 5(c).
10. New Notes. On or promptly after the Assignment Effective Date, Borrower, Agent, Assignor and Assignee shall make appropriate arrangements so that a new Note executed by Borrower, dated as of the Assignment Effective Date and in the amount of the [respective] commitment[s] of [Assignor and] Assignee, after giving effect to this Agreement, are issued to [Assignor and] Assignee, in exchange for the surrender by Assignor [and Assignee] to Borrower of any applicable outstanding Note marked "Exchanged".
A-3
A/72437573.12
11. General.
(a) No term or provision of this Agreement may be amended, waived or terminated orally, but only by an instrument signed by the parties hereto.
(b) This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts. Each set of executed counterparts shall be an original. Executed counterparts may be delivered by facsimile transmission.
(c) If Assignor has not assigned its entire remaining commitment of the Loan to Assignee, Assignor may at any time and from time to time grant to others pursuant to the Loan Agreement assignments of or participation, in all or part of Assignor's remaining Loan or commitment.
(d) This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. Neither Assignor nor Assignee may assign or transfer any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement without the prior written consent of the other and Agent. The preceding sentence shall not limit the right of Assignee to grant to others assignment of or participation in all or part of the Assigned Rights and Obligations to the extent permitted by the terms of the Loan Agreement.
(e) All payments to Assignor or Assignee hereunder shall, unless otherwise specified by the party entitled thereto, be made in Dollars, in immediately available funds, and to the address or account specified on the signature pages of this Agreement. The address of Assignee for notice purposes under the Loan Agreement shall be as specified on the signature pages of this Agreement.
(f) If any provision of this Agreement is held invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the remaining provisions hereof will not be affected or impaired in any way.
(g) Each party shall bear its owns expenses in connection with the preparation and execution of this Agreement.
(h) This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia.
(i) To the extent Borrower's consent to this Assignment is required under the terms of the Loan Agreement, this Agreement shall not be effective unless and until Borrower shall consent to the same, which consent shall be confirmed by its execution hereof.
A-4
A/72437573.12
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement, under seal, as of the day and year first above written.
ASSIGNOR:
ADDRESS:
By
Printed Name
Title
ASSIGNEE:
ADDRESS:
By
Printed Name
Title
ACKNOWLEDGED AND CONSENTED TO:
SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, a Maryland limited partnership
[ADDRESS]
By:
Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation, its sole general partner
By:
Name;
Title:
ACKNOWLEDGED AND AGREED: U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
ADDRESS:
1650 Tysons Boulevard, Suite 250
By:
McLean, Virginia 22102
Name:
Attention: Real Estate Banking Group
Title
A-5
A/72437573.12
EXHIBIT B
DESCRIPTION OF IMPROVEMENTS
The proposed improvements will include a mixed use development located on two parcels of land straddling the North and South sides of Clarendon Boulevard between North Garfield and North Highland Streets comprised of approximately 244 rental apartment units, approximately 170,400 square feet of office space, approximately 42,300 square feet of ground floor and retail space and an underground parking garage containing approximately 600 spaces.
B-1
A/72437573.12
EXHIBIT C
LEGAL DESCRIPTION OF THE LAND
TRACT 1
All of Parcel lettered "B", Block E, Lyon's Addition to Clarendon, as the same is shown on a plat attached to the Deed of Resubdivision and Easements recorded in Deed Book 4160 at page 294, among the Land Records of Arlington County, Virginia, being more particularly described by metes and bounds as follows:
Beginning at a point where the northerly right-of-way line of Wilson Boulevard (variable width) intersects the westerly right-of-way line of North Garfield Street (variable width); thence with the said line of North Garfield Street:
S 06 32' 23" E, 158.46 feet to a point where the said line of North Garfield Street intersects the northerly right-of-way line of Clarendon Boulevard (variable width); thence with the said line of Clarendon Boulevard
S 55 15' 05" W, 188.53 feet to a point marking a corner to a part of Lot 3, Block E, Lyons Addition to Clarendon; thence departing the said line of Clarendon Boulevard and running with the line of said part of Lot 3 and part of Lot 2, Block E, Lyons Addition to Clarendon and also a portion of the aforementioned right-of-way line of Wilson Boulevard
N 21 51' 21" W, 115.66 feet to a point; thence with the said line of Wilson Boulevard on the following courses and distances:
N 45 11' 50" E, 56.60 feet to a point; thence
S 12 33' 46" E, 17.72 feet to a point; thence
N 45 12' 07" E, 191.52 feet to the point of beginning. Containing 25,201 square feet, or 0.57854 acres of land.
TOGETHER WITH the beneficial easements and other items in the nature of real property rights contained in the Declaration of Covenants and Easements recorded in Deed Book 4009 at page 639 among the aforesaid Land Records.
TOGETHER WITH the rights in the nature of real property rights arising from the Encroachment Ordinance recorded in Deed Book 4108 at page 1998 among the aforesaid Land Records.
C-1
A/72437573.12
TRACT 2
All of Parcel lettered "A", Block F, Lyon's Addition to Clarendon, as the same is shown on a plat attached to the Deed of Resubdivision and Easements recorded in Deed Book 4156 at page 723, among the Land Records of Arlington County, Virginia, being more particularly described by metes and bounds as follows:
Beginning at a point where the southerly right-of-way line of Clarendon Boulevard (variable width) intersects the easterly right-of-way line of North Garfield Street (variable width); thence with the said line of North Garfield Street on the following three (3) courses and distances:
S 06 32' 23" E, 121.34 feet to a point; thence
N 55 15' 07" E, 5.67 feet to a point; thence
S 06 32' 23" E, 245.33 feet to a point where the said line of North Garfield Street intersects the northerly right-of-way line of 11th Street North (variable width); thence with the said line of 11th Street North on the following three (3) courses and distances;
S 84 33' 37" W, 110.02 feet to a point; thence
N 06 32' 23" W, 15.00 feet to a point; thence
S 84 33' 37" W, 5.00 feet to the southeasterly corner to Outlot "A":, Block F, Lyon's Addition to Clarendon; thence departing the said line of 11th Street North and running with the easterly line of said Outlot "A"
N 06 32' 23" W, 96.72 feet to a point; thence with the northerly line of Outlot "A" and also Lot 110, Block F, Lyon's Addition to Clarendon
S 83' 27' 41" W, 102,50 feet to a point in the easterly right-of-way line of North Highland Street (variable width) thence departing the line of said Lot 110 and running with the said line of North Highland Street
N 06 32' 23" W, 136.08 feet to a point where the said line of North Highland Street intersects the aforementioned line of Clarendon Boulevard; thence with the said line of Clarendon Boulevard
N 55 15' 07" E, 241.14 feet to the point of beginning, Containing 54,578 square feet or 1.25293 acres of land.
TOGETHER WITH the easement over "Outlot A" as set forth in the Deed of Easement recorded in Deed Book 1966 at page 1152 among the aforesaid Land Records.
TOGETHER WITH the beneficial easements and other items in the nature of real property rights contained in the Declaration of Covenants and Easements recorded in Deed Book 4009 at page 639 among the aforesaid Land Records.
TOGETHER WITH the rights in the nature of real property rights arising from the Encroachment Ordinance recorded in Deed Book 4108 at page 2009 among the aforesaid Land Records.
C-2
A/72437573.12
TOGETHER WITH the rights in the nature of real property rights arising from the Development Agreement dated June 7, 2006, as evidenced by Memorandum of Development Agreement recorded in Deed Book 4008 at page 2113 as amended by unrecorded First Amendment to Development Agreement dated September 5, 2007, as evidenced by Memorandum of First Amendment to Development Agreement recorded in Deed Book 4136 at page 152 both among the aforesaid Land Records.
TOGETHER WITH the easement granted Saul Holdings Limited Partnership by Sanitary Sewer Easement Agreement from Leadership Institute dated April 9, 2008 and recorded in Deed Book 4181 at page 1624.
C-3
A/72437573.12
EXHIBIT D
PERMITTED ENCUMBRANCES
PERMITTED EXCEPTIONS
1. Taxes subsequent to December 31, 2007, not yet due and payable, and in addition thereto, possible supplemental taxes due to recent improvements, if any, to the land described in Exhibit A;
2. Restrictions contained in instruments recorded in Deed Book 110 at page 81, Deed Book 110 at page 329, Deed Book 110 at page 367, Deed Book 110 at page 434, Deed Book 110 at page 435, Deed Book 110 at page 481, Deed Book 111 at page 32, Deed Book 111 at page 81, Deed Book 111 at page 92, Deed Book 119 at page 418, Deed Book 133 at page 584 and Deed Book 136 at page 57, all among the Land Records of Arlington County, Virginia.
Affects Tracts 1 and 2
3. Easement to American Telephone and Telegraph Company recorded in Deed Book 159 at page 39 among the aforesaid Land Records.
Affects Tract 2.
4. Party Wall Agreements recorded in Deed Book 436 at page 41, Deed Book 436 at page 42, Deed Book 442 at page 577 and in Deed Book 527 at page 45, affected by Agreement recorded in Deed Book 793 at page 310, all as supplemented by Declaration recorded in Deed Book 2459 at page 1712 all among the aforesaid Land Records.
Affects Tract 1, except for Deed Book 793 at page 310, which affects Tract 2.
5. Easements reserved by The County Board of Arlington County, Virginia as set forth in the Deed dated April 10, 1978 and recorded in Deed Book 1966 at page 1139 among the aforesaid Land Records.
Affects Tract 2.
6. Easement for sanitary sewer and gas pipeline as set forth in the instrument recorded in Deed Book 1966 at page 1143 among the aforesaid Land Records.
Affects Tract 2.
D-1
A/72437573.12
d
7. Perpetual easement for public street and utility purposes granted to The County Board of Arlington County, Virginia by Deed of Easement dated April 14, 1978 and recorded in Deed Book 1966 at page 1146 among the aforesaid Land Records.
Affects Tract 2.
8. Easement over "Outlot B" granted National Graduate University by Deed of Easement dated April 14, 1978 and recorded in Deed Book 1966 at page 1152 among the aforesaid Land Records.
Affects Tract 2.
9. Unrecorded Development Agreement dated June 7, 2006, as evidenced by Memorandum of Development Agreement recorded in Deed Book 4008 at page 2113, as amended by unrecorded First Amendment to Development Agreement dated September 5, 2007, as evidenced by Memorandum of First Amendment to Development Agreement recorded in Deed Book 4136 at page 152 both among the aforesaid Land Records.
Affects Tract 2.
10. Declaration of Covenants and Easements recorded in Deed Book 4009 at page 639 among the aforesaid Land Records.
Affects Tract 1.
11. Encroachment Ordinance recorded in Deed Book 4108 at page 1998 among the aforesaid Land Records.
Affects Tract 1.
12. Encroachment Ordinance recorded in Deed Book 4108 at page 2009 among the aforesaid Land Records.
Affects Tract 2.
13. Deed of Covenant (South Block) recorded in Deed Book 4149 at page 2764 among the aforesaid Land Records.
Affects Tract 2.
14. Deed of Covenant (North Block) recorded in Deed Book 4149 at page 2772 among the aforesaid Land Records.
Affects Tract 1.
15. Easements with the County Board of Arlington County, Virginia contained in Deed of Resubdivision and Easements and Easements per the plat attached thereto recorded in Deed Book 4156 at page 723 among the aforesaid Land Records.
Affects Tract 2.
D-2
A/72437573.12
16. Easements with the County Board of Arlington County, Virginia and terms and conditions contained in Deed of Resubdivision and Easements and Easements per the plat attached thereto recorded in Deed Book 4160 at page 294 among the aforesaid Land Records.
Affects Tract 1.
17. Terms and conditions contained in the Sanitary Sewer Easement Agreement between Leadership Institute and Saul Holdings Limited Partnership dated April 9, 2008 and recorded in Deed Book 4181 at page 1624.
Affects Tract 2.
18. Exception is taken to the following matters shown on the Tract 1 survey:
A. Rights of others, including the public generally, in and to that portion of Tract 1 located within the bounds of Wilson Boulevard.
B. Underground gas lines and gas valves.
19. Except is taken to the following matters shown on the Tract 2 survey:
A. Overhead electric lines and related equipment.
20. Surface easement and right of way and perpetual easement granted Washington Metropolitan Transit Authority by Deed of Easement dated November 24, 1975 and recorded in Deed Book 1904 at page 693 (the sanitary sewer easement was vacated by instrument recorded at Deed Book 4165 at page 2491).
Affects Tract 2
21. Surface easement and right of way granted Washington Metropolitan Transit Authority by Deed of Easement dated December 19, 1975 and recorded in Deed Book 1902 at page 837 (the sanitary sewer easement was vacated by instrument recorded at Deed Book 4165 at page 2491).
Affects Tract 2
22. That certain unrecorded Memorandum of Lease dated as of May 12, 2008, by and between Saul Holdings Limited Partnership and Leadership Institute.
Affects Tract 2
D-3
A/72437573.12
EXHIBIT E
SWORN CONSTRUCTION COST STATEMENT
DATE:
AGENT:
BORROWER:
GENERAL CONTRACTOR:
PROJECT ARCHITECT:
PROJECT:
May 14, 2008
U.S. Bank National Association
Saul Holdings Limited Partnership
Clark Residential, LLC
Torti Gallas and Partners
Clarendon Center
Arlington County, Virginia
BORROWER
The undersigned Borrower, being first duly sworn, as the borrower and the owner of the Project, deposes and says, in connection with the development, construction and completion of the Project: that this Sworn Construction Cost Statement includes a true, correct and complete listing of all costs for material, supplies, equipment, labor, and other work and services of any kind necessary to achieve Completion (as that term is defined in the Construction Loan Agreement by and between Borrower, Agent and the lenders a party thereto (the "Lenders")) of the Project; that listed herein are the names of all persons, parties and entities having contracts or subcontracts relating to development, construction or completion of the Project, or which are otherwise entitled to receive payment for materials, supplies, equipment, labor, or other work or services of any kind with respect to the Project, and the amounts previously paid, now due, or to become due to each of said parries; and that there is no amount previously paid, now due or to become due to any party not listed herein, or in excess of the amount listed herein, for material, supplies, equipment, labor, or other work or services of any kind relating to the Project.
The undersigned further deposes and says, also in connection with the development, construction and completion of the Project, that any change or increase in the total cost of the Project as shown herein, or in the amount payable to any party listed herein, will be communicated in writing to Agent as soon as reasonably practicable after such changes are made known to Borrower, and will be subject to approval by Agent, if such approval is required by said Construction Loan Agreement; the General Contractor will guarantee their materials provided or work performed in connection with the Project to be free from defects for at least one (1) year after Completion of the Project; that the purpose of the foregoing is to induce Lenders to advance the proceeds of a loan of up to $157,500,000,00 secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, security deed or trust indenture upon the Project; and that, upon payment of the specific unpaid items listed herein, Borrower will indemnify and save harmless Agent and the Lenders as to any other claim and as to any lien for any material, supplies, equipment, labor, and other work or services of any kind relating to the Project.
-1-
A/72441623.5
[Signature page to Clarendon Center Sworn Construction Cost Statement]
SIGNATURES OF PERSONS
AUTHORIZED TO SIGN DRAW
REQUESTS
BORROWER:
SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP,
a Maryland limited partnership
By: Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation, its sole
general partner
By:
Name: B. Francis Saul III
Title: President
Subscribed and sworn to before me this 13th day of May, 2008.
Linda R. Geimer
Notary Public
Montgomery County, Maryland
LINDA R. GEIMER
NOTARY PUBLIC STATE OF MARYLAND
My Commission Expire July 14, [ILLEGIBLE]
LINDA R. GEIMER
NOTARY
PUBLIC
ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY
 
SWORN CONSTRUCTION COST STATEMENT TOTAL PROJECT COSTS
BORROWER: Saul Holdings Limited Partnership
DATE:
12-May-08
GENERAL
PROJECT:
CONTRACTOR: Clark Residential, LLC
Clarendon Center
PROJECT
LOCATION: 3030 Clarendon Blvd., 1200 N. Garfield St.,
ARCHITECT: Torti Gallas and Partners, Inc
3000 Wilson Blvd.
1 DIRECT COSTS
1.0 Permits & Fees
$ 3,308,176.00
1.1 General Contract (G703 Attached)
$ 118,500,000.00
1.2 Building - Owner Items
$ 1,651,007.00
1.3 Tenant Finishing - Retail
$ 2,750,085.00
1.4 Tenant Finishing - Office
$ 10,310,760.00
1.5 Residential FF&E
$ 837,000.00
1.6 Construction Contingency
$ 6,410,894.00
$ 143,767,922.00
2 LAND AND LAND IMPROVEMENTS
2.1 Land Acquisition
$ 20,443,088.05
2.2 Utilities and Hook-ups
$ -
2.1 Offsite Street Improvements
$ -
2.1 Offsite Utility Extensions
$ -
$ 20,443,088.05
3 BORROWER'S ADMINISTRATIVE
3.1 Insurance
$ 340,700.00
3.2 Real Estate Taxes and Assessments
[ILLEGIBLE]
3.3 Overhead
[ILLEGIBLE]
$ 3,804,517.00
4 FINANCING
4.1 Interest Reserve
$ 20,948,989.00
4.2 Construction Loan Fee
$ -
4.3 Brokerage Fees
$ -
$ 20,948,989.00
5 LEGAL AND TITLE
5.1 Legal Fees
$ 450,000.00
5.2 Title Insurance
5.3 Closing Costs
$ 1,955,500.00
5.4 Disbursement Fees
$ -
$ 2,405,500.00
6 PROFESSIONAL FEES
6.1 Architect
$ 5,388,390.00
6.2 Geotechnical Consultant
$ 136,482.00
6.3 Interior Design Apartments
$ 377,000.00
6.4 Interior Design Office
$ 90,000.00
6.5 Retail Architect Design
$ 83,266.00
6.6 Landscape Design
$ 8,742.00
6.7 Civil Engineering
$ 452,167.00
6.8 Transportation Consultant
$ 20,000.00
6.9 Testing & Inspection
$ 435,000.00
6.10 WMATA Testing
$ 265,000.00
6.11 Other Consultants
$ 140,000.00
6.12 Renderings / Blueprints
$ 25,000.00
6.13 Lender's Inspecting Architect
$ 45,000.00
$ 7,466,047.00
7 MARKETING
7.1 Marketing Studies
$ -
7.2 Promotion and Advertising
$ 353,000.00
7.3 Model Furnishings
$ -
$ 353,000.00
8 TENANT IMPROVEMENTS (included in Direct Costs)
9 LEASE UP / SALES
9.1 Commissions
$ 2,953,613.00
9.2 Existing Tenant Buyout
$ 500,000.00
9.3 Building Maintenance
$ -
$ 3,453,613.00
10 DEVELOPMENT FEE
$ 8,500,000.00
11 CONTINGENCY
$ 994,323.95
TOTAL PROJECT COSTS:
$ 212,137,000.00
CLARENDON CENTER
SUMMARY OF CLARK CONSTRUCTION G703
SOUTH NORTH
BLOCK BLOCK TOTAL
Dampproofing 45,000 20,000 65,000
Jamb Flashing Material 70,000 30,000 100,000
Mock-Up Pad / Hoisting 12,000 12,000
Hoisting / Remob - Cast Stone / Precast 40,000 40,000
Landscaping Cast Stone / Precast 47,400 47,400
Temporary Heat 100,000 50,000 150,000
Exterior Stone 215,400 110,600 326,000
Stone Countertops 417,375 417,375
Miscellaneous Metals 2,024,000 886,000 2,910,000
Ornamental Metals 268,875 25,000 293,875
Metal Panels at Elevators 14,000 14,000
Balcony Soffit Panels 220,000 220,000
Carpentry 1,150,000 300,000 1,450,000
Millwork 970,744 28,300 999,044
Waterproofing 1,439,050 642,500 2,081,550
EIFS 61,206 62,271 123,477
Weather Barrier -
Metal Panels at Elevators 216,222 144,148 360,370
Roofing -
Caulking 292,015 149,934 441,949
Doors, Frames and Hardware 700,000 110,000 810,000
Overhead Doors 73,193 36,807 110,000
Glass and Glazing 5,492,812 2,345,063 7,837,875
Mirrors 88,000 88,000
Drywall 5,082,000 916,000 5,998,000
Material Hoist 252,880 44,980 297,860
Make Ready Crew 122,000 122,000
Tile 682,150 120,000 802,150
Wood Floor 1,225,301 1,225,301
Carpet / Resilient 8,655 8,655
Paint 875,000 150,000 1,025,000
South Block Elastomeric 14,000 14,000
Toilet Compartments 159,675 63,725 223,400
Louvers 54,250 24,500 78,750
Louvers (install) 10,000 5,000 15,000
Clocks 24,980 24,980
Clocks (Install) 6,000 6,000
Lockers -
Fire Extinguishers -
Fire Extinguishers (unbought) 5,000 5,000 10,000
Awnings 29,881 33,819 63,700
Mailboxes -
Wire Mesh Partitions 43,903 2,000 45,903
Wire Shelving -
Toilet Accessories -
Shower Enclosures 21,000 21,000
Window Washing Equipment 21,413 10,361 31,774
Interior Signage (Allowance) 15,000 5,000 20,000
Exterior Signage (Allowance) 5,000 5,000 10,000
Dock Levelers / Bumpers -
Residential Equipment 964,479 964,479
CLARENDON CENTER
SUMMARY OF CLARK CONSTRUCTION G703
SOUTH BLOCK
NORTH BLOCK
TOTAL
Residential Casework 760,000 760,000
Floor Mats 7,746 6,297 14,043
Fireplace 2,400 2,400
Blinds 86,325 30,925 117,250
Swimming Pool 82,800 82,800
Elevators 2,500,000 1,100,000 3,600,000
Chutes 50,000 50,000
Mechanical 12,510,250 2,839,750 15,350,000
Fire Protection 1,340,000 300,000 1,640,000
Electrical 6,997,910 1,801,890 8,799,800
Temp Light at 11th Street 5,000 5,000
Traffic Signalization Allowance 100,000 100,000
General Conditions -
Project Supervision 1,476,538 481,838 1,958,376
Project Management 1,971,140 376,490 2,347,630
Field Engineering 306,360 177,684 484,044
Jobsite Safety 442,200 119,324 561,524
Jobsite Cleanup 130,389 35,836 166,225
Field Engineering Supplies & Equipment 35,400 20,200 55,600
Safety Equipment & Materials 27,775 18,275 46,050
Dumpsters 65,000 22,500 87,500
Jobsite Office and Site Expenses 169,950 92,400 262,350
Jobsite Administration 567,560 316,610 884,170
Railroad Insurance 28,677 28,677
Construction Contingency 1,185,724 1,446,358 2,632,082
Contingency Disbursements 237,076 237,076
Subguard 661,629 192,839 854,468
General Liability Insurance 420,311 131,724 552,035
CCIP 1,055,478 334,488 1,389,966
Gross Receipts Tax 152,827 49,379 202,206
Fee 3,477,600 1,110,363 4,587,963
89,616,108 28,883,892 118,500,000
CONTINUATION SHEET
AIA DOCUMENT G703
AIA document G702, APPLICATION AND CERTIFICATE FOR PAYMENT,
containing Contractor's signed Certification, is attached.
In tabulations below, amounts are stated to the nearest dollar.
Use Column I on Contracts where variable retainage for line items may apply.
APPLICATION NO. 11
APPLICATION DATE: May 22, 2008
PERIOD FROM: May 1, 2008
PERIOD TO: May 31, 2008
ARCHITECTS PROJECT NO.:
A B C D E F G H I
WORK COMPLETED
ITEM NO.
DESCRIPTION OF WORK
SCHEDULED VALUE
FROM PREVIOUS APPLICATION (D + E)
THIS PERIOD
MATERIALS PRESENTLY STORED (NOT IN D OR E)
TOTAL COMPLETED AND STORED TO DATE (D+E+F)
% (G+O)
BALANCE TO FINISH (C-G)
RETAINAGE (10%)
CLARENDON CENTER SOUTH APARTMENTS & OFFICE
1 Photographic Survey-Early Start 1 (Abatement) 2,077 0% 2,077 -
1.1 Photographic Survey-Early Start OCO 1 (Utilities) 2,200 0% 2,200 -
2 Asbestos Abatement- BERO CORPORATION 111,850 0% 111,850 -
2.1 Asbestos Abatement- Additional ACM (810001) 16.037 0% 16.037 -
3 Lump Sum Selective w/ Abatement 15,000 0% 15,000 -
4 Allowance for Asbestos Abatement 136,000 0% 136,000 -
5 Utility Early Start- Water, Sanity & Storm- W. B. HOPKE 530,000 0% 530,000 -
6 Sanitary Sewer Relocation at ODB (810011) 25,948 0% 25,948 -
7 Utility Early Start- Electrical Ducthbank- D.A FOSTER 301,000 0% 301,000 -
8 Conduit [Illegible] (Rev F) 810018 12,618 0% 12,618 -
9 Utility Early Start- Traffic Control (Labor) 3,000 0% 3,000 -
10 Utility Early Start- Layout Engineering 20,000 0% 20,000 -
11 Utility Early Start- Traffic Barriers & Signage 8,000 0% 8,000 -
12 Utility / Cut & Cap Allowance-JOHN VITALE & SONS 42,184 0% 42,184 -
13 Construction Faucing 8,000 0% 8,000 -
14 Mobilization / Erosion Control 27,923 0% 27,923 -
15 Protect WMATA Air Shell / Temp Trash Enclosure at 008 10,600 0% 10,600 -
15.1 Temp Faucing -Sanitary Sewer Relocation 4,516 0% 4,516 -
15.2 Clean-Up 11th Straut - Sanitary Sewer Relocation 500 0% 500 -
16 Layout and Survey-BOWMAN CONSULTING 37,860 0% 37,860 -
16.1 Lay-out and Survey- Sanitary Sewer Relocation 825 0% 825 -
17 Final Cleaning 210,143 0% 210,143 -
CONTINUATION SHEET
AIA DOCUMENT G703
AIA document G702, APPLICATION AND CERTIFICATE FOR PAYMENT,
containing Contractor's signed Certification, is attached.
In tabulations below, amounts are stated to the nearest dollar.
Use Column I on Contracts where variable retainage for line items may apply.
APPLICATION NO. 11
APPLICATION DATE: May 22, 2008
PERIOD FROM: May 1, 2008
PERIOD TO: May 31, 2008
PERIOD TO: May 31, 2008
ARCHITECTS PROJECT NO.:
A B C D E F G H I
WORK COMPLETED
ITEM NO.
DESCRIPTION OF WORK
SCHEDULED VALUE
FROM PREVIOUS APPLICATION (D+E)
THIS PERIOD
MATERIALS PRESENTLY STORED (NOT IN D OR E)
TOTAL COMPLETED AND STORED TO DATE (D+E+F)
% (G+O)
BALANCE TO FINISH (C-G)
RETAINAGE (10%)
CLARENDON CENTER SOUTH APARTMENTS & OFFICE
18 Commisioning Agency 78,000 0% 78,000 -
19 South Block Building Demolition 222,210 0% 222,210 -
19.1 Hand Demo at ODB 810023 16,206 0% 16,296 -
19.2 Saw Cut Grade Beams at ODB 810024 8,237 0% 8,237
19.3 Purge ODB Well w/ Mortar 11,383 0% 11,383
19.4 Demo at Sanitary Sewer Relocation 4,373 0% 4,373
20 Demo W/P & FilI at ODB Stair (610016) 20,000 0% 20,000
21 New Opening at ODB (Allowance) 6,600 0% 5,500
22 Starting & Shoring - CLARK FOUNDATIONS 2,618,530 0% 2,818,530
22.1 South Stock Exploratory Text Pits 25,000 0% 25,000
23 Excavation - THE ANDERSON COMPANY 1,170,000 0% 1,170,000
24 Dewatering 70,000 0% 70,000 -
25 Striping (Parking) 11,043 0% 11.043 -
25.1 Striping (Roads) 18,000 0% 18,000
28 Fountains in line 28
27 Site Concrete - KALOS CONSTRUCTION 403,000 0% 403,000
27.1 Asphalt in line 27
28 Pevots - CHEVY CHASE CONTRACTORS 148,000 0% 148,000 -
29 Landscape / Irrigation / Site Furnishing - CHAPEL VALLEY 392,050 OK 392,050 -
30 South Site Utilities (Well / Added in line 6
31 Concrete - MILLER & LORG 16,875,000 0% 16,875,000
32 Architectural Procast - MODERN MOSAIC 1,800,000 0% 1,800,000
CONTINUATION SHEET
AIA DOCUMENT G703
AIA document G702, APPLICATION AND CERTIFICATE FOR PAYMENT,
containing Contractor's signed Certification, is attached.
In tabulations below, amounts are stated to the nearest dollar.
Use Column I on Contracts where variable retainage for line items may apply.
APPLICATION NO. 11
APPLICATION DATE: May 22, 2008
PERIOD FROM: May 1, 2008
PERIOD TO: May 31, 2008
ARCHITECTS PROJECT NO.:
A B C D E F G H I
WORK COMPLETED
ITEM NO.
DESCRIPTION OF WORK
SCHEDULED VALUE
FROM PREVIOUS APPLICATION (D+E)
MATERIALS PRESENTLY STORED (NOT IN D OR E)
TOTAL COMPLETED AND STORED TO DATE (D+E+F)
% (G+O)
BALANCE TO FINISH (C-G)
RETAINAGE (10%)
CLARENDON CENTER SOUTH APARTMENTS & OFFICE
33 Cast Stone In line 34
34 Masonry - CALVENT MASONRY 6,117,870 0% 6,117,870 -
34.1 [Illegible] 45,000 0% 45,000 -
34.2 Jacob Flashing Material 70,000 0% 70,000
34.3 Mock-Up Pad/Hoisting 12,000 0% 12,000 -
34.4 Landscaping Cast Stone / Precast 47,400 0% 47,400 -
35 Temporary Heat 100,000 0% 100,000 -
36 Exterior Stone - LORTON CONTRACTING 215,400 0% 215,400 -
36.1 Stone Countertops - ONE WORLD VENTURES 417,375 0% 417,375 -
37 Miscellaneous Metals - AIW 2,024,000 0% 2,024,000 -
38 Ornamental Metals - STERLING DULA 256,875 0% 256,875 -
38.1 Metal Panels at Elevators 14,000 0% 14,000 -
38.2 Balcony Soflit Panels 220,000 0% 220,000 -
39 Carpentry - J. ROBERTS, INC. 1,150,000 0% 1,150,000 -
40 Network - BEAUBOIS 970,744 0% 970,744 -
41 Watersproofing - GORDON CONTRACTORS 1,438,050 0% 1,438,050 -
42 EIFS - M&O EXTERIOR APPLICATORS 61,206 0% 61,206 -
43 Weather Border in line 60
44 Metal Panels 218,222 0% 218,222 -
45 Roofing in line 4
46 Cooking 282,015 0% 202,015 -
47 Doors, Frances and Hardware 700,000 0% 700,000
CONTINUATION SHEET AIA DOCUMENT G703
AIA document G702, APPLICATION AND CERTIFICATE FOR PAYMENT, APPLICATION NO.: 11
containing Contractor's signed Certification, is attached APPLICATION DATE: May 22,2008
In tabulations below, amounts are stated to the nearest dollar PERIOD FROM: May 1,2008
Use Column I on Contracts where variable retainage for line items may apply. PERIOD TO: May 31, 2008
ARCHITECTS PROJECT NO:
A B C D E F G H I
ITEM NO. DESCRIPTION OF WORK WORK COMPLETED MATERIALS PRESENTLY STORED (NOT IN D OR E) TOTAL COMPLETED AND STORED TO DATE (D+E+F) % (G+C) BALANCE TO FINISH (C-G) RETAINAGE (10%)
SCHEDULED VALUE FROM PREVIOUS APPLICATION (D+E) THIS PERIOD
CLARENDON CENTER SOUTH APARTMENTS & OFFICE
48 Overhead Doors-DOOR SYSTEMS 73,183 0% 73,183
49 Glass and Glazing -EMMITSBURG GLASS 6,482,812 0% 6,482,812
49.1 Mirrors 88,000 0% 88,000
50 Drywell-C.J. COAKLEY 8,082,000 0% 8,082,000
51 Material (ILLEGIBLE) 282,880 0% 282,880
52 Make Ready Crow 122,000 0% 122,000
53 Tie-C.B. FLOORING 682,180 0% 682,180
54 Wood Floor-NATIONAL COMMERCIAL FLOORING 1,226,301 0% 1,226,301 -
55 Carpet/Resistent in line 65
56 Paint 876,000 0% 876,000
57 South Blook Electronic-NLP 14,000 0% 14,000
58 Toilet Compartments-MATERIAL DISTRIBUTIONS 168,676 0% 168,676
59 Lowers - POLLOCK & BUY 64,280 ox 64,280 -
59. 1 Lowers (install) 10,00 0% 10,000
60 Clocks-ELECTRIC TIME 24,880 0% 24,880 -
60.1 Clocks (install) 8,000 0% 8,008 -
61 Lockers inline 58
62 Fire Extinguishers in line 58
62.1 Fire Extinguishers 6,000 0% 6,000 -
63 (ILLEGIBLE)-BALTIMORE CANVAS 28,881 0% 28,881
64 Mailboxes in line 58
65 Wire Mesh Partitions 43,903 0% 43,903
CONTINUATION SHEET AIA DOCUMENT G703
AIA document G702. APPLICATION AND CERTIFICATE FOR PAYMENT, APPLICATION NO.: 11
Containing Contractor's signed Certification, is attached. APPLICATION DATE: May 22,2008
In tabulations below, amounts are stated to the nearest dollar. PERIOD FROM: May 1,2008
Use Column I on Contracts where variable retainage for line items may apply. PERIOD To: May 31.2008
ARCHITECT'S PROJECT NO:
A B C E F G H I
Item NO. DESCRIPTION OF WORK SCHEDULED VALUE WORK COMPLETED MATERIALS PRESENTLY STORED (NOT IN D OR E) TOTAL COMPLETED AND STORED TO DATE (D+E+F)% (G+C) BALANCE TO FINISH (C-G) RETAINAGE (10%)
FROM PREVIOUS APPLICATION (D+E) THIS PERIOD
CLARENDON CENTER SOUTH APARTMENTS & OFFICE
66 Wire Shelving in line 58
67 Toilet Accessories in line 59
68 Shower Enclosures-GORDON'S GLASS 21,000 0% 21,000
69 Window Washing Equipment 21,413 0% 21,413
70 Interior Signage (Allowance) 16,000 0% 16,000
70.1 Exterior Signage (Allowance) 6,000 0% 6,000
71 Dock Letter/Bumpers in line 48
72 Residential Equipment-M&M APPLIANCE 884,478 0% 884,478
73 Residential Casework 760,000 0% 760,000
74 Floor Mats-THE MATWORKS CO. 7,748 0% 7,748
75 Fireplace-FIREPLACE SOLUTIONS 2,400 0% 2,400
76 Blinds-SUN CONTROL 88,326 0% 88,326
77 Swimming Pool-U.S POOLS 82,800 0% 82,800
78 Elevators 2,800.00 0% 2,800,000
80 Chutes-U.S. CHUTES 80,000 0% 80,000
81 Mechanical- RONCO MECHANICAL 12,510,280 0% 12,510,280
82 Fire Protection-FIREGUARD 1,340,000 0% 1,340,000
S3 Electrical -CHERRY LANE 8,887,910 0% 8,887,910
83.1 Temp Light at 11th Street 8,000 0% 8,000
84 GENERAL CONDITIONS
84.1 Project Supervision 1,478,830 0% 1,478,830
84.2 Project Management 1,971,140 0% 1,971,140
CLARENDON CENTER
SUMMARY OF CLARK CONSTRUCTION G703
SOUTH NORTH
BLOCK BLOCK TOTAL
Photographic Survey - Early Start 1 (Abatement) 2,077 2,077
Photographic Survey - Early Start OCO 1 (Utilities) 2,200 2,200
Asbestos Abatement 111,650 111,650
Abestos Abatement - Additional ACM 15,037 15,037
Lump Sum Selective Demo assoc w/ Abatement 15,000 15,000
Allowance for Asbestos Abatement 135,000 135,000
Utility Early Start - Water, Sanity & Storm 530,000 530,000
Sanitary Sewer Relocation at ODB 25,948 25,948
Utility Early Start - Electrical Ductbank 301,000 301,000
Conduit Revisions 12,616 12,616
Utility Early Start - Traffic Control (Labor) 3,000 3,000
Utility Early Start - Layout Engineering 20,000 20,000
Utility Early Start - Traffic Barriers & Signage 9,000 9,000
Utility / cut & Cap Allowance 42,184 42,184
Construction Fencing 6,000 6,000
Mobilization / Erosion control 27,923 27,923
Protect WMATA Air Shaft / Temp Trash Enclosure at ODB 10,500 10,500
Temp Fencing - Sanitary Sewer Rolocation 4,515 4,515
Clean Up 11th Street - Sanitary Sewer Relocation 500 500
Layout and Survey 37,850 32,650 70,500
Layout and Survey - Sanitary Sewer Relocation 825 825
Final Cleaning 210,143 48,171 258,314
Commissioning Agency 78,000 22,000 100,000
Temporary Fence 5,400 5,400
Facade Restoration 173,395 173,395
Building Demolition 222,210 148,660 370,870
Hand Demo at ODB 810023 15,295 15,295
Saw Cut Grade Beams at ODB 810024 6,237 6,237
Parge ODB Wall w/ Mortar 11,363 11,363
Demo at Sanitary Sewer Relocation 4,373 4,373
Demo, W/P & Fill at ODB Sair (810015) 20,000 20,000
New Opening at ODB (Allowance) 5,500 5,500
Existing Conditions Survey 11,000 11,000
Sheeting & Shoring 2,618,530 1,408,118 4,026,648
South Block Exploratory Test Pits 25,000 25,000
North Steel Increase 30,112 30,112
Excavation 1,170,000 670,000 1,840,000
Dewatering 70,000 60,000 130,000
Striping (Parking) 11,043 13,708 24,751
Striping (Roads) 16,000 10,000 26,000
Fountains -
Site Concrete 403,600 247,500 651,100
Asphalt -
Pavers 146,000 52,000 198,000
Landscape / Irrigation / Site Furnishing 392,050 154,785 546,835
Utilities (Wet) / Added 266,000 266,000
Utilities (Dry) 50,000 50,000
Concrete 15,875,000 5,841,000 21,716,000
Architectural Precast 1,600,000 42,000 1,642,000
Cast Stone -
Masonry 5,117,670 2,117,560 7,235,230
CONTINUATION SHEET AIA DOCUMENT G703
AIA document G702, APPLICATION AND CERTIFICATE FOR PAYMENT, APPLICATION NO.: 11
containing Contractor's signed Certification, is attached. APPLICATION DATE: May 22, 2008
In tabulations below, amounts are stated to the nearest dollar. PERIOD FROM: May 1, 2008
Use Column I on Contracts where variable retainage for line items may apply. PERIOD TO: May 31, 2008
ARCHITECTS PROJECT NO.:
A B C D E F G H I
WORK COMPLETED MATERIALS TOTAL
ITEM NO. DESCRIPTION OF WORK SCHEDULED VALUE FROM PREVIOUS APPLICATION (D+E) THIS PERIOD PRESENTLY STORED (NOT IN D OR E) COMPLETED AND STORED TO DATE (D+E+F)% (G+C) BALANCE TO FINISH (C-G) RETAINAGE (10%)
CLARENDON CENTER SOUTH APARTMENTS & OFFICE
84.3 Field Engineering 306,360 0% 306,360
84.4 Jobsite Safety 442,200 0% 442,200
84.5 Jobsite Cleanup 130,388 0% 130,388
84.6 Field Engineering Supplies & Equipment 35,400 0% 35,400
84.7 Society Equipment & Materials 27,776 0% 27,776
84.8 [ILLEGIBLE] [ILLEGIBLE] 0% [ILLEGIBLE]
84.9 Jobsite Office and Site Expenses [ILLEGIBLE] 0% [ILLEGIBLE]
84.10 Jobsite Administration [ILLEGIBLE] 0% [ILLEGIBLE]
85 RAILROAD INSURANCE 28,677 0% 28,677
86 CONSTRUCTION CONTINGENCY 1,186,724 0% 1,186,724
86.1 Contingency Distribursements 237,076 0% 237,076
87 SUBGUARD [ILLEGIBLE] 0% [ILLEGIBLE]
88 GENERAL LIABILITY INSURANCE 420,311 0% 420,311
89 CCP 1,055,478 0% 1,055,478
90 GROSS RECEIPTS TAX 152,827 0% 152,827
91 FEE 3,477,600 0% 3,477,600
SUBTOTAL 88,818,108 0 0 0 0 0% 88,818,108 0
#DIV/01
#DIV/01
CONTINUATION SHEET AIA DOCUMENT G703
AIA document G702 APPLICATION AND CERTIFICATE FOR PAYMENT, APPLICATION NO.:
containing Contractor's signed Certification, is attached. APPLICATION DATE: May 22, 2008
In tabulations below, amounts are stated to the nearest dollar. PERIOD FROM: May 1, 2008
Use Column I on Contractor where variable retainage for line items may apply. PERIOD TO: May 31, 2008
ARCHITECTS PROJECT NO.:
A B C E F G H I
WORK COMPLETED
ITEM NO. DESCRIPTION OF WORK SCHEDULED VALUE FROM PREVIOUS APPLICATION (D+E) THIS PERIOD MATERIALS PRESENTLY STORED (NOT IN D OR E) TOTAL COMPLETED AND STORED TO DATE (D+E+F) %(G+C) BALANCE TO FINISH (C-G) RETAINAGE (10%)
CLARENDON CENTER SOUTH APARTMENTS & OFFICE #DIV/01
#DIV/01
#DIV/01 #DIV/01 #DIV/01
APPROVED CHANGE ORDER TOTAL 0 0 0 0 0 #DIV/01 0 0
TOTAL TO DATE (CONTRACT + COs] [ILLEGIBLE] 0 0 0 0 0% [ILLEGIBLE] 0
CONTINUATION SHEET AIA DOCUMENT G703
AIA document G702, APPLICATION AND CERTIFICATE FOR PAYMENT, APPLICATION NO.: 01
containing Contractor's signed Certification, is attached. APPLICATION DATE: May 22, 2008
In tabulations below, amounts are stated to the nearest dollar. PERIOD FROM: May 1, 2008
Use Column 1 on Contracts where variable retainage for line items may apply. PERIOD To: May 31, 2008
ARCHITECTS PROJECT NO.:
A B C D E F G H I
WORK COMPLETED
ITEM
No. DESCRIPTION OF WORK SCHEDULED VALUE FROM PREVIOUS APPLICATION (D+E) THIS PERIOD MATERIALS PRESENTLY STORED (NOT IN D OR E) TOTAL COMPLETED AND STORED TO DATE (D+E+F)% (G+C) BALANCE TO FINISH (C-G) RETAINAGE
(10%)
CLARENDON CENTER NORTH OFFICE
1 Layout and Survey-BOWMAN CONSULTING [ILLEGIBLE] 0% [ILLEGIBLE] -
2 Final Cleaning 48,171 0% 48,171 -
3 Commissioning Agency 22,000 0% 22,000 -
4 Temporary [ILLEGIBLE] 5,400 0% 5,400 -
5 [ILLEGIBLE] Restoration-WORCESTER EISENBRADT [ILLEGIBLE] 0% [ILLEGIBLE]
6 North Building Demolition-BERG CORPORATION [ILLEGIBLE] 0% [ILLEGIBLE] -
7 Existing Conditions Survey 11,000 0% 11,000 -
8 Shooting & Storing - CLARK FOUNDATIONS [ILLEGIBLE] 0% [ILLEGIBLE] -
8.1 North Steel Increase 30,112 0% 30,112 -
9 Excavation-THE ANDERSON COMPANY 670,000 0% 670,000 -
10 [ILLEGIBLE] 60,000 0% 60,000 -
11 [ILLEGIBLE] [ILLEGIBLE] 13,708 0% 13,708 -
12 [ILLEGIBLE] [ILLEGIBLE] 10,000 0% 10,000 -
13 Site Concrete-KALOS CONSTRUCTION 247,600 0% 247,600 -
14 Asphalt in fine 13
15 Paws - CHEVY CHASE CONTRACTORS 52,000 0% 52,000 -
16 Landscape/Irrigation/Site [ILLEGIBLE] - CHAPEL VALLEY 164,785 0% 164,785 -
17 North Site Utilities (Wet) 288, 000 0% 288, 000 -
18 North Site Utilities (Dry) 50,000 0% 50,000 -
19 Concrete 5,841,000 0% 5,841,000 -
20 Architectural/[ILLEGIBLE]-MODERN MOSAIC 42,000 0% 42,000 -
21 Cost [ILLEGIBLE] in fine 22
CONTINUATION SHEET AIA DOCUMENT G703
AIA document G702 APPLICATION AND CERTIFICATE FOR PAYMENT APPLICATION NO.: 01
containing Contractor's signed Certification, is attached APPLICATION DATE: May 22,2008
In tabulations below, amounts are stated to the nearest dollar PERIOD PROM May 1,2008
Use Column I on Contracts where variable retainage for line items may apply PERIOD TO: May 31,2008
ARCHITECTS PROJECT NO.:
A B C D E F G H I
WORK COMPLETED
ITEM
No. DESCRIPTION OF WORK SCHEDULED VALUE FROM PREVIOUS APPLICATION (D+E) THIS PERIOD MATERIALS PRESENTLY STORED (NOT IN D OR E) TOTAL COMPLETED AND STORED TO DATE (D+E+F)% (G+C)BALANCE TO FINISH (C-G) RETAINAGE (10%)
CLARENDON CENTER NORTH OFFICE
22 [Illegible] -CALVENT MASONARY 2,117,680 0% 2,117,680 -
23 [Illegible] 20,000 0% 20,000 -
23.1 [Illegible] Floating Material 30,000 0% 30,000 -
232 Holexing /Rehab- Cast Stobe/Precest 40,001 0% 40,000 -
24 Temporary Heat 50,000 0% 50,000 -
25 Exterior Stone -LORTON CONTRACTING 110,800 0% 110,800 -
26 Miscellaneuos Matels-AIW 888,006 0% 888,000 -
27 Ornamental Metals-STERLING DONA 26,006 0% 26,000 -
28 Carpantry- J. ROBERTS, iNC 300,000 0% 300,000 -
29 Network-BEAUSBOIS 28,300 0% 28,300 -
30 Waterproofing-GORDON CONTRACTORS 642,600 0% 642,600 -
31 [Illegible] EXTERIOR APPLICATORS 82,271 0% 82,271 -
32 Weather Benter
33 Metal Panels 144,1481 0% 144,148 -
34 Roofing in line 30
35 Checking 149,834 0% 148,834 -
36 Doors, Frames and Hardware 110,008 0% 110,000 -
37 38 Overheed Doors-DOOR SYSTEM Glass and Glaizing-EXHIBITS GLASS 38,807 2,345,083 0% 0% 38,807 2,346,083 -
38 Glass [Illegible] 2, 345,053 [Illegible] 0% 2,345,053 -
39 Drywell-C.J.COAKLEY 818,00 0% 816,000 -
40 Material Hoist 44,880 0% 44,880 -
41 Tile & Terrezzo-C.B FLOORING 120,000 0% 120,000 -
CONTINUATION SHEET AIA DOCUMENT G703
AIA document G702, APPLICATION AND CERTIFICATE FOR PAYMENT, APPLICATION NO.: 01
containing Contractor's signed Certification, is attached. APPLICATION DATE: May 22, 2008
In tabulations below, amounts are stated to the nearest dollar. PERIOD FROM May 1, 2008
Use Column I on Contracts where variable retainage for line items may apply. PERIOD TO: May 31, 2008
ARCHITECTS PROJECT NO.:
A B C D E F G H I
ITEM NO. DESCRIPTION OF WORK WORK COMPLETED MATERIALS PRESENTLY STORED (NOT IN D OR E) TOTAL COMPLETED AND STORED TO DATE (D+E+F)
% (G+C) BALANCE TO FINISH (C-G) RETAINAGE (10%)
SCHEDULED VALUE FROM PREVIOUS APPLICATION (D+E) THIS PERIOD
CLARENDON CENTER NORTH OFFICE
42 Carpet/Illegible-NATIONAL COMMERCIAL FLOORING 8055 0% 8,055 -
43 Paint 150,000 0% 150,000 -
44 Toilet Compartments-MATERIAL DISTRIBUTIONS 63,725 0% 63,725 -
45 Lourers-POLLOCK & GUY 24,600 0% 24,600 -
46 Louvers (install) 6,000 0% 6,000 -
47 Lockers in line 44
48 Fire Extinguishers in line 44
49 Fire Extinguishers (unbought) 5.000 0% 5,000 -
50 Illigible-BALTIMORE CANVAS 33,619 0% 33.619 -
51 Wire Mash Partitions 2,000 0% 2000 -
52 Illigible Accessories in line 44
53 Window Wasting Equipment 10,361 0% 10,361 -
54 Interior Signage (Allowance) 5,000 0% 5,000 -
55 Exterior Signage (Allowance) 5,000 0% 5,000 -
56 Floor Mats-THE MATWORKS CO. 8,297 0% 8,297 -
57 Blinds-SUN CONTROL 30,826 0% 30,826 -
58 Elevators 1,100,000 0% 1,100,000 -
59 Mechanical-RONCO MECHANICAL 2,838,760 0% 2,838,760 -
60 Fire Protection-FIREGUARD 300,000 0% 300,000 -
61 Electrical -CHERRY LANE 1,801,880 0% 1,801,880 -
62 Traffic Illigible Allowance 100,000 0% 100,000 -
63 GENERAL CONDITIONS
 
CONTINUATION SHEET AIA DOCUMENT G703
AIA DOCUMENT G702, APPLICATION AND CERTIFICATE FOR PAYMENT, APPLICATION NO.: 01
containing Contractor's signed Certification, is attached. APPLICATION DATE: May 22, 2008
In tabulations below, amounts are stated to the nearest dollar. PERIOD FROM May 1, 2008
Use Column I on Contracts where variable retainage for line items may apply. PERIOD TO: May 31, 2008
ARCHITECTS PROJECT NO.:
A B C F G H I
ITEM NO. DESCRIPTION OF WORK SCHEDULED VALUE FROM PREVIOIIS APPLICATION (D+E) THIS PERIOD WORK COMPLETED MATERIALS PRESENTLY STORED (NOTIN D OR E) TOTAL COMPLETED AND STORED TO DATE (D+E+F) % (G+C) BALANCE TO FINISH (C-G) RETAINAGE (10%)
CLARENDON CENTER NORTH OFFICE
63.1 Project Supervision 481,838 0% 481,838 -
63.2 Project Management 378,490 0% 378,490 -
63.3 Field Engineering 177,684 0% 177,684 -
63.4 Jobsite Safety 118,324 0% 118,324 -
63.5 Jobsite Cleanup 35,8380% 35,838 -
63.6 Field Engineering & Equipment 20,200 0% 20,200 -
63.7 Safety Equipment & Materials 18,2750% 18,275 -
63.8 Dumpster 22,5000% 22,500 -
63.9 Jobsite Office and Site Expenses 82,4000% 82,400 -
63.10 Jobsite Administration 318,8100% 318,810 -
64 CONSTRUCTION CONTINGENCY 1,448,358 0% 1,448,358
65 Contingency Disbursement 0 #DIV/01 - -
66 SUBGUARD 192,939 0% 192,939 -
67 GENERAL LIABILITY INSURANCE 131,724 0% 131,724 -
68 CCIP 334,488 0% 334,488 -
69 GROSS RECEIPTS TAX 44,379 0% 44,379 -
70 FEE 1,110,384 0% 1,110,384 -
SUBTOTAL 28,883,882 0 0 0 0 0% 28,883,882 0 -
#DIV/01
 
CONTINUATION SHEET AIA DOCUMENT G703
AIA document G702, APPLICATION AND CERTIFICATE FOR PAYMENT, APPLICATION NO.: 01
containing Contractor's signed Certification, is attached. APPLICATION DATE: May 22,2008
In tabulations below, amounts are stated to the nearest dollar. PERIOD FROM: May 1,2008
Use Column I on Contracts where variable retainage for line items may apply. PERIOD TO: May 31,2008
ARCHITECTS PROJECT NO.:
A B C D E F G H I
WORK COMPLETED MATERIALS TOTAL
ITEM NO. DESCRIPTION OF WORK SCHEDULED VALUE FROM PREVIOUS APPLICATlON (D+E) THIS PERIOD PRESENTLY STORED (NOT IN D OR E) COMPLETED AND STORED TO DATE (D+E+F) % (G+C) BALANCE TO FINISH (C-G) RETAINAGE (10%)
CLARENDON CENTER NORTH OFFICE
#DIV/01 #DIV/01 #DIV/01 #DIV/01 #DIV/01 #DIV/01 - - - - - - - - - - - -
APPROVED CHANGE ORDER TOTAL 0 0 0 0 0 #DIV/01 0 0
TOTAL TO DATE (CONTRACT + COs) 28,883,882 0 0 0 0 0% 28,883,882 0
EXHIBIT F
TITLE INSURANCE REQUIREMENTS
A commitment for an ALTA 1992 Form Loan Policy of Title Insurance (or equivalent) issued by a reputable, national title insurance company acceptable to Lender, which (a) is in the amount of the loan, (b) shows Agent as the proposed insured, (c) shows Borrower as fee owner of the property, (d) includes in the legal description of the property all appurtenant easements, (e) provides for the deletion of all Standard Exceptions, (f) provides for the deletion of the Creditors' Rights Exception, (g) shows no delinquent taxes, (h) is accompanied by legible copies of all documents referred to therein, and (i) includes the following Endorsements (i) ALTA Form 3.0 (zoning), (ii) ALTA Form 9 (comprehensive), (iii) variable rate (which references the rate determination formula as set forth in the Loan Agreement), (iv) separate tax parcel, (v) subdivision, (vi) usury, (vii) affirmative mechanics' lien coverage, (viii) pending disbursements clause and (ix) address. Direct access reinsurance will be required only to the extent the title insurance company's maximum limits, as determined by Agent, are less than the amount of the loan.
F-1
A/72437573.12
EXHIBIT G
INSURANCE REQUIREMENTS
I. PROPERTY INSURANCE
A. DURING CONSTRUCTION
An ORIGINAL (or certified copy) Builder's All-Risk, Completed Value, Non-Reporting Form Policy or ORIGINAL Acord 27 or 28 (2003/10) form of Certificate of Insurance naming the borrowing entity as an insured, reflecting coverage of 100% of the replacement cost, and written by a carrier approved by Agent with a current Best's Insurance Guide Rating of at least A- IX (which is authorized to do business in the state in which the property is located) that includes:
1. Mortgagee Clause naming U.S. Bank National Association as Mortgagee with a 30-day notice to Agent in the event of cancellation, non-renewal or material change
2. Agent's Loss Payable Endorsement with a Severability of Interest Clause with a 30-day notice to Agent in the event of cancellation, non-renewal or material change
3. Replacement Cost Endorsement
4. No Exclusion for Acts of Terrorism
5. No Coinsurance Clause
6. Flood Insurance
7. Collapse and Earthquake Coverage
8. Vandalism and Malicious Mischief Coverage
9. Boiler and Machinery Coverage
10. Demolition, Increased Cost of Construction Coverage
11. In-Transit Coverage
12. Partial Occupancy Permitted
13. Borrower's coverage is primary and non-contributory with any insurance of self-insurance carried by U.S. Bank National Association
14. Waiver of Subrogation against any party whose interests are covered in the policy.
15. Coverage to become effective upon the date of the Notice to Proceed, the date of site mobilization or the start of any shipment of materials, machinery or equipment to the site, whichever is earlier, and to remain in effect until replaced by permanent All Risk Property Insurance described below, or until such other time as may be mutually agreed upon by Agent and Borrower
B. UPON COMPLETION
An ORIGINAL (or certified copy) All-Risk Hazard Insurance Policy or ORIGINAL Acord 27 or 28 (2003/10) form of Certificate of Insurance naming the borrowing entity as an insured, reflecting coverage of 100% of the replacement cost, and written by a carrier
G-1
A/72437573.12
approved by Agent with a current Best's Insurance Guide Rating of at least A- IX (which is authorized to do business in the state in which the property is located) that includes:
1. Mortgage Clause naming U.S. Bank National Association as Mortgagee with a 30-day notice to Agent in the event of cancellation, non-renewal or material change
2. Agent's Loss Payable Endorsement with a Severability of Interest Clause with a 30-day notice to Agent in the event of cancellation, non-renewal or material change
3. Replacement Cost Endorsement.
4. No Exclusion for Acts of Terrorism.
5. No Coinsurance Clause
6. Boiler and Machinery Coverage.
7. Sprinkler Leakage Coverage.
8. Vandalism and Malicious Mischief Coverage.
9. Flood Insurance.
10. Loss of Rents Insurance in an amount of not less-than 100% of one year's Rental Value of the Project. "Rental Value" shall include:
a) The total projected gross rental income from tenant occupancy of the Project as set forth in the Budget,
b) The amount of all charges which are the legal obligation of tenants and which would otherwise be the obligation of Borrower, and
c) The fair rental value of any portion of the Project which is occupied by Borrower.
11. One year's business interruption insurance in an amount acceptable to Agent
12. Collapse and Earthquake Coverage.
13. Extra Expense Coverage.
14. Borrower's coverage is primary and con-contributory with any insurance or self-insurance carried by U.S. Bank National Association..
15. Waiver of Subrogation against any party whose interest are covered in the policy.
II. LIABILITY INSURANCE
An ORIGINAL Acord 25 Certificate of General Comprehensive Liability Insurance naming the borrowing entity as an insured, and written by a carrier approved by Agent with a current Best's Insurance Guide Rating of at least A- IX (which is authorized to do business in the state in which the property is located) that includes:
1. $2,000,000 property damage
2. $3,000,000 bodily damage
3. $5,000,000 aggregate limit
4. $2,000,000 excess or umbrella liability coverage
G-2
A/72437573.12
Additional Insured Endorsement naming U.S. Bank National Association as an additional insured with a 30-day notice to Agent in the event of cancellation, non-renewal or material change
III. WORKER'S COMPENSATION
An ORIGINAL Certificate of Worker's Compensation coverage in the statutory amount, naming the General Contractor and written by a carrier approved by Agent, provided that Agent hereby approves Zurich for such purpose.
G-3
A/72437573.12
EXHIBIT H
NOTICES AND WIRE INSTRUCTIONS
THE BANKS
Bank Name:
U.S. Bank National Association
c/o Commercial Loan Services - West
McLean, Virginia
ABA #:
123000220
Acct #:
003 400 12160600
Ref:
Saul Holdings, LP
Attention:
Cheryl Durst
(612) 303-3537
BORROWER
Bank Name:
Chevy Chase Bank F.S.B.
Bethesda, Maryland, 20814
ABA #:
255071981
Account Name for Wire Reference:
Saul Holdings Limited Partnership
Account #:
01-437280-1
Attention:
Doug Day or Keisha DeShields
(301) 986-6382 or (301) 986-6392
TITLE COMPANY
Bank Name:
Bank of America, N.A.
Bank Address:
100 N. Tryon Street, Charlotte, NC 28202
ABA Number:
026 009 593
Account Name:
Commonwealth Land Title Insurance Company
CRESPA Account
Account Number:
1925666531
Advise to:
DPN 08-001288 RQ11254292
Clarendon Center
GENERAL CONTRACTOR
Bank Name:
Bank of America
Charlotte, NC 28255
ABA #:
026009593
Account #:
000694883015
Reference or Loan Number:
Job #112727 - CLARENDON CTR SOUTH APTS
OFFCE
Attention:
Tom Brogan, (301) 272-6819
H-1
A/72437573.12
EXHIBIT I
COMMITMENTS AND COMMITMENT PERCENTAGES OF LENDERS
Bank
Commitment
Commitment Percentage
U.S. Bank National Association
$50,000,000.00
31.746031746031%
HSBC Realty Credit Corporation (USA)
$40,000,000.00
25.396825396825%
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association
$27,500,000.00
17.460317460318%
Compass Bank
$25,000,000.00
15.873015873016%
Raymond James Bank, FSB
$15,000,000.00
9.523809523810%
TOTAL
$157,500,000.00
100.0%
I-1
A/72437573.12
EXHIBIT J
FORM OF LIEN WAIVER
[Forms attached on following pages]
G-l-2
A/72437573.12
FORM OF
CONTRACTOR AFFIDAVIT AND WAIVER OF CLAIMS AND LIENS
THE STATE OF)
) ss.
COUNTY OF)
BEFORE ME, the undersigned authority, on this day personally appeared
, known to me to be a credible person and officer of
("Contractor") and who, being duly sworn, upon his oath declares
and acknowledges as follows:
Title and Date of "Agreement":
Name of "Owner":
Name of "Contractor":
Description of "Land":
Description of "Improvements":
Current "Guaranteed Maximum Price"/"Contract Sum":
"Project State":
THIS WAIVER IS: A Final Waiver
A Partial Waiver
1. I am the duly authorized agent for Contractor, which has authorized me to make this affidavit, to enter into the agreements and to grant the waivers herein set forth, on its behalf and as its acts and deeds. All the statements in this Affidavit are true and correct.
2. Pursuant to the Agreement, Contractor has supplied materials and performed labor in connection with the construction of the Improvements on the Land.
IF FINAL WAIVER, COMPLETE THE FOLLOWING PARAGRAPH 3 AND THE FOLLOWING PARAGRAPH 4 AND APPLIES:
3. Contractor has received Dollars
($ ) [insert amount of Final Payment], which constitutes payment in full for any and
all materials supplied and labor performed by or on behalf or Contractor on the above described Land and Improvements. Contractor waives and releases any and all liens, claims, causes of action, suits, demands, rights and interests (whether choate or inchoate and including, without limitation, all mechanic's and materialman's liens under the Constitution and statutes of the Project State) owned, claimed or held by Contractor against Owner, its lenders or guarantors, and/or the Land and Improvements or any part thereof by reason of materials supplied or labor performed on said Land and Improvements or for any other reason,
4. Contractor warrants that all costs that contractor has incurred and bills that Contractor owes to others for materials supplied or labor performed in connection with the Land or Improvements have been fully paid and satisfied, Contractor further warrants that should any claim or lien be filed for material supplied or labor performed in connection with the Improvements, Contractor will immediately furnish a bond for the release of such claim or lien, obtain settlement of any such claim or lien, and furnish Owner a written, full release of such claim or lien. Should Contractor be
G-1-3
A/72437573.12
unable to obtain such release, Contractor agrees to fully indemnify and hold harmless Owner from any and all costs it may incur by reason of such claim or lien.
IF PARTIAL WAIVER, COMPLETE THE FOLLOWING PARAGRAPHS 3, 4 AND 5:
3. Contractor has received payment in the amount of Dollars ($ ) [insert total of all payments received to date], for all materials supplied and labor performed by or on behalf of Contractor] in connection with the construction of the Improvements during the period through , 20 . [Insert date of end of prior progress payment period.] Accordingly, except for retainage and documented potential change orders submitted to the Owner in writing as of , 20 [insert date of end of prior progress payment period], Contractor waives and releases any and all liens, claims; causes of action, suits, demands, rights and interests (whether choate or inchoate and including, without limitation, all mechanic's and materialmen's liens under the Constitution and statutes of the Project State) owned, claimed, or held by Contractor against Owner, its lenders or guarantors, and/or the Land and Improvements or any part thereof by reason of materials supplied or labor performed on the Land and Improvements or for any other reason through , 20 [insert date of end of prior progress payment period].
4. In consideration of and conditioned upon receipt from Owner of Dollars ($ ) [insert amount approved for payment in current Application for Payment], the sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, Contractor waives and releases any and all liens, claims, causes of action, suits, demands, rights and interests (whether choate or inchoate and including, without limitation, all mechanic's and materialman's liens under the Constitution and statutes of the Project State) owned, claimed or held by Contractor against Owner, its lenders or guarantors, and/or the Land and Improvements or any part thereof by reason of materials supplied or labor performed on the Land and Improvements or for any other reason through , 200 [insert date covered by present Application for Payment].
5. Contractor warrants that all costs that Contractor has incurred and bills that Contractor owes to others for materials supplied or labor performed in connection with the Land or Improvements through , 20 [insert date of end of prior progress payment period] have been fully paid and satisfied. Contractor further warrants that should any claim or lien be filed for material supplied or labor performed through , 20 [same date], Contractor shall immediately furnish a bond for the release of each such claim or lien, obtain settlement of each such claim or lien, and furnish Owner written full release of such claim or lien, Should Contractor be unable to obtain such release, Contractor agrees to indemnify and hold harmless Owner (and its lenders and guarantors) for any and all costs it may incur by reason of such claim or lien.
EXECUTED this day of , 20.
CONTRACTOR
By:
Title:
G-l-4
A/72437573.12
SUBSCRIBED AND SWORN TO before me the said Contractor Affidavit and Waiver of Claims and Liens, this day of , 20 , to certify which witness my hand and seal of office.
NOTARY PUBLIC in and for County,
My Commission Expires:
G-l-5
A/72437573.12
FORM OF
SUBCONTRACTOR AFFIDAVIT AND PARTIAL RELEASE OF CLAIMS AND LIEN WAIVER
THE STATE OF)
) ss.
COUNTY OF )
BEFORE ME, the undersigned authority, on this day personally appeared
, known to me to be a credible person and officer of
("Subcontractor") and who, being duly sworn, upon his oath declares
and acknowledges as follows:
Summary of Subcontract:
Base Subcontract Amount:
Approved Changes to Date:
Revised Subcontract Amount:
Amount Paid to Date:
Current Payment Due:
Balance Due on Subcontract:
1. I am the duly authorized agent for Subcontractor, which has authorized me to make this affidavit, to enter into the agreements and to grant the waivers herein set forth, on its behalf and as its acts and deeds. All the statements in this Affidavit are true and correct.
2. In connection with an agreement dated , 20 between ("Owner") and ("Contractor"), and pursuant to an agreement dated , 20 between Contractor and Subcontractor, Subcontractor has supplied materials and performed labor in connection with the construction of improvements upon certain real property known as ("Land"). These improvements are more particularly described as construction of ("Improvements").
3. Subcontractor has received payment in the amount of Dollars ($ ) [insert total of all payments received to date for all materials supplied and labor performed by or on behalf of Subcontractor] in connection with the Improvements during the period through , 20 . [Insert date of end of prior progress payment period.] Accordingly, except for retainage Subcontractor waives and releases any and all liens, claims, causes of action, suits, demands, rights and interests (whether choate or inchoate and including, without limitation, all mechanic's and materialmen's liens under the Constitution and statutes of the State/Commonwealth of ) owned, claimed, or held by Subcontractor against the Contractor, Contractor's sureties, the Owner, Owner's lenders and guarantors, and/or the Land and Improvements or any part thereof by reason of materials supplied or labor performed on the Land and Improvements or for any other reason through , 200 [insert date of end of prior progress payment period].
4. In consideration of and conditioned upon the payment by Contractor of the sum of Dollars ($ ) [insert amount approved for payment in present Application for Payment], the sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, Subcontractor waives and releases any and all liens, claims, causes of action, suits, demands, rights and interests
G-2-1
A/72437573.12
(whether choate or inchoate and including, without limitation, all mechanic's and materialman's liens under the Constitution and statutes of the State/ Commonwealth of ) owned, claimed or held by Subcontractor against the Contractor, Contractor's sureties, the Owner, Owner's lenders and guarantors, and/or the Land and Improvements, or any part thereof by reason of materials supplied or labor performed on the Land and Improvements or for any other reason through , 200 [insert date covered by present application for payment].
5. Subcontractor warrants that all costs that Subcontractor has incurred and bills that Subcontractor owes to others for materials supplied or labor performed in connection with the Land or Improvements through [insert date of end of prior progress payment period] have been fully paid and satisfied. Subcontractor further warrants that should any claim or lien be filed for material supplied or labor performed by virtue of Subcontractor's participation in the construction of the Improvements, Subcontractor will immediately furnish a bond for the release of each such claim or lien, obtain settlement of each such claim or lien, and furnish Owner and Contractor written full release of such claim or lien, Should Subcontractor be unable to obtain such release, Subcontractor agrees to fully indemnify and hold harmless Contractor and Owner (and its lenders and guarantors) for any and all costs they may incur by reason of such claim or lien.
EXECUTED this day of , 20.
SUBCONTRACTOR
By:
Title:
SUBSCRIBED AND SWORN TO before me the said Subcontractor Affidavit and Partial Waiver of Claims and Liens, this day of , 20, to certify which witness my hand and seal of office.
NOTARY PUBLIC in and for County,
My Commission Expires:
G-2-2
A/72437573.12
FORM OF
SUBCONTRACTOR AFFIDAVIT AND FINAL RELEASE OF CLAIMS AND LIEN WAIVER
THE STATE OF)
) ss.
COUNTY OF)
BEFORE ME, the undersigned authority, on this day personally appeared, known to me to be a credible person and officer of ("Subcontractor") and who, being duly sworn, upon his oath declares and acknowledges as follows:
1. I am the duly authorized agent for Subcontractor, which has authorized me to make this affidavit, to enter into the agreements and to grant the waivers herein set forth, on its behalf and as its acts and deeds. All the statements in this Affidavit are true and correct.
2. In connection with an agreement dated , 20 between ("Owner") and ("Contractor"), and pursuant to an agreement dated , 20 between Contractor and Subcontractor, Subcontractor has supplied materials and performed labor in connection with the construction of improvements upon certain real property known as ("Land"). These improvements are more particularly described as ("Improvements").
3. Subcontractor hereby certifies it has received payment in the amount of Dollars ($ ) [insert amount of Final Payment] which constitutes payment in full for any and all materials supplied and labor performed by or on behalf of Subcontractor in connection with the Land and Improvements. Accordingly, Subcontractor waives and releases any and all liens, claims, causes of action, suits, demands, rights and interests (whether choate or inchoate and including, without limitation, all mechanic's and materialman's liens under the Constitution and statutes of the State/Commonwealth of ) owned, claimed or held by Subcontractor against the Contractor, Contractor's sureties, the Owner, Owner's lenders and guarantors, and/or the Land and Improvements or any part thereof by reason of materials supplied or labor performed on such Land and Improvements or for any other reason.
4. Subcontractor warrants that all costs that Subcontractor has incurred and bills that Subcontractor owes to others for materials supplied or labor performed or labor performed in connection with the Land or Improvements have been fully paid and satisfied. Subcontractor further warrants that should any claim or lien be filed for material supplied or labor performed by virtue of Subcontractor's participation in the construction of the Improvements, Subcontractor will immediately furnish a bond for the release of each such claim or lien, obtain settlement of any such claim or lien, and furnish Owner and Contractor written full release of such claim or lien, Should Subcontractor be unable to obtain such release, Subcontractor agrees to fully indemnify and hold harmless Contractor and Owner (and its lenders and guarantors) from any and all costs they may incur by reason of such claim or lien.
EXECUTED this day of , 20.
SUBCONTRACTOR
J-l
A/72437573.12
 
By:
Title:
SUBSCRIBED AND SWORN TO before me the said Subcontractor Affidavit and Final Release of Claims and Liens, this day of , 20, to certify which witness my hand and seal of office.
NOTARY PUBLIC in and for County,
My Commission Expires:
J-2
A/72437573.12
EXHIBIT K
DRAW REQUEST FORM
Borrower hereby certifies as follows (all terms herein having the meanings set forth in the Construction Loan Agreement ["Loan Agreement"] dated May , 2008 between Borrower and U.S. Bank National Association as Agent ["Agent"], and the Lenders [as defined therein]):
(a) At the date hereof no suit or proceeding at law or in equity, and no investigation or proceeding of any governmental body, has been instituted or, to the knowledge of Borrower, is threatened, which in either case would substantially affect the condition or business operations of Borrower, except the following:
(b) At the date hereof, no default or event of default under the Loan Agreement or under any of the other Loan Documents has occurred and is continuing, and no event has occurred which, upon the service of notice and/or the lapse of time, would constitute an event of default thereunder, except the following:
(c) The representations and warranties set forth in Article IV of the Loan Agreement are hereby reaffirmed and restated, and Borrower represents and warrants to Agent and the Lenders that the same are true, correct and complete on the date hereof, except as to the following:
(d) No material adverse change has occurred in the financial condition or in the assets or liabilities of Borrower from those set forth in the latest financial statements for each furnished to Agent, except the following:
(e) The progress of construction of the Project is such that it can be completed on or before the Completion Date specified in the Loan Agreement for the cost originally represented to Lender, except for the following:
(f) The Loan, as of the date hereof, is in balance as required by the Loan Agreement.
(g) The labor, materials, equipment, work, services and supplies described herein have been performed upon or furnished to the Project in full accordance with the Plans, which have not been amended except as expressly permitted by the Loan Agreement.
(h) There have been no changes in the costs of the Project from those set forth on the Sworn Construction Cost Statement, as amended by any amendment thereto heretofore delivered by Borrower to Agent and approved by Agent, if such approval is required by the Loan Agreement.
K-1
A/72437573.12
(i) All bills for labor, materials, equipment, work, services and supplies furnished in connection with the Project, which could give rise to a mechanic's lien if unpaid, have been paid or will be paid out of the requested advance, except as follows:
(j) All funds advanced under the Loan Agreement to date have been utilized as specified in the Draw Requests pursuant to which the same were advanced, exclusively to pay costs incurred for or in connection with, constructing the Improvements and developing the Land and the Project, and Borrower represents that no part of the Loan proceeds have been paid for labor, materials, equipment, work, services or supplies incorporated into or employed in connection with any project other than the Property, as that term is defined in the Loan Agreement. Borrower further represents that all funds covered by this Draw Request are for payment for labor, materials, equipment, work, services or supplies furnished solely in connection with said Property.
Borrower authorizes and requests Agent and Lenders to charge the total amount of this Draw Request against Borrower's Loan account and to advance from the proceeds of the Loan the funds hereby requested, and to make or authorize disbursement of said funds to or for the account of the persons or firms and in amounts up to, but not exceeding, the amounts listed herein, subject to the requirements of and in accordance with the procedures provided in the Loan Agreement. The advance made pursuant to this Draw Request is acknowledged to be an accommodation to Borrower and is not a waiver by Agent or Lenders of any defaults or events of default under the Loan Documents or any other claims of Agent on behalf of the Lenders against Borrower or the General Contractor.
The advances and disbursements on the attached sheets are hereby approved and authorized. Borrower hereby authorizes and directs Agent to disburse $ of this Draw Request directly to General Contractor pursuant to the payment instructions previously delivered to Agent from General Contractor.
SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, a Maryland limited partnership
By: Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation, sole general partner
By:
Name: Title:
K-2
A/72437573.12
EXHIBIT L
[INTENTIONALLY OMITTED]
L-1
EXHIBIT M
LIST OF DRAWINGS AND SPECIFICATIONS
See Exhibit C to Construction Contract
M-1
EXHIBIT N
LEASING GUIDELINES
Leasing Guidelines
Office
Rent/SF $ 43.50 Full Service
Lease Term 7 Years
Tenant Improvements $ 55,00 /SF
Retail
Rent/SF $ 55.00 Triple Net
Lease Term 5 Years
Lease-Up Concessions $ 2.00 /SF
Apartments
Stabilized Rent/SF $ 3.23 /SF
Lease Term 1 Year
Any proposed Lease shall be deemed to comply with the foregoing criteria if, after taking such Lease into account, the weighted average of the rental rate, tenant concessions or leasing commissions, as applicable, of all of the Leases in the same product category shall comply with such criteria.
N-1
EXHIBIT O
COMPLIANCE CERTIFICATE OF CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER
(Financial Statements)
The undersigned (the "Borrower") HEREBY CERTIFIES THAT:
This Compliance Certificate is furnished pursuant to that certain Construction Loan Agreement
dated as of May , 2008 (the "Loan Agreement") among the Borrower and U.S. Bank National
Association, ("Agent") as administrative agent, for itself and for other financial institutions (collectively, the "Lenders") and the Lenders which are or may become parties to the Loan Agreement, Unless otherwise defined herein, the terms used in this Compliance Certificate shall have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Loan Agreement.
As required by Section 5.7 of the Loan Agreement, financial statements of the Borrower for the [year] [quarter] ended , 20 (the "Financial Statements") prepared in accordance with GAAP (subject, in the case of quarterly statements, to year-end adjustments none of which are anticipated to be materially adverse, except as specifically disclosed in this Compliance Certificate) accompany this Compliance Certificate. The Financial Statements present fairly the financial position of the Borrower as at the date thereof and the results of operations of the Borrower and its subsidiaries for the period covered thereby.
The activities of the Borrower and its subsidiaries during the period covered by the Financial Statements have been reviewed by the Chief Financial Officer and/or by employees or agents under his immediate supervision. Based upon such review, during the period covered by the Financial Statements, and as of the date of this Certificate, no Event of Default, or event, which, with the giving of notice or passage of time, or both, would become an Event of Default, has occurred and is continuing of which (i) the Borrower has knowledge, or (ii) the Agent has not previously given notice, except as specifically disclosed in this Compliance Certificate.
The Chief Financial Officer certifies that he is authorized to execute and deliver this Compliance Certificate on behalf of the Borrower.
O-1
WITNESS our hands this day of , 20 .
SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, a Maryland
limited partnership
By: Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation, its sole
general partner
By:
Name:
Chief Financial Officer
O-2
EXHIBIT P
COMPLIANCE CERTIFICATE OF CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER
(Financial Statements)
The undersigned (the "Guarantor") HEREBY CERTIFIES THAT:
This Compliance Certificate is furnished pursuant to that certain Construction Loan Agreement dated as of May , 2008 (the "Loan Agreement") among the Borrower and U.S. Bank National Association, ("Agent") as administrative agent, for itself and for other financial institutions (collectively, the "Lenders") and the Lenders which are or may become parties to the Loan Agreement. Unless otherwise defined herein, the terms used in this Compliance Certificate shall have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Loan Agreement.
As required by Section 5.7 of the Loan Agreement, financial statements of the Guarantor and its respective subsidiaries for the [year] [quarter] ended , 20 (the "Financial Statements") prepared in accordance with GAAP (subject, in the case of quarterly statements, to year-end adjustments none of which are anticipated to be materially adverse, except as specifically disclosed in this Compliance Certificate) accompany this Compliance Certificate. The Financial Statements present fairly the financial position of the Guarantor as at the date thereof and the results of operations of the Guarantor and its subsidiaries for the period covered thereby.
The activities of the Guarantor and its subsidiaries during the period covered by the Financial Statements have been reviewed by the Chief Financial Officer and/or by employees or agents under his immediate supervision. Based upon such review, during the period covered by the Financial Statements, and as of the date of this Certificate, no Event of Default, or event, which, with the giving of. notice or passage of time, or both, would become an Event of Default, has occurred and is continuing of which (i) the Guarantor has knowledge, or (ii) the Agent has not previously given notice, except as specifically disclosed in this Compliance Certificate.
The Chief Financial Officer certifies that he is authorized to execute and deliver this Compliance Certificate on behalf of the Guarantor.
P-1
WITNESS our hands this day of , 20 .
SAUL CENTERS, INC., a Maryland corporation
By:
Name:
Chief Financial Officer
P-1
EXHIBIT Q
DEFINITION OF PRE-LEASING TEST
The determination by Agent, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, that (a) not less than fifty percent (50%) in the aggregate of the office space in the Property has been leased with a weighted average lease rate of $40.00 per square foot full service and minimum lease terms of five (5) years, and (b) not less than fifty percent (50%) in the aggregate of the retail space in the Property has been leased under triple net Leases with a weighted average lease rate of $55.00 per square foot and minimum lease terms of five (5) years, and each of such Leases in all cases of the foregoing (a) and (b) shall be pursuant to fully executed Leases approved by Agent hereunder (except to the extent such Leases do not require Agent's approval in accordance with this Agreement).
Q-1
GUARANTY
THIS GUARANTY (the "Guaranty") is made and entered into as of the 14th day of May, 2008 by and between SAUL CENTERS, INC., a Maryland corporation, having an address at 7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Bethesda, Maryland 20814 ("Guarantor"), in favor of U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, a national banking association, having an address at 1650 Tysons Boulevard, Suite 250, McLean, Virginia 22102, Attention: Real Estate Banking Group, Division Head (the "Agent"), as agent for itself and for the other financial institutions (collectively, the "Lenders") which are now or may in the future become parties to that certain Construction Loan Agreement of even date herewith between, inter alia, SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, a Maryland limited partnership ("Borrower") and Agent (as the same may be amended, modified, restated or replaced from time to time, the "Loan Agreement").
WITNESSETH THAT:
WHEREAS, the Lenders have agreed, upon certain conditions, to make a loan to Borrower in the total principal amount of up to One Hundred Fifty-Seven Million Five Hundred Thousand and No/100ths Dollars ($157,500,000.00) ("Loan"), which Loan is evidenced by certain Promissory Notes of even date herewith (as amended, modified, restated or replaced from time to time, collectively, the "Note") and the Loan Agreement and is secured by, among other documents, a Combination Credit Line Deed of Trust, Security Agreement and Fixture Financing Statement of even date herewith ("Deed of Trust") pertaining to certain property located in Clarendon, Arlington County, Virginia ("Property") which is more particularly described in the Deed of Trust (the Note, the Loan Agreement, the Deed of Trust, this Agreement and the other documents evidencing or securing the Loan (as the same may be amended, modified, restated or replaced from time to time) are herein collectively referred to as the "Loan Documents"); and
WHEREAS, Guarantor is the sole general partner member of the Borrower; and
WHEREAS, in order to induce Lenders to make the Loan, and as additional security for the Loan and for all sums advanced under the Note, the Loan Agreement and the Deed of Trust, and for the payment and performance by Borrower of its obligations under the Note, the Loan Agreement and the Deed of Trust, Borrower has agreed to obtain, and Guarantor has agreed to execute, deliver and perform, this Guaranty; and
WHEREAS, Lenders have refused to make the Loan to Borrower or to make any advances under the Loan Documents unless this Guaranty is executed by Guarantor and is delivered to Agent for the benefit of Lenders;
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of Lenders' agreement to make the Loan to Borrower in accordance with the terms of the Loan Documents, and of other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged by Guarantor, Guarantor hereby covenants and agrees with the Lenders as follows:
1. Guarantor, for itself, its heirs, executors, administrators, personal representatives, legal representatives, successors and assigns, hereby primarily, unconditionally, absolutely, irrevocably, guaranties to Lenders and to their successors and assigns that all payments due and payable under the Note, including, but not limited to, payments of principal ("Principal") and/or interest (including, but not limited to, interest accruing under the Note after the filing of any petition under applicable federal bankruptcy laws and any amounts paid by Borrower to Agent for the benefit of the Lenders and required to be disgorged by Agent as preferential payments under any applicable bankruptcy laws) and all other
amounts owing under the Loan Documents, shall be fully and punctually paid in accordance with the terms of the Note, as and when due, and whether or not accelerated pursuant to the terms of the Note, that Borrower shall fully and punctually pay, comply with and perform all of the obligations, terms, covenants and conditions of the Loan Documents to be by it paid, complied with and performed (including, without limitation, lien-free completion of the Improvements (as defined in the Loan Agreement)), and that all warranties and representations made by Borrower in the Loan Documents and/or in connection therewith are true and correct in any material respects; and, if the payments due and payable under the Loan Documents shall not be so paid, and/or if Borrower shall fail or refuse to so pay, comply with or perform said obligations, terms, covenants and conditions of the Loan Documents (expressly including, without limitation, payment of any amounts due under the Leadership Agreements or the Proffers (as such terms are defined in the Loan Agreement)), Guarantor shall fully and punctually so pay such payments and shall so pay, comply with and perform the obligations, terms, covenants and conditions with respect to which Borrower has failed or refused to pay, comply with or perform, whether or not the Note has been accelerated pursuant to the terms thereof, shall pay the attorneys' fees of Agent and the Lenders and all court costs incurred by Agent in enforcing or protecting, or obtaining the right to enforce or protect, whether in bankruptcy court, probate court or otherwise, any of Agent's rights, remedies or recourses hereunder or thereunder (prior to trial, at trial and on appeal and whether or not Agent prevails therein), and shall reimburse Agent for all damages suffered by Agent as the result of the incorrectness or untruthfulness of said warranties and representations as and to the extent such reimbursement is required from Borrower under the Loan Documents, all without cost or expense to Agent and/or the Lenders. The obligations and liabilities of Guarantor hereunder shall be primary and not secondary. In addition to all other rights of Agent to accelerate the indebtedness evidenced by the Note, if (a) an event of default shall occur which, pursuant to the terms of the Note, would entitle Agent to accelerate said indebtedness, but (b) there shall be filed with respect to Borrower a petition in bankruptcy or similar relief under the United States Bankruptcy Code or any similar law, and by reason of such filing or as a result of any order of court, Agent shall be prevented from accelerating or collecting said indebtedness, then Agent shall have the right to demand from Guarantor payment in full of, and Guarantor shall pay in full, all indebtedness evidenced or secured by the Loan Documents, including all principal, interest, costs, expenses, fees and charges, whether or not then due and payable by Borrower.
Upon satisfaction of the Pre-Leasing Test (as defined in the Loan Agreement), the maximum obligation of the guarantor for the repayment of Principal pursuant to Paragraph 1 hereof shall not exceed One Hundred Eighteen Million One Hundred Twenty-Five Thousand and 00/100ths Dollars ($118,125,000.00). In no event shall the preceding sentence be deemed to limit Guarantor's obligation with respect to accrued interest or any other amounts owing under the Loan Documents or hereunder.
Upon Completion of the Improvements (as such terms are defined in the Loan Agreement), the maximum obligation of the Guarantor for the repayment of Principal pursuant to Paragraph 1 shall not exceed Ninety-Four Million Five Hundred Thousand and 00/100ths Dollars ($94,500,000.00), In no event shall the preceding sentence be deemed to limit Guarantor's obligations with respect to accrued interest or any other amounts owing under the Loan Documents or hereunder.
Upon satisfaction of the Guaranty Reduction Debt Service Test (as defined below), the maximum obligation of the Guarantor for the repayment of Principal pursuant to Paragraph 1 shall not exceed Sixty-Three Million and 00/100ths Dollars ($63,000,000.00). In no event shall the preceding sentence be deemed to limit Guarantor's obligations with respect to accrued interest or any other amounts owing under the Loan Documents or hereunder.
The obligations of the Guarantor pursuant to this Guaranty shall be reduced only to the extent of payments of cash to Agent for the benefit of the Lenders by the Guarantor made pursuant to this Guaranty after Agent has made a demand for such payments pursuant hereto, and shall not be reduced as
-2-
a result of Agent realizing upon any collateral furnished to Agent and the Lenders in connection with the Loan (except that there shall be only one satisfaction of all amounts due to the Lenders with respect to the Loan).
For purposes of this Guaranty, "Guaranty Reduction Debt Service Test" shall mean the determination by Agent, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, that the Property has generated Net Operating Income (as defined in the Loan Agreement) during the immediately preceding three (3) month period, annualized, which equals or exceeds the product of 1.0 times Debt Service (as defined in the Loan Agreement).
2. The Loan Documents are hereby made a part of this Guaranty by reference thereto with the same force and effect as if fully set forth herein. Guarantor hereby acknowledges having received a true, correct and complete copy of each of the Loan Documents.
3. Guarantor hereby agrees that Agent may take other guaranties, collateral or security to further secure the Loan Documents, or any of them, and consents that any of the obligations, terms, covenants and conditions contained in the Loan Documents may be renewed, altered, extended, changed, modified or released at Agent's written direction, or with Agent's written consent, without in any manner affecting this Guaranty or releasing Guarantor herefrom, and without the further consent of or notice to Guarantor, and Guarantor shall continue to be liable hereunder to pay and perform pursuant hereto and to the Loan Documents, as so renewed, altered, extended, changed, modified or released, and notwithstanding the taking of such other guaranties, collateral or security. This Guaranty is additional and supplemental to any and all other guaranties heretofore or hereafter executed by Guarantor or by any other person, party or entity for the benefit of Agent and the Lenders, Borrower or any other person, party or entity, in connection with the Property, or any other property, or relating to the Loan Documents or any other loan documents, and shall not supersede or be superseded by any other document or guaranty executed by Guarantor, or by any other person, party or entity, for any purpose. Guarantor hereby agrees that all or any part of the Property and any other collateral may be released from, and any new or additional security may be added to, the lien and security interest of the Loan Documents; Borrower, Guarantor and any additional parties who are or may become liable for payment or performance of the Loan Documents may hereafter be released from its or their liability hereunder and/or under the Loan Documents; Agent may perfect or fail to perfect, or to continue the perfection of, any lien or security interest; and Agent may take, or delay in taking, or refuse to take, any and all action with reference to the Loan Documents (regardless of whether the same might vary the risk or alter the rights, remedies or recourses of Guarantor), including specifically the settlement or compromise of any amount allegedly due thereunder, all without notice to, consideration to or the consent of Guarantor, and without in any way releasing, diminishing or affecting the absolute nature of Guarantor's obligations and liabilities hereunder.
4. Guarantor hereby waives any and all legal requirements that Agent, or its successors or assigns, must institute any action or proceeding at law or in equity or exhaust their rights, remedies and/or recourses against Borrower or anyone else with respect to the Loan Documents, as a condition precedent to bringing an action against Guarantor upon this Guaranty. Guarantor agrees that Agent may simultaneously maintain an action upon this Guaranty and an action or proceeding upon the Note and/or to foreclose or otherwise enforce the Deed of Trust, the Assignment and/or any other Loan Document. All remedies afforded to Agent, and its successors or assigns, by reason of this Guaranty and the Loan Documents, are separate and cumulative remedies, and no one of such remedies, whether exercised by Agent, or its successors or assigns, or not, shall be deemed an exclusion of any of the other remedies available to Agent or its successors or assigns, at law, in equity, by statute, under the Loan Documents, hereunder or otherwise, and shall in no way limit or prejudice any such other remedies which Agent, or its successors or assigns, may have. Guarantor further waives any requirement that Agent demand or seek payment or performance by Borrower or by any other party of the amounts owing or the covenants to be
-3-
performed under the Loan Documents, as a condition precedent to bringing any action against Guarantor, or any of them, upon this Guaranty, it being agreed that a failure to pay, comply with or perform the obligations, terms, covenants and conditions herein guarantied, or any breach of a representation or warranty herein guarantied, shall, without further act, make Guarantor liable as herein set forth. All payments made by Borrower, by Guarantor or by any other party, and/or the proceeds of any security, may be applied by Agent upon such items of indebtedness owed to Agent and the Lenders pursuant to the Loan Documents in such order as Agent may determine, whether the same be due or not.
5. Guarantor specifically agrees that, in the event of the foreclosure of the Deed of Trust or sale of the Property pursuant thereto, and in the event the proceeds thereof are not sufficient to pay in full the indebtedness secured thereby, Guarantor shall be and hereby is expressly made liable to Agent and the Lenders for the amount of the deficiency, notwithstanding any provision of any law or contract which may prevent Agent and the Lenders from enforcing such deficiency against, or collecting such deficiency from, Borrower, or its successors or assigns, or which provides that the indebtedness secured by the Deed of Trust has been satisfied as the result of the foreclosure thereof.
6. Until the indebtedness evidenced and secured by the Loan Documents is indefeasibly paid in full, and until each and all of the terms, covenants and conditions of the Loan Documents and of this Guaranty are fully performed, Guarantor shall not be released by any act, omission or thing which might, but for this provision of this Guaranty, be deemed a legal or equitable discharge of a surety or guarantor, or by reason of any waiver, extension, modification, forbearance or delay by Agent, or its successors or assigns, or its or their failure to proceed promptly or otherwise, or by reason of any further obligation or agreement between Borrower and/or the then owner of the Property and the then holder of the Note, relating to the payment of any sum evidenced thereby or to any of the other terms, covenants and conditions contained therein or in the other Loan Documents, and Guarantor hereby expressly waives and surrenders any defense to liability hereunder based upon the foregoing acts, omissions, things, waivers, extensions, modifications, forbearances, delays, obligations, agreements, or any of them. Guarantor also waives any defense arising by virtue of any disability, insolvency, bankruptcy, lack of authority or power, death, insanity, incompetence, liquidation or dissolution of Borrower, Guarantor, or any other surety, co-maker, endorser or guarantor, even though rendering the Note or any of the other Loan Documents invalid, void, unenforceable or otherwise uncollectible, it being agreed that Guarantor shall remain liable hereunder, regardless of whether Borrower, any other Guarantor or any other person, firm or entity be found not to be liable thereunder or hereunder for any reason, and regardless of any claim which Guarantor might otherwise have against Agent and the Lenders by virtue of Lender's invocation of or failure to invoke any right, remedy or recourse given to it hereunder or under the Loan Documents. No change in the ownership of Borrower or in Borrower's general partner shall affect or change the terms of this Guaranty or in any way change or reduce the liability of Guarantor hereunder.
7. Guarantor hereby waives diligence in collection, presentment for payment, demand, protest, notice of nonpayment, notice of protest and of dishonor, notice of extension of time for payment, notice of acceptance hereof, notice of future advances, notice of default, notice of acceleration, notice of intent to accelerate, notice of intent to proceed against any collateral and all other notices now or hereafter provided for by law.
8. In the event that Guarantor shall advance or become obligated to pay any sums hereunder, or in the event that for any reason Borrower and/or any subsequent owner of the Property is now or shall hereafter become indebted or obligated to Guarantor, the amount of such sums and of such indebtedness and obligation and interest thereon shall at all times be subordinate as to lien, time of payment and in all other respects to the amounts owing to Agent and the Lenders under the Loan Documents. Guarantor shall have no right to participate in any way in the Note, in the other Loan Documents or in the right, title or interest of Agent and the Lenders in the Property, or to receive
-4-
payments from Borrower upon any such indebtedness or obligation, notwithstanding any payments made by Guarantor hereunder, all rights of reimbursement, indemnification, subrogation and participation being hereby expressly subordinated, unless and until the entire indebtedness owing to Agent and the Lenders under the Loan Documents has been paid in full and all other obligations of Borrower under the Loan Documents have been fully performed, discharged and satisfied. Guarantor agrees that following and during the continuance of an Event of Default under the Loan Documents, and until the indebtedness evidenced and secured by the Loan Documents shall have been paid in full, Guarantor will not accept any payment or satisfaction of any kind of any indebtedness or obligation of Borrower to Guarantor, and Guarantor hereby assigns to Agent, for the benefit of the Lenders, all right, title and interest in such indebtedness and obligations, including the right to file proof of claim and to vote thereon in connection with any bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization proceeding, and including the right to vote on any plan of arrangement or reorganization. Further, Guarantor agrees that following and during the continuance of an Event of Default under the Loan Documents, and until the indebtedness evidenced and secured thereby shall have been paid in full, (a) no Guarantor shall accept payment from any other Guarantor by way of contribution on account of any payment made hereunder by said Guarantor to Agent, (b) Guarantor will not take any action to exercise or enforce any rights to such contribution, and (c), if Guarantor should receive any payment, satisfaction or security for any indebtedness or obligation of Borrower to Guarantor or for any contribution by any other Guarantor for payment made hereunder by any Guarantor to Agent for the benefit of the Lenders, the same shall be delivered to Agent in the form received, endorsed or assigned as may be appropriate, for application on account of or as security for the indebtedness evidenced and secured by the Loan Documents, and, until so delivered, shall be held in trust for Agent as security for said indebtedness.
9. Guarantor hereby warrants and represents unto Agent and the Lenders that (a) the financial statements of, and other financial and cash flow information for, Borrower, Guarantor and all Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis previously or hereafter delivered to Agent fairly and accurately present, or will, in all material respects, fairly and accurately present, the financial condition of Borrower, Guarantor and such Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis as of the dates of such statements and information, and the cash flows of Borrower, Guarantor and such Subsidiaries for the periods covered by such information, and neither this Agreement nor any document, financial statement, financial, cash flow or credit information, certificate or statement referred to herein or furnished to Agent by Borrower, Guarantor and such Subsidiaries contains, or will contain, any untrue statement of a material fact or omits, or will omit, a material fact, or is or will be misleading in any material respect; (b) except as may be set out on Exhibit A attached hereto, (i) there are no actions, suits or proceedings pending or, to the knowledge of Guarantor, threatened, in writing, against or affecting Guarantor or any of Guarantor's assets, in which an adverse result would have a material adverse effect upon Guarantor or any of Guarantor's assets, or involving the validity or enforceability of the Loan Documents or the priority of the lien thereof, at law or in equity; and, to the best knowledge of Guarantor, Guarantor is not in default under any order, writ, injunction, decree or demand of any court or any administrative body having jurisdiction over Guarantor, (ii) Guarantor is not in default beyond applicable notice, grace or cure periods under any instrument or agreement under and subject to which any recourse indebtedness in excess of $100,000.00 in the aggregate or any nonrecourse indebtedness in excess of $10,000,000.00 in the aggregate for borrowed money has been issued or is secured; and (c) said Guarantor has knowledge of Borrower's financial condition and affairs and of all other circumstances which bear upon the risk assumed by said Guarantor under this Guaranty. (Guarantor hereby agrees to continue to keep itself informed thereof while this Guaranty is in force and agrees that Agent does not have and will not have any obligation to investigate the financial condition or affairs of Borrower for the benefit of Guarantor or to advise Guarantor of any fact respecting, or any change in, the financial condition or affairs of Borrower or any other circumstances which may bear upon Guarantor's risk hereunder which come to the knowledge of Agent, its directors, officers, employees or agents at any time, whether or not Agent knows, believes or has reason to know or to believe that any such fact or change is unknown to Guarantor or might or does
-5-
materially increase the risk of Guarantor hereunder.) Guarantor shall not transfer any of its assets for the purpose of preventing Agent from satisfying any judgment rendered under this Guaranty therefrom, either before or after the entry of any such judgment. Guarantor shall promptly deliver to Borrower all financial statements of Guarantor which Borrower is required by the Deed of Trust to deliver to Agent in time for Borrower to deliver the same to Agent on or before the date provided for the delivery thereof under the Deed of Trust, For purposes of this Guaranty, the term "Subsidiary" shall mean, for any entity, any corporation, partnership or other entity of which at least a majority of the securities or other ownership interests having by the terms thereof ordinary voting power to elect a majority of the board of directors or other persons performing similar functions of such corporation, partnership or other entity (without regard to the occurrence of any contingency) which is at the time directly or indirectly owned or controlled by such entity or one or more subsidiaries of such entity or by such entity and one or more subsidiaries of such entity.
10. Any notice, demand or request by either party hereto to the other under the terms of this Guaranty, or documents related hereto, may be given by personal delivery or recognized overnight courier, and shall be deemed to have been received upon the earlier of receipt or one business day after the date the same is sent. Such notice shall be addressed to the party to which the notice is to be given at the address set forth in the first paragraph of this Guaranty, or at any other address specified in a notice given by such party to the other not less than ten (10) days prior to the date on which such address change becomes effective for purposes of this Guaranty.
11. This Guaranty, for all purposes, shall be interpreted and construed in accordance with the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia, in which state it is to be performed. The unenforceability or invalidity of any provision or provisions of this Guaranty as to any persons or circumstance shall not render that provision nor any other provision or provisions herein contained unenforceable or invalid as to any other persons or circumstance and all provisions hereof, in all other respects, shall remain valid and enforceable.
12. Agent may arrange for other lenders to purchase, or to participate with Agent in, the Loan, and Agent shall be entitled to retain any compensation received from any such other lender. Agent may divulge all information received by it from Guarantor or any other source, including, but not limited to, information relating to the Loan, to Borrower, to the Property and to Guarantor, to any such other lender, and Guarantor shall cooperate with Agent in satisfying the requirements of any such other lender for consummating such a purchase or participation,
13. Notwithstanding any other provision or provisions herein contained, no provision of this Guaranty shall require or permit the collection from Guarantor of interest in excess of the maximum rate or amount, if any, which Guarantor may be required or permitted to pay by any applicable law.
14. Guarantor hereby agrees that, at Agent's option, any action to enforce this Guaranty may be brought and venued in the courts of the Commonwealth of Virginia, and Guarantor hereby consents thereto and submits itself to the jurisdiction of said courts with respect to any such action. Guarantor hereby waives any right which Guarantor may have to a trial by jury in any action relating to this Guaranty.
15. This instrument shall inure to the benefit of Agent, the Lenders and their successors and assigns, and shall bind Guarantor and Guarantor's heirs, executors, administrators, personal representatives, legal representatives, successors and assigns. The obligations of Guarantor under this Guaranty shall be enforceable in all events against Guarantor, its successors and assigns, as a claim against its estate or otherwise against the representatives of its estate, its heirs-at-law, the devisees and
-6-
beneficiaries of its total estate and each of them. The use of any gender herein shall include all other genders.
16. Notwithstanding anything herein contained, this Guaranty shall become null and void in the event that any person or entity shall pay, in full, the amount of principal, interest and all other sums and payments which may be then owing under the Loan Documents in accordance with the terms thereof and shall comply with and perform all of the other obligations of Borrower under the Loan Documents,
17. This Guaranty may be executed in any number, of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, whether signed by one (1) Guarantor or by several Guarantors, and all of which, together, shall constitute a single instrument. The agreements, duties, liabilities and obligations of Guarantor under this Guaranty shall not be affected or impaired in any way by virtue of the fact that Guarantor signs separate counterparts hereof, and do not all sign the same counterpart hereof.
18. The undersigned expressly waives to the fullest extent permitted by law any and all benefits which might otherwise of available to the undersigned under Sections 49-25 and 49-26 of the Code of Virginia (1950), as amended.
19. Until the obligations of the Guarantor have been fully and finally paid and performed, Guarantor covenants and agrees, and shall cause the Borrower, to comply with and be bound by each and every covenant set forth in Section 5.8 of that certain Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 19, 2007, among Borrower, as borrower, Agent, as agent, and certain other parties thereto, as it may have been and hereafter may be from time to time modified, amended, restated, supplemented or replaced (the "Revolving Credit Agreement"), which evidences a $150,000,000 revolving credit facility, the provisions of which are hereby incorporated herein by reference as if fully set forth herein. Guarantor acknowledges and agrees that it shall be an Event of Default hereunder and under the Loan Documents in the event that Agent declares an "Event of Default" under the Revolving Credit Agreement for failure to comply with the covenants and obligations set forth in Section 5.8 of the Revolving Credit Agreement, within the cure periods provided therein. In the event that such facility is terminated, Guarantor shall continue to be bound by the covenants set forth in Section 5.8 of the Revolving Credit Agreement in effect thereunder as of the date immediately prior to such termination, until such time as the obligations of the Guarantor hereunder have been fully and finally satisfied.
[Signature on following page]
-7-
[Signature page to Clarendon Center Guaranty]
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Guarantor has duly executed this Guaranty as of the day and year first above written.
SAUL CENTERS, INC., a Maryland corporation
By:
Name: B. Francis Saul III
Title: President
STATE OF MARYLAND ) ss:
COUNTY OF MONTGOMERY )
I, a Notary Public in and for the aforesaid jurisdiction, do hereby certify that B. Francis Saul III who is personally well known to me as, or satisfactorily proven to be, the person named as President of Guarantor in the foregoing Guaranty, bearing date as of the 14th day of May, 2008, personally appeared before me in the said jurisdiction, and acknowledged the same to be the act and deed of the Saul Centers, Inc., party thereto, and delivered the same as such.
GIVEN under my hand and official seal this 13th day of May, 2008.
Notary Public
My Commission Expires:
LINDA R. GEIMER
NOTARY PUBLIC STATE OF MARYLAND
My Commission Expires July 14, 2008
LINDA R. GEIMER
NOTARY PUBLIC
ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY
-8-

Exhibit 10.(b)
(the "") is made and entered into as of the 19th day of December, 2007, by and between (i) , a Maryland limited partnership (hereinafter called ); (ii) , a national banking association, as administrative agent and sole lead arranger (""); (iii), as syndication agent (""), and (iv) , and and any other lenders who are now or who may hereafter become parties to this Agreement (collectively, the "").
THIS REVOLVING CREDIT AGREEMENT
Agreement
SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
"Borrower"
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
Agent
 WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
Syndication Agent
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
COMPASS BANK,
SOVEREIGN BANK
Lenders
, in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements hereinafter set forth, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
WITNESSETH THAT
For the purposes of this Agreement, the following terms shall have the following respective meanings, unless the context hereof clearly requires otherwise:
Any federal, state or local law, statute, code, ordinance, rule, regulation or requirement relating to accessibility to facilities or properties for disabled, handicapped and/or physically challenged persons, including, without limitation, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1991, as amended.
:
Accessibility Regulation
: Up to $50,000,000.00.
Accordion Amount
: December 19, 2009.
Accordion Expiration Date
: All costs of acquiring Real Estate Assets, including purchase price and reasonable and customary closing costs, as determined by Agent.
Acquisition Costs
: An amount equal to ninety seven percent (97%) of EBITDA.
Adjusted EBITDA
: Any portion of the Loan (or a Swing Loan) advanced to or for the benefit of Borrower in accordance with the terms hereof and as to which Borrower has elected or is deemed to have elected one (1) of the available interest rate options and, if applicable, a LIBOR Rate Period. An Advance may be a LIBOR Rate Advance or a Loan Rate Advance; provided, however, that if Borrower has made no election of an interest rate option with respect to any Advance (other than for a Swing Loan), Borrower shall be deemed to have elected that it be a Loan Rate Advance. Swing Loans shall be deemed to be Loan Rate Advances.
Advance
: The date on which an Advance of Loan (or Swing Loan) proceeds requested by Borrower hereunder is funded.
Advance Date
 
: This Revolving Credit Agreement, including any amendments hereof and supplements hereto executed by Borrower and Agent on behalf of Lenders.
Agreement
: With respect to:
Applicable Margin
(a) Loan Rate Advances  0.00% with respect to Tranche A Loan Rate Advances, 0.575% with respect to Tranche B Loan Rate Advances.
(b) With respect to Tranche A LIBOR Rate Advances, the Applicable Margin shall be equal to 1.650% unless the Leverage Ratio requirement set forth below is satisfied in which event the Applicable Margin for LIBOR Rate Advances shall be reduced as follows:
 
(c) With respect to Tranche B LIBOR Rate Advances, the Applicable Margin shall be equal to 2.500% unless the Leverage Ratio requirement set forth below is satisfied in which event the Applicable Margin for LIBOR Rate Advances shall be reduced as follows:
 
: An Unencumbered Asset (including, without limitation, a Proposed Acquisition that would constitute an Unencumbered Asset upon the acquisition
Approved Asset
 
thereof by Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary) which has been approved by all Lenders pursuant to . A schedule identifying the Approved Assets as of the date hereof is attached hereto as .
Section 2.B.2
Exhibit E
: A Subsidiary that (x) is wholly and directly owned and controlled by Borrower, Guarantor or a combination thereof, (y) has delivered a Subsidiary Guaranty pursuant to hereof that remains in full force and effect, and (z) holds fee simple title to an Approved Asset.
Approved Subsidiary
Section 5.9.E
: As defined in hereof.
Assignee Lender
Section 8.8.A
: The Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System or any successor thereto.
Board
: As defined in the preamble to this Agreement.
Borrower
: As defined in hereof.
Borrower Information
Section 1.2
: Any day, other than a Saturday, a Sunday, or a Legal Holiday on which Agent is not open for business.
Business Day
: The date upon which Borrower submits a Draw Request, the date upon which Borrower requests that Agent issue a Letter of Credit, the date upon which Borrower requests that an Approved Asset be added to or removed from the pool of Unencumbered Assets, the date upon which a Capital Event occurs, or the date upon which there exists an Event of Default under the Loan, as applicable.
Calculation Date
: The occurrence from time to time of an equity or debt offering by Borrower (which shall specifically exclude stock issued in connection with a dividend reinvestment plan), a Disqualifying Environmental Event, or if an Encumbrance, Imposition or Lien arises against an Approved Asset.
Capital Event
: For any period of determination, an amount equal to the sum, without duplication, of (a) the aggregate Adjusted EBITDA for the then immediately preceding twelve (12) full calendar months, divided by eight percent (8.00%) (provided that, with respect to Real Estate Assets which Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary has owned for more than three (3) months but less than one (1) year, as of the Calculation Date, Adjusted EBITDA shall be annualized based upon the most recent three-month period); (b) 100% of the value of Unrestricted Cash and Cash Equivalents; (c) with respect to Real Estate Assets Under Development, including those projects which have been operating for less than one year, the greater of (x) 100% of the aggregate costs incurred and paid to the Calculation Date by the Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary or (y) Adjusted EBITDA (provided that, with respect to Real Estate Assets which have been in operation for less than one (1) year, as of the Calculation Date, Adjusted EBITDA shall be annualized based upon the most recent three-month period) divided by eight percent (8.00%); (d) the Acquisition Costs with respect to Real Estate Assets which, as of the date of calculation, Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary has owned for less than three (3) months; (e) unimproved land held for development, valued at the lesser of market or cost; and (f)
Capitalization Value
 
contractual purchase price of any property subject to a purchase obligation, repurchase obligation or forward commitment, which obligation at such time could be specifically enforced by the seller, but only to the extent such obligations are included in the definition of Total Adjusted Outstanding Indebtedness or Total Adjusted Committed Indebtedness, as appropriate.
: A proposed mixed use development comprised of approximately 244 rental apartment units, +/-170,000 square feet of office space and +/-42,000 square feet of retail space located on two parcels at the intersections of Clarendon Boulevard with North Highland and North Garfield Streets in Clarendon, Arlington County, Virginia.
Clarendon Center Project
: The date of this Agreement.
Closing Date
: The Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
Code
Each Lender's share of all right, title, and interest in the Loan and the Loan Documents, as set forth on attached hereto, as amended and modified by unilateral action of Agent from time to time to reflect the sale or assignment of a portion or portions of the Loan.
:
Commitment Percentage
Schedule 1
: For any period of determination, the following amount (without duplication) incurred by Borrower during the then immediately preceding twelve (12) full calendar months, as determined by Agent in its sole discretion (but excluding interest funded from any interest reserve under any construction loan, including, without limitation, for the Clarendon Center Project): (a) Interest Expense (b) the aggregate amount of scheduled principal payments of indebtedness of the Borrower (excluding optional prepayments but expressly including scheduled principal payments in respect of any indebtedness which is not amortized through equal periodic installments of principal and interest over the term of such indebtedness, including, without limitation, balloon payments at maturity that are not refinanced or paid off on or before the maturity date thereof) required to be made during such time period by the Borrower (c) the aggregate amount of capitalized interest required in accordance with GAAP to be paid or accrued by the Borrower during such time period, (d) expenses attributable to preferred stock (including preferred stock dividends whether the preferred stock is classified upon the obligor's balance sheet as equity or liability) or a similar type of investment.
Debt Service
plus
plus
plus
: As defined in hereof.
Declining Bank
Section 3.6(a)
: As defined in hereof.
Default Rate
Section 1.12
: Any Lender who for any reason shall fail or refuse to abide by its obligations under the Loan Documents or this Agreement within the time periods specified for performance of such obligation or, if no time frame is specified, if such failure or refusal continues for a period of five (5) Business Days after notice from Agent.
Defaulting Lender
 
: Any release or threatened release of Hazardous Substances, any violation of Environmental Laws or any other similar environmental event with respect to a Real Estate Asset which is not cured within sixty (60) days or that would cause, in Agent's determination, such Real Estate Asset to no longer be financeable on a non-recourse (with customary exceptions) debt basis under the then generally accepted underwriting standards of national insurance company or pension fund real estate institutional lenders. In the event that such release or threatened release, violation or similar environmental event is susceptible of cure but is not cured within said sixty (60) days, so long as Borrower is diligently and continuously pursuing such cure, as evidenced to Agent's satisfaction, Agent shall permit Borrower an additional one hundred twenty (120) days to effectuate such cure; provided, however that such additional one hundred twenty (120) days shall not apply where such release or threatened release, violation or similar environmental event results, in Agent's judgment, in a matter which is of an emergency nature.
Disqualifying Environmental Event
. With respect to:
Distribution
(i) the Borrower, any distribution of cash or other cash equivalent, directly or indirectly, to the partners of the Borrower; or any other distribution on or in respect of any partnership interests of the Borrower excluding distributions reinvested pursuant to Borrower's distribution reinvestment program; and
(ii) the Guarantor, the declaration or payment of any dividend on or in respect of any shares of any class of capital stock of Guarantor, excluding dividends payable solely in shares of common stock by Guarantor and dividends reinvested pursuant to Guarantor's dividend reinvestment program; the purchase, redemption, or other retirement of any shares of any class of capital stock of Guarantor, directly or indirectly through a subsidiary of Guarantor, or otherwise; the return of capital by Guarantor to its shareholders as such; or any other distribution on or in respect of any shares of any class of capital stock of Guarantor (except as excluded above).
: A written request by Borrower for an Advance of Loan proceeds under this Agreement, in the form and with the certifications included within attached hereto and hereby made a part hereof.
Draw Request
Exhibit A
: For any period of determination, an amount equal to the net income of Borrower and Guarantor on a consolidated basis and their pro rata share of earnings of unconsolidated subsidiaries, the unconsolidated subsidiaries of the general partners of Borrower, and joint ventures in which Borrower, Guarantor and/or Borrower's general partners is a party, and before interest, taxes, depreciation, amortization and gains and losses on property sales, extraordinary items and other non-recurring gains or losses, all as calculated in accordance with GAAP, as determined by Agent.
EBITDA
: As defined in .
Encumbrance
Section 5.6
: Any judgment, decree, order, law, license, rule or regulation pertaining to environmental matters, including without limitation, those arising under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (""), the Comprehensive Environmental
Environmental Law
RCRA
 
Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980 as amended (""), the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 (""), the Federal Clean Water Act, the Federal Clean Air Act, the Toxic Substances Control Act, or any state or local statute, regulation, ordinance, order or decree relating to health, safety or the environment.
CERCLA
SARA
: A Business Day which is also a day on which commercial banks are open for international business (including dealings in dollar deposits) in London, England.
Euro Day
: Any event set forth in .
Event of Default
Section 6.1
: As defined in .
Existing Lenders
Section 3.6(c)
: As defined in .
Extension Period
Section 1.4
: As defined in .
Extension Request
Section 1.4
: As of any date of determination, the rate set forth in the weekly statistical release designated as H.15(519), or any successor publication, published by the Federal Reserve Board (including any such successor, "H.15(519)") for such date opposite the caption "Federal Funds (Effective)". If for any relevant date such rate is not yet published in H.15(519), the rate for such date will be the rate set forth in the daily statistical release designated as the Composite 3:30 p.m. Quotations for U.S. Government Securities, or any successor publication, published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York (including any such successor, the "Composite 3:30 p.m. Quotation") for such date under the caption "Federal Funds Effective Rate". If on any relevant date the appropriate rate for such date is not yet published in either H.15(519) or the Composite 3:30 p.m. Quotation, the rate for such date will be the arithmetic mean of the rates for the last transaction in overnight Federal funds arranged prior to 9:00 a.m. (New York City time) on that date by each of three leading brokers of Federal funds transactions in New York City selected by Agent.
Federal Funds Rate
. That certain fee letter of even date herewith, between the Borrower and Agent.
Fee Letter
: As defined in .
First Solicitation
Section 3.6(a)
. A purchase agreement entered into by the Borrower for the fee or leasehold purchase of a retail, office or industrial real estate property to be constructed.
Forward Purchase Contract
. Net income, computed in accordance with GAAP, excluding minority interests, gains, or losses from debt restructuring and sales of property (inclusive of non-recurring items such as asset sales or property valuation adjustments), plus depreciation and amortization, and after adjustments for unconsolidated partnerships and joint ventures. Adjustments for unconsolidated partnerships and joint ventures will be calculated to reflect Funds From Operations on the same basis.
Funds from Operations
 
: Generally accepted accounting principles set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or in such other statements by such other entity as may be approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession, which are applicable to the circumstances as of any date of determination. Except as may be expressly provided to the contrary herein, all accounting terms used herein shall be interpreted, and all accounting determinations hereunder shall be made, in accordance with GAAP. To the extent any change in GAAP affects any computation or determination required to be made pursuant to this Agreement, such computation or determination shall be made as if such change in GAAP had not occurred, unless Borrower and Majority Lenders agree in writing on an adjustment to said computation or determination to account for such change in GAAP.
GAAP
: All laws, statutes, codes, ordinances, and governmental rules, regulations and requirements applicable to Borrower, Guarantor, Agent, any Lender and/or the Approved Assets.
Governmental Requirements
: As of the date of determination, the "Total Assets" as reflected in the then most recent balance sheet for the Guarantor prepared in accordance with GAAP and delivered to Agent and/or filed with the United States Securities Exchange Commission in accordance with .
Gross Asset Value
Section 5.4
: Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation.
Guarantor
: That certain Guaranty of even date herewith, executed by Guarantor to Agent on behalf of the Lenders to guaranty the Loan, as the same may be amended, modified or replaced from time to time.
Guaranty
: Any hazardous waste, as defined by 42 U.S.C.  9601(5), any hazardous substances as defined by 42 U.S.C.  9601(14), any pollutant or contaminant as defined by 42 U.S.C. 9601(33) or any toxic substances, oil or hazardous materials or other chemicals or substances regulated by any Environmental Laws.
Hazardous Substances
: Funds with good value on the day and in the city in which payment is received.
Immediately Available Funds
: As defined in .
Imposition
Section 5.6
: That sum equal to the greater of zero (0) or the financial loss incurred by the Lenders resulting from prepayment of a LIBOR Rate Advance, calculated as the difference between the amount of interest the Lenders would have earned (from like investments in the Money Markets as of the first day of the LIBOR Rate Advance) had prepayment not occurred and the interest the Lenders will actually earn (from like investments in the Money Markets as of the date of prepayment) as a result of the redeployment of funds from the prepayment.
Interest Differential
: For any period of determination, an amount (without duplication) determined by Agent in its sole discretion equal to the aggregate amount of
Interest Expense
 
interest required in accordance with GAAP to be paid or accrued by the Borrower during such time period on: (i) all indebtedness of the Borrower (including the Loan and including original issue discount and amortization of prepaid interest, if any) (ii) all amounts available for borrowing, or for drawing under letters of credit, if any, issued for the account of the Borrower, but only if such interest was or is required to be reflected as an item of expense, excluding commitment fees, agency fees, facility fees, balance deficiency fees, non-use fees and similar fees and expenses in connection with the borrowing of money and (iii) preferred stock or a similar type of investment.
New Year's Day, Martin Luther King's Birthday, President's Day, Memorial Day, Fourth of July, Labor Day, Columbus Day, Veteran's Day, Thanksgiving Day and Christmas Day.
Legal Holiday:
: Each Lender that is a party to this Agreement and which hereafter becomes party to this Credit Agreement, collectively, and each of their respective permitted successors and assigns.
Lenders
: An irrevocable letter of credit issued by Agent pursuant to this Agreement for the account of Borrower.
Letter of Credit
: As defined in .
Letter of Credit Fee
Section 2.A.7
: As defined in .
Letter of Credit Participation
Section 2.A.9
: The ratio of Total Adjusted Outstanding Indebtedness to Capitalization Value.
Leverage Ratio
: With respect to each LIBOR Rate Period applicable to any requested LIBOR Rate Advance, the rate per annum (rounded up to the next whole multiple of 1/100th of 1%) equal to the rate obtained by dividing (a) the LIBOR rate quoted by Agent from Reuters Screen LIBOR01 or any successor thereto, at approximately 5:00 o'clock a.m., Central time, on the second Euro Day prior to the first day of such LIBOR Rate Period for delivery in Immediately Available Funds on the first day of such LIBOR Rate Period for the approximate number of days as are in such LIBOR Rate Period and in an amount comparable to the principal amount of such LIBOR Rate Advance being made by the Lenders for which LIBOR is being determined, by (b) a percentage equal to 100% minus the maximum rate in effect on the first day of such LIBOR Rate Period at which reserves (including any marginal, supplemental or emergency reserves) are required to be maintained by the Lenders under Regulation D against "Eurocurrency liabilities" (as such term is defined in Regulation D). LIBOR shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in such reserve requirements.
LIBOR
: A rate of interest equal to LIBOR plus the Applicable Margin.
LIBOR Rate
: Any portion of the Principal Balance which bears interest at a LIBOR Rate; provided, however, that any LIBOR Rate Advance must be in the aggregate principal amount of at least $1,000,000.00.
LIBOR Rate Advance
 
: A telephonic notice from Borrower to Agent, received by Agent prior to 10:00 o'clock a.m. (Central time) on a Euro Day at least three (3) Euro Days prior to the date the LIBOR Rate is to be applicable with respect to such portion of the Principal Balance referred to therein, in which Borrower elects to have said portion of the Principal Balance, or a portion thereof as specified in said notice, be a LIBOR Rate Advance.
LIBOR Rate Notice
: The period commencing on the date any LIBOR Rate Advance is made and ending one (1) month, two (2) months, three (3) months or six (6) months thereafter as selected by Borrower in the applicable LIBOR Rate Notice; provided, however, that (a) if any LIBOR Rate Period would end on a day that is not a Euro Day, such LIBOR Rate Period shall extend to the next Euro Day, unless, in the case of said LIBOR Rate Advance, such Euro Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which event such LIBOR Rate Period shall end on the immediately preceding Euro Day, and (b) no LIBOR Rate Period shall end later than the then applicable Maturity Date.
LIBOR Rate Period
: The loan evidenced by the Note.
Loan
: That portion of the Revolving Commitment Amount determined by Agent to be available to be advanced as more particularly described in .
Loan Availability
Section 2.B.3
: The documents described in , which evidence, secure or otherwise relate to the Loan, including but not limited to the Note, this Agreement, the Fee Letter, the Letter of Credit applications, the Letters of Credit, the Closing Certification, the Sworn Statement, the Guaranty, each Subsidiary Guaranty and including any amendments thereof and supplements thereto executed by Agent and Borrower (and/or any other party thereto).
Loan Documents
Section 2.B.1
: A rate of interest equal to the Prime Rate plus the Applicable Margin. Changes in the Loan Rate shall become effective on the same day as the date of any change in the Prime Rate and shall apply to all advances made hereunder (other than LIBOR Rate Advances), whether such advances are made prior to, the same day as, or subsequent to any particular change in the Loan Rate. In no event shall the Loan Rate ever exceed the maximum rate permitted by applicable law (if any such maximum rate is established by applicable law), and such maximum rate shall change if and when applicable law changes to permit a higher maximum rate.
Loan Rate
: Any portion of the Principal Balance which bears interest at the Loan Rate.
Loan Rate Advance
: The Unencumbered Assets known as Beacon, French Market and Southdale, and such other Approved Assets as Borrower and all Lenders may agree to designate as a Major Asset from time to time.
Major Asset
: Lenders holding not less than sixty-six and two-thirds of one percent (66 2/3%) of the then aggregate outstanding unpaid principal amount of the Loan
Majority Lenders
 
or, if no such principal amount is then outstanding, not less than sixty-six and two-thirds of one percent (66 2/3%) of the Revolving Commitment.
: December 19, 2010, unless extended pursuant to the terms of .
Maturity Date
Section 1.4
: The maximum principal amount of a hypothetical loan which would be fully repaid assuming (A) annual payments equal in the aggregate to Tranche B Available Earnings divided by 5, (B) a 25 year amortization schedule and (C) an annual interest rate equal to the greater of (i) seven and three quarters percent (7.75%) or (ii) two and one quarter percent (2.25) in excess of the then-current annual yield on ten-year U.S. Treasury obligations issued most recently prior to such date.
Maximum Availability
: The maximum aggregate amount that the beneficiaries may at any time draw under outstanding Letters of Credit, as such maximum aggregate amount may be reduced from time to time pursuant to the terms of the Letters of Credit.
Maximum Drawing Amount
: For any period of determination, an amount equal to Capitalization Value less Total Adjusted Outstanding Indebtedness.
Minimum Equity Value
: The requirement that any Real Estate Asset that on any date of determination has been improved with a building or buildings has been leased to third party tenants and has an aggregate average occupancy of all building(s) in such Real Estate Asset of not less than seventy five percent (75%) for the fiscal quarter most recently ended, other than Lexington and West Park, and except as otherwise approved by Majority Lenders; provided, however, in the event that the occupancy rate with respect to any Approved Asset meeting the Minimum Lease Up Requirement as of the date hereof falls below seventy-five percent (75%), Borrower shall have a period of eight (8) months thereafter to re-lease such asset in order to satisfy the Minimum Lease Up Requirement before such property shall no longer be deemed an Approved Asset. If, at any time thereafter, such former Approved Asset again meets the Minimum Lease-Up Requirement, it shall, as of the date it meets such requirement, again be deemed an Approved Asset. For purposes of this definition, a tenant shall be deemed to be in "occupancy" if such tenant or its subtenant(s) is in possession of the leased premises and such tenant is paying stipulated rent, if any; provided, however, when determining whether the Minimum Lease Up Requirement has been satisfied pursuant to hereof, a tenant shall be deemed to be in occupancy if, within six (6) months prior to the date of determination, such tenant entered into a lease for space in the Real Estate Asset which such tenant previously did not occupy and there exists no default under such lease and no material contingencies to such tenant's occupancy under the lease other than completion of tenant improvement work.
Minimum Lease Up Requirement
Section 2.B.2
: One or more wholesale funding markets available to Agent, including negotiable certificates of deposit, commercial paper, eurodollar deposits, bank notes, federal funds and others.
Money Markets
 
: The proceeds of a sale of an equity interest in the Borrower or the Guarantor (including those attributable to a dividend reinvestment program), net of usual and customary closing costs and expenses.
Net Equity Proceeds
: As defined in .
New Lenders
Section 3.6(b)
: As defined in .
New Notes
Section 3.6(b)
: Individually or collectively as the context may require, the Unsecured Revolving Promissory Note(s) of even date herewith executed and delivered by Borrower to Lenders to evidence the Loan, together with (a) any New Notes and/or Supplemental Notes issued pursuant to hereof, and (b) any Swing Loan Note executed and delivered by Borrower to the Swing Lender to evidence a Swing Loan, in the aggregate maximum principal amount of up to One Hundred Fifty Million and 00/100ths Dollars ($150,000,000.00) plus the Accordion Amount, if applicable, as any or all of the foregoing may be amended, modified or replaced from time to time.
Note
Section 3.6
: All indebtedness, obligations and liabilities of the Borrower to any of the Lenders, the Swing Lender and the Agent, individually or collectively, under this Agreement, any of the other Loan Documents, or in respect to the Loan, the Note or Reimbursement Obligations incurred or the Letter of Credit applications or the Letters of Credit, any Swing Loan or other instruments at any time evidencing any thereof, whether existing on the date of this Agreement or arising or incurred hereafter, direct or indirect, joint or several, absolute or contingent, matured or unmatured, liquidated or unliquidated, secured or unsecured, arising by contract, operation of law or otherwise.
Obligations
: As defined in hereof.
Outstanding Percentage
Section 3.6(c)
: As defined in hereof.
Participant
Section 8.8(G)
: For any period of determination, a determination by Agent of a hypothetical principal amount of indebtedness, calculated on a monthly basis, which Borrower could incur assuming (i) payments of annual debt service equal to Unencumbered Adjusted EBITDA measured with respect to the Approved Assets divided by 1.35, (ii) an interest rate equal to the greater of (a) two and one-quarter percent (2.25%) in excess of the then-current annual yield on ten-year United States Treasury obligations issued most recently prior to such date and (b) seven and three-quarters percent (7.75%), and (iii) a twenty five (25) year principal amortization schedule.
Permanent Loan Estimate
: Any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, partnership (general or limited), limited liability partnership, joint venture, firm, association, trust, unincorporated organization, government or governmental agency or political subdivision or any other entity, whether acting in an individual, fiduciary or other capacity.
Person
: The rate publicly announced by Agent from time to time as its prime rate, as and when such rate changes; provided, however, that Agent may lend to its customers at interest rates that are at, above or below the Prime Rate.
Prime Rate
 
: One Hundred Fifty Million and 00/100ths Dollars ($150,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may have been advanced to or for the benefit of Borrower (including, without limitation, under any Swing Loan) and remains unpaid from time to time, as such amount may be increased pursuant to hereof.
Principal Balance
Section 3.6
: A Real Estate Asset that would constitute an Unencumbered Asset at the time of its acquisition.
Proposed Acquisition
: The fixed and tangible properties consisting of land, buildings and/or other improvements owned or ground leased (subject to the following proviso) by the Borrower or by an Approved Subsidiary at the relevant time of reference thereto, provided however that with the exception of the Unencumbered Assets known as Beacon, Olney and Southdale, a ground leased property shall not be deemed a Real Estate Asset (and thus shall not be eligible as an Approved Asset) unless unanimously approved as such by the Lenders.
Real Estate Assets
Any Real Estate Assets for which the Borrower (or Approved Subsidiary) is actively pursuing construction and for which construction is proceeding to completion without undue delay from permit denial, construction delays or otherwise, all pursuant to such Person's ordinary course of business; provided that such Real Estate Asset will no longer be considered a Real Estate Asset Under Development on the date which is twelve (12) months after the Borrower (or Approved Subsidiary) obtains the necessary governmental approvals to permit occupancy of the building. Notwithstanding the foregoing, tenant improvements to previously constructed and/or leased Real Estate Assets shall not be considered Real Estate Assets Under Development.
:
Real Estate Assets Under Development
: As defined in .
Refunding Date
Section 3.5(c)
: Regulations D and U, respectively (or any substitute regulations), of the Board, together with all amendments from time to time thereto.
Regulation D; Regulation U
: Any change, after the date hereof in United States Federal, state or foreign laws, regulations or treaties or the adoption or making after such date of any interpretations, directives or requests applying to Agent and/or the Lenders under any federal, state or foreign laws or regulations (whether or not having the force of law) by any court or governmental or monetary authority charged with the interpretation or administration thereof.
Regulatory Change
: The Borrower's obligation to reimburse the Lenders and the Agent on account of any drawing under any Letter of Credit as provided in . Notwithstanding the foregoing, unless Borrower shall notify Agent of its intention to repay the Reimbursement Obligations on the date of the related drawing under any Letter of Credit, as set forth in , such Reimbursement Obligation shall simultaneously with such drawing be converted to and become a Loan Rate Advance.
Reimbursement Obligations
Section 2.A.4
Section 2.A.4
: As defined in .
Requested Increase
Section 3.6(a)
 
: The obligation of the Lenders to make Advances to Borrower and to participate in the issuance, extension and renewal of Letters of Credit and the obligation of Agent to issue, extend and renew Letters of Credit, in an aggregate principal amount at any time not to exceed the Revolving Commitment Amount upon the terms and subject to the conditions and limitations set forth in this Agreement.
Revolving Commitment
: One Hundred Fifty Million and 00/100ths Dollars ($150,000,000.00), as such amount may be increased in accordance with the provisions of hereof.
Revolving Commitment Amount
Section 3.6(a)
: As defined in .
Shortfall
Section 3.6(a)
: For any entity, any corporation, partnership or other entity of which at least a majority of the securities or other ownership interests having by the terms thereof ordinary voting power to elect a majority of the board of directors or other persons performing similar functions of such corporation, partnership or other entity (without regard to the occurrence of any contingency) which is at the time directly or indirectly owned or controlled by such entity or one or more subsidiaries of such entity or by such entity and one or more subsidiaries of such entity.
Subsidiary
: As defined in .
Subsidiary Guaranty
Section 5.9.E
: As defined in .
Supplemental Notes
Section 3.6(b)
: U.S. Bank National Association, in its capacity as the lender under the Swing Loan facility described in , and its successors in such capacity.
Swing Lender
Section 3.5
: A loan made by the Swing Lender pursuant to .
Swing Loan
Section 3.5
: $30,000,000.
Swing Loan Commitment
: A written request by Borrower for an Advance of Swing Loan proceeds under this Agreement, in the form and with the certifications included within attached hereto and hereby made a part hereof.
Swing Loan Draw Request
Exhibit A-2
: As defined in .
Swing Loan Maturity Date
Section 3.5
: As defined in .
Swing Loan Note
Section 3.5
: As defined in .
Swing Loan Refund Amount
Section 3.5
: The earlier of (a) the Maturity Date, or (b) the date on which the Note is declared to be immediately due and payable pursuant to the terms hereof or of the Note.
Termination Date
: As of any date of determination, the sum (without duplication) as determined by Agent of all committed obligations, contingent
Total Adjusted Committed Indebtedness
 
and otherwise of the Borrower and Borrower's pro rata share of all committed obligations of Borrower's unconsolidated subsidiaries, the unconsolidated subsidiaries of the general partners of Borrower, and joint ventures in which Borrower and/or Borrower's general partners is a party, whether secured or unsecured, that in accordance with GAAP should be classified upon the obligor's balance sheet as liabilities, or to which reference should be made by footnotes thereto, including in any event and whether or not so classified: (a) the committed amount of all debt and similar monetary obligations, whether direct or indirect (excluding trade payables and other operating expenses paid by Borrower within sixty days); (b) the committed amount of all liabilities secured by any mortgage, pledge, security interest, lien, charge, or other encumbrance existing on property owned or acquired subject thereto, whether or not the liability secured thereby shall have been assumed; (c) the maximum liability which Borrower could incur under all guarantees for borrowed money, endorsements and other contingent obligations, whether direct or indirect, in respect of indebtedness or obligations of others, including any obligation to supply funds (including partnership obligations and capital requirements) to or in any manner to invest in, directly or indirectly, the debtor, to purchase indebtedness, or to assure the owner of indebtedness against loss, through an agreement to purchase goods, supplies, or services for the purpose of enabling the debtor to make payment of the indebtedness held by such owner or otherwise, and the obligations to reimburse the issuer in respect of any letters of credit; (d) preferred stock outstanding or a similar type of investment; and (e) all liability under forward equity arrangements and Forward Purchase Contracts which at such time could be specifically enforced by the seller thereunder. For the avoidance of doubt, preferred stock outstanding or a similar type of investment that in accordance with GAAP is classified upon the obligor's balance sheet as equity shall not be included in the definition of "Total Adjusted Committed Indebtedness."
: As of any date of determination, the sum (without duplication) as determined by Agent of all advanced and outstanding obligations, contingent and otherwise of the Borrower and Borrower's pro rata share of all advanced and outstanding obligations of Borrower's unconsolidated subsidiaries, the unconsolidated subsidiaries of the general partners of Borrower, and joint ventures in which Borrower and/or Borrower's general partners is a party, whether secured or unsecured, that in accordance with GAAP should be classified upon the obligor's balance sheet as liabilities, or to which reference should be made by footnotes thereto, including in any event and whether or not so classified: (a) all debt and similar monetary obligations, whether direct or indirect (excluding trade payables and other operating expenses paid by Borrower within sixty days); (b) all liabilities secured by any mortgage, pledge, security interest, lien, charge, or other encumbrance existing on property owned or acquired subject thereto, whether or not the liability secured thereby shall have been assumed; (c) all guarantees for borrowed money, endorsements and other contingent obligations, whether direct or indirect, in respect of advanced and outstanding indebtedness or obligations of others, including any obligation to supply funds (including partnership obligations and capital requirements) to or in any manner to invest in, directly or indirectly, the debtor, to purchase indebtedness, or to assure the owner of indebtedness against loss, through an agreement to purchase goods, supplies, or services for the purpose of enabling the debtor to make payment of the indebtedness held by such owner or otherwise, and the obligations to reimburse the issuer in respect of any letters of credit; (d) preferred stock outstanding or a similar type of investment; and (e) all liability under forward equity arrangements and
Total Adjusted Outstanding Indebtedness
 
Forward Purchase Contracts which at such time could be specifically enforced by the seller thereunder. For the avoidance of doubt, preferred stock outstanding or a similar type of investment that in accordance with GAAP is classified upon the obligor's balance sheet as equity shall not be included in the definition of "Total Adjusted Outstanding Indebtedness."
: As of any date of determination, the aggregate unpaid principal balance of Advances outstanding on such date.
Total Revolving Outstandings
: As of any date of determination, the aggregate unpaid principal balance of Tranche A Advances outstanding on such date.
Total Revolving Tranche A Outstandings
: As of any date of determination, the aggregate unpaid principal balance of Tranche B Advances outstanding on such date.
Total Revolving Tranche B Outstandings
: Certain Advances as determined in accordance with .
Tranche A Advance
Section 3.4.B.III
: With respect to any period, an amount (calculated monthly and annualized) equal to the sum of all principal and accrued interest which would be required to be paid during such period in order to repay an amount equal to the then Tranche A Loan Availability over a hypothetical twenty-five-year amortization schedule at a hypothetical annual interest rate equal to the greater of: (i) seven and three-quarters percent (7.75%) or (ii) two and one-quarter percent (2.25%) in excess of the then-current annual yield on ten-year U.S. Treasury obligations issued most recently prior to such date.
Tranche A Debt Service
: A Tranche A Advance which is a LIBOR Rate Advance.
Tranche A LIBOR Rate Advance
: That portion of the Loan relating to Tranche A Advances.
Tranche A Loan
: That portion of the Revolving Commitment Amount determined by Agent to be available to be advanced as Tranche A Advances as more particularly described in .
Tranche A Loan Availability
Section 2.B.3
: A Tranche A Advance which is a Loan Rate Advance.
Tranche A Loan Rate Advance
: Certain Advances as determined in accordance with .
Tranche B Advance
Section 3.4.B.III
: The amount determined with respect to the then immediately preceding twelve (12) full calendar months equal to (i) Adjusted EBITDA, less (ii) Debt Service (other than all principal and interest paid or required to be paid in respect of the Loan), less (iii) Tranche A Debt Service, as determined by Agent.
Tranche B Available Earnings
: A Tranche B Advance which is a LIBOR Rate Advance.
Tranche B LIBOR Rate Advance
 
: That portion of the Loan relating to Tranche B Advances.
Tranche B Loan
: That portion of the Revolving Commitment Amount determined by Agent to be available to be advanced as Tranche B Advances as more particularly described in .
Tranche B Loan Availability
Section 2.B.3
: A Tranche B Advance which is a Loan Rate Advance.
Tranche B Loan Rate Advance
: Adjusted EBITDA calculated only with respect to the Approved Assets.
Unencumbered Adjusted EBITDA
. Any Real Estate Asset that on any date of determination: (a) is not subject to any material liens (including any such lien imposed by the organizational documents of the owner of such asset), (b) is not the subject of any matter that materially adversely affects the value of such Real Estate Asset, (c) is not the subject of a Disqualifying Environmental Event, (d) has been improved with a building or buildings which (1) have been issued a certificate of occupancy (where available) or is otherwise lawfully occupied for its intended use, and (2) are fully operational, (e) is wholly owned or ground-leased (to the extent permitted hereunder) by the Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary and (f) has not been designated by the Borrower in writing to the Agent as a Real Estate Asset that is not an Unencumbered Asset, which designation shall not be permitted during the continuance of an Event of Default and shall be accompanied by a compliance certificate in the form of attached hereto.
Unencumbered Asset
Exhibit B-6
: With respect to any Letter of Credit, the Uniform Customs and Practice for Documentary Credits (1993 Revision), International Chamber of Commerce Publication No. 500, or any successor version thereof adopted by the Agent in the ordinary course of its business as a letter of credit issuer and in effect at the time of issuance of such Letter of Credit.
Uniform Customs
: As of any date of determination, the sum of (a) the aggregate amount of unrestricted cash then held by the Borrower and (b) the aggregate amount of unrestricted cash equivalents (valued at fair market value) then held by the Borrower. As used in this definition, (i) "unrestricted" means the specified asset is not subject to any liens in favor of any Person and (ii) "cash equivalents" include overnight deposits and also means that such asset has a liquid, par value in cash and is convertible to cash on demand. Notwithstanding anything contained herein to the contrary, the term Unrestricted Cash and Cash Equivalents shall not include the commitments of the Lenders to make Advances under this Agreement or any other commitments from which the access to such cash or cash equivalents would create indebtedness or tenant security and other restricted deposits, until forfeited or otherwise entitled to be retained by the Borrower.
Unrestricted Cash and Cash Equivalents
1.1
Principal Advances
 
Upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, each Lender severally, but not jointly, agrees to lend to Borrower, pro rata in accordance with its Commitment Percentage, and Borrower agrees to borrow from Lenders, on a revolving basis, at any time and from time to time, in accordance with the terms hereof, from the Closing Date to the Termination Date, during which period Borrower may borrow, repay and reborrow in accordance with the terms hereof, for the purpose of acquisitions, pre-development, development, and renovations/expansions, entitled land (not to exceed 20% of the Revolving Commitment Amount in the aggregate at any one time), short-term working capital (including Distributions not to exceed $10,000,000.00 in the aggregate at any one time), principal amortization requirements and letters of credit issued for the account of Borrower (not to exceed $15,000,000.00 in the aggregate at any one time); provided, however, that (A) at no time shall any Lender be obligated to lend to Borrower more than its Commitment Percentage of the total amount of proceeds of the Loan which Borrower is then qualified to receive hereunder, (B) the amount of the Total Revolving Outstandings shall never exceed the lesser of (x) the Revolving Commitment Amount and (y) the Loan Availability, (C) the amount of the Total Revolving Tranche A Outstandings shall never exceed the Tranche A Loan Availability, and (D) the amount of the Total Revolving Tranche B Outstandings shall never exceed the Tranche B Loan Availability. In no event shall Borrower use Loan proceeds in connection with the acquisition of unentitled land (., land with none of the following: (i) existing or approved infrastructure, (ii) access or entitlement to utilities or (iii) plan for development), mortgages or public or private securities (other than the purchase of shares in Saul Centers, Inc. not to exceed $5,000,000.00 in the aggregate at any one time), without in each instance obtaining Agent's prior written consent.
i.e
All Advances by each Lender shall be evidenced by a Note. Each Note executed by the Borrower shall be in the aggregate principal amount equal to such Lender's Commitment Percentage of the Revolving Commitment Amount. Each Lender shall enter in its ledgers and records the amount of each such Advance, and of each payment made upon the Loan, and each Lender is authorized by Borrower to enter on a schedule attached to the Note a record of such Advances and payments; provided, however, that the failure by any Lender to make any such entry or any error by such Lender in making such entry shall not limit or otherwise affect the Obligations. Notwithstanding the express principal amount of the Note, Borrower shall not at any time be obligated to repay more or less than the total of all Advances made by each Lender pursuant hereto and to the other Loan Documents, together with interest thereon at the rates specified below and in the Note, computed on each Advance from the date it is so made by such Lender, and all other advances made by such Lender pursuant to the terms of the Loan Documents, with interest thereon as therein provided, less all payments of principal of and interest on the Note, and of such advances and interest thereon, made by Borrower. The entire unpaid principal amount of the Loan shall be due and payable on the Termination Date.
Advances under the Loan shall consist of Tranche A Advances and Tranche B Advances. Borrower and Agent each acknowledge that the separation of the Loan into two separate tranches is done for the sole purpose of applying different interest rates and availability requirements to portions of the Loan, and that together the Tranche A Loan and Tranche B Loan represent and are a single unified loan and debt evidenced by the
 
Note. No Tranche B Advances shall be made unless and until the Total Revolving Outstandings are equal to or greater than the Tranche A Loan Availability. The Total Revolving Tranche B Outstandings shall be repaid in full prior to any principal reductions on the Total Revolving Tranche A Outstandings. In the event the Total Revolving Commitment is reduced for any reason whatsoever, such reduction shall first reduce the Tranche B Loan Availability.
. Interest shall accrue on the Principal Balance from and after the date hereof. All interest payable hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a 360 day year, but shall be charged for the actual number of days principal is unpaid. Interest accruing in accordance herewith shall be payable, in arrears, on the first Business Day of each calendar month, commencing with the first Business Day of the next calendar month following the calendar month in which the initial advance is made to Borrower, and continuing on the first Business Day of each and every calendar month thereafter until the Principal Balance (as advanced and readvanced) and all accrued interest thereon are paid in full. Agent shall provide a monthly notice to Borrower setting forth the amount of interest due and the due date thereof, which notice shall be mailed on or prior to the tenth (10th) day preceding the first day of each month; provided, however, that Borrower shall be obligated to pay interest on the Loan (and any Swing Loan) when due regardless of the date Borrower receives such notice. All unpaid, accrued interest shall be paid in full on the Termination Date.
1.2
Payment of Interest and Principal
In the event that the interest and/or charges in the nature of interest, if any, provided for by this Agreement or by any other Loan Document, shall contravene a legal or statutory limitation applicable to the Loan (or any Swing Loan), if any, Borrower shall pay only such amounts as would legally be permitted; provided, however, that if the defense of usury and all similar defenses are unavailable to Borrower, Borrower shall pay all amounts provided for herein. If, for any reason, amounts in excess of the amounts permitted in the foregoing sentence shall have been paid, received, collected or applied hereunder, whether by reason of acceleration or otherwise, then, and in that event, any such excess amounts shall be applied to principal, unless principal has been fully paid, in which event such excess amount shall be refunded to Borrower.
The parties understand that the applicable interest rate for this indebtedness shall be determined and/or adjusted from time-to-time based upon certain financial ratios and/or other information to be provided or certified to Agent by Borrower (the "). If it is subsequently determined that any such Borrower Information was incorrect (for whatever reason, including without limitation because of a subsequent restatement of earnings by Borrower) at the time it was delivered to Agent, and if the applicable interest rate calculated for any period was lower than it should have been had the correct information been timely provided, then, such interest rate for such period shall be automatically recalculated using the correct Borrower Information. Agent shall promptly notify Borrower in writing of any additional interest due because of such recalculation, and Borrower shall pay to the Agent, for the account of each Lender as applicable, such additional interest within five (5) business days of receipt of such written notice. Any recalculation of interest required by this provision shall survive termination of this agreement and this provision shall not in any way limit any of Agent's or any Lender's other rights and remedies under this Agreement.
"Borrower Information
 
. The Principal Balance and accrued interest thereon may be prepaid in full or in part at any time, without premium or penalty (other than as set forth in with respect to prepayments of any LIBOR Rate Advances), after a minimum of one (1) Business Day prior written notice from Borrower to Agent of the date of prepayment, any such prepayments being first applied in reduction of any then outstanding balance of the Tranche B Loan. Upon any such prepayment in full, Borrower may terminate this Agreement, without fee or penalty, pursuant to written notice to Agent. Each prepayment shall be in an amount not less than the lesser of $100,000.00 or the Principal Balance.
1.3
Prepayment
Section 1.11
. If not sooner paid in accordance with the terms hereof, the Principal Balance, together with all unpaid interest accrued thereon, shall be due and payable, in full, on the Maturity Date; provided, however, the Maturity Date may be extended for one (1) additional period of one (1) year (the ") upon the written request (the ) of Borrower given not less than thirty (30) days nor more than one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the Maturity Date, such extension being subject to satisfaction of all of the following conditions:
1.4
Maturity Date; Extension
Extension Period
"Extension Request"
A. Payment on or before the first day of the Extension Period of the Extension Fee set forth in the Fee Letter;
B. At the time of the Extension Request and on the first day of the Extension Period, there shall exist no uncured Event of Default (as hereinafter defined) or event which, with the giving of notice or passage of time, or both, could become an Event of Default;
C. Borrower shall deliver to Agent all financial information relating to Borrower and Guarantor required hereunder, and such information shall reflect that no material adverse change, financial or otherwise, as determined by Agent, in its sole discretion, shall have occurred with respect to Borrower or Guarantor;
Notwithstanding Borrower's right to extend the Maturity Date of the Loan as set forth above, Borrower hereby agrees that Agent and the Lenders shall have no commitment or obligation to extend the Maturity Date beyond December 19, 2010 unless each of the foregoing conditions shall have been satisfied.
. From and after the date hereof, and until the date on which the Note is paid in full, Borrower shall pay interest on the Principal Balance at the Loan Rate, as the same may fluctuate from time to time; provided, however, subject to the limitations stated herein, Borrower may elect in accordance with the procedures set forth herein to have interest accrue and be paid on all or a portion of the outstanding Principal Balance (other than with respect to a Swing Loan) at a rate per annum equal to the LIBOR Rate.
1.5
Calculation of Interest
. Borrower may elect to fix the rate of interest payable upon the Principal Balance (other than with respect to a Swing Loan) or any portion thereof pursuant to the provisions of this Section. The provisions of this shall
1.6
LIBOR Pricing Options
Section 1.6
 
govern the computation, accrual and payment of interest with respect to the Principal Balance or any portion thereof for which Borrower properly makes such an election. If no Event of Default has occurred and is continuing under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents, Borrower may from time to time elect, by a LIBOR Rate Notice, to pay interest on the LIBOR Rate Advance described in said LIBOR Rate Notice at a LIBOR Rate during the LIBOR Rate Period specified in said LIBOR Rate Notice; provided, however, Borrower may not elect to have more than five (5) LIBOR Rate Advances outstanding at any one time. Upon request by Borrower, prior to the submission by Borrower to Agent of any LIBOR Rate Notice, Agent shall by telephone advise Borrower from time to time of the then applicable LIBOR Rate with respect to any LIBOR Rate Period promptly after the same is determined by Agent, which determination shall be final, conclusive and binding on Borrower. All interest accruing hereunder at a LIBOR Rate shall accrue and be computed and charged in the same manner as interest at the Loan Rate. From and after the end of each LIBOR Rate Period, in the event Borrower does not timely select another interest rate option at least three (3) Euro Days before a particular LIBOR Rate Advance expires, Agent may, at any time thereafter convert such LIBOR Rate Advance to a Loan Rate Advance, but until such conversion, the funds advanced under the expired LIBOR Rate Advance shall continue to accrue interest at the same rate as the interest rate under such expired LIBOR Rate Advance. Agent's internal records of applicable interest rates shall be determinative in the absence of manifest error. Notwithstanding the foregoing, all LIBOR Rate Periods at any one time outstanding shall end on not more than five (5) different dates, and the duration of any LIBOR Rate Periods which would exceed such limitation shall be adjusted to coincide with the remaining term of such other shorter LIBOR Rate Period(s) as Borrower shall notify Agent of in writing, or absent such notice, as Agent may elect. Except as hereinafter expressly provided, no LIBOR Rate Advance may be repaid or prepaid on any day other than the last day of the LIBOR Rate Period applicable thereto; provided, however, that if Agent is required by any applicable law, statute, rule, regulation or requirement to accept any such prepayment, Borrower shall also pay to Agent for the benefit of the Lenders, from time to time, on demand, any sums necessary to compensate the Lenders for all costs, expenses, claims, penalties and liabilities incurred by the Lenders by virtue of the repayment or prepayment of funds, or the inability of the Lenders to repay or prepay funds borrowed by the Lenders in the London interbank market to advance to Borrower.
. Notwithstanding any other provision herein, if any Regulatory Change shall change the basis of taxation of payments to the Lenders of the principal of or interest on any LIBOR Rate Advance or any other fees or amounts payable hereunder (other than taxes imposed on the overall net income of the Lenders by the jurisdiction in which the Lenders have their principal offices or by any political subdivision or taxing authority therein), or shall subject the Lenders to any new or additional charge, fee, withholding or tax of any kind with respect to the Loan hereunder or change the method of taxation of the Loan or impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit or loan commitments extended by, the Lenders (except any such reserve requirement which is reflected in LIBOR) or shall impose on a Lender or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement, the Note or the LIBOR Rate Advances made by the Lenders, and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to the Lenders of making or maintaining any LIBOR Rate Advance or to reduce the amount of any sum
1.7
Regulatory Costs
 
received or receivable by a Lender hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise) in respect thereof, by an amount deemed by such Lender to be material, then Borrower shall pay to Agent for the benefit of such Lender upon demand, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender for such additional costs or reduction, including lost income resulting therefrom as reasonably determined by such Lender. A statement from such Lender setting forth such amount or amounts as shall be necessary to so compensate such Lender shall be delivered to Borrower and shall, in the absence of manifest error, be conclusive and binding upon Borrower. Borrower shall pay Agent on behalf of such Lender the amount shown as due on any such statement within ten (10) Business Days after its receipt of the same. Failure on the part of any Lender to demand compensation for any increased costs, lost income or reduction in amounts received or receivable shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's rights to demand compensation for any increased costs or reduction in amounts received or receivable. The protection under this section shall be available to the Lenders regardless of any possible contention of the invalidity or inapplicability of any law, regulation or directive which shall give rise to any demand by the Lenders.
. In the event that on the date for determining LIBOR in respect of the LIBOR Rate Period for any LIBOR Rate Advance, Agent shall determine (which determination shall be conclusive in the absence of manifest error) that, by reason of circumstances affecting the London interbank market, adequate and fair means do not exist for ascertaining LIBOR for such LIBOR Rate Period, Agent shall promptly give to Borrower telephonic notice (confirmed as soon as practicable in writing) of the nature and effect of such circumstances. After receipt of such notice and during the existence of such circumstances, Borrower shall have no right to elect a LIBOR Rate with respect to advances hereunder; provided that nothing in this Section shall affect the LIBOR Rate then in effect on any LIBOR Rate Advance outstanding at the time of receipt by Borrower of such notice until the expiration of the LIBOR Rate Period in effect with respect to such LIBOR Rate Advance at such time.
1.8
Inability to Determine LIBOR
. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein contained, if any Regulatory Change shall make it unlawful for any Lender to make or maintain any LIBOR Rate Advance or to give effect to its obligations as contemplated hereby, then, by written notice to Borrower, Agent may:
1.9
Illegality
A. Declare that LIBOR Rate Advances will not thereafter be made hereunder, in which event Borrower shall be prohibited from requesting LIBOR Rate Advances, and the Lenders shall not be required to make LIBOR Rate Advances to Borrower, hereunder unless such declaration is subsequently withdrawn; and
B. Require, but only to the extent the Regulatory Change affects outstanding LIBOR Rate Advances, that all outstanding LIBOR Rate Advances made by the Lenders be added to, and become a part of, the Loan Rate Advance hereunder, in which event all such LIBOR Rate Advances shall automatically be added to, and become a part of, the Loan Rate Advance as of the effective date of such notice as is hereinafter provided for (notwithstanding any provisions of the Note or this Agreement to the contrary), and interest shall accrue thereon, from and after said date, at the Loan Rate or the Default
 
Rate, whichever is then applicable. For purposes of this Section, a notice to Borrower by Agent shall be effective on the date of receipt by Borrower.
. Borrower shall also pay to the applicable Lenders from time to time on demand such amounts as such Lender may determine to be necessary to compensate such Lender for any costs which such Lender determines are attributable to the extension of credit hereunder in respect of any amount of capital maintained by such Lender or any of its affiliates pursuant to any law, guideline or regulation of any jurisdiction or any interpretation, directive or request (whether or not having the force of law) of any court or governmental or monetary authority enacted, whether proposed on the date of this Agreement or enacted, promulgated or issued after the date of this Agreement. Without limiting the foregoing, such compensation shall include an amount equal to any reduction in return on assets or return on equity to a level below that which the Lenders could have achieved absent their extension of credit hereunder and but for such law, regulation, interpretation, directive or request.
1.10
Capital Adequacy
. If a LIBOR Rate Advance is prepaid, whether by the Borrower as a result of acceleration upon default or otherwise, the Borrower agrees to pay all of the losses, costs, expenses and Interest Differential (as determined by the Agent) of Agent and the Lenders incurred or sustained as a result of such prepayment. Because of the short-term nature of this facility, the Borrower agrees that the Interest Differential shall not be discounted to its present value. Any prepayment of a LIBOR Rate Advance shall be in an amount equal to the remaining entire principal balance of such advance. Agent shall provide to Borrower a statement, signed by an officer of Agent, explaining any such loss or expense and setting forth, if applicable, the computations used to determine such loss or expense which shall be conclusive and binding on Borrower, absent manifest error.
1.11
Indemnification of Agent and the Lenders
. If a default shall occur and continue beyond any applicable notice, cure or grace period under the Note, this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents or the entire Principal Balance, all interest accrued thereon, and all other amounts payable under the Loan have not been repaid on or before the Maturity Date, then the entire Principal Balance shall (without notice to or demand upon Borrower) become due and payable on said date, together with all unpaid, accrued interest thereon and all other amounts payable under the Loan, and with interest computed thereon from and after that date at a rate which is four percent (4%) per annum in excess of the Loan Rate or the LIBOR Rate, as applicable, or at the maximum lawful rate of interest which may be charged thereon by Agent, if any, whichever is less (hereinafter called ""), until all such amounts are paid in full.
1.12
Default Rate
Default Rate
. In the event that any required payment of principal and/or interest hereunder (other than full payment at maturity) is not made within five (5) days of the due date thereof, Borrower shall pay to Agent an additional payment of a late payment charge to compensate for Lenders' loss of use of funds and for the expenses of handling the delinquent payment, in an amount equal to five percent (5.0%) of such delinquent payment. In the event the maturity of the indebtedness hereunder is accelerated by Agent, this section shall apply only to payments overdue prior to the time of such acceleration.
1.13
Late Payment Charge
 
. Borrower, Agent and the Lenders agree that no payment of interest or other consideration made or agreed to be made by Borrower to Agent and/or the Lenders pursuant to this Agreement, the Note or any other instrument referring to or securing the Note shall, at any time, be deemed to have been computed at an interest rate in excess of the maximum rate of interest permissible by law, if any. In the event such payments of interest or other consideration provided for in this Agreement, the Note or any other instrument referring to or securing the Note shall result in payment of an effective rate of interest which, for any period of time, is in excess of the limit of the usury law or any other law applicable to the Loan evidenced by the Note, all sums in excess of those lawfully collectible as interest for the period in question shall, without further agreement or notice between or by any party or parties hereto, be applied to the Principal Balance immediately upon receipt of such monies by Agent with the same force and effect as though Borrower had specifically designated, and Agent had agreed to accept, such extra payments as a principal payment, without premium or penalty. If principal has been fully paid, any such excess amount shall be refunded to Borrower. This provision shall control over every other obligation of Borrower, Agent and the Lenders hereunder and under the Note and any other instrument which secures the Note.
1.14
Effective Rate
. All payments made under the Note shall be applied to any late payment charge then due, to accrued interest (first with respect to Tranche B Advances, then to Tranche A Advances), to the Principal Balance (first with respect to Tranche B Advances, then to Tranche A Advances) and, if Agent and the Lenders have advanced any sums under the terms of any instrument which secures the Note, to repayment of the funds so advanced, even though the same have become part of the Principal Balance, together with interest thereon at the Default Rate, in such order as Agent, at its option, may elect. All payments made under the Loan shall be made in Immediately Available Funds, without counterclaim or set off and free and clear of, and without any deduction or withholding for, any taxes or other payments.
1.15
Payments
. On the date hereof and on or before the dates set forth therein, Borrower shall pay Agent all fees, costs and expenses referenced in the Fee Letter. The agency fee set forth in the Fee Letter is for the services to be performed by Agent in acting as Agent and is fully earned on the date paid. The agency fee paid to the Agent is solely for its own account and is nonrefundable.
1.16
Fees
1.17
Non-Usage Fees
In addition to any other fees set forth in this Agreement, Borrower shall pay to Agent on behalf of Lenders in Immediately Available Funds a non-usage fee equal to 0.15% per annum multiplied by the unadvanced portion of the Revolving Commitment Amount (after deducting the undrawn amount of any Letters of Credit outstanding hereunder), payable on the first day of each calendar quarter, calculated in arrears based on the average daily balance of the unadvanced portion of the Revolving Commitment Amount during the prior calendar quarter; the first payment of such fee shall be due and payable on April 1, 2008 and shall be pro rated based upon that portion of the calendar quarter during which the Revolving Commitment is outstanding. The non-usage fee shall be
 
shared among the Lenders in accordance with the daily average Commitment Percentages of the Lenders during such calendar quarter.
2.A
Terms of the Letter of Credit Facility
2.A.1. . Upon the terms and subject to the conditions of this Agreement, Agent agrees, in its individual capacity, to issue, extend and renew Letters of Credit for the account of Borrower from time to time between the Closing Date and the Termination Date in such form as may be requested by Borrower and reasonably agreed to by Agent and in such amounts as the Borrower shall request up to an aggregate amount at any time outstanding not exceeding the Revolving Commitment Amount; , , that, after giving effect to such issuance, (a) the Maximum Drawing Amount shall not exceed $15,000,000.00 at any time, (b) the sum of (i) the Maximum Drawing Amount on all Letters of Credit and (ii) Total Revolving Outstandings shall not exceed the Loan Availability in effect at any time, and (c) the total number of Letters of Credit outstanding shall not exceed five (5).
Letters of Credit
provided
however
2.A.2. . Each request for a Letter of Credit shall be made by the Borrower, in writing, by telex, facsimile transmission or electronic conveyance received by the Agent by 2:00 p.m. (Central time) on a Business Day which is not less than five (5) Business Days preceding the requested date of issuance (which shall also be a Business Day) and shall be accompanied by a certificate executed by the Borrower in the form of . Each request for a Letter of Credit shall specify (i) the date of issuance of the requested Letter of Credit, (ii) the amount of the requested Letter of Credit, (iii) the name of the account party on such Letter of Credit, and (iv) the beneficiary of such Letter of Credit. The Agent may require that such request be made on such letter of credit application and reimbursement agreement form as the Agent may from time to time specify, along with satisfactory evidence of the authority and incumbency of the representative of the Borrower making such request. Each request for a Letter of Credit shall be deemed a representation by the Borrower that, on the date of issuance of such Letter of Credit and after giving effect thereto, the applicable conditions specified in have been and will be satisfied. Unless the Agent determines that any applicable condition specified in has not been satisfied, the Agent will issue the requested Letter of Credit at its principal office in Minneapolis, Minnesota not later than 3:00 p.m. on the requested date of issuance.
Procedures for Letters of Credit
Exhibit B-7
Article III
Article III
2.A.3. . Letters of Credit shall be issued in support of obligations of the Borrower. All Letters of Credit must expire not later than thirty (30) days prior to the Maturity Date. Each Letter of Credit so issued, extended or renewed shall be subject to the Uniform Customs.
Terms of Letters of Credit
2.A.4. . If the Agent has received documents purporting to draw under a Letter of Credit that the Agent believes conform to the requirements of the Letter of Credit, or if the Agent has decided that it will
Agreement to Repay Letter of Credit Drawing
 
comply with the Borrower's written request or authorization to pay a drawing on any Letter of Credit that the Agent does not believe conforms to the requirements of the Letter of Credit, it will notify Borrower, of that fact. Except as contemplated in below, the Borrower shall reimburse the Agent for the account of the Agent or (as the case may be) the Lenders by 9:30 a.m. (Central time) on the day on which such drawing is to be paid in Immediately Available Funds in an amount equal to the amount of such drawing. In addition, Borrower agrees to reimburse or pay to Agent for the account of the Agent or (as the case may be) the Lenders with respect to each Letter of Credit issued, extended or renewed by Agent hereunder:
Section 2.A.10
A. Upon reduction (but not termination) of the Revolving Commitment Amount to an amount less than the then Maximum Drawing Amount, an amount equal to such difference, which amount shall be held by the Agent in a non-interest bearing account as cash collateral for the benefit of Lenders and the Agent for all Reimbursement Obligations, and
B. Upon the termination of the Revolving Commitment, or the acceleration of the Reimbursement Obligations with respect to all Letters of Credit in accordance with , an amount equal to the then Maximum Drawing Amount on all Letters of Credit, which amount shall be held by Agent in a non-interest bearing account as cash collateral for the benefit of Lenders and Agent for all Reimbursement Obligations.
Section 6.2(C)
2.A.5. . The obligation of the Borrower under to repay the Agent for any amount drawn on any Letter of Credit shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, shall continue for so long as any Letter of Credit is outstanding, notwithstanding any termination of this Agreement, and shall be paid strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, under all circumstances whatsoever, including without limitation the following circumstances:
Obligations Absolute
Section 2.A.4.
A. Any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit;
B. The existence of any claim, setoff, defense or other right which the Borrower may have or claim at any time against any beneficiary, transferee or holder of any Letter of Credit (or any Person for whom any such beneficiary, transferee or holder may be acting), the Agent or any other Person, whether in connection with a Letter of Credit, this Agreement, the transactions contemplated hereby, or any unrelated transaction; or
C. Any statement or any other document presented under any Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent, invalid or insufficient in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect whatsoever.
Neither the Agent nor its officers, directors or employees shall be liable or responsible for, and the Obligations of the Borrower shall not be impaired by:
(i) The use which may be made of any Letter of Credit or any acts or omissions of any beneficiary, transferee or holder thereof in connection therewith;
 
(ii) The validity, sufficiency or genuineness of documents, or of any endorsements thereon, even if such documents or endorsements should, in fact, prove to be in any or all respects invalid, insufficient, fraudulent or forged;
(iii) The acceptance by the Agent of documents that appear on their face to be in order, without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary; or
(iv) Any other action of the Agent in making or failing to make payment under any Letter of Credit if in good faith and in conformity with U.S. or foreign laws, regulations or customs applicable thereto.
2.A.6. . If any Regulatory Change shall either (a) impose, modify or make applicable any reserve, deposit, capital adequacy or similar requirement against Letters of Credit issued by the Agent, or (b) shall impose on the Agent any other conditions affecting this Agreement or any Letter of Credit; and the result of any of the foregoing is to increase the cost to the Agent of issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit, or reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by the Agent hereunder, then, upon written demand (which demand shall be given by the Agent promptly after it determines such increased cost or reduction), the Borrower shall pay to the Agent the additional amount or amounts as will compensate the Agent for such actual or imputed increased cost or reduction. A certificate submitted to the Borrower by the Agent setting forth the basis for the determination of such additional amount or amounts necessary to compensate the Agent as aforesaid, and stating in reasonable detail the basis for the charge and the method of computation, shall be conclusive and binding on the Borrower absent error.
Increased Cost for Letters of Credit
2.A.7. . For each Letter of Credit issued, the Borrower shall pay to the Agent (a) a fee equal to the higher of (a) $1,000.00, or (b) 12.5 basis points on each Letter of Credit face amount, payable upon issuance of each such Letter of Credit, and (b) a fee (a ) in an amount equal to the Applicable Margin (as applied to Tranche A LIBOR Rate Advances, to the extent such Letter of Credit is issued in reduction of Tranche A Loan Availability, and as applied to Tranche B LIBOR Rate Advances, to the extent such Letter of Credit is issued in reduction of Tranche B Loan Availability, as determined by Agent) per annum multiplied by the face amount of each outstanding Letter of Credit, which Letter of Credit Fee (i) shall be payable quarterly in arrears on the first day of each calendar quarter for the immediately preceding calendar quarter (which Letter of Credit Fee shall be pro-rated for any calendar quarter in which such Letter of Credit is issued, drawn upon or otherwise reduced or terminated) and (ii) shall be for the account of the Lenders pro rata in accordance with their respective Commitment Percentages. In addition to the Letter of Credit Fee, the Borrower shall pay to the Agent, on demand, all amendment, drawing and other fees regularly charged by the Agent to its letter of credit customers and all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Agent in connection with the issuance, amendment, administration or payment of any Letter of Credit. Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, the parties acknowledge and agree that the determination of whether a Letter of Credit is issued in reduction of Tranche A Loan Availability or in reduction of Tranche B Loan Availability
Letter of Credit Fees
"Letter of Credit Fee"
 
shall be fixed as of the date of issuance of such Letter of Credit and for so long as such Letter of Credit shall remain outstanding.
2.A.8 . No portion of any Letter of Credit is to be obtained for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any "margin security" or "margin stock" as such terms are used in Regulations U and X of the Board, 12 C.F.R. Parts 221 and 224.
Regulations U and X
2.A.9 . Each Lender severally agrees that it shall be absolutely liable, without regard to the occurrence of any default or Event of Default or any other condition precedent whatsoever, to the extent of such Lender's Commitment Percentage, to reimburse Agent on demand pursuant to for the amount of each draft paid by Agent under each Letter of Credit to the extent that such amount is not reimbursed by the Borrower pursuant to (such agreement for a Lender being called herein the "" of such Lender).
Letter of Credit Participation
Section 2.A.10
Section 2.A.4
Letter of Credit Participation
2.A.10 . Notwithstanding anything contained in above to the contrary, unless Borrower shall have notified the Agent prior to 11:00 a.m. (Central time) on the Business Day immediately prior to the date of such drawing that Borrower intends to reimburse Agent for the amount of such drawing, Borrower shall be deemed to have requested a Loan Rate Advance on the date on which such drawing is honored and in an amount equal to the amount of such drawing. The Borrower may thereafter convert any such Loan Rate Advance to a LIBOR Rate Advance in accordance with . Each Lender shall, in accordance with , make available such Lender's Commitment Percentage of such Advance to Agent, the proceeds of which shall be applied directly by Agent to reimburse Agent and/or Lenders for the amount of such draw. Agent is irrevocably authorized by the Borrower and each of the Lenders to honor draws on each Letter of Credit by the beneficiary thereof in accordance with the terms of the Letter of Credit. The responsibility of the Agent to the Borrower and the Lenders shall be only to determine that the documents (including each draft) delivered under each Letter of Credit in connection with such presentment shall be in conformity in all material respects with such Letter of Credit.
Letter of Credit Payments; Advance of Loan
Section 2.A.4
Section 1.6
Section 1.1
2.A.11 . The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that that certain Letter of Credit No. SLCMMSP04158 in the face amount of $176,894.15, issued by Agent for the benefit of Board of Supervisors of Prince William County, Virginia on behalf of Borrower, which has an expiry date of June 5, 2008 shall be deemed to have been issued pursuant to this Agreement, in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in this Article II.A.
Existing Letter of Credit
Lenders shall not be required to make any Advances hereunder until the pre-closing requirements, conditions and other requirements set forth below have been completed and fulfilled to the satisfaction of Agent, with respect to said Advance, at Borrower's sole cost and expense.
 
2.B.1
Prerequisites to Effectiveness of Agreement
The obligations of Lenders to make Advances and the effectiveness of this Agreement are subject to the following documents, certificates and opinions, each in form and substance acceptable to Agent and its counsel, having been delivered to and approved by Agent. It is agreed, however, that Lenders may, in their discretion, make such Advances prior to completion and fulfillment of any or all of such pre-closing requirements, conditions and other requirements, without waiving its right to require such completion and fulfillment before any additional Advances are made.
A. This Agreement duly executed by Borrower, Agent, Swing Lender and Lenders; the Note duly executed by Borrower; the Fee Letter; and the Guaranty duly executed by Guarantor;
B. A copy of the Certificate of Limited Partnership of Borrower and all amendments thereto, and a Certificate of Good Standing for Borrower, currently certified by the Secretary of State of its state of organization; Borrower's Agreement of Limited Partnership, and any necessary consents and resolutions authorizing the transactions described herein, all currently certified by Borrower's general partner, and upon which Agent and Lenders may rely until revoked by written notice to Agent;
C. A copy of the Articles of Incorporation of Guarantor and all amendments thereto, and a Certificate of Good Standing for Guarantor, each currently certified by the Secretary of State of its state of incorporation; Guarantor's By-Laws, Resolutions of Guarantor's Board of Directors authorizing the transactions described herein, and an incumbency certificate for Guarantor (including the names, titles and specimen signatures of officers thereof authorized to execute Loan Documents), all currently certified by Guarantor's corporate secretary or assistant secretary, as appropriate, and upon which Agent and Lenders may rely until revoked by written notice to Agent;
D. A Certificate from the general partner of Borrower and from a duly authorized officer of Guarantor, setting forth the names, titles, specimen signatures and telephone numbers of all persons authorized to (i) sign Draw Requests and/or other documents, instruments, certificates and agreements to be delivered by Borrower and/or Guarantor to Agent, and/or (ii) to give instructions to Agent hereunder, each of which Certificates shall be deemed to be in full force and effect until forty-eight (48) hours after receipt by Agent of an amendment thereof duly executed by a duly authorized officer or Guarantor;
E. A signed, written opinion from counsel to Borrower and Guarantor, addressed to Agent and currently dated, as to the due organization, existence, qualification and good standing of Borrower and Guarantor; as to the due authorization, validity, legality, binding nature and enforceability of the Loan Documents listed in , without the consent or approval of any other Person; that, to such counsel's knowledge, the execution, delivery and performance by Borrower and Guarantor of the Loan Documents to which each is a party will not violate any contracts or agreements of Borrower or Guarantor or any applicable Governmental Requirements; as to the absence, to such counsel's knowledge, of litigation or governmental proceedings which could
Section 2.B.1.A
 
materially, adversely affect Borrower or Guarantor; and such other matters as may be required by Agent on behalf of Lenders;
F. The most current available annual financial statements for Borrower and Guarantor on a consolidated basis, as well as financial statements on a consolidated basis for each of the three (3) full fiscal years immediately preceding the time period covered by said current financial statements; and
G. A sworn statement from and agreement by Borrower and Guarantor listing all guarantees and contingent liabilities to which Borrower and Guarantor are a party or for which Borrower or Guarantor may be liable and agreeing to periodically update said listing, to which sworn statement shall be attached (or in which sworn statement shall be described) current financial statements of Borrower and of Guarantor, which shall be, in such sworn statement, certified and sworn to by Borrower and Guarantor as being true, correct, complete and not misleading in any material respect, and Borrower and Guarantor shall also, in such sworn statement, certify that there has been no material change in the financial status of Borrower or of Guarantor since the dates thereof.
H. With respect to each Unencumbered Asset which is to become an Approved Asset on the Closing Date, (i) a written description of the Unencumbered Asset, including the size, legal description and location of the Unencumbered Asset; (ii) a title report, dated within thirty (30) days of the date on which such Unencumbered Asset is included as an Approved Asset, running in favor of the Agent on behalf of the Lenders, together with a copy of each document referred to therein (collectively ""), evidencing that such Real Estate Asset is an Unencumbered Asset; (iii) a current, certified rent roll for such Unencumbered Asset; (iv) operating statements for the prior three (3) years, if available (but in no event less than the prior twelve (12) months); (v) market, location and demographic information; (vi) pro forma operating and capital budgets and (vii) such other information as may be reasonably requested by Agent.
Title Evidence
I. Receipt of a Closing Certificate and a Compliance Certificate in the form attached hereto as (if Borrower has requested that an Advance be funded on the Closing Date).
Exhibit B-1
J. The Borrower agrees that at the request of Agent it will furnish supplements of all materials described in this to Agent after the Closing Date, updating such material.
Section 2.B.1
K. All proceedings in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, the other Loan Documents and all other documents incident thereto shall be satisfactory in form and substance to Agent and to the Agent's counsel, and the Agent and such counsel shall have received all information and such counterpart originals or certified or other copies of such documents as the Agent may request.
L. The Borrower shall have paid to the Agent, for the account of the Lenders or for its own account, as applicable, all of the fees and expenses that are due and payable as of the Closing Date in accordance with this Agreement.
 
M. The obligation of the Agent to issue any Letter of Credit shall be subject to the fulfillment of the following conditions:
(1) . The representations and warranties contained in shall be true and correct on and as of the date upon which Borrower requests that Agent issue the Letter of Credit and on the date of issuance of each Letter of Credit with the same force and effect as if made on such date.
Representations and Warranties
Article IV
(2) . No default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing on the date upon which Borrower requests that Agent issue the Letter of Credit and on the date of issuance of each Letter of Credit or will exist upon issuance of the Letter of Credit.
No Default
(3) . The Agent shall have received the Borrower's application for such Letter of Credit specified under .
Notices and Requests
Section 2.A.2
(4) . No change shall have occurred in any law or regulations thereunder or interpretations thereof that in the reasonable opinion of the Agent or Majority Lenders would make it illegal for Agent or Lenders to participate in the issuance, extension or renewal of such Letter of Credit or, in the reasonable opinion of the Agent, would make it illegal to issue, extend or renew such Letter of Credit.
No Legal Impediment
2.B.2
Conditions Precedent to Approval of an Asset as an Approved Asset
If and when Borrower wishes to have Lenders approve an Unencumbered Asset or Proposed Acquisition for inclusion as an Approved Asset, Borrower shall submit to Agent a written request for such approval, together with a certificate, signed by Borrower in the form attached hereto as , that the Real Estate Asset or Proposed Acquisition complies with all of the terms, provisions and conditions of this Agreement (with respect to a Proposed Acquisition, subject only to the acquisition of the asset), and the following conditions must be satisfied in the sole discretion of Agent (in reliance upon documentation provided by Borrower, copies of which shall be provided to each Lender by Agent within two (2) Business Days after receipt by Agent):
Exhibit B-3
A. Borrower shall provide, at the time of its request for approval, (i) a written description of the Real Estate Asset or Proposed Acquisition, including its size, legal description and location; (ii) Title Evidence evidencing that such asset is an Unencumbered Asset (or in the case of a Proposed Acquisition, would be an Unencumbered Asset upon acquisition by Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary; (iii) a current, certified rent roll for such asset; (iv) operating statements for the prior three (3) years, if available (but in no event less than the prior twelve (12) months); (v) market, location and demographic information; (vi) pro forma operating and capital budgets; (vii) evidence that such Unencumbered Asset or such Proposed Acquisition meets the Minimum Lease Up Requirement; and (viii) such other information as may be reasonably requested by Agent.
B. Agent shall have completed to its satisfaction, and at the Borrower's expense, an inspection of the Unencumbered Asset or Proposed Acquisition, if it elects to do so.
 
C. All proceedings in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, the other Loan Documents and all other documents incident thereto shall be satisfactory in form and substance to Agent and to the Agent's counsel, and the Agent, such counsel and the Lenders shall have received all information and such counterpart originals or certified or other copies of such documents as the Agent may request.
Upon receipt of the above-mentioned written request, certificate and other items (""), Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders, engage legal counsel to review the deliveries, all at Borrower's sole cost and expense. If the Approval Prerequisites are satisfied as determined by Agent, whose approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, and if the proposed Unencumbered Asset or Proposed Acquisition complies with the terms, provisions, requirements and conditions of this Agreement, also in Agent's reasonable determination, Agent shall, after receiving approval from all Lenders, approve (x) the proposed Unencumbered Asset as an Approved Asset, or (y) the Proposed Acquisition as an Approved Asset subject to the consummation of the acquisition thereof by Borrower (or Approved Subsidiary), in writing, which approval shall be given or withheld within ten (10) business days of receipt of the Approval Prerequisites.
Approval Prerequisites
Nothing set forth herein or in any other Loan Document shall be read, deemed, construed or interpreted to impose any explicit or implicit obligation of any kind upon the Lenders to approve any Unencumbered Asset or Proposed Acquisition so that it is thereafter included as an Approved Asset, such approval to be, in each instance, subject to the sole discretion of the Lenders in all respects; provided, however, that if the Approval Prerequisites with respect to a property constituting a Proposed Acquisition are satisfactory to all Lenders, the Lenders will not unreasonably withhold their consent to such Proposed Acquisition becoming an Approved Asset.
In no event shall the Lenders be obligated to make advances for a Proposed Acquisition unless such property is acquired by Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary and approved as an Approved Asset by all Lenders (pursuant to the provisions of this Agreement).
2.B.3
Determination of Loan Availability
A. Loan Availability shall be calculated by Agent on behalf of the Lenders on the first day of each calendar quarter and on each Calculation Date.
B. For any period of determination, Loan Availability shall equal the sum of the Tranche A Loan Availability and Tranche B Loan Availability as determined in accordance with Sections 2.B.3.C and 2.B.3.D, respectively, as may be reduced in accordance with Section 2.B.3.E.
C. For any period of determination, Tranche A Loan Availability shall equal the sum of the following three amounts, rounded down to the nearest $1,000,000.00 increment:
1. With respect to Approved Assets which, as of the Calculation Date, either Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary has owned for more than one year (and which have been in operation for more than one year), the lesser of:
 
(x) Unencumbered Adjusted EBITDA for the then immediately preceding twelve (12) full calendar months (i) multiplied by sixty percent (60%) and (ii) divided by eight percent (8.00%) or
(y) The Permanent Loan Estimate (using Unencumbered Adjusted EBITDA for the then immediately preceding twelve (12) full calendar months) for such Approved Assets; and
2. With respect to Approved Assets which, as of the Calculation Date, either (a) Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary has owned for more than three (3) months but less than one (1) year, or (b) have been in operation for less than one (1) year, the lesser of:
(x) Unencumbered Adjusted EBITDA annualized based upon the most recent three-month period (i) multiplied by sixty percent (60%) and (ii) divided by eight percent (8.00%) or
(y) The Permanent Loan Estimate (using Unencumbered Adjusted EBITDA annualized based upon the most recent three-month period for such Approved Assets; and
3. With respect to Approved Assets which, as of the Calculation Date, either (a) Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary has owned for less than three (3) months or, (b) are Proposed Acquisitions which are Approved Assets to be acquired by Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary as of the Calculation Date, an amount equal to sixty percent (60%) of the Acquisition Costs for such Approved Assets.
D. For any period of determination, Tranche B Loan Availability shall equal the lesser of (i) the Maximum Availability and (ii) $60,000,000.00.
E. Each Letter of Credit issued by Agent and outstanding hereunder shall (x) reduce Tranche A Loan Availability on a dollar for dollar basis for so long as such Letter of Credit is outstanding, if and to the extent that the Total Revolving Outstandings as of the date of issuance is less than the Tranche A Loan Availability as of such date, and (y) reduce Tranche B Loan Availability on a dollar for dollar basis for so long as such Letter of Credit is outstanding to the extent that the face amount of such Letter of Credit does not reduce Tranche A Loan Availability under (x) above.
F. Tranche A Loan Availability shall be reduced on a dollar for dollar basis by (x) the aggregate balance of any Swing Loans made by the Swing Lender and outstanding hereunder, (y) one and one-half (1.5) times the amount of any Imposition, Lien or Encumbrance arising with respect to any Approved Asset until same is paid in full, discharged or bonded over to the satisfaction of the Agent (provided that such Imposition, Lien or Encumbrance is less than one percent (1%) of the Capitalization Value of the Approved Asset, it being acknowledged that for so long as any Imposition, Lien or Encumbrance in excess of such amount encumbers an Approved Asset, such Real Estate
 
Asset shall not be an Approved Asset) and (z) any other unsecured indebtedness of Borrower or Guarantor.
G. In no event shall Lenders be obligated to make Advances which in the aggregate exceed Loan Availability as determined by Agent from time to time. If at any time Loan Availability is less than the Total Revolving Outstandings, Borrower shall, within thirty (30) days of such determination by Agent, either (i) cure the cause of such reduction in Loan Availability, or (ii) pay the excess to Agent on behalf of the Lenders. No additional Advances shall be made hereunder and no additional Letters of Credit shall be issued hereunder until such time as Agent determines that Loan Availability exceeds the Total Revolving Outstandings. It shall be an Event of Default if Borrower fails to cure the cause of the reduction in Loan Availability or make the required payment within such thirty (30) day period.
H. If at any time Tranche A Loan Availability is less than the Total Revolving Tranche A Outstandings as determined by Agent, the excess of such Total Revolving Tranche A Outstandings over the Tranche A Loan Availability shall immediately upon such determination be deemed reallocated to the Total Revolving Tranche B Outstandings and shall thereafter be treated for all purposes as a Tranche B Advance (provided that in no event shall Total Revolving Outstandings ever exceed aggregate Loan Availability).
3.1
General
Subject to the limitations on Advances contained elsewhere in this Agreement, the Loan proceeds shall be advanced by Agent, to or for the benefit of Borrower, in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in this . All monies advanced by Agent and each Lender (including amounts payable to such Lender and advanced by such Lender to itself pursuant to the terms hereof) shall constitute loans made to Borrower under this Agreement, evidenced by the Note and secured by the other Loan Documents, and interest shall be computed thereon as prescribed by this Agreement and the Note, from the date advanced to or for the benefit of Borrower.
Article III
No Advance shall constitute a waiver of any condition precedent to the obligation of any Lender to make any further Advance or preclude Agent from thereafter requiring Borrower to satisfy any such condition precedent with respect to any prior or further Advance. No Advance shall constitute a waiver of any default or Event of Default hereunder which may exist at the time of said Advance, whether or not the same is known to such Lender. All conditions precedent to the obligation of Agent to make any Advance on behalf of Lenders are imposed hereby solely for the benefit of Agent and Lenders, and no other party may require satisfaction of any such condition precedent or shall be entitled to assume that Agent will make or refuse to make any Advance in the absence of strict compliance with such condition precedent. All requirements of this Agreement may be waived by Agent, in whole or in part, at any time.
 
Each Lender may, but shall not be obligated to, advance to itself, when due, from the proceeds of the Loan, without further order or request from Borrower, all interest payable to such Lender under the terms hereof or of the Note, and may, at such Lender's option, without any obligation to do so, advance to itself all other sums due or to become due to such Lender under this Agreement or under any of the other Loan Documents, including but not limited to its fees, administration fees, attorneys' fees, other consultants' fees and all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by such Lender in connection with this Agreement and with the Loan. Each Lender shall also have the right, but not the obligation, after the occurrence of an Event of Default, to advance to Agent the proceeds of the Loan for application by Agent to the satisfaction of any of Borrower's other obligations hereunder or under any of the other Loan Documents.
3.2
Inspections
Agent shall have access to each Real Estate Asset at all reasonable times and shall have the right to enter each Real Estate Asset and to conduct such inspections thereof as it shall deem necessary or desirable for the protection of the Lenders' interests; provided that Agent gives reasonable prior notice thereof to Borrower. Borrower may elect to accompany Agent on any such inspections. No Lender shall be obligated to conduct any inspection of any Real Estate Asset.
Neither Borrower nor any third party shall have the right to use or rely upon any reports generated by Agent for any purpose whatsoever. Borrower shall be responsible for making its own inspections of each Approved Asset.
3.3
Agent and Lender Responsibility
It is expressly understood and agreed that neither Agent nor any Lender assumes liability or responsibility for any representations made by Borrower or for any acts on the part of Borrower.
3.4
Procedure for Advances
A. At the time of each Advance, there shall exist no default or Event of Default hereunder, and all representations and warranties made herein shall be true and correct on and as of each Advance Date with the same effect as if made on that date. Each Advance (other than under a Swing Loan) shall be made pursuant to a Draw Request submitted by Borrower to Agent on behalf of the Lenders. Each Advance under a Swing Loan shall be made pursuant to a Swing Loan Draw Request submitted by Borrower to Agent and Swing Lender (if a party other than Agent).
B. With respect to each Draw Request:
(I) Not later than 10:00 A.M. (Central time) three (3) Euro Business Days prior to the Advance Date if any portion of the requested Advance is desired by Borrower to be a LIBOR Rate Advance, and one Business Day prior to the Advance Date if any portion of the requested Advance is to be a Loan Rate Advance, Borrower shall deliver to Agent a request, in writing, designating the amount of such portion (in the minimum
 
amount of $1,000,000.00 and in integral multiples of $100,000.00 in excess thereof (provided that a $100,000 increment may consist in part of a Tranche A Advance and in part of a Tranche B Advance if the Advance will cause the Total Revolving Outstandings to exceed the Tranche A Loan Availability)) and designating the initial LIBOR Rate Period applicable thereto. If no such request is made by Borrower with respect to any Advance, the entire Advance shall be deemed to be a Loan Rate Advance.
(II) On each Advance Date, if all the terms and conditions of this Agreement have been complied with by Borrower, to the satisfaction of Agent, if no default or Event of Default exists hereunder, and if Agent has approved the Draw Request, each Lender shall advance to Agent its Commitment Percentage of the principal amount of the requested Advance by delivering to Agent a wire transfer of funds. Agent shall then forward the Advance to Borrower. All Advances actually so made shall be deemed to be loans to Borrower, shall reduce the available amount of the Revolving Loan Commitment, and shall bear interest at the rates provided herein from the date so advanced.
(III) All Advances shall constitute Tranche A Advances to the extent that the then Total Revolving Outstandings are less than or equal to the Tranche A Loan Availability, subject to subsequent reallocation in accordance with . All Advances in excess of the Tranche A Loan Availability shall constitute Tranche B Advances.
Section 2.B.3.G
C. With respect to each Swing Loan Draw Request, Borrower shall deliver any such request no later than 10:00 A.M. (Central time) on the requested Advance Date. On each such Advance Date, if all the terms and conditions of this Agreement have been complied with by Borrower, to the satisfaction of Agent and Swing Lender (if a party other than Agent), if no default or Event of Default exists hereunder, and if Agent and Swing Lender (if a party other than Agent) have approved the Swing Loan Draw Request, the Swing Lender shall advance to Agent the amount of the approved Advance. Agent shall then forward the Advance to Borrower. All Advances actually so made shall be deemed to be loans to Borrower, shall reduce the available amount of the Swing Loan Commitment, and shall bear interest at the rates provided herein from the date so advanced.
D. Each Lender shall also have the right, but not the obligation, so long as an Event of Default exists hereunder, to advance to Agent the proceeds of any Advance for application to the satisfaction of any of Borrower's Obligations. Any Advance by a Lender for such purpose shall be part of the Loan and shall be evidenced and secured by the Loan Documents from the date made. Borrower hereby authorizes each Lender, so long as an Event of Default exists hereunder, to hold, use, advance and apply Loan proceeds for the payment or performance of any obligation of Borrower hereunder, including but not limited to the obligation to pay interest on the Loan.
E. In the event that Agent (and/or the Swing Lender (if a party other than Agent) in the case of a Swing Loan Request) shall determine, in its sole judgment, that proper documentation to support a requested Advance, as required by this Agreement, has not been furnished, it may withhold payment of such Advance, or of such portion of such Advance as shall not be so supported by proper documentation, and shall promptly notify Borrower of the discrepancy in or omission of such documentation. Until such time as such
 
discrepancy or omission is corrected to the satisfaction of such Agent (and/or the Swing Lender, as applicable), it may withhold such funds.
F. Borrower shall provide notice to Agent in the Draw Request of the proposed use of the requested Advance. If Borrower anticipates using the Advance for purposes of financing construction on a Real Estate Asset Under Development, Borrower shall provide evidence to Agent at the time of each such Draw Request that Borrower or an Approved Subsidiary has entered into leases for not less than fifty percent (50%) of the rentable square footage of such Real Estate Asset Under Development (which leases must be on arms-length terms and conditions if with an affiliate of Borrower). If Borrower fails to provide the foregoing evidence, Agent shall have no obligation to make the requested Advance for such construction.
.
3.5
Swing Loans
(a) During the term of this Agreement, the Lenders agree, on the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, to make advances to Borrower pursuant to this Section from time to time in amounts such that (i) the aggregate of such advance and amount of Swing Loans theretofore advanced and still outstanding does not at any time exceed the Swing Loan Commitment and (ii) the amount of such advance does not exceed the Loan Availability. Each advance under this Section shall be in an aggregate principal amount of $1,000,000 or a larger multiple of $100,000 (except that any such advance may be in the aggregate available amount of Swing Loans determined in accordance with the immediately preceding sentence). With the foregoing limits, Borrower may borrow under this Section, repay or, to the extent permitted by , prepay Swing Loans and reborrow under this Section at any time during the term of this Agreement.
Section 1.3
(b) The Agent shall, on behalf of Borrower (which hereby irrevocably directs the Agent to act on its behalf), on notice given by Agent no later than 1:00 p.m. (Central time) on the Business Day immediately following the funding of any Swing Loan, request each Lender to make, and each Lender hereby agrees to make, an advance, in an amount (with respect to each Lender, its "") equal to such Lender's Commitment Percentage of the aggregate principal amount of the Swing Loans (the "") outstanding on the date of such notice, to repay the Swing Lender. Unless any of the events described in with respect to Borrower shall have occurred and be continuing (in which case the procedures of shall apply), each Lender shall make such advance to Agent at Agent's office in immediately available funds, not later than 1:00 p.m. (Central time), on the fifth Business Day immediately following the date of such notice. Agent shall immediately apply such proceeds to repay Refunded Swing Loans. Effective on the day such advances are made, the portion of the Swing Loans so paid shall no longer be outstanding as Swing Loans, shall no longer be due as Swing Loans under the Swing Loan Note held by the Swing Lender, and shall be due as Advances under the respective Notes issued to the Lenders. Borrower authorizes the Agent to charge Borrower's accounts with Agent (up to the amount available in each such accounts) in order to immediately pay the amount of such Refunded Swing Loans to the extent amounts received from the Lenders are not sufficient to repay in full such Refunded Swing Loans.
Swing Loan Refund Amount
Refunded Swing Loans
Section 6.1(J)
Section 3.5(c)
 
(c) If, prior to the time advances would have otherwise been made by Lenders pursuant to , one of the events described in with respect to the Borrower shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender shall, on the date such advances were to have been made pursuant to the notice referred to in (the ""), purchase an undivided participating interest in the Swing Loans in an amount equal to such Lender's Swing Loan Refund Amount. On the Refunding Date, each Lender shall transfer to the Agent, in immediately available funds, such Lender's Swing Loan Refund Amount, and upon receipt thereof, the Agent shall deliver to such Lender a Swing Loan participation certificate dated the date of Agent's receipt of such funds and in the Swing Loan Refund Amount of such Lender.
Section 3.5(b)
Section 6.1(J)
Section 3.5(b)
Refunding Date
(d) Whenever, at any time after the Agent has received from any Lender such Lender's Swing Loan Refund Amount pursuant to , the Agent receives any payment on account of the Swing Loans in which the Lenders have purchased participations pursuant to said , the Agent will promptly distribute to each such Lender its ratable share (determined on the basis of the Swing Loan Refund Amounts of all of the Lenders) of such payment (appropriately adjusted, in the case of interest payments, to reflect the period of time during which such Lender's participating interest was outstanding and funded); provided, however, that in the event that such payment received by the Agent is required to be returned, such Lender will return to the Agent any portion thereof previously distributed to it by the Agent.
Section 3.5(c)
Section 3.5(c)
(e) Each Lender's obligation to make an advance under its Revolving Commitment as provided in or to purchase a participating interest pursuant to shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance, including, without limitation, (i) any set-off, counterclaim, recoupment, defense or other right which such Lender, Borrower or any other Person may have against the Agent or any other Person, (ii) the occurrence or continuance of an Event of Default, the termination or reduction of the Revolving Commitments or the non-satisfaction of any condition precedent to the making of any advance of the Loans, (iii) any adverse change in the condition (financial or otherwise) of Borrower or any other Person, (iv) any breach of this Agreement by Borrower, any other Lender or any other Person or (v) any other circumstance, happening or event whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing.
Section 3.5(b)
Section 3.5(c)
(f) For purposes of , Advances of Swing Loans shall be deemed to be Loan Rate Advances.
Article III
(g) If not sooner paid in accordance with the terms hereof, Swing Loans shall be due and payable, in full, upon the earlier of five (5) Business Days after said amounts are advanced or the Maturity Date (the "").
Swing Loan Maturity Date
(h) Any Swing Loan made by the Swing Lender shall be evidenced by, and repaid with interest in accordance with, a promissory note of Borrower in the form of duly completed and executed by Borrower, payable to the Swing Lender (such note, as the same may hereafter be amended, modified, extended , severed, assigned, substituted, renewed or restated from time to time, the "").
Exhibit G
Swing Loan Note
 
.
3.6
Additional Loan Commitments
(a) Borrower may, from time to time, up to a maximum of three (3) requests, request the Lenders to increase their Revolving Commitments, so as to increase the Revolving Commitment Amount to an amount no greater than the sum of (1) the Accordion Amount plus (2) $150,000,000. The increase in the Revolving Commitment Amount pursuant to any such particular request shall be at least an amount (the "") equal to the lesser of (x) $10,000,000 or (y) the Accordion Amount less all previous increases in the Revolving Commitment Amount pursuant to this Section. Borrower shall make each such request by giving notice to Agent no later than forty-five (45) days prior to the Accordion Expiration Date, which notice shall set forth the amount (which shall be no less than the Minimum Request) of the requested increase in the Revolving Commitment Amount (the "") and such other details with respect to such increase as Agent shall reasonably request. Agent will use commercially reasonable efforts, with the assistance of Borrower, to arrange a syndicate of Lenders with Revolving Commitments (including the then-existing Revolving Commitments) aggregating the then existing Revolving Commitment Amount plus the Requested Increase. Upon receipt of notice as aforesaid from Borrower, Agent shall promptly send a copy of such notice to each Lender and shall request that each Lender increase its Revolving Commitment by an amount equal to its Commitment Percentage of the Requested Increase (the ""). Each Lender shall have the right, but not the obligation, to increase its Revolving Commitment by an amount equal to its Commitment Percentage of the Requested Increase, and shall have a period of fifteen (15) days from the First Solicitation to notify Agent whether or not such Lender elects so to increase its Revolving Commitment. Any Lender that fails to respond to the First Solicitation in writing within such fifteen (15)-day period will be deemed to have elected not to increase its Revolving Commitment. If all Lenders elect to increase their respective Revolving Commitments by amounts equal to their respective Commitment Percentages of the Requested Increase, Agent shall so notify Borrower, Agent and each of the Lenders, and Borrower shall proceed in accordance with below. If any Lender (any such Lender, a "") shall not elect or shall be deemed to have elected not to increase its Revolving Commitment as aforesaid, (i) the amount of such Declining Lender's Revolving Commitment shall be unchanged, (ii) Agent shall notify Borrower and each of the Lenders as to which Lenders have elected to increase their Revolving Commitments and by what amounts and (iii) if Borrower so requests, Agent shall use commercially reasonable efforts to either (A) solicit from the Lenders that elected to increase their respective Revolving Commitments a further increase in their Revolving Commitments in an aggregate amount equal to all or any portion of the aggregate amount of the Declining Lenders' Commitment Percentage of the Requested Increase (the "") or (B) submit a list of proposed syndicate members that are not then a party to this Agreement to Borrower for its review and approval (such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) in order to obtain additional commitments in an amount equal to the Shortfall. From and after the Accordion Expiration Date, Agent shall have no further obligation to syndicate the Facility or to obtain or accept any additional Revolving Commitments except to the extent that Agent may be continuing to use commercially reasonable efforts to satisfy any Requested Increase that is timely given in accordance with this .
Minimum Request
Requested Increase
First Solicitation
Section 3.6(b)
Declining Bank
Shortfall
Section 3.6(a)
 
(b) In connection with increases to the Revolving Commitments of some or all of the Lenders as provided in above, Borrower shall execute supplemental Notes (the "") evidencing such increases, as well as such other confirmatory modifications to this Agreement as Agent shall reasonably request. In connection with the addition of lenders as a result of solicitations by Agent pursuant to clause (B) of above (""), Borrower, Agent and each New Lender shall execute an acceptance letter in the form of (""). Borrower shall execute a Note payable to each New Lender in the amount of the New Lender's Revolving Commitment (a "") and Borrower and Agent (with the consent of only the New Lenders and those Lenders increasing their Revolving Commitments) shall execute such confirmatory modifications to this Agreement as Agent shall reasonably request, whereupon the New Lender shall become, and have the rights and obligations of, a "Lender", with a Revolving Commitment in the amount set forth in such Acceptance Letter. The Lenders shall have no right of approval with respect to a New Lender's becoming a Lender or the amount of its Revolving Commitment. Each Supplemental Note and New Note shall constitute one of the Unsecured Revolving Promissory Notes constituting the "Note" for all purposes of this Agreement.
Section 3.6(a)
Supplemental Notes
Section 3.6(a)
New Lenders
Exhibit F
Acceptance Letter
New Note
(c) If at the time a New Lender becomes a Lender (or a Lender increases its Revolving Commitment) pursuant to this Section there is any principal outstanding under the Note of the previously admitted Lenders (the ""), such New Lender (or Lender increasing its Revolving Commitment) shall remit to Agent an amount equal to the Outstanding Percentage (as defined below) multiplied by the Revolving Commitment of the New Lender (or the amount of the increase in the Revolving Commitment of a Lender increasing its Revolving Commitment), which amount shall be deemed advanced under the Revolving Commitment of the New Lender (or the Lender increasing its Revolving Commitment). Agent shall pay such amount to the Existing Lenders in accordance with the Existing Lenders' respective Commitment Percentages (as calculated immediately prior to the admission of the New Lender (or the increase in a Lender's Revolving Commitment)), and such payment shall effect an automatic reduction of the outstanding principal balance under the respective Notes of the Existing Lenders. For purposes of this Section, the term "" means the ratio of (i) the aggregate outstanding principal amount under all of the Notes of the Existing Lenders, immediately prior to the admission of the New Lender (or the increase in the Revolving Commitment of a Lender), to (ii) the aggregate of the Revolving Commitments of the Existing Lenders (as increased pursuant to this Section, if applicable) and the New Lenders.
Existing Lenders
Outstanding Percentage
(d) The fees payable by the Borrower upon any increase of the Revolving Commitments shall be as set forth in the Fee Letter and agreed upon by the Borrower, the Agent, the New Lenders and those Lenders increasing their Revolving Commitments. Nothing in this shall constitute or be deemed to constitute an agreement or commitment by any Lender to increase its Revolving Commitment hereunder.
Section 3.6
Borrower represents and warrants to Agent and Lenders that:
 
4.1
Legal Status of Borrower
Borrower is a limited partnership, duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Maryland and is duly authorized to transact business in the jurisdictions in which the Approved Assets owned by it are located, and has all power, authority, permits, consents, authorizations and licenses necessary to carry on its business, to acquire, develop, demolish, construct, renovate, expand, equip, own and operate each Approved Asset owned by Borrower and to execute, deliver and perform this Agreement and the other Loan Documents; and this Agreement and the other Loan Documents executed to date by Borrower have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by and on behalf of Borrower so as to constitute this Agreement and said other Loan Documents the valid and binding obligations of Borrower, enforceable in accordance with their terms.
4.2
No Breach of Applicable Agreements or Laws
The consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and the execution, delivery and/or performance of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents will not result in any breach of or constitute a default under the organizational documents of Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary, any mortgage, deed of trust, lease, bank loan, credit agreement, guaranty or other instrument or violate any Governmental Requirements, to which Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary is a party, or by which Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary may be bound or affected.
4.3
No Litigation or Defaults
There are no actions, suits or proceedings pending or, to the knowledge of Borrower, threatened, in writing, against or affecting Borrower, Guarantor, any Approved Subsidiary or the Approved Assets, in which an adverse result would have a material adverse effect upon Borrower, Guarantor, any Approved Subsidiary or the Approved Assets, except as listed on attached hereto and hereby made a part hereof, or involving the validity or enforceability of the Loan Documents or the priority of the lien thereof, at law or in equity; and, to the best knowledge of Borrower, Guarantor and any Approved Subsidiary, none of Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary is in default under any order, writ, injunction, decree or demand of any court or any administrative body having jurisdiction over Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary.
Schedule 4.3
4.4
Financial and Other Information
The financial statements of, and other financial and cash flow information for, Borrower, Guarantor and all Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis previously or hereafter delivered to Agent fairly and accurately present, or will, in all material respects, fairly and accurately present, the financial condition of Borrower, Guarantor and such Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis as of the dates of such statements and information, and the cash flows of Borrower, Guarantor and such Subsidiaries for the periods covered by such information, and neither this Agreement nor any document, financial statement, financial, cash flow or credit information, certificate or statement referred to herein or furnished to Agent by Borrower, Guarantor and such Subsidiaries contains, or will contain, any untrue
 
statement of a material fact or omits, or will omit, a material fact, or is or will be misleading in any material respect.
4.5
No Defaults under Loan Documents or Other Agreements
There is no default or Event of Default on the part of Borrower under the Loan Documents and none of Borrower, Guarantor nor any Approved Subsidiary is in default beyond applicable notice, grace or cure periods under any instrument or agreement under and subject to which any recourse indebtedness in excess of $100,000.00 in the aggregate or any nonrecourse indebtedness in excess of $10,000,000.00 in the aggregate for borrowed money has been issued or is secured.
4.6
Fiscal Years
The fiscal year of Borrower, Guarantor and all Subsidiaries ends on December 31.
4.7
Guarantor
Guarantor is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Maryland, and has all power, authority, permits, consents, authorizations and licenses necessary to carry on its business in the State of Maryland and to execute, deliver and perform the Guaranty and the other Loan Documents to which it is or will be a party, and all actions required to authorize the execution, delivery and performance by it of the Guaranty and such other Loan Documents have been duly taken and are in full force and effect; and the Guaranty and such other Loan Documents have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by and on behalf of Guarantor so as to constitute the Guaranty and such other Loan Documents, when executed by Guarantor, to be the valid and binding obligations of Guarantor, enforceable in accordance with their terms.
4.8
No Brokers
Borrower has not (nor has any Approved Subsidiary) dealt with any brokers in connection with this Loan and no brokerage fees or commissions are payable by or to any person in connection with this Agreement or the Advances. Neither Agent nor any Lender shall be responsible for the payment of any fees or commissions to any broker and Borrower shall indemnify, defend and hold Agent and Lenders harmless from and against any claims, liabilities, obligations, damages, costs and expenses (including attorneys' fees and disbursements) made against or incurred by Agent and Lenders as a result of claims made by any broker or person claiming by, through or under Borrower, Guarantor or their affiliates in connection with the Loan.
4.9
No Violation of Usury Laws
The undersigned represents and warrants that the Loan and this Note are made exclusively for business purposes in connection with holding, developing, and managing real estate for profit, within the meaning and intent of Maryland Code Annotated,
 
Commercial Law Section 12-103(e), as amended, and that none of the proceeds of the Loan or the Note will be used for personal, family or household purposes of any person.
4.10
Subsidiaries
Except for Saul Subsidiary I Limited Partnership, Saul Subsidiary II Limited Partnership, Guarantor, Saul QRS, Inc., Avenel VI, Inc., Briggs Chaney Plaza, LLC, Kentlands Lot 1, LLC, Smallwood Village Center LLC, Westview Village Center LLC and Saul Monocacy, LLC, there are no entities which are required under GAAP to be consolidated with Borrower for financial reporting purposes, except as otherwise disclosed to Agent in writing from time to time. Each Approved Subsidiary is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing in the state of its organization and is duly authorized to transact business in the jurisdictions in which the Approved Assets owned by it are located, and has all power, authority, permits, consents, authorizations and licenses necessary to carry on its business, to acquire, develop, demolish, construct, renovate, expand, equip, own and operate each Approved Asset owned by it and to execute, deliver and perform the Subsidiary Guaranty required under hereof, and such Subsidiary Guaranty and any other Loan Documents executed to date by such Approved Subsidiary have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by and on behalf of such Approved Subsidiary so as to constitute such Subsidiary Guaranty and said other Loan Documents the valid and binding obligations of said Approved Subsidiary, enforceable in accordance with their terms.
Section 5.9.E
4.11
Miscellaneous
Borrower is not (nor is any Approved Subsidiary),
A. Engaged principally or as one of its important activities in the business of extending credit for the purpose of purchasing or carrying margin stock (as defined in Regulation U of the Board), and the value of all margin stock owned by Borrower does not constitute more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the value of the assets of Borrower. No portion of any Advance is to be used, and no portion of any Letter of Credit is to be obtained, for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any "margin security" or "margin stock" as such terms are used in Regulations U and X of the Board, 12 C.F.R. Parts 221 and 224.
B. An "investment company" or a company "controlled" by an investment company within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
C. A "holding company" or a "subsidiary company" of a holding company or an "affiliate" of a holding company or a subsidiary company of a holding company within the meaning of the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935, as amended.
4.12
REIT Status
Guarantor has not taken any action that would prevent it from maintaining its existence as a qualified real estate investment trust within the meaning of the Internal Revenue Code or from maintaining such qualification at all times during the term of the Revolving Commitment and for so long as any Letter of Credit remains outstanding.
 
4.13
Title to Properties
The Borrower (or an Approved Subsidiary) has good title to (or with respect to Beacon, Olney and Southdale, a leasehold interest in), as of the Closing Date, the Approved Assets (with respect to Approved Assets designated as such on the Closing Date, as identified on hereto) or the date of designation as an Approved Asset (with respect to Approved Assets acquired and/or designated as such after the Closing Date), and in each case to the best of its knowledge thereafter; the Borrower (or an Approved Subsidiary) holds good and clear record and marketable fee simple title thereto (or with respect to Beacon, Olney and Southdale, a leasehold interest therein), subject to no mortgages, conditional sales agreements, title retention agreements, liens or, except as otherwise set forth in the title reports delivered by Borrower, encumbrances.
Exhibit E
. Borrower, and each Approved Subsidiary as to Real Estate Assets owned by it, hereby represents and warrants that as of the date hereof, no Disqualifying Environmental Event, release or, to Borrower's (and such Approved Subsidiary's, as applicable) knowledge, threatened release of Hazardous Substances, violation of Environmental Laws or similar environmental event with respect to any Approved Asset that could become a Disqualifying Environmental Event has occurred with respect to the Approved Assets which remains uncured.
4.14
Representation as to Environmental Matters
THE WARRANTIES AND REPRESENTATIONS IN THIS , AND ANY ADDITIONAL REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES CONTAINED HEREIN AND IN THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS, SHALL BE DEEMED TO HAVE BEEN RENEWED AND RESTATED BY BORROWER AND GUARANTOR AT THE TIME OF EACH REQUEST BY BORROWER FOR AN ADVANCE.
ARTICLE IV
While this Agreement is in effect, and until Agent and Lenders have been paid in full the principal of and interest on all Advances made by Lenders hereunder and all other amounts payable hereunder and under the other Loan Documents and so long as any Letter of Credit is outstanding:
5.1
Paying Costs of Loan
Borrower shall pay all reasonable costs and expenses of Agent and all costs and expenses of Borrower (and any Approved Subsidiary) in connection with each Approved Asset and the Loan, the preparation and review of the Loan Documents and the evaluation, making, closing, funding, administration, transfer and/or repayment of the Loan and the review of Unencumbered Assets, including but not limited to the attorneys' fees, consultants' fees, administration fees, and all other costs and expenses payable to third parties incurred by Agent or Borrower in connection with the Loan. Such costs and expenses shall be so paid by Borrower whether or not the Loan is fully advanced.
5.2
Maintenance of Ownership Structure
 
B.F. Saul II or B.F. Saul III, members of their respective families and trusts for the benefit of any of the same and companies or other entities controlled directly or indirectly, by any of the same, shall at all times own, directly or indirectly, at least ten percent (10%), in the aggregate, of (x) the limited partnership units of Borrower, and (y) the common stock of Guarantor on a fully diluted basis.
5.3
Keeping of Records
Borrower shall set up and maintain accurate and complete books, accounts and records pertaining to each Approved Asset in a manner reasonably acceptable to Agent. Borrower will permit representatives of Agent to have free access to and to inspect and copy all books, records and contracts of Borrower relating to each Approved Asset, and will permit representatives of Agent to have free access to and to inspect and copy all other books, records and contracts of Borrower at all reasonable times and upon reasonable prior notice to Borrower. Any such inspection shall be for the sole benefit and protection of Agent, and neither Agent nor any Lender shall have any obligation to disclose the results thereof to Borrower or to any third party.
5.4
Providing Financial Information
Borrower shall furnish to Agent such financial information concerning Borrower and Guarantor, and Borrower's and Guarantor's other assets and investments, as Agent may reasonably request, and shall furnish to Agent, at Borrower's sole cost and expense the following:
A. . Not later than one hundred ten (110) days after the end of each fiscal year, a consolidated balance sheet, a consolidated statement of profit and loss and consolidated statement of cash flows, as of the end of such fiscal year, for the Borrower and Guarantor, on a consolidated basis certified by independent accountants satisfactory to Agent as being complete and correct and fairly presenting the financial condition and results of operations as of the end of such year and for that fiscal year for Borrower and Guarantor together with a statement from the chief financial officer for Borrower and the Guarantor, in the forms attached hereto as and .
Fiscal Year
Exhibits B-4
B-5
B. .
Fiscal Quarter
(i) Not later than forty five (45) days after the end of each fiscal quarter, ending March 31, June 30 and September 30, a balance sheet, statement of profit and loss and statement of cash flows for such fiscal quarter, for the Guarantor and its consolidated subsidiaries, to be prepared on an accrual basis and certified as complete and correct by the chief financial officer of such entities; and
(ii) Not later than forty five (45) days after the end of each fiscal quarter, a statement from the chief financial officer for the Borrower and the Guarantor, in the forms attached hereto as and , together with documentation showing all calculations necessary to support such statement.
Exhibits B-4
B-5
 
C. Copies of all 8Ks, 10Ks and 10Qs filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, the Maryland State Securities Commission, and any other state regulators regarding the Guarantor, which shall be delivered to Agent as and when filed or distributed; and
D. Not later than sixty (60) days after the end of each fiscal year, a copy of the pro forma operating and capital budgets for each of the Approved Assets for the succeeding fiscal year, which Budget shall be in form satisfactory to the Agent, in its reasonable discretion.
E. Not later than forty-five (45) days after the end of each fiscal quarter, a copy of the rent roll for each of the Approved Assets as of the end of such quarter in form satisfactory to the Agent, and a tenant lease expiration summary, each certified as being true, correct and complete by the chief financial officer of the Borrower.
F. Such other statements or reports as the Lenders may through Agent reasonably request in form and detail satisfactory to such Lenders.
All such financial statements shall be in reasonable detail, shall be prepared in general accordance with GAAP (except that assets may be valued based on market value), or in accordance with another accounting method acceptable to Agent, and shall be certified as true, correct and complete by Borrower (by its chief financial officer) or Guarantor. In addition, Borrower shall permit Agent and each Lender to examine all of Borrower's and Guarantor's books and records pertaining thereto.
5.5
Maintaining Insurance Coverage
Borrower shall, at all times until Agent and Lenders have been fully repaid all indebtedness evidenced by the Note, maintain, or cause to be maintained, in effect, adequate insurance with respect to each Approved Asset, including casualty insurance on a 100% replacement cost basis.
5.6
Transferring, Conveying or Encumbering Approved Assets; Payment of Impositions and Liens; Maintenance of Existence
Borrower shall not voluntarily or involuntarily agree to, cause, suffer or permit (A) any sale, transfer or conveyance of any interest of Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary, legal or equitable, in any Approved Asset or any part or portion thereof; or (B) any mortgage, pledge, encumbrance or lien to be imposed or remain outstanding against any Approved Asset, or any security interest to exist therein (hereinafter each called an ""), except as created by the Loan Documents (if any). In the event that any Encumbrance arises against any Approved Asset, Borrower shall give written notice thereof to Agent within five (5) days after the imposition of such Encumbrance. Agent shall thereupon recalculate Loan Availability taking into account such Encumbrance. If necessary, Borrower shall make a payment as required pursuant to if Loan Availability is then less than Total Revolving Outstandings.
Encumbrance
Section 2.B.3
 
Borrower shall, before any penalty or interest attaches thereto because of delinquency in payment, pay and discharge, or cause to be paid and discharged, all taxes, assessments, levies and governmental charges imposed upon or against each Approved Asset or upon or against the Note or the indebtedness evidenced hereby (hereinafter referred to as ""). In the event any Impositions are payable in installments, Borrower shall have the right to pay the same in such installments, even though such Impositions then bear interest, so long as Borrower pays each such installment prior to delinquency. Borrower shall not suffer to exist and shall promptly pay and discharge (or cause to be paid and discharged) any mechanic's, statutory or other lien or Encumbrance on the Approved Asset or any part thereof (hereinafter collectively referred to as ""). In the event that any Imposition or Lien arises against any Approved Asset, Borrower shall give written notice thereof to Agent within five (5) days after the occurrence of such Imposition or Lien. Agent shall thereupon recalculate Loan Availability taking into account such Imposition or Lien. If necessary, Borrower shall make a payment as required pursuant to if Loan Availability is then less than Total Revolving Outstandings.
Impositions
Liens
Section 2.B.3
Borrower shall maintain (and shall cause any Approved Subsidiary to maintain) its existence as a duly organized and qualified limited partnership (or such other entity, in the case of any Approved Subsidiary), in good standing under the laws of the state of its formation and the laws of each state in which any Approved Asset owned by it is located, and none of Borrower, Guarantor nor any such Approved Subsidiary shall be dissolved, merged, wound-up or terminated. Borrower shall cause Guarantor at all times to (x) maintain its existence as a qualified real estate investment trust (a "") within the meaning of the Internal Revenue Code and not to take any action which could lead to its disqualification as a REIT, (y) except with the prior written consent of Agent, not to be unreasonably withheld, cause its shares to be listed and admitted to trading on the New York Stock Exchange or a successor stock exchange and (z) maintain its existence as a Maryland corporation. Within thirty (30) days after request by Agent from time to time, Guarantor shall provide evidence that Guarantor continues to qualify as a REIT.
REIT
5.7
Complying with the Loan Documents, Contracts and Laws
Borrower shall cause all of the representations, warranties and covenants herein to remain true and correct during the term of the Loan, shall comply with and perform all of its agreements and obligations under the Loan Documents, and shall comply with all requests by Agent which are consistent with the terms thereof. Borrower shall promptly provide Agent with copies of any notices of default or deficiency received from any creditor under loans with a principal balance in excess of $100,000.00 and shall promptly cure the same. Borrower shall comply in all material respects with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, orders and directions of any governmental authority having jurisdiction over it or its business.
5.8
Financial Covenants
Borrower hereby covenants and agrees that so long as the Revolving Commitment remains outstanding, as of the end of each fiscal quarter and on each Calculation Date:
 
A. . Borrower shall have Minimum Equity Value of not less than the sum of $600,000,000.00 plus ninety percent (90%) of Net Equity Proceeds.
Minimum Equity Value
B. . The ratio of Total Adjusted Outstanding Indebtedness to Capitalization Value shall not exceed sixty percent (60%).
Portfolio Loan to Value
C. . The ratio of Adjusted EBITDA to Interest Expense for the then immediately preceding twelve (12) full calendar months shall not be less than 2.50 to 1.
Interest Expense Coverage
D. . The ratio of Adjusted EBITDA to Debt Service for the then immediately preceding twelve (12) full calendar months shall not be less than 1.60 to 1.
Debt Service Coverage
E. . Not less than sixty percent (60%) of Total Adjusted Committed Indebtedness (other than the Loan, with respect to which only the principal outstanding on the date of calculation shall be included) shall (x) accrue interest at a fixed rate of interest and (y) have an initial term of not less than five (5) years. Absent Majority Lenders' prior written approval, the Revolving Commitment shall constitute the only unsecured indebtedness incurred by Borrower. In addition, Borrower hereby agrees that to the extent Borrower would like to incur secured indebtedness accruing interest at a floating rate of interest from time to time, Borrower shall provide prior written notice to Agent. In the event that at any time Borrower intends to receive advances under indebtedness accruing interest at a floating rate of interest (including the Revolving Commitment), which advances aggregate in excess of the Revolving Commitment Amount, then Borrower shall provide prior written notice thereof to Agent and Agent may thereupon require that the Borrower make interest rate protection arrangements satisfactory to Borrower and Agent with respect to all advances of floating rate indebtedness (including the Revolving Commitment) exceeding in the aggregate the Revolving Commitment Amount. The Borrower shall thereafter maintain such arrangements in full force and effect, and shall not, without the approval of the Majority Lenders, modify, terminate, or transfer such arrangements.
Minimum Fixed Rate Debt
F. . Distributions shall not exceed ninety percent (90%) of Funds from Operations with respect to the Borrower and the Guarantor on a consolidated basis (or, if greater, the amount required to be distributed under Section 857(a) of the Code).
Payout Ratio
G. . The ratio of Adjusted EBITDA for the then immediately preceding twelve (12) full calendar months to the sum of Total Adjusted Outstanding Indebtedness and undrawn Loan Availability shall be greater than 12.5%.
Constant Carried Test
H. The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit Guarantor or any Subsidiaries to, make investments in the following which in the aggregate would exceed fifteen percent (15%) of Gross Asset Value:
Permitted Investments.
(i) Investments in any Subsidiaries or any unconsolidated entities that are not Approved Subsidiaries, valued at the lower of cost or market;
 
(ii) Land held for development, valued at the lower of cost or market;
(iii) Real Estate Assets Under Development (excluding the Clarendon Center Project), valued at the aggregate amount of the total budgeted costs, inclusive of capitalized interest costs necessary to complete the applicable projects; and
(iv) Indebtedness secured by mortgages, deeds of trust or other liens on real property in favor of the Borrower, Guarantor or any Subsidiary (exclusive of Real Estate Assets), valued at the aggregate book value thereof.
5.9
Miscellaneous
Borrower shall, and shall cause each Approved Subsidiary, if applicable, to, also:
A. Maintain its qualification to transact business in its state of organization, in each state in which an Approved Asset owned by it is located, and in each jurisdiction where failure so to qualify would permanently preclude Borrower (or such Approved Subsidiary) from enforcing its rights with respect to any material asset or would expose Borrower (or such Approved Subsidiary) to any material liability.
B. File all tax returns and reports which are required by law to be filed by it and pay before they become delinquent all taxes, assessments and governmental charges and levies imposed upon it and all claims or demands of any kind which, if unpaid, might result in the creation of a lien upon its property.
C. Give prompt written notice to Agent of (i) the breach of any representation, warranty or covenant contained in this Agreement or in any of the Loan Documents (which notice shall be accompanied by a certificate from Borrower in the form of attached hereto); (ii) the creation of any Encumbrance, Lien or Imposition in excess of $50,000.00 against any Approved Asset; (iii) the occurrence of any Capital Event (which notice shall be accompanied by a certificate from Borrower in the form of attached hereto) and any release or threatened release of Hazardous Substances, any violation of Environmental Laws or similar environmental event with respect to a Real Estate Asset that could become a Disqualifying Environmental Event; and (iv) the commencement of any action, suit or proceeding before any court or arbitrator or any governmental department, board, agency or other instrumentality affecting Borrower or Guarantor or any property of Borrower or Guarantor or to which Borrower or Guarantor is a party in which an adverse determination or result could have a material adverse effect on the business, operations, property or condition (financial or otherwise) of Borrower or Guarantor or on the ability of any of them to perform its respective obligations under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, stating the nature and status of such action, suit or proceeding. The Borrower will and will cause the Guarantor to give notice to the Agent in form and detail reasonably satisfactory to the Agent, within ten (10) days of any judgment not covered by insurance, final or otherwise, against the Borrower the Guarantor in an amount in excess of $100,000.
Exhibit B-8
Exhibit B-6
D. Maintain, preserve, protect and keep the Real Estate Assets in good repair, working order and condition and make all necessary and proper repairs, renewals and
 
replacements, normal wear and tear excepted. Borrower further covenants and agrees to continue (and cause each Approved Subsidiary to continue) to operate its business in substantially the same fashion as currently in effect, including, without limitation, acquiring Real Estate Assets of the same quality as the Real Estate Assets currently owned by Borrower and operating and maintaining such Real Estate Assets in substantially the same manner and with the same standard of care and quality as is currently employed by Borrower.
E. Within thirty (30) days of any entity becoming a Subsidiary of Borrower, Borrower shall deliver to Agent each of the following in form and substance satisfactory to the Agent: (a) a guaranty executed by such Subsidiary in substantially the same form as the guaranty provided by Guarantor of even date herewith (each, a ""), pursuant to which the Subsidiary guaranties the full and prompt payment and performance of all of the Obligations of Borrower under the Loan and (b) the items listed in with respect to such Subsidiary; provided, however, (i) if such Subsidiary is expressly prohibited from becoming a guarantor of the Loan pursuant to a written agreement with a third party financial institution making a loan to such Subsidiary (the ""), then, such Subsidiary shall not be required to enter into a Subsidiary Guaranty of the Loan until such time as the Third Party Loan has been repaid in full or the documents evidencing such Third Party Loan no longer contain such a restriction, or (ii) if such Subsidiary is created solely for administrative purposes and holds no interest in real property, then, such Subsidiary shall not be required to enter into a Subsidiary Guaranty. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event shall (x) an Unencumbered Asset owned by a Subsidiary qualify as an Approved Asset or (y) a Subsidiary qualify as an Approved Subsidiary, unless such Subsidiary shall have provided a Subsidiary Guaranty pursuant to this that remains in full force and effect.
Subsidiary Guaranty
Sections 2.B.1.C through G
Third Party Loan
Section 5.9.E
.
5.10
Covenants relating to Environmental Law
Borrower covenants and agrees as follows:
A. Except for substances of a quantity normally used for maintenance or operation of a commercial office building or retail shopping center, as applicable, which are used, stored and disposed of in accordance with all applicable Environmental Laws (as hereinafter defined), Borrower shall not (and shall not permit any Approved Subsidiary to) place, store, locate, generate, produce, create, process, treat, handle, transport, incorporate, discharge, emit, spill, release, deposit or dispose of any Hazardous Substance (as hereinafter defined) in, upon, under, over or from the Approved Assets, and shall not permit any Hazardous Substance to be placed, stored, located, generated, produced, created, processed, treated, handled, transported, incorporated, discharged, emitted, spilled, released, deposited, disposed of or to escape therein, thereupon, thereunder, thereover or therefrom. Borrower shall cause all Hazardous Substances found on or under the Approved Assets to be properly removed therefrom and properly disposed of at Borrower's sole cost and expense in accordance with all applicable Environmental Laws. Borrower shall not (and shall not permit any Approved Subsidiary to) install or permit to be installed any underground storage tank therein or thereunder, and shall comply (and cause each Approved Subsidiary to comply) with all Environmental Laws which are applicable to the Approved Assets. At any time, and from time to time, in the event Agent
 
determines, in its sole discretion, that there may be an issue with respect to Hazardous Substances or compliance with Environmental Laws with respect to the Approved Assets or if an Event of Default exists hereunder, if Agent so requests, Borrower shall provide to Agent an environmental review, audit, assessment and/or report relating to the Approved Assets, at Borrower's sole cost and expense, by an engineer or scientist acceptable to Agent.
B. Borrower shall comply (and shall cause each Approved Subsidiary to comply) with all Accessibility Regulations which are applicable to the Approved Assets.
C. Borrower shall, promptly after obtaining knowledge thereof, advise Agent in writing of (i) any activity in violation of any applicable Environmental Law relating to the Approved Assets, (ii) any governmental or regulatory actions (including, without limitation, information requests) instituted or threatened in writing under any Environmental Law or any Accessibility Regulation affecting the Approved Assets, including, without limitation, any notice of inspection, abatement, noncompliance or potential liability, (iii) all claims made or threatened in writing by any third party against Borrower or the Approved Assets relating to any Hazardous Substance or a violation of any Environmental Law or any Accessibility Regulation and (iv) discovery by Borrower of any occurrence or condition on or under the Approved Assets or on or under any real property adjoining or in the vicinity of the Approved Assets which could subject Borrower, Agent, the Lenders or the Approved Assets to a claim under any Environmental Law or Accessibility Regulation or to any restrictions on ownership, occupancy, transferability or use of the Approved Assets under any Environmental Law or Accessibility Regulation. Borrower shall promptly deliver to Agent copies of all orders, notices, permits, applications, or other communications and reports, and of such other documentation or records as Agent may reasonably request, relating to any such activity, Environmental Law, Accessibility Regulation, violations, actions, claims, discovery or event which Borrower receives or which are susceptible of being obtained by Borrower without undue cost or expense and without the necessity for initiating legal proceedings to obtain the same.
D. If Borrower or any other Person (including, without limitation, any Approved Subsidiary) undertakes any investigation or corrective action, including, without limitation, any response, removal, detoxification or other remedial action, pursuant to any requirement of any Environmental Law or Accessibility Regulation, Borrower shall obtain and deliver to Agent a written report, in form and substance acceptable to Agent, from a consultant acceptable to Agent, stating that all required action has been properly taken and that, upon completion of said action, the Approved Assets is in compliance with such Environmental Law and/or Accessibility Regulation.
6.1
Events of Default
Each of the following events shall constitute an Event of Default under this Agreement:
 
A. Borrower shall default in the payment of principal due according to the terms hereof or of the Note and shall fail to cure said default within five (5) days after the due date thereof, provided, however, in no event shall such grace period apply with respect to payments due on the Termination Date;
B. Borrower shall default in the payment of interest on Advances made by Lenders, or in the payment of any fees, including any Letter of Credit Fee, or any other amounts payable hereunder, under the Note or under any of the other Loan Documents and shall fail to cure said default within five (5) days after the due date thereof;
C. Borrower or any Approved Subsidiary shall default in the performance of or fail to observe any of the covenants contained in of this Agreement and such default, if curable, as determined by Agent, is not cured within ten (10) days;
Section 5.8
D. Borrower or any Approved Subsidiary shall default in the performance or observance of any other agreement, covenant or condition required to be performed or observed by Borrower under the terms of this Agreement or the Loan Documents, which default, if curable, is not cured within thirty (30) days after Agent gives Borrower written notice thereof other than a default under hereof or any other event, circumstance or omission as to which another notice and/or cure period is provided for hereunder or which otherwise is separately addressed in this .
Section 5.10
Section 6.1
E. Borrower or any Approved Subsidiary shall default in the performance of any covenant contained in hereof which is not cured within sixty (60) days; provided, however, in the event that such breach is susceptible of cure but is not cured within said sixty (60) days, so long as Borrower or such Approved Subsidiary is diligently and continuously pursuing such cure, as evidenced to Agent's reasonable satisfaction, Agent shall permit Borrower or such Approved Subsidiary an additional one hundred twenty (120) days to effectuate such cure;
Section 5.10
F. Any representation or warranty made by Borrower or Guarantor in this Agreement or in any of the other Loan Documents, or in any certificate or document furnished under the terms of this Agreement or in connection with the Loan, shall be untrue or incomplete in any material respect;
G. Any other event or occurrence herein expressly stated to be an Event of Default occurs or exists;
H. Any Loan Document is not in full force and effect or a default has occurred and is continuing thereunder after giving effect to any cure or grace period in any such document;
I. Any mortgaging, conveyance or other voluntary transfer or encumbrance of any of the Approved Assets or any portion thereof occurs without the prior consent of Agent; provided, however, the prior written consent of all Lenders shall be required with respect to any mortgaging, conveyance or other voluntary transfer or encumbrance of any of the Major Assets or any portion thereof;
 
J. Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary shall commit an act of bankruptcy, shall file a voluntary petition in a bankruptcy, reorganization, composition, readjustment, arrangement, insolvency, liquidation, dissolution or similar proceeding under any present or future statute, law or regulation, shall consent to voluntary or involuntary adjudication in bankruptcy or to reorganization, or shall be adjudicated bankrupt or insolvent under any applicable law or laws pursuant to a voluntary proceeding, or admits, in writing, to having become insolvent or to be unable to pay its debts as they become due, or becomes unable to pay its debts as they mature, or makes an assignment for the benefit of its creditors, or is dissolved, liquidated, terminated or merged, or if it applies for, or if it consents to, the appointment of a trustee, custodian or receiver for it or a substantial portion of its assets;
K. A custodian, trustee or receiver is appointed for any portion of the assets of Borrower, Guarantor, or any Approved Subsidiary, or an involuntary petition in bankruptcy or insolvency is filed against Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary and is not discharged within ninety (90) days after such appointment or filing;
L. Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary, permits the attachment or judicial seizure of any of its assets with a value in excess of One Hundred Thousand and No/100ths Dollars ($100,000.00);
M. Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary, shall be dissolved, liquidated, terminated or merged without the Lenders' unanimous prior written consent or Guarantor shall amend its articles of incorporation without the prior written consent of Agent (except as may be expressly required by law or regulation) or Guarantor shall fail to (x) maintain its existence as a qualified REIT within the meaning of the Internal Revenue Code, (y) list and trade its shares on the New York Stock Exchange or a successor stock exchange at any time, except with the prior written consent of Agent and the Majority Lenders, not to be unreasonably withheld, or (z) maintain its existence as a Maryland corporation;
N. Guarantor shall be terminated, dissolved, liquidated or wound-up, or shall contest, repudiate or purport to revoke the Guaranty, or the Guaranty for any reason (except pursuant to the express terms thereof) shall cease to be in full force and effect as to Guarantor or shall be judicially declared unenforceable or null and void, or any Approved Subsidiary shall contest, repudiate or purport to revoke its Subsidiary Guaranty given pursuant to , or its Subsidiary Guaranty for any reason (except pursuant to the express terms thereof or pursuant to the dissolution or merger of such subsidiary and consequent distribution of assets to Borrower) shall cease to be in full force and effect as to such Approved Subsidiary or shall be judicially declared unenforceable or null and void;
Section 5.9.E
O. Any entity comprising the Borrower or Guarantor is enjoined, restrained or in any way prevented by any court order or judgment or if a notice of lien, levy, or assessment is filed of record with respect to all or any part of the Approved Assets by any governmental department, office or agency which could materially adversely affect the performance of the obligations of such parties hereunder or under the Loan Documents, or if any proceeding is filed or commenced seeking to enjoin, restrain or in any way prevent the foregoing parties from conducting all or a substantial part of their respective business
 
affairs and failure to vacate, stay, dismiss, set aside or remedy any of the foregoing within sixty (60) days after the occurrence thereof;
P. The default (after the expiration of any notice or cure periods) under any recourse indebtedness in excess of $100,000.00 in the aggregate or any nonrecourse indebtedness in excess of $10,000,000.00 in the aggregate of Borrower or Guarantor, or the maturity of any recourse indebtedness in excess of $100,000.00 in the aggregate or any nonrecourse indebtedness in excess of $10,000,000.00 in the aggregate of Borrower or Guarantor (other than indebtedness under this Agreement) shall be accelerated, or Borrower or Guarantor shall fail to pay any such recourse indebtedness in excess of $100,000.00 in the aggregate or any nonrecourse indebtedness in excess of $10,000,000.00 in the aggregate, in each case when due (after the lapse of any applicable grace period) or, in the case of such indebtedness payable on demand, when demanded (after the lapse of any applicable grace period), or any event shall occur or condition shall exist and shall continue for more than the period of grace, if any, applicable thereto and shall have the effect of causing, or permitting the holder of any such indebtedness or any trustee or other person, party or entity acting on behalf of such holder to cause, such recourse indebtedness in excess of $100,000.00 in the aggregate or any nonrecourse indebtedness in excess of $10,000,000.00 in the aggregate to become due prior to its stated maturity or to realize upon any collateral given as security therefor;
Q. There shall occur a material adverse change of any kind, financial or otherwise with respect to Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary, as determined by Agent in its sole discretion;
R. There shall occur any default (after the expiration of any notice or cure periods) under any other loans from one or more Lenders to Borrower, Guarantor or any Approved Subsidiary.
6.2
Rights and Remedies
Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default, unless such Event of Default is subsequently waived in writing by Agent on behalf of Lenders, Agent, acting on behalf of the Lenders, or Lenders, as the case may be, in each case subject to Section 8.4.C, shall be entitled to exercise any or all of the following rights and remedies, consecutively or simultaneously, and in any order:
A. Agent may make one (1) or more further Advances, without liability on the part of the Lenders to make any subsequent Advances.
B. Agent may suspend the obligation of the Lenders to make Advances under this Agreement, without notice to Borrower.
C. Subject to the provisions of and , Agent may terminate the obligation of the Lenders to make Advances under this Agreement, and declare the entire unpaid principal balance of the Advances made under this Agreement and all Reimbursement Obligations to be immediately due and payable, together with accrued and unpaid interest on such Advances, without notice to or demand on Borrower.
Sections 2.A.9
2.A.10
 
D. Agent may terminate its obligation to issue, extend or renew Letters of Credit.
E. Agent may exercise any or all remedies specified herein and/or in the other Loan Documents, and/or any other remedies available at law, in equity or under statute.
F. Agent may take action on behalf of Borrower to correct the circumstances which are the subject of the Event of Default, which action shall not be deemed to cure the Event of Default.
G. Borrower hereby irrevocably authorizes Lenders to set off any sum due to or incurred by Lenders against all deposits and credits of Borrower with, and any and all claims of Borrower against, Lenders. Such right shall exist whether or not Agent shall have made any demand hereunder or under any other Loan Document, whether or not said sums, or any part thereof, or deposits and credits held for the account of Borrower is or are matured or unmatured, and regardless of the existence or adequacy of any collateral, guaranty or any other security, right or remedy available to Agent. Agent agrees that, as promptly as is reasonably possible after the exercise of any such setoff right, Agent shall notify Borrower of the exercise of such setoff right; provided, however, that the failure of Agent to provide such notice shall not affect the validity of the exercise of such setoff rights. Nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed a waiver or prohibition of or restriction on Lenders to all rights of banker's lien, setoff and counterclaim available pursuant to law.
7.1
Binding Effect; Waivers; Cumulative Rights and Remedies
The provisions of this Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, personal representatives, legal representatives, successors and assigns, subject to the provisions of ; provided, however, that neither this Agreement nor the proceeds of the Loan may be assigned by Borrower voluntarily, by operation of law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of Agent (it being agreed that the prior written consent of all Lenders shall be required if Borrower desires to assign this Agreement). No delay on the part of Agent or Lenders in exercising any right, remedy, power or privilege hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any right, remedy, power or privilege hereunder constitute such a waiver or exhaust the same, all of which shall be continuing. The rights and remedies of Agent and Lenders specified in this Agreement shall be in addition to, and not exclusive of, any other rights and remedies which Agent would otherwise have at law, in equity or by statute, and all such rights and remedies, together with Agent's rights and remedies under the other Loan Documents, are cumulative and may be exercised individually, concurrently, successively and in any order.
Section 5.6
7.2
Survival
 
All agreements, representations and warranties made in this Agreement shall survive the execution of this Agreement, the making of the Advances by Lenders, and the execution of the other Loan Documents, and shall continue until Lenders receive payment in full of all indebtedness of Borrower incurred under this Agreement and under the other Loan Documents and for so long as any Letter of Credit remains outstanding.
7.3
Governing Law; Waiver of Jury Trial
THIS AGREEMENT, THE RIGHTS OF THE PARTIES HEREUNDER, AND THE CONSTRUCTION, INTERPRETATION, VALIDITY AND ENFORCEABILITY HEREOF AND OF ALL OF THE LOAN DOCUMENTS SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE INTERNAL LAWS OF THE STATE OF MARYLAND, WITHOUT GIVING EFFECT TO CONFLICT OF LAWS PRINCIPLES THEREOF, BUT GIVING EFFECT TO FEDERAL LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES RELATING TO NATIONAL BANKS. BORROWER, AGENT AND LENDERS HEREBY WAIVE ANY RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING RELATING TO THE LOAN, THE LOAN DOCUMENTS AND/OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED THEREBY. AT THE OPTION OF LENDERS, THIS AGREEMENT MAY BE ENFORCED IN ANY FEDERAL COURT SITTING IN THE STATE OF MARYLAND OR MARYLAND STATE COURT; AND BORROWER CONSENTS TO THE JURISDICTION AND VENUE OF ANY SUCH COURT AND WAIVES ANY ARGUMENT THAT VENUE IN SUCH FORUM IS NOT CONVENIENT. IN THE EVENT BORROWER COMMENCES ANY ACTION IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION OR VENUE UNDER ANY TORT OR CONTRACT THEORY ARISING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY FROM THE RELATIONSHIP CREATED BY THIS AGREEMENT, AGENT, AT ITS OPTION, SHALL BE ENTITLED TO HAVE THE CASE TRANSFERRED TO ONE OF THE JURISDICTIONS AND VENUES ABOVE-DESCRIBED, OR IF SUCH TRANSFER CANNOT BE ACCOMPLISHED UNDER APPLICABLE LAW, TO HAVE SUCH CASE DISMISSED WITHOUT PREJUDICE.
7.4
Counterparts
This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, all of which shall constitute a single agreement.
7.5
Notices
Any notice required or permitted to be given by either Borrower to Agent on behalf of the Banks or by Agent on behalf of the Banks to Borrower under the terms of this Agreement, or documents related hereto, shall be in writing and shall be sent by manual delivery, telegram, facsimile transmission, overnight courier, or United States registered or certified mail, return receipt requested (postage prepaid), addressed to such party at the address specified on the signature page hereof, or at such other address in the United States of America as such party shall have specified to the other party hereto in writing, at least ten (10) days prior to the effective date of said change of address. All periods of notice shall be measured from the date of delivery thereof if manually delivered, from the date of sending thereof if sent by telegram or facsimile transmission, from the first Business Day after the date of sending if sent by overnight courier, or from four (4) days after the date of
 
mailing if so mailed; provided, however, that any notice to Lenders designating, continuing or converting any Advance as or into a LIBOR Rate Advance shall be deemed to have been given upon telephonic notice from Borrower to Agent, as more particularly set forth herein.
7.6
No Third Party Reliance
No third party shall be entitled to rely upon this Agreement or to have any of the benefits of any Lender's interest hereunder, unless such third party is an express assignee of all or a portion of Lenders' interest hereunder.
7.7 [
Intentionally Omitted.]
7.8
Time of the Essence
Time is of the essence hereof with respect to the dates, terms and conditions of this Agreement.
7.9
Entire Agreement; No Oral Modifications
This Agreement, the Guaranty, the other Loan Documents and the other documents mentioned herein set forth the entire agreement of the parties with respect to the Loan and supersede all prior written or oral understandings and agreements between them with respect thereto. No modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement shall be effective unless set forth in writing and signed by the parties hereto.
7.10
Captions
The headings or captions of the Articles and Sections set forth herein are for convenience only, are not a part of this Agreement and are not to be considered in interpreting this Agreement.
7.11
Borrower-Lender Relationship
The relationship between Borrower, Agent and Lenders created hereby and by the other Loan Documents shall be that of a borrower and a lender only, and in no event shall Agent or any Lender be deemed to be a partner of, or a joint venturer with, Borrower.
7.12
Rules of Interpretation
In this Agreement, in the computation of a period of time from a specified date to a later specified date, unless otherwise stated, the word "from" means "from and including" and the word "to" or "until" each means "to but excluding". The words "hereof", "herein" and "hereunder" and words of similar import when used in this Agreement shall refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular provision of this Agreement. References to Sections, Subsections, Exhibits, schedules and like references are to this Agreement unless otherwise expressly provided. The words "include", "includes" and "including" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation". Unless the
 
context in which used herein otherwise clearly requires, "or" has the inclusive meaning represented by the phrase "and/or" where permitted by the context.
7.13
Expenses
Borrower agrees to pay (a) the costs of producing and reproducing this Agreement, the other Loan Documents and the other agreements and instruments mentioned herein, (b) the reasonable fees, expenses and disbursements of the Agent's outside counsel or any local counsel to the Agent incurred in connection with the preparation, administration or interpretation of the Loan Documents and other instruments mentioned herein, each closing hereunder, and amendments, modifications, approvals, consents or waivers hereto or hereunder, (c) the fees, expenses and disbursements of the Agent incurred by the Agent in connection with the preparation, administration or interpretation of the Loan Documents and other instruments mentioned herein, including, without limitation, the costs incurred by the Agent in connection with its inspection of the Unencumbered Assets, and the fees and disbursements of the Agent's counsel in preparing the documentation, (d) [intentionally omitted], (e) all expenses (including attorneys' fees and costs, which attorneys may be employees of any Lender or the Agent, and the fees and costs of appraisers, engineers, investment bankers, surveyors or other experts retained by the Lender or Agent in connection with any such enforcement proceedings) incurred by any Lender or the Agent in connection with (i) the enforcement of or preservation of rights under any of the Loan Documents against the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries or any Guarantor or the administration thereof after the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default (including, without limitation, expenses incurred in any restructuring and/or "workout" of the Loan), and (ii) any litigation, proceeding or dispute whether arising hereunder or otherwise, in any way related to any Lender's or the Agent's relationship with the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries or any Guarantor, (f) all reasonable fees, expenses and disbursements of the Agent incurred in connection with title searches, and (g) all costs incurred by the Agent in the future in connection with its inspection(s) of the Unencumbered Assets. The covenants of this Section shall survive payment or satisfaction of payment of amounts owing with respect to the Note.
.
8.1
Agency
A. . Each Lender hereby appoints and authorizes Agent to act as sole agent under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, authorizes and directs Agent to enter into the Loan Documents other than this Agreement for the benefit of the Lenders, and authorizes the Agent to take such action on its behalf under the provisions of this Agreement and the Loan Documents and to exercise such powers as are set forth herein or therein, together with such other powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. In furtherance thereof, Lenders hereby ratify the execution and delivery by Agent of this Agreement, the acceptance by Agent of all of the other Loan Documents and the terms and conditions of the Loan Documents. The Agent hereby accepts such appointment. Agent shall exercise all rights and powers of Agent under this Agreement, including the administration of the Loan and disbursement of Advances,
Appointment and Authorization
 
except as otherwise expressly provided in this Agreement. The Borrower, without further inquiry or investigation, shall, and is hereby authorized by the Lenders to, assume that all actions taken by the Agent hereunder and in connection with or under the Loan Documents are duly authorized by the Lenders.
B. .
Non-Liability of Agent and Indemnity
(1) Agent shall have no duties or responsibilities except those expressly set forth in this Agreement or in the other Loan Documents. Agent shall administer the Loan in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement in the same manner as it customarily does for similar loans for its own account. The duties of the Agent shall be mechanical and administrative in nature; the Agent shall not have by reason of this Agreement a fiduciary relationship in respect of any Lender; and nothing in this Agreement or any Loan Document, expressed or implied, is intended to or shall be so construed as to impose upon the Agent any obligations in respect of this Agreement or any Loan Document except as expressly set forth herein or therein. Neither Agent nor any of its respective directors, officers, agents or employees shall be liable to any Lender for any action taken or not taken by them under or in connection with this Agreement or under any of the other Loan Documents other than Agent's gross negligence and willful misconduct. In this regard, Agent may consult with independent legal counsel, accountants and other professionals or experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it or them in good faith in accordance with the advice of such legal counsel, accountants or other professionals or experts. In the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, Agent shall not be liable for any apportionment or distribution of payments made by it in good faith pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, and if any such apportionment or distribution is subsequently determined to have been made in error, the sole recourse of any person to whom payment was due, but not made, shall be to recover from the recipients of such payments any payment in excess of the amount to which they are determined to have been entitled.
(2) In the event the Agent is not reimbursed and indemnified by the Borrower, within ten (10) Business Days of demand therefor by Agent, each Lender will reimburse and indemnify the Agent, and its directors, officers, agents and employees, in proportion to its respective Commitment Percentage of the Loan, for and against any claims, actions, judgments, costs, expenses or disbursements of whatsoever kind or nature which may be imposed on, asserted against or incurred by the Agent, or its directors, officers, agents, or employees in performing its duties hereunder or under any Loan Document; provided, however, that no Lender shall be liable for any of the foregoing to the extent that they arise from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the party to be indemnified. The obligations of the Lenders under this shall survive the payment in full of all obligations of Borrower and the termination of this Agreement.
Section 8.1.B(2)
.
8.2
Resignation of Agent; Removal
A. U.S. Bank National Association or any successor agent may resign as Agent at any time by written notice delivered to the Borrower and the Lenders (if any). Such resignation shall be effective upon the earlier to occur of thirty (30) days following such notice or a successor's acceptance of appointment as the Agent. In addition, in the event of
 
Agent's gross negligence or willful misconduct (as determined by all Lenders) or for cause duly shown (as determined by the Majority Lenders), Agent may be removed by giving thirty (30) days prior written notice to Agent and Borrower; provided, however, for purposes of calculating such approval in this context, Agent shall be deemed a Defaulting Lender and its Commitment Percentage shall therefore be disregarded and excluded for voting purposes only.
B. In the case of any of the events described in , (A) the Majority Lenders shall appoint a successor Agent from among the Lenders so long as such successor meets the requirements described in and hereof; provided, however, that the resigning Agent shall be entitled to appoint a successor agent who, so long as no Event of Default exists hereunder, has been approved by Borrower, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed, and who meets the requirements of and as Agent, if the Majority Lenders have not appointed a successor within thirty (30) days after the date the resigning Agent gave notice of resignation; (B) upon a successor's acceptance of appointment (and assumption of the Agent's obligations hereunder arising after the date of such appointment), the successor will thereupon succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the resigning or removed Agent; (C) upon the effectiveness of any resignation or removal, the resigning or removed Agent will thereupon be discharged from the duties and obligations of Agent which thereafter arise under the Credit Agreement; and (D) any resigning Agent shall have the benefit of any indemnities provided in the Loan Documents and this Agreement.
Section 8.2.A
Sections 8.8.A(2)
8.8.A(3)
Sections 8.8.A(2)
8.8.A(3)
.
8.3
Administration
A. . Each Lender shall reimburse the Agent for its Commitment Percentage of any expenses with respect to the administration, enforcement or collection of the Loan which are not reimbursed by the Borrower pursuant to and within the period required by the Loan Documents, or if not specified in the Loan Documents, promptly after the date of demand therefor made by the Agent, other than those resulting directly from Agent's gross negligence or willful misconduct. The Agent shall have the right, but not the obligation, to incur such expenditures prior to reimbursement therefor by the Lenders.
Expenses
B. . Except for the Note executed in favor of each Lender and for Loan Documents sent for filing or recording (which are not returned following recording), Agent shall hold and maintain a duplicate set of all original Loan Documents. The Agent shall promptly deliver to each Lender a copy or counterpart of execution copy of each Loan Document. The Agent shall forward, within four (4) Business Days after receipt, to each Lender a copy of each financial statement of Borrower or rent roll or other financial statement for the Real Estate Assets received from Borrower. Upon request of any Lender, the Agent shall promptly forward to such Lender each financial statement of Borrower received by Agent. The Lenders may, upon reasonable prior notice and during the Agent's normal business hours, inspect and make copies of such books and records of Agent that relate to this Loan.
Documents; Information; Inspection
.
8.4
Actions by Agent; Required Consents
 
A. Except as specified below, Agent shall exercise its sole discretion to act or not to act under the Loan Documents and the appropriate action with respect thereto. Such discretion may be exercised with respect to the granting of approvals, consents, and modifications under the Loan Documents and with respect to the exercise or refraining from exercise of rights under the Loan Documents.
B. Notwithstanding , the following matters shall require the prior consent of all of the Lenders:
Section 8.4.A
(1) any change (other than as currently contemplated in the Loan Documents) in the interest rate under the Loan;
(2) any reduction in the amount of any payment of any fees other than fees paid solely to the Agent;
(3) release of any guarantor;
(4) any change (other than by operation of the Loan Documents) in the Maturity Date of the Loan or in the conditions for extension of the Maturity Date;
(5) any release, termination, modification or amendment of any indemnity provided in the Loan Documents;
(6) any forgiveness of principal, interest or other amounts payable under the Loan (other than the forgiveness of late fees up to three (3) times during the term of this Agreement, after which Majority Lender consent shall be required) or any extension of time for payment of principal or interest;
(7) any increase in the Revolving Commitment Amount (as such may be increased in accordance with the provisions of hereof) or the Loan;
Section 3.6(a)
(8) any amendment to the covenants contained in hereof;
Section 5.8
(9) any amendment to this or ;
Section 8.4.B
Section 8.2
(10) any change in the definition of "Majority Lenders"; and
(11) those matters for which consent of all of the Lenders is required pursuant to .
Section 6.1.M
C. Notwithstanding , the prior consent of the Majority Lenders shall be required for the acceleration of any indebtedness under the Loan Documents, or the pursuit of remedies against the Borrower;
Section 8.4.B
D. In case one or more Events of Default have occurred and shall be continuing, and whether or not acceleration of the Loan shall have occurred, the Agent shall, if (a) so requested by the Majority Lenders and (b) the Lenders have provided to the Agent such additional indemnities and assurances against expenses and liabilities as the Agent may
 
reasonably request, proceed to enforce the provisions of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and exercise all or any such other legal and equitable and other rights or remedies as it may have in respect of enforcement of the Lenders' rights against the Borrower under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents. The Majority Lenders may direct the Agent in writing as to the method and the extent of any such enforcement, the Lenders (including any Lender which is not one of the Majority Lenders so directing the Agent in writing) hereby agreeing to ratably and severally indemnify and hold the Agent harmless from all liabilities incurred in respect of all actions taken or omitted in accordance with such directions, provided that the Agent need not comply with any such direction to the extent that the Agent reasonably believes the Agent's compliance with such direction to be unlawful or commercially unreasonable in any applicable jurisdiction.
.
8.5
Payments
A. . Lenders and Agent specifically agree to the following operational and administrative procedures as between themselves:
Interest Rates and Disbursement Matters
(1) The Prime Rate (as established from time to time) shall in each instance be the rate established from time to time by Agent.
(2) Agent shall notify each Lender by telephone or facsimile of the election by the Borrower (A) to apply the Loan Rate one (1) Business Day prior to the date on which the Loan Rate shall be effective and (B) to apply the LIBOR Rate two (2) Business Days prior to the date on which the LIBOR Rate shall be effective. Agent shall notify each Lender by telephone or facsimile of its Commitment Percentage of a proposed Advance of the Loan and the date of such disbursement two (2) Business Days prior to such disbursement with respect to disbursements which are to bear interest at the Loan Rate or the LIBOR Rate, such notice to be delivered by facsimile. All notices from Agent to the Lenders shall also include: (i) the amount of such Advance requested by Borrower, (ii) the amount approved for advance by Agent, (iii) each Lender's Commitment Percentage of such proposed Advance, and (iv) the date such Advance is scheduled to be made to Borrower. Each Lender may request copies of any additional materials submitted to Agent by Borrower after Agent and the Lenders have made any Advance. Each Lender shall deposit by wire transfer of Immediately Available Funds to Agent's account as specified on hereto the amount of such Commitment Percentage no later than 11:00 a.m. (Central time) on the date of such disbursement.
Exhibit D
Unless Agent shall have been notified by any Lender not later than the close of business (Central time) on the Business Day immediately preceding the date for funding in respect of any Advance that such Lender does not intend to make available to Agent such Lender's Commitment Percentage of such Advance, Agent may assume that such Lender has made such amount available to Agent. In any case where a Lender does not for any reason make available to Agent such Lender's Commitment Percentage of such Advance, Agent, in its sole discretion, may, but shall not be obligated to, fund to Borrower such Lender's Commitment Percentage of such Advance. If the amount so funded by Agent is not in fact made available to Agent by the responsible Lender, then such Lender hereby
 
assigns to Agent any payments received by Agent from Borrower in repayment of such amount, together with interest thereon at the rate applicable to such Advance.
(3) If any Lender fails to deliver funds to Agent for a disbursement by the time required by above, such Lender shall pay to Agent interest on such funds at the Federal Funds Rate, as announced by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, for each day (or portion thereof) until such funds are delivered. Any interest paid pursuant to this section shall be divided among the Lenders which funded the applicable disbursement.
subsection (2) 
(4) Agent shall wire transfer to each Lender at such Lender's account as designated on hereto its Commitment Percentage of any payments (to the extent payable pursuant to ) within one (1) Business Day of Agent's receipt of such payment. Agent shall pay to the Lenders interest thereon, at the Federal Funds Rate from the Business Day following receipt of such funds by Agent until such funds are paid in Immediately Available Funds to the Lender.
Exhibit D
Section 8.5.B)
(5) Any Lender desiring to make a claim for costs or taxes payable by Borrower shall deliver a certificate to Agent setting forth the basis and calculation thereof and the Agent shall forward such certificate to the Borrower. Except as provided in the Loan Documents, each Lender shall be responsible for any taxes payable in respect of amounts paid hereunder. All payments made by Agent to Lenders shall be made without withholding for taxes, charges, or levies, except as may be required by law. Each Lender shall on demand from Agent provide completed and signed copies of certificates required to show exemption of such Lender from United States withholding taxes.
B. . Lenders and Agent agree that all payments made and actually received by the Agent in respect of the Loan (from any person or source) shall be applied in the following order of priority (based on Commitment Percentages thereof):
Application of Recoveries
(1) to the reimbursement of any costs incurred by the Agent to administer, enforce, collect or deal with the Loan (including payments made pursuant to hereof (or to reimbursement of the Lenders to the extent such costs have been paid by the Lenders);
Sections 8.5.A(2) and (3) 
(2) to the payment of all interest (including interest calculated at the Default Rate) due and payable on the Note;
(3) to the payment of fees payable under the Loan Documents;
(4) to the payment of principal of the Note; and
(5) to the Borrower.
C. . If any Lender shall obtain any payment (whether voluntary, involuntary, through the exercise of any right of set-off or otherwise) on account of its interest in the Loan in excess of its Commitment Percentage in the Loan, such
Excess Payments
 
Lender will pay the excess to Agent and Agent shall pay to the other Lenders their respective proportionate share thereof; provided, however, that if all or any portion of such excess payment is thereafter recovered by the Borrower or other party entitled thereto through legal action or otherwise, each Lender shall reimburse the party returning such excess payment in an amount equal to such Lender's Commitment Percentage of the excess payment.
D. . If in the reasonable opinion of the Agent the distribution of any amount received by it in such capacity hereunder or under any of the other Loan Documents might involve it in material liability, it may refrain from making distribution until its right to make distribution shall have been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction, provided that the Agent shall invest any such undistributed amounts in overnight obligations on behalf of the Lenders and interest thereon shall be paid pro rata to the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitment Percentages. If a court of competent jurisdiction shall adjudge that any amount received and distributed by the Agent is to be repaid, each Person to whom any such distribution shall have been made shall either repay to the Agent its proportionate share of the amount so adjudged to be repaid or shall pay over the same in such manner and to such Persons as shall be determined by such court.
Liability for Advances
.
8.6
Defaulting Lender
A. . If for any reason any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then in addition to the rights and remedies that may be available to the Agent and the other Lenders at law and in equity, such Defaulting Lender's right to participate in the administration of the Loan and the Loan Documents, including, without limitation, any rights to consent to or direct any action or inaction of the Agent, shall be suspended during the pendency of such failure or refusal. Borrower acknowledges and agrees that (a) the obligations of the Lenders under this Agreement are several, (b) no Lender is or will be obligated to lend Borrower more than the amount set forth in hereto for such Lender, nor to fund any part of any advance except upon fulfillment of all applicable conditions precedent provided herein and in the other Loan Documents, (c) except to the extent expressly provided in this Agreement, Borrower shall have no recourse or claim against a non-defaulting Lender nor against Agent (so long as the same have otherwise complied with their obligations under this Agreement), for any deficiency or any liability, loss, damage or expense resulting from the default of a Defaulting Lender, and (d) the Commitment Percentage of the Revolving Commitment Amount of any Lender shall not be increased or decreased as a result of the failure by any other Lender to perform its obligation to make an advance.
Defaults
Schedule 1
B. . If for any reason the Defaulting Lender fails to make timely payment to any other party to this Agreement of any amount required to be paid to it hereunder, in addition to other rights and remedies which such other party may have under or otherwise, such other party shall be entitled (1) to collect interest from the Defaulting Lender for the period from the date on which the payment was due until the date on which the payment is made for each day during such period at the Federal Funds Rate, (2) to withhold or set off, and to apply to the payment of the defaulted amount and any related interest, any amounts to be paid to the Defaulting Lender under
Remedies
Section 8.6.A
 
this Agreement, (3) to bring an action or suit against the Defaulting Lender in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover the defaulted amount and any related interest, (4) to arrange for the purchase of the Commitment Percentage of the Defaulting Lender as provided in , and (5) to advance funds on behalf of the Defaulting Lender as provided in .
Section 8.6.D
Section 8.6.E
C. . The Defaulting Lender shall indemnify, defend, and hold Agent and each of the other Lenders harmless from and against any and all losses, damages, liabilities, and expense (including attorneys' fees) which they may actually sustain or incur by reason of or in consequence of the Defaulting Lender's failure or refusal to abide by the terms of this Agreement.
Indemnity
D. . If a Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, the other Lenders who are not Defaulting Lenders shall have the right, but not the obligation, in their sole discretion, to acquire (pro rata based on the Commitment Percentages of the Lenders exercising such right) all of such Defaulting Lender's right, title, and interest in and to the Loan. The purchase price shall be the principal and accrued interest allocable to the Defaulting Lender's Commitment Percentage of the Loan and shall be paid on the closing day of such purchase. On the date of closing of such purchase, the Defaulting Lender shall pay the Agent a processing fee of $3,500. The Defaulting Lender shall retain liability for all obligations in respect of the Loan and this Agreement arising prior to the date of transfer (but releasing Defaulting Lender's liability for all obligations in respect of the Loan and this Agreement arising from and after the date of transfer) and shall execute and deliver such documents as may be reasonably necessary to effect such transfer.
Purchase Right
E. . If a Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, the other Lenders may (pro rata based on the Commitment Percentages of the Lenders exercising such right), but are not obligated to, make advances to the Agent in the aggregate amount that the Defaulting Lender is obligated to advance under the Credit Agreement or this Agreement. Such advances shall be treated as loans made to the Defaulting Lender, shall bear interest at the Default Rate (payable on demand), shall be due and payable upon demand, and shall be paid prior to any payment being made to the Defaulting Lender.
Default Loans
F. . The exercise of the above remedies shall not reduce, diminish or liquidate the Defaulting Lender's obligation for the sharing of losses and reimbursement of costs, liabilities, and expenses under the Loan Documents and this Agreement. The obligations of the Defaulting Lender arising prior to any purchase pursuant to shall survive any such purchase.
Cumulative Remedies and Survival
Section 8.6.D
.
8.7
Representations, Warranties and Acknowledgments
A. Each Lender represents and warrants, as of the date hereof, as follows:
Authorization, etc.
(1) Such Lender has all necessary corporate power and authority to own its interest in the Loan and the Loan Documents, and has all necessary corporate power and authority to perform its obligations with respect to this Agreement and the Loan Documents;
 
(2) The execution and delivery of this Agreement and all other instruments and documents executed and delivered in connection therewith by such Lender have been duly authorized by all requisite corporate action of such Lender; and
(3) No approval, authorization, order, license or consent of, or registration of filing with, any governmental authority or other person is required in connection with such Lender's execution and delivery of this Agreement by such Lender.
B. . Each Lender agrees that it has, independently and without reliance upon any other party hereto, or upon the directors, officers, agents or employees of any other party hereto, but only in reliance upon information supplied to it by or on behalf of the Borrower and upon such other information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own independent credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement and the Loan Documents. Without limiting the foregoing, each Lender acknowledges that it has received copies of the Loan Documents and financial statements, certificates, instruments, documents, affidavits, resolutions and agreements as it deems necessary to make its credit analysis and decisions in respect of the Loan. Each Lender also agrees that it shall, independently and without reliance upon any other party hereto, continue to make its own independent credit analyses and decisions in acting or not acting under the Loan Documents. Except as specifically provided herein, the Agent shall have no duty or responsibility, either initially or on a continuing basis, to provide any Lender with any credit or other information with respect thereto, whether coming into its possession before the Closing Date or at any time or times thereafter.
Independent Decision
C. . Each Lender hereby acknowledges that, except as specifically set forth herein, Agent (i) makes no warranty or representation to Lenders for any statements, warranties or representations (written or otherwise, express or implied) made in or in connection with the Loan Documents for the financial condition of the Borrower or for the title or the value of any of the collateral for the Loan, and (ii) shall not be responsible to the Lenders for any recitals, statements, representations or warranties herein or for the due execution, effectiveness, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency, or collectibility of any of the Loan Documents or any other instrument or document furnished pursuant thereto or in connection with the Loan or the legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency, perfection or priority of any rights in all or any portion of the collateral for the Loan. The Agent shall not be bound to ascertain whether any notice, consent, waiver or request delivered to it by the Borrower or any holder of any Note shall have been duly authorized or is true, accurate and complete. Agent shall not be required to make any inquiry concerning either the performance or observance of any of the terms, provisions or conditions of this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents or the financial condition of the Borrower or Guarantor, or the existence or possible existence of any Event of Default or any default which, with the giving of notice, passage of time, or both, would become an Event of Default.
No Reliance
.
8.8
Assignments
A. . Any Lender may assign to any affiliate of such Lender all or a portion of its respective Commitment Percentage of the Loan, in such a
Permitted Assignments
 
manner as to create privity of contract between such affiliate and the Borrower and to make such affiliate a Lender for all purposes hereunder; provided, however any Lender serving as Agent hereunder shall hold not less than $20,000,000.00 of the total commitment so long as there exists no Event of Default. Any Lender may assign to any entity which meets the following conditions ("") all or a portion of its respective Commitment Percentage of the Loan, in such a manner as to create privity of contract between such person and the Borrower and to make such person a Lender for all purposes hereunder:
Assignee Lender
(1) The minimum portion of the total commitment which the assigning Lender may assign to an Assignee Lender (the "") shall be Five Million and 00/100ths Dollars ($5,000,000.00).
Assigned Interest
(2) An Assignee Lender (or its direct or indirect parent) shall be either (A) a commercial lender organized under the laws of the United States, or any state thereof, and having total assets in excess of Ten Billion Dollars ($10,000,000,000) or (B) a U.S. branch of a commercial bank organized under the laws of any other country which has total assets in excess of Ten Billion Dollars ($10,000,000,000) or (C) any other U.S. financial institution which has total assets in excess of Ten Billion Dollars ($10,000,000,000).
(3) The senior unsecured debt of an Assignee Lender (or its direct or indirect parent) shall have a rating of Baa-2 or higher from Moody's Investors Service, Inc. or a comparable rating agency.
(4) Such assignment shall have been approved by Agent and, so long as no Event of Default exists hereunder or under the other Loan Documents, by Borrower. Borrower shall notify Agent within five (5) Business Days after receipt of notice of such proposal to advise Agent of whether it approves the proposed assignee. If Borrower disapproves such assignee, then, unless Borrower provides a reasonable basis for withholding its consent to such proposed assignee, Agent shall notify all of the Lenders who shall thereupon have a right of first refusal, exercisable within ten (10) Business Days after receipt of Agent's notice, to elect to acquire, pro rata based upon the percentage which its respective Commitment Percentage bears to the aggregate Commitment Percentages of all Lenders electing to purchase the Assigned Interest. The closing of such assignment to the electing Lenders shall occur twenty (20) Business Days after Agent's notice. If none of the Lenders exercise their right to purchase, the assigning Lender may thereafter convey the Assigned Interest to the originally proposed assignee, notwithstanding that Borrower did not approve such proposed assignee. It shall not be deemed to be reasonable for the Borrower to withhold its consent if such proposed assignee meets the criteria outlined in and  hereof. No sub-assignments shall be permitted.
Section 8.8(A)((2)
(3)
(5) The Assignee Lender shall have paid to the Agent an administrative fee of $3,500.00 to process the admission of such Assignee Lender.
(6) The Assignee Lender shall not be Borrower or any affiliates of Borrower.
 
B. . The Borrower and Agent may continue to deal solely and directly with the assigning Lender in connection with the interest so assigned to an Assignee Lender (or to an affiliate of such Lender) until such time as (i) written notice of such assignment, together with payment instructions, addresses and related information with respect to the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) shall have been given to the Borrower and Agent by the assigning Lender and the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate); (ii) the assigning Lender and the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) shall have delivered to the Borrower and Agent an Assignment and Assumption Agreement in the form attached hereto as .
Assignment and Assumption
Exhibit C
Promptly following a request therefor, Borrower will execute and deliver to Agent an appropriate replacement promissory note or replacement promissory notes, in each case designated as such, in favor of each assignee (and assignor, if such assignor is retaining a portion of its Commitment Percentage and advances) reflecting such assignee's (and assignor's) Commitment Percentage of the Revolving Commitment Amount. Promptly following the execution and delivery of such replacement promissory note(s) the original promissory note or notes evidencing all or a portion of the Commitment Percentage of the Revolving Commitment Amount and advances being assigned shall be canceled and returned to Borrower.
C. . Promptly following receipt by Agent of an executed Assignment and Assumption Agreement, Agent shall give notice to the Borrower and to the Lenders of: (i) the effectiveness of the assignment by the assigning Lender to the Assignee Lender (or the affiliate of the Lender); and (ii) the revised percentages and maximum amounts of the Commitment Percentage of the Revolving Commitment Amount in effect as a result of such assignment.
Notice by Agent
D. . Immediately upon delivery of the Assignment and Assumption Agreement to Agent, this Agreement shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, but only to the extent, necessary to reflect the addition of the Assignee Lender (or affiliate of the Lender) and the resulting adjustment of the Commitment Percentage arising therefrom. The Commitment Percentage of the Revolving Commitment Amount assigned to each Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) shall reduce the Commitment Percentage of the Revolving Commitment Amount of the assigning Lender by a like amount.
Adjustment of Shares
E. . From and after the date upon which Agent notifies the assigning Lender that it has received an executed Assignment and Assumption Agreement: (1) the Assignee Lender (or the Lender's affiliate) thereunder shall be a party to this Agreement and, to the extent that rights and obligations hereunder have been assigned to it pursuant to such Assignment and Assumption Agreement, shall have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement; and (2) the assigning Lender shall, to the extent that rights and obligations under this Agreement have been assigned by it pursuant to such Assignment and Assumption Agreement, relinquish its rights and be released from its obligations under this Agreement.
Rights of Assignee
F. . By executing and delivering an Assignment and Assumption Agreement, the Assignee Lender (or the Lender's affiliate) thereunder
Assignee's Agreements
 
confirms and agrees as follows: (1) other than as provided in such Assignment and Assumption Agreement, the assigning Lender makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility with respect to any statements, warranties or representations made in or in connection with this Agreement or the execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of this Agreement, the Note or any other instrument or document furnished pursuant to the Loan; (2) the assigning Lender makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility with respect to the financial condition of the Borrower or any other parties or the performance or observance by the Borrower of any of its Obligations; (3) the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) has received a copy of this Agreement, together with such other documents and information as the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into the Assignment and Assumption Agreement; (4) the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) will, independently and without reliance upon Agent, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under this Agreement; (5) the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) hereby appoints and authorizes Agent to take such action as administrative agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under the Loan Documents and this Agreement as are delegated to Agent thereunder and hereunder, together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto; and (6) the Assignee Lender (or such affiliate) agrees that it will perform all of the obligations which by the terms of this Agreement are required to be performed by it as a Lender and confirms the representations and warranties of the assigning Lender under this Agreement.
G. . Subject to Borrower's prior written consent so long as no Event of Default exists hereunder or under the other Loan Documents, any Lender may at any time grant to an affiliate of such Lender, or one or more banks or other financial institutions (each a "") participating interests in its Percentage Interest of the Revolving Commitment Amount or the obligations owing to such Lender hereunder. No Participant shall have any rights or benefits under this Agreement or any other Loan Document. In the event of any such grant by a Lender of a participating interest to a Participant, such Lender shall remain responsible for the performance of it obligations hereunder, and the Borrower and the Agent shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement. Any agreement pursuant to which any Lender may grant such a participating interest shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right and responsibility to enforce the obligations of the Borrower hereunder including, without limitation, the right to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; provided however, such Lender may agree with the Participant that it will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to (i) increase such Lender's Percentage Interest of the Revolving Commitment Amount, (ii) extend the date fixed for the payment of principal on the Loan or a portion thereof owing to such Lender, or (iii) reduce the rate at which interest is payable thereon.
Participations
Participant
. The Agent and each Lender may accept deposits from, lend money to, and generally engage in any kind of banking, trust or other business with Borrower or any affiliate of Borrower as if it were not performing the duties specified herein, and may accept fees and other considerations from the Borrower or any such affiliate for services in connection with this Agreement and otherwise without having to account for the same to the other parties hereto.
8.9
Other Business
 
. If the Agent requests in writing the consent or approval from the Lenders and any Lender does not respond to such request within seven (7) Business Days (or such other period as may be provided herein), such Lender shall be deemed to have given such consent or approval.
8.10
Consents
. In its individual capacity as a Lender, U.S. Bank National Association shall have the same obligations and the same rights, powers and privileges in respect to its Commitment Percentage and the Advances made by it, and as the holder of a Note as it would have were it not also the Agent.
8.11
Agent as Lender
. Agent and each Lender hereby agree that, upon learning of the existence of a default or an Event of Default, it shall (to the extent notice has not previously been provided) promptly notify the other parties to this Agreement (other than Borrower) thereof. The Agent hereby agrees that upon receipt of any notice under this provision it shall promptly notify the other Lenders of the existence of such default or Event of Default. Agent shall provide to Lenders copies of any notice of a default or an Event of Default which Agent delivers to Borrower.
8.12
Notification of Defaults and Events of Default
. The provisions of this are for the benefit of Agent, the Lenders, and other than the portions of that pertain specifically to Borrower, Borrower shall have no right to rely on or enforce any of the provisions hereof; provided, however, the foregoing shall in no way limit Borrower's obligations under this . In performing its functions and duties under this Agreement, Agent shall act solely as agent of the Lenders and does not assume and shall not be deemed to have assumed any obligation toward or relationship of agency or trust with or for Borrower or any other person.
8.13
No Reliance by Borrower
Article VIII
Section 8.8
Article VIII
. Agent shall be entitled to rely upon any written notices, statements, certificates, orders or other documents, telecopies or any telephone message believed by it in good faith to be genuine and correct and to have been signed, sent or made by the proper person, and with respect to all matters pertaining to this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents and its duties hereunder or thereunder, upon advice of legal counsel (including counsel for Borrower), independent public accountants and other experts selected by it.
8.14
Reliance
. Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, without the need to comply with any of the formal or procedural requirements of this Agreement, including this , any Lender may at any time and from time to time pledge and assign all or any portion of its rights under all or any of the Loan Documents to a Federal Reserve Bank; provided that no such pledge or assignment shall release such Lender from its obligations thereunder. To facilitate any such pledge or assignment, Agent shall, at the request of such Lender, enter into a letter agreement with the Federal Reserve Bank in, or substantially in, the form of the exhibit to Appendix C to the Federal Reserve Bank of New York Operating Circular No. 10.
8.15
Pledge to Federal Reserve Bank
Section 8.15
. The USA Patriot Act of 2001 (Public Law 107-56) and federal regulations issued with respect thereto require all financial
8.16
USA Patriot Act Notice; Compliance
 
institutions to obtain, verify and record certain information that identifies individuals or business entities which open an "account" with such financial institution. Consequently, Lender (for itself and/or as Agent for all Lenders hereunder) may from time-to-time request, and Borrower shall provide to Lender, Borrower's name, address, tax identification number and/or such other identification information as shall be necessary for Lender to comply with federal law. An "account" for this purpose may include, without limitation, a deposit account, cash management service, a transaction or asset account, a credit account, a loan or other extension of credit, and/or other financial services product.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each party has caused this Agreement to be duly executed and delivered as of the day and year first above set forth.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Borrower hereby certifies as follows (all terms having the meanings set forth in the Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 18, 2007 (the "") between Borrower and U.S. Bank National Association ("") as administrative agent and sole lead arranger for itself and for the other financial institutions (collectively, the "") which are or may in the future become parties to the Credit Agreement):
Credit Agreement
Agent
Lenders
(a) As of the date hereof, no suit or proceeding at law or in equity, and no investigation or proceeding of any governmental body, has been instituted or, to the knowledge of Borrower, is threatened, which in either case would impact the Loan, or Borrower's or Guarantor's ability to perform its obligations under, and comply with the terms of, the Loan Documents, except the following:
(b) As of the date hereof, no Event of Default under the Credit Agreement or under any of the other Loan Documents has occurred and is continuing, and no event has occurred which, upon the giving of notice and/or the lapse of time, would constitute an Event of Default thereunder, except the following:
(c) To Borrower's knowledge, as of the date hereof, (1) Loan Availability is equal to $, consisting of Tranche A Loan Availbility of $ and Tranche B Loan Availability of $, and (2) Total Revolving Outstandings are equal to $, consisting of Total Revolving Tranche A Outstandings of $ and Total Revolving Tranche B Outstandings of $.
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
(d) (1) The representations and warranties set forth in the Credit Agreement are hereby reaffirmed and restated, and Borrower represents and warrants to Agent and Lenders that the same are true, correct and complete on the date hereof, except as to the following:
(2) The following entities are required under GAAP to be consolidated with Borrower for financial reporting purposes:
Saul Subsidiary I Limited Partnership
Saul Subsidiary II Limited Partnership
Guarantor
Saul QRS, Inc.
Avenel VI, Inc.
Briggs Chaney Plaza, LLC
 
Kentlands Lot 1, LLC
Saul Monocacy, LLC
Smallwood Village Center LLC
Westview Village Center LLC
(e) No material adverse change has occurred in the financial condition or in the assets or liabilities of Borrower or Guarantor from those set forth in the latest financial statements for each furnished to Agent, except the following:
Borrower authorizes and requests Lenders to advance from the proceeds of the Loan the funds hereby requested, and to make or authorize disbursement of said funds to or for the account of the persons or firms and in amounts up to, but not exceeding, the amounts listed herein, subject to the requirements of and in accordance with the procedures provided in the Credit Agreement. The advance made pursuant to this Draw Request is acknowledged to be an accommodation to Borrower and is not a waiver by Lenders of any default or Event of Default under the Loan Documents or any other claims of Agent or Lenders against Borrower or Guarantor.
 
The advances and disbursements on the attached sheets are hereby approved and authorized.
 
 
NOTE: THIS DRAW REQUEST IS FOR AN ADVANCE OF A SWING LOAN PURSUANT TO SECTION 3.5 OF THE CREDIT AGREEMENT AS REFERENCED HEREIN.
Borrower hereby certifies as follows (all terms having the meanings set forth in the Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 18, 2007 (the "") between Borrower and U.S. Bank National Association, both as swing lender ("") and as administrative agent and sole lead arranger ("") for itself and for the other financial institutions (collectively, the "") which are or may in the future become parties to the Credit Agreement:
Credit Agreement
Swing Lender
Agent
Lenders
(a) As of the date hereof no suit or proceeding at law or in equity, and no investigation or proceeding of any governmental body, has been instituted or, to the knowledge of Borrower, is threatened, which in either case would impact the Loan, or Borrower's or Guarantor's ability to perform its obligations under, and comply with the terms of, the Loan Documents, except the following:
(b) At the date hereof, no Event of Default under the Credit Agreement or under any of the other Loan Documents has occurred and is continuing, and no event has occurred which, upon the giving of notice and/or the lapse of time, would constitute an Event of Default thereunder, except the following:
(c) To Borrower's knowledge, as of the date hereof, (1) Loan Availability is equal to $, consisting of Tranche A Loan Availbility of $ and Tranche B Loan Availability of $, and (2) Total Revolving Outstandings are equal to $, consisting of Total Revolving Tranche A Outstandings of $ and Total Revolving Tranche B Outstandings of $.
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
(d) The representations and warranties set forth in the Credit Agreement are hereby reaffirmed and restated, and Borrower represents and warrants to Agent and Lenders that the same are true, correct and complete on the date hereof, except as to the following:
(e) No material adverse change has occurred in the financial condition or in the assets or liabilities of Borrower or Guarantor from those set forth in the latest financial statements for each furnished to Agent, except the following:
Borrower authorizes and requests the Swing Lender to advance proceeds of a Swing Loan in the amount hereby requested, and to make or authorize disbursement of said funds to or for the account of the persons or firms and in amounts up to, but not exceeding, the amounts listed herein, subject to the requirements of and in accordance with the procedures provided in the Credit Agreement. The advance made pursuant to this Swing Loan Draw Request is acknowledged to be an accommodation to Borrower and is not a waiver by the Swing Lender, Agent or Lenders of any default or Event of Default under the Loan Documents or any other claims of Agent, Swing Lender or Lenders against Borrower or Guarantor.
 
The advances and disbursements on the attached sheets are hereby approved and authorized.
 
 
 
The undersigned (the "") HEREBY CERTIFIES THAT:
Borrower
This Compliance Certificate is furnished pursuant to that certain Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 18, 2007 (the "") among the Borrower and U.S. Bank National Association, ("") as administrative agent and sole lead arranger for itself and for other financial institutions (collectively, the "") which are or may become parties to the Credit Agreement. Unless otherwise defined herein, the terms used in this Compliance Certificate shall have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Agent
Lenders
attached hereto sets forth the financial data and computations evidencing the Borrower's compliance with the covenants contained in of the Credit Agreement after giving effect to the requested Advance, all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct.
Schedule 1
Section 5.8
attached hereto sets forth the financial data and computations evidencing Loan Availability as calculated by Borrower (subject to review and adjustment by Agent) after giving effect to the requested Advance, all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct.
Schedule 2
The activities of the Borrower and its subsidiaries since the date of the last Compliance Certificate submitted by the Borrower to the Agent have been reviewed by the Chief Financial Officer and/or by employees or agents under his immediate supervision. Based upon such review, both before and after giving effect to the requested Advance no Event of Default, or event, which, with the giving of notice or passage of time, or both, would become an Event of Default, exists on the date hereof or will exist under the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document on the proposed date of Advance or thereafter.
The Chief Financial Officer certifies that he is authorized to execute and deliver this Compliance Certificate on behalf of the Borrower.
 
WITNESS our hands this day of , 20.
    
                    
    
 
 
The undersigned (the "") HEREBY CERTIFIES THAT:
Borrower
This Compliance Certificate is furnished pursuant to that certain Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 18, 2007 (the "") among the Borrower and U.S. Bank National Association, ("") as administrative agent and sole lead arranger for itself and for other financial institutions (collectively, the "") which are or may become parties to the Credit Agreement. Unless otherwise defined herein, the terms used in this Compliance Certificate shall have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Agent
Lenders
attached hereto sets forth the financial data and computations evidencing the Borrower's compliance with the covenants contained in Section 5.8 of the Credit Agreement after giving effect to the removal from the pool of Approved Assets of the Real Estate Asset more particularly described on , all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct.
Schedule 1
Schedule 1
attached hereto sets forth the financial data and computations evidencing Loan Availability as calculated by Borrower (subject to review and adjustment by Agent) after giving effect to the removal from the pool of Approved Assets of the Real Estate Asset more particularly described on , all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct.
Schedule 2
Schedule 1
The activities of the Borrower, and its subsidiaries have been reviewed by the Chief Financial Officer and/or by employees or agents under his immediate supervision. Based upon such review, both before and after giving effect to the proposed encumbrance or sale of the Approved Asset, no Event of Default, or event, which, with the giving of notice or passage of time, or both, would become an Event of Default, exists on the date hereof or will exist under the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document on the proposed date of the proposed encumbrance or sale of the Approved Asset or thereafter.
The Chief Financial Officer certifies that he is authorized to execute and deliver this Compliance Certificate on behalf of the Borrower.
 
WITNESS our hands this day of , 20.
    
                    
    
 
 
The undersigned (the "") HEREBY CERTIFIES THAT:
Borrower
This Compliance Certificate is furnished pursuant to that certain Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 18, 2007 (the "") among the Borrower and U.S. Bank National Association, ("") as administrative agent and sole lead arranger for itself and for other financial institutions (collectively, the "") which are or may become parties to the Credit Agreement. Unless otherwise defined herein, the terms used in this Compliance Certificate shall have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Agent
Lenders
attached hereto sets forth the financial data and computations evidencing the Borrower's compliance with the covenants contained in Section 5.8 of the Credit Agreement, all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct.
Schedule 1
The activities of the Borrower and its subsidiaries have been reviewed by the Chief Financial Officer and/or by employees or agents under his immediate supervision. Based upon such review, no Event of Default, or event, which, with the giving of notice or passage of time, or both, would become an Event of Default, exists or will exist under any Loan Document immediately prior to and after giving effect to the approval by the Lenders of the new Approved Asset, except to the extent that any such Event of Default, or event, which, with the giving of notice or passage of time, or both, would become an Event of Default, would be cured by such acceptance of the proposed Approved Asset.
The Chief Financial Officer certifies that he is authorized to execute and deliver this Compliance Certificate on behalf of the Borrower.
 
WITNESS our hands this day of , 20.
    
                    
    
 
 
The undersigned (the "") HEREBY CERTIFIES THAT:
Borrower
This Compliance Certificate is furnished pursuant to that certain Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 18, 2007 (the "") among the Borrower and U.S. Bank National Association, ("") as administrative agent and sole lead arranger for itself and for other financial institutions (collectively, the "") which are or may become parties to the Credit Agreement. Unless otherwise defined herein, the terms used in this Compliance Certificate shall have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Agent
Lenders
As required by Section 5.4 of the Credit Agreement, financial statements of the Borrower for the [year] [quarter] ended , 20 (the "") prepared in accordance with GAAP (subject, in the case of quarterly statements, to year-end adjustments none of which are anticipated to be materially adverse, except as specifically disclosed in this Compliance Certificate) accompany this Compliance Certificate. The Financial Statements present fairly the financial position of the Borrower as at the date thereof and the results of operations of the Borrower and its subsidiaries for the period covered thereby.
            
    
Financial Statements
attached hereto sets forth the financial data and computations evidencing the Borrower's compliance with the covenants contained in Section 5.8 of the Credit Agreement, all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct.
Schedule 1
attached hereto sets forth the financial data and computations evidencing Loan Availability as calculated by Borrower (subject to review and adjustment by Agent), all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct.
Schedule 2
The activities of the Borrower and its subsidiaries during the period covered by the Financial Statements have been reviewed by the Chief Financial Officer and/or by employees or agents under his immediate supervision. Based upon such review, during the period covered by the Financial Statements, and as of the date of this Certificate, no Event of Default, or event, which, with the giving of notice or passage of time, or both, would become an Event of Default, has occurred and is continuing of which (i) the Borrower has knowledge, or (ii) the Agent has not previously given notice, except as specifically disclosed in this Compliance Certificate.
The Chief Financial Officer certifies that he is authorized to execute and deliver this Compliance Certificate on behalf of the Borrower.
 
WITNESS our hands this day of , 20.
    
                    
    
 
 
The undersigned (the "") HEREBY CERTIFIES THAT:
Guarantor
This Compliance Certificate is furnished pursuant to that certain Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 18, 2007 (the "") among the Borrower and U.S. Bank National Association, ("") as administrative agent and sole lead arranger for itself and for other financial institutions (collectively, the "") which are or may become parties to the Credit Agreement. Unless otherwise defined herein, the terms used in this Compliance Certificate shall have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Agent
Lenders
As required by of the Credit Agreement, financial statements of the Guarantor and its respective subsidiaries for the [year] [quarter] ended , 20 (the "") prepared in accordance with GAAP (subject, in the case of quarterly statements, to year-end adjustments, none of which are anticipated to be materially adverse, except as specifically disclosed in this Compliance Certificate) accompany this Compliance Certificate. The Financial Statements delivered herewith present fairly the financial position of the Guarantor and its subsidiaries as at the date thereof and the results of operations of the Guarantor and its subsidiaries for the period covered thereby.
Section 5.4
            
    
Financial Statements
The activities of the Guarantor and its subsidiaries during the period covered by the Financial Statements, have been reviewed by the chief financial officer of the Guarantor and/or by employees or agents under his immediate supervision. Based upon such review, during the period covered by the Financial Statements, and as of the date of this Certificate, no Event of Default, or event, which, with the giving of notice or passage of time, or both, would become an Event of Default, has occurred and is continuing of which (i) the Guarantor has knowledge, or (ii) the Agent has not previously given notice, except as specifically disclosed in this Compliance Certificate.
 
 
The undersigned (the "") HEREBY CERTIFIES THAT:
Borrower
This Compliance Certificate is furnished pursuant to that certain Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 18, 2007 (the "") among the Borrower and U.S. Bank National Association, ("") as administrative agent and sole lead arranger for itself and for other financial institutions (collectively, the "") which are or may become parties to the Credit Agreement. Unless otherwise defined herein, the terms used in this Compliance Certificate shall have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Agent
Lenders
Borrower hereby gives the Agent notice of a Capital Event more particularly described as follows:
attached hereto sets forth the financial data and computations evidencing the Borrower's compliance with the covenants contained in of the Credit Agreement after giving effect to such Capital Event, all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct.
Schedule 1
Section 5.8
attached hereto sets forth the financial data and computations evidencing Loan Availability as calculated by Borrower (subject to review and adjustment by Agent) after giving effect to the Capital Event, all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct.
Schedule 2
The activities of the Borrower, the Guarantor and their respective subsidiaries have been reviewed by the Chief Financial Officer and/or by employees or agents under his immediate supervision. Based upon such review, both before and after giving effect to the Capital Event, no Event of Default, or event, which, with the giving of notice or passage of time, or both, would become an Event of Default, exists on the date hereof or will exist under the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document on the proposed date of the Capital Event or thereafter.
The Chief Financial Officer certifies that he is authorized to execute and deliver this Compliance Certificate on behalf of the Borrower.
 
WITNESS our hands this day of , 20.
    
                    
    
 
 
The undersigned (the "") HEREBY CERTIFIES THAT:
Borrower
This Compliance Certificate is furnished pursuant to that certain Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 18, 2007 (the "") among the Borrower and U.S. Bank National Association, ("") as administrative agent and sole lead arranger for itself and for other financial institutions (collectively, the "") which are or may become parties to the Credit Agreement. Unless otherwise defined herein, the terms used in this Compliance Certificate shall have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Agent
Lenders
Borrower hereby requests that Agent issue a Letter of Credit under the Credit Agreement, more particularly described as follows:
attached hereto sets forth the financial data and computations evidencing the Borrower's compliance with the covenants contained in of the Credit Agreement after giving effect to the requested issuance of a Letter of Credit, all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct.
Schedule 1
Section 5.8
attached hereto sets forth the financial data and computations evidencing Loan Availability as calculated by Borrower (subject to review and adjustment by Agent) after giving effect to the issuance of the requested Letter of Credit, all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct.
Schedule 2
The activities of the Borrower, and its subsidiaries since the date of the last Compliance Certificate submitted by the Borrower to the Agent have been reviewed by the Chief Financial Officer and/or by employees or agents under his immediate supervision. Based upon such review, both before and after giving effect to the requested issuance of a Letter of Credit, no Event of Default, or event, which, with the giving of notice or passage of time, or both, would become an Event of Default, exists on the date hereof or will exist under the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document on the proposed date of the issuance of the Letter of Credit or thereafter.
The Chief Financial Officer certifies that he is authorized to execute and deliver this Compliance Certificate on behalf of the Borrower.
 
WITNESS our hands this day of , 20.
    
                    
    
 
 
The undersigned (the "") HEREBY CERTIFIES THAT:
Borrower
This Compliance Certificate is furnished pursuant to that certain Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 18, 2007 (the "") among the Borrower and U.S. Bank National Association, ("") as administrative agent and sole lead arranger for itself and for other financial institutions (collectively, the "") which are or may become parties to the Credit Agreement. Unless otherwise defined herein, the terms used in this Compliance Certificate shall have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Agent
Lenders
Borrower hereby gives the Agent notice of the occurrence of a default under the Credit Agreement more particularly described as follows:
attached hereto sets forth the financial data and computations evidencing the Borrower's compliance with the covenants contained in of the Credit Agreement after giving effect to such Event of Default, all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct.
Schedule 1
Section 5.8
attached hereto sets forth the financial data and computations evidencing Loan Availability as calculated by Borrower (subject to review and adjustment by Agent) after giving effect to the Event of Default, all of which data and computations are true, complete and correct.
Schedule 2
The activities of the Borrower, the Guarantor and their respective subsidiaries have been reviewed by the Chief Financial Officer and/or by employees or agents under his immediate supervision. Based upon such review, no Event of Default, or other event, which, with the giving of notice or passage of time, or both, would become an Event of Default, exists or will exist under any Loan Document.
The Chief Financial Officer certifies that he is authorized to execute and deliver this Compliance Certificate on behalf of the Borrower.
 
WITNESS our hands this day of , 20.
    
                    
    
 
 
(this "") is dated as of , 20, between ("") and ("").
THIS ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION AGREEMENT
Agreement
                
    
                        
Assignor
                        
Assignee
Assignor is a Lender under that certain Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 18, 2007 (the "") by and among Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, a Maryland partnership (""), U.S. Bank National Association as administrative agent and sole lead arranger (the "") on behalf of itself and certain other Lenders named therein, as modified from time to time. The Lenders have agreed to make a loan to Borrower. Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings ascribed to such terms in the Credit Agreement. Assignor desires to assign to Assignee and Assignee desires to accept and assume the rights and obligations of Assignor under the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Borrower
Agent
[a portion of]
, in consideration of the mutual agreements herein contained, the parties hereto agree as follows:
NOW, THEREFORE
. Effective on the Assignment Effective Date (as defined in below), Assignor hereby assigns to Assignee an Assigned Share (as defined below) of all of Assignor's right, title, interest and obligations under the Credit Agreement, including without limitation those relating to the Loan. The Assigned Share of all such rights, title, interest and obligations is referred to collectively as the "".
1.
Assignment
Section 3
Assigned Rights and Obligations
The "" means (a) a $ portion of the Revolving Commitment Amount on the Assignment Effective Date, and (b) the aggregate amount of all Loans outstanding under the Credit Agreement on the Assignment Effective Date that is attributable to the percentage of the Loan represented by the Assigned Share. The percentage of the Revolving Commitment Amount represented by the Assigned Share shall equal the quotient of the above portion of the Revolving Commitment Amount divided by $, expressed as a percentage rounded to eight decimal places.
Assigned Share
                
                
. Effective on the Assignment Effective Date, Assignee hereby accepts the foregoing assignment of, and hereby assumes from Assignor, the Assigned Rights and Obligations.
2.
Assumption
. This Agreement shall become effective on a date (the "") selected by Assignor, which shall be on or as soon as practicable after the execution and delivery of counterparts of this Agreement by Assignor, Assignee, Agent and Borrower. Assignor shall promptly notify Assignee, Agent and Borrower in writing of the Assignment Effective Date.
3.
Effectiveness
Assignment Effective Date
 
. In consideration of the assignment by Assignor to and the assumption by Assignee of the Assigned Rights and Obligations, on the Assignment Effective Date (a) Assignee shall pay to Assignor such amounts as are specified in any written agreement or exchange of letters between them, and (b) Assignee shall pay to Agent an assignment processing fee of $3,500.
4.
Payments on Assignment Effective Date
5. .
Allocation and Payment of Interest and Fees
(a) Agent shall pay to Assignee all interest, and other amounts not constituting principal that are paid by or on behalf of Borrower pursuant to the Loan Documents and are attributable to the Assigned Rights and Obligations (""), that accrue on and after the Assignment Effective Date. If Assignor receives or collects any such Borrower Amounts, Assignor shall promptly pay them to Assignee.
Borrower Amounts
(b) Agent shall pay to Assignor all Borrower Amounts that accrue before the Assignment Effective Date when and as the same are paid by Agent to the other the Lenders. If Assignee receives or collects any such Borrower Amounts, Assignee shall promptly pay such amounts to Assignor.
(c) Unless specifically assumed by Assignee, Assignor shall be responsible and liable for all reimbursable liabilities and costs and indemnification obligations which accrue prior to the Assignment Effective Date, and such liability shall survive the Assignment Effective Date.
(d) Agent shall not be liable for any allocation or payment to either Assignor or Assignee subsequently determined to be erroneous, unless resulting from Agent's willful misconduct or gross negligence.
6. .
Representations and Warranties
(a) Each of Assignor and Assignee represents and warrants to the other and Agent as follows:
(i) It has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Agreement and to fulfill its obligations under, and to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement;
(ii) The making and performance of this Agreement and all documents required to be executed and delivered by it hereunder do not and will not violate any law or regulation applicable to it;
(iii) This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by it and constitutes its legal, valid and binding obligation enforceable in accordance with its terms; and
(iv) All approvals, authorizations or other actions by, or filings with, any governmental authority necessary for the validity or enforceability of its obligations under this Agreement have been made or obtained.
 
(b) Assignor represents and warrants to Assignee that Assignor owns the Assigned Rights and Obligations, free and clear of any lien or other encumbrance.
(c) Assignee represents and warrants to Assignor as follows:
(i) Assignee has made and shall continue to make its own independent investigation of the financial condition, affairs and creditworthiness of the Borrower and any other person or entity obligated under the Loan Documents (collectively, ""), and the value of any collateral now or hereafter securing any of the Obligations; and
Credit Parties
(ii) Assignee has received a copy of those Loan Documents and such other documents, financial statements and information as it has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement.
. Assignor makes no representation or warranty and assumes no responsibility to Assignee for:
7.
No Assignor Responsibility
(a) the execution (by any party other than Assignor), effectiveness, genuineness, validity, enforceability, collectibility or sufficiency of the Loan Documents or for any representations, warranties, recitals or statements made in the Loan Documents or in any financial or other written or oral statement, instrument, report, certificate or any other document made or furnished or made available by Assignor to Assignee or by or on behalf of Borrower to Assignor or Assignee in connection with the Loan Documents and the transactions contemplated thereby;
(b) the performance or observance of any of the terms, covenants or agreements contained in any of the Loan Documents or as to the existence or possible existence of any default or Event of Default under the Loan Documents; or
(c) the accuracy or completeness of any information provided to Assignee, whether by Assignor or by or on behalf of Borrower.
Assignor shall have no initial or continuing duty or responsibility to make any investigation of the financial condition, affairs or creditworthiness of Borrower, in connection with the assignment of the Assigned Rights and Obligations or to provide Assignee with any credit or other information with respect thereto, whether coming into its possession before the date hereof or at any time or times thereafter.
. Effective on the Assignment Effective Date, Assignee (a) shall be deemed to be a party to the Credit Agreement, (b) agrees to be bound by the Credit Agreement as it would have been if it had been an original Lender thereunder, and (c) agrees to perform in accordance with their respective terms all of the obligations which are required under the Loan Documents to be performed by it as a Lender. Assignee appoints and authorizes Agent to take such actions as agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under the Loan Documents as are delegated to Agent by the terms thereof, together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
8.
Assignee Bound By Credit Agreement
 
. Effective on the Assignment Effective Date, Assignor shall be released from the Assigned Rights and Obligations arising on and after such date; , , that Assignor shall retain all of its rights to indemnification under the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents for any events, acts or omissions occurring before the Assignment Effective Date, and to the extent not assumed by Assignee, Assignor shall continue to be responsible for the liabilities and obligations described in .
9.
Assignor Released From Credit Agreement
provided
however
Section 5(c)
. On or promptly after the Assignment Effective Date, Borrower, Agent, Assignor and Assignee shall make appropriate arrangements so that a new Note executed by Borrower, dated as of the Assignment Effective Date and in the amount of the commitment of Assignee, after giving effect to this Agreement, are issued to Assignee, in exchange for the surrender by Assignor to Borrower of any applicable outstanding Note marked "Exchanged".
10.
New Notes
[respective]
[s]
[Assignor and]
[Assignor and]
[and Assignee]
.
11.
General
(a) No term or provision of this Agreement may be amended, waived or terminated orally, but only by an instrument signed by the parties hereto.
(b) This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts. Each set of executed counterparts shall be an original. Executed counterparts may be delivered by facsimile transmission.
(c) If Assignor has not assigned its entire remaining commitment of the Loan to Assignee, Assignor may at any time and from time to time grant to others pursuant to the Credit Agreement assignments of or participation in all or part of Assignor's remaining Loan or commitment.
(d) This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. Neither Assignor nor Assignee may assign or transfer any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement without the prior written consent of the other and Agent. The preceding sentence shall not limit the right of Assignee to grant to others assignment of or participation in all or part of the Assigned Rights and Obligations to the extent permitted by the terms of the Credit Agreement.
(e) All payments to Assignor or Assignee hereunder shall, unless otherwise specified by the party entitled thereto, be made in Dollars, in Immediately Available Funds, and to the address or account specified on the signature pages of this Agreement. The address of Assignee for notice purposes under the Credit Agreement shall be as specified on the signature pages of this Agreement.
 
(f) If any provision of this Agreement is held invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the remaining provisions hereof will not be affected or impaired in any way.
(g) Each party shall bear its owns expenses in connection with the preparation and execution of this Agreement.
(h) This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Minnesota.
(i) To the extent Borrower's consent to this Assignment is required under the terms of the Credit Agreement, this Agreement shall not be effective unless and until Borrower shall consent to the same, which consent shall be confirmed by its execution hereof.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement, under seal, as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Beacon Center
Flagship Center
French Market
Germantown
Kentlands Place
Lexington
Olney Shopping Center
Southdale
South DeKalb Plaza
West Park
Crosstown Business Center
 
 
 
Dear :
                                             
Reference is hereby made to that certain Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 18, 2007 by and between Borrower, Agent and the Lenders (the "").
Credit Agreement
In accordance with the provisions of Section 3.6(b) of the Credit Agreement, the undersigned hereby accepts a $ interest in the Loan, as evidenced by that certain Unsecured Revolving Promissory Note of even date herewith executed by Borrower and payable to the undersigned.
                        
 
 
 
 
 
, , a Maryland limited partnership (hereinafter called ), promises to pay to the order of , a national banking association (hereinafter, together with any subsequent holder hereof, called ), or assigns, at the office of U.S. Bank National Association, as agent ("") located at 1650 Tysons Boulevard, Suite 250, McLean, Virginia 22102, Attention: Real Estate Banking Group, Division Head, or at such other place as Agent may from time to time designate in writing, on or before the Swing Loan Maturity Date, the principal sum of (the ""), or so much thereof as may have been advanced and/or readvanced to or for the benefit of Maker hereunder in accordance with the terms and limitations set forth in the Credit Agreement (as defined below) and remains unpaid from time to time (hereinafter called ), with interest on the Principal Balance, until paid in full, at the rates per annum specified in the Credit Agreement, in coin or currency, which, at the time or times of payment, is legal tender for the payment of public and private debts in the United States of America, all in accordance with the terms hereinafter set forth and set forth in the Credit Agreement. All capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the meaning ascribed thereto in that certain Revolving Credit Agreement of even date herewith by and among, , Maker, Agent, Swing Lender and the other lenders (the "") a party thereto from time to time (collectively, and as further amended, modified and restated from time to time, the "").
FOR VALUE RECEIVED
SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
"Maker"
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
"Swing Lender"
Agent
                                        
Swing Loan Amount
"Principal Balance"
inter alia
Lenders
Credit Agreement
This Unsecured Swing Loan Promissory Note (the "") is a Swing Loan Note as referenced in the Credit Agreement. All of the agreements, conditions, covenants, warranties, representations, provisions and stipulations made by or imposed upon Maker under the Loan Documents are hereby made a part of this Note to the same extent and with the same force and effect as if they were fully inserted herein, and Maker covenants and agrees to keep and perform the same, or cause them to be kept and performed, strictly in accordance with their terms.
Note
From and after the date hereof, and until the date on which this Note is paid in full, interest shall accrue and Maker shall pay interest on the Principal Balance on the terms more particularly set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned and all endorsers and guarantors of this Note, and other parties primarily or secondarily liable hereon, each represents and warrants that the amounts advanced and/or readvanced or to be advanced and/or readvanced under this Note and Loan Documents and evidenced hereby are being made exclusively for the purpose of carrying on business or commercial activity.
 
Time is of the essence hereof. Upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default under the Credit Agreement, the Guaranty (as defined in the Credit Agreement) or any of the other Loan Documents (as defined in the Credit Agreement), then, in any such case, the entire Principal Balance, with all accrued interest thereon, together with all other sums evidenced or secured by the Loan Documents, shall, at the option of Agent on behalf of the Swing Lender, become immediately due and payable and Swing Lender's obligation to make additional advances under the Swing Loan Commitment shall, at the option of Agent on behalf of the Swing Lender, be terminated, without notice, demand or presentment for payment, and without notice of intention to accelerate or of acceleration, at the place of payment aforesaid; provided, however, that Agent shall endeavor to give telephonic notice to Maker if any payment is not received on the due date thereof. Failure to exercise this option, however often, shall not constitute a waiver of the right to exercise it thereafter. From and after the date of occurrence of any such Event of Default, and from and after the Maturity Date, interest shall accrue on the Principal Balance at the Default Rate and shall be payable on the first Business Day of each calendar month or on demand, at Agent's option; provided, however, that if all Events of Default are corrected and the indebtedness evidenced hereby is fully reinstated in accordance with Maryland law, the interest payable thereon shall again be computed at the Loan Rate, unless and until another Event of Default shall occur. Except as herein expressly provided, no modification or amendment of the terms of this Note shall be effective unless made in a writing signed by Maker and Swing Lender.
Each Maker, comaker, endorser, surety and guarantor hereby guaranties payment of this Note, and waives demand for payment, presentment for payment, notice of nonpayment, protest, notice of protest, notice of dishonor, notice of intention to accelerate maturity, notice of acceleration of maturity, all other notices as to this Note, diligence in collection as to each and every payment due hereunder, and all other requirements necessary to charge or hold such person or entity to any obligation hereunder, and agrees that without any notice Agent on behalf of Swing Lender may take security herefor or may release any or all security herefor, or may from time to time extend, renew, or otherwise modify the date or dates or amount or amounts of payment above recited, and that, in any such case, each Maker, comaker, endorser, surety and guarantor shall continue to be bound hereby and to be liable to pay the unpaid balance of the indebtedness evidenced hereby, as so additionally secured, extended, renewed or modified, and notwithstanding any such release; and further agrees to pay all costs and expenses of collection, including court costs and attorneys' fees (prior to trial, at trial and on appeal) incurred in collecting the indebtedness evidenced hereby, or in exercising or defending, or obtaining the right to exercise the rights of Agent on behalf of Swing Lender hereunder, under the Credit Agreement or under any Loan Document, whether suit be brought or not, and in bankruptcy, insolvency, arrangement, reorganization and other debtorrelief proceedings, in probate, in other court proceedings, or otherwise, whether or not Agent prevails therein except in the event Maker prevails pursuant to a final judicial determination, and all costs and expenses incurred by Agent and/or Swing Lender in protecting or preserving the interests which are subject to the Loan Documents.
This Note is made with reference to and shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of the State of Maryland for all purposes, including, but not limited to, the purpose of determining the maximum rate of interest, if any, which may be lawfully received hereunder by the holder hereof.
 
The term as used in this Note shall mean and have reference to, collectively, all parties and each of them directly or indirectly obligated for the indebtedness evidenced by this Note, whether as principal maker, endorser, guarantor, or otherwise, together with the respective heirs, administrators, executors, legal representatives, successors and assigns of each of the foregoing.
"Maker"
The headings or captions of the Articles and Sections set forth herein are for convenience only, are not a part of this Note and are not to be considered in interpreting this Note.
Each party to this Note hereby expressly waives any right to trial by jury of any claim, demand, action or cause of action arising under this Note, any of the other Loan Documents or transactions contemplated thereby, in each case whether now existing or hereafter arising, and each party hereby agrees and consents that any such claim, demand, action or cause of action shall be decided by court trial without a jury, and that any party to this Note may file an original counterpart or a copy of this section with any court as written evidence of the consent of the parties hereto to the waiver of their right to trial by jury.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Maker has caused this Note to be duly executed and delivered as of the day and year first above set forth.
 
This signature page is attached to and is a part of that certain Unsecured Swing Loan Promissory Note in the original principal amount of and No/100ths Dollars ($) from Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, a Maryland limited partnership, as "", to U.S. Bank National Association, as "."
                        
                        
Maker
Swing Lender
 

Exhibit 10.(c)
This SHARED SERVICES AGREEMENT, dated July 1, 2004, is between B.F. Saul Company, a corporation organized under the laws of the District of Columbia ("" which definition shall be deemed to include, for purposes of this Agreement, all consolidated subsidiaries of Saul Company), and Saul Centers, Inc., a corporation organized under the laws of the State of Maryland ("" which definition shall be deemed to include, for purposes of this Agreement, Saul Holdings Limited Partnership and all of its subsidiaries).
Saul Company,
Saul Centers,
A.    Both of the parties hereto are engaged in various businesses involving real estate. The headquarters locations and most executive officers of each of the parties are located at the same address, designated below as "Headquarters." Saul Company has certain experienced employees, programs and procedures the use of which could be of benefit to Saul Centers.
B.    In order to recognize that certain costs of operating their businesses are most efficiently accounted for on a shared basis, the parties have agreed to establish and recognize certain standards and procedures for such shared costs as set forth below in this Agreement.
C.    Further, in order to make its business operations more cost-effective and efficient, and otherwise to facilitate such operations, Saul Centers has requested that Saul Company make available to Saul Centers certain time and services of Saul Company employees, and certain goods and services accessible through Saul Company.
D.    Saul Company has agreed to make such employee time and services and other goods and services available to Saul Centers, on the terms and conditions hereinafter set forth, both parties agreeing that such terms represent a fair and equitable treatment of the costs and benefits to each of the parties with respect to such time, goods and services.
E.    The parties confirm that this Agreement is intended to confirm and clarify the practices and procedures that have been agreed to and in effect since January 1, 2004, and thus should be deemed to be effective from and after January 1, 2004.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and of the mutual covenants and agreements contained herein, and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows.
 
 
(a)    The head offices of both Saul Company and Saul Centers are currently located on the 13
th
through 15
th
floors of the East Tower at 7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Bethesda, Maryland 20814 (such location, until changed by written agreement of an authorized officer of each of the parties, to be referred to herein as ""). The parties agree that certain costs of the operation of, and company operations run from, the Headquarters, as set forth on attached to this Agreement ("") shall be split between Saul Company and Saul Centers on a percentage basis proportionate to the number of employees ("") employed by each such party whose primary place of employment is Headquarters. The costs included on Schedule 1-A shall be reviewed by authorized officers of each of the parties on an annual basis (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by such authorized officers). Any changes therein made by mutual agreement of such authorized officers shall be deemed amendments to this Agreement, and shall be attached to the original copy of this Agreement held by each such party. [In this connection, the parties acknowledge and agree that certain occupancy costs that might otherwise be deemed included in the definition of Headquarters Shared Costs under this Agreement are, instead, already covered by and included in one or more separate agreements such as a sublease. Costs covered by such separate agreements are not intended to be treated under this Shared Services Agreement.]
Headquarters
Schedule 1-A
Headquarters Shared Costs
Employees
(b)    For purposes of determining the respective number of Employees of Saul Company and Saul Centers for any purpose under this Agreement, (i) some employees perform services for both Saul Company and Saul Centers, the name and respective portion of each such employee's time allocated to each company to be set forth on Schedule 1-B; and (ii) the parties may agree (and shall so set forth on Schedule 1-B) that all or a designated portion of the time of a particular employee or employees ("") is to be allocated to Saul Centers, even though that employee may technically be an employee of Saul Company. As to item (ii) in the preceding sentence, the parties agree that such procedure is intended to provide a more efficient way of accounting for time of various employees spent for the benefit of Saul Centers that may vary from period to period than attempting actually to track the specific allocation of such time.
Allocated Employees
(c)    The respective number of Saul Company and Saul Centers Headquarters Employees and their allocated percentages shall be determined annually (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by authorized officers of each company). For each calendar year, such number shall be determined, "in arrears," by using the number of Employees employed by each party on the first business day of the last month in the preceding calendar year. For example, for the period from January 1, 2005 through December 31, 2005, such number shall be based on the number of Employees of each party on the first business day of December, 2004. The parties acknowledge that the number of
 
Employees may fluctuate from time to time within any quarterly annual, but, subject to the provisions set forth above for more frequent determinations by mutual agreement) have agreed that the system of computation described above in this Section 1 substantially captures the agreement of the parties and is fair and equitable on an overall basis.
(d)    Headquarters Shared Costs may, based on the mutual agreement of the parties, be paid, in proportion, directly by each party, or be paid by Saul Company and reimbursed by Saul Centers monthly. The supporting documentation for any such request shall be made available to Saul Centers at any reasonable time at Headquarters.
 
(a)    Both Saul Company and Saul Centers have offices in locations other than Headquarters, and Employees who work at locations other than Headquarters. The parties agree that certain "company-wide" costs of the operation of the respective businesses of Saul Company and Saul Centers, whether relating to officers and Employees at Headquarters or other offices, as set forth on attached to this Agreement ("") shall be split between Saul Company and Saul Centers on a percentage basis proportionate to the number of Employees employed by each such party, including both Employees whose principal place of business is Headquarters and Employees whose principal place of business is one or more other offices of either party. The costs included on Schedule 2 shall be reviewed by authorized officers of each of the parties on an annual basis (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by such authorized officers). Any changes therein made by mutual agreement of such authorized officers shall be deemed amendments to this Agreement, and shall be attached to the original copy of this Agreement held by each such party.
Schedule 2
Company-Wide Shared Costs
(b)    Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, the parties acknowledge that the Company-Wide Shared Costs are not intended to cover certain Employees (such as Employees whose sole work for the relevant party is performed at and for the benefit of a particular property) (""), whose compensation and other related expenses are determined and paid on a different basis from direct Employees of the parties.
Excluded Employees
(c)    The proportionate share of the Company-Wide Shared Costs and the method and timing of payment or reimbursement therefor shall be determined on the same basis as set forth in Sections 1(c) and 1(d) above.
 
(a) The parties acknowledge that (i) certain costs of the operation of each of the parties are incurred under programs (the "") that apply only to certain segments of the employee population, based on the needs of the employers and the terms of their employment (including by way of
Designated Programs
 
example and not limitation, use of "company cars"); and (ii) the cost and administrative activities related to such programs ("") can reasonably be expected to be reduced if such Designated Programs are operated on a shared basis. The Designated Programs covered by this Agreement are as set forth on attached to this Agreement. The costs included on Schedule 3 shall be reviewed by authorized officers of each of the parties on an annual basis (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by such authorized officers). Any changes therein made by mutual agreement of such authorized officers shall be deemed amendments to this Agreement, and shall be attached to the original copy of this Agreement held by each such party.
Shared Program Costs
Schedule 3
(b)    The portion of the Shared Program Costs allocated to each of the parties hereto shall be calculated on an annual basis, and shall be determined by mutual agreement of an authorized officer of each party, on the basis of the percentage of the actual cost of each shared program attributable to the officers and employees of each of the parties.
(c)    The method and timing of payment of the Shared Program Costs by each of the parties shall be determined as set forth in Section 1(d) above.
 
(a)    The parties acknowledge that information technology services ("") can be provided more efficiently and cost effectively to Saul Company and Saul Centers on a shared basis. The parties further acknowledge that the level of usage of IT by Saul Company and Saul Centers, respectively, varies over time, but can be projected on an annual basis within a reasonable range of accuracy. All employees providing IT are employees of Saul Company. Accordingly, the parties agree that, after the allocations of Headquarters Shared Costs and Company-Wide Shared Costs set forth in Sections 1 and 2 above are made between Saul Company and Saul Centers, a further allocation shall be made as follows.
IT
(b)    The percentage of the Headquarters Shared Costs and Company-Wide Shared Costs allocated to Saul Company in effect as of the first day of each fiscal year of Saul Company, pursuant to Sections 1 and 2 above, shall be determined. Thereafter, the portion of such Saul Company-allocated costs attributable to personnel providing IT and to certain system-wide licensing, maintenance, and operating costs (the "") shall be determined and set forth on attached hereto. Such determination shall be made by mutual agreement of an authorized officer of each of the parties. Such authorized officers shall then, by mutual agreement, determine and set forth on such Schedule 4, a percentage of the IT Shared Costs to be paid by Saul Centers for the fiscal year then beginning (the ""). Such percentage shall be determined on the basis of the projected use of IT by Saul Centers and Saul Company during such year, taking into consideration the status, activities and business plan of each such party.
IT Shared Costs
Schedule 4
Annual SCI IT Percentage
 
(c)    Thereafter, during such fiscal year, Saul Centers shall pay to Saul Company the Annual SCI IT Percentage of the IT Shared Costs monthly at such times as may be determined by mutual agreement of the parties.
(d)    The Annual SCI IT Percentage included on Schedule 4 shall be reviewed by authorized officers of each of the parties on an annual basis (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by such authorized officers). Any changes therein made by mutual agreement of such authorized officers shall be deemed amendments to this Agreement, and shall be attached to the original copy of this Agreement held by each such party.
(e)    The parties acknowledge that each of Saul Company and Saul Centers will from time to time purchase computer, telephony, and other IT-related equipment and software for individual employees (including by way of example and not limitation, desktop computers, PDAs, and office telephones). All such costs shall be borne directly by the entity for whom that person works (subject to splitting as a cost associated with an Allocated Employee, as set forth in Section 1(b) above), and shall not be included in IT Shared Costs.
 
(a)    The parties acknowledge that certain other administrative and "in-house" services ("") are provided to Saul Centers by employees of Saul Company on an on-going basis for purposes of efficiency and cost effectiveness. Such services, as of the date hereof, are as set forth on attached hereto.
Administrative Services
Schedule 5
(b)    For all of such Administrative Services other than legal services, Saul Centers shall pay to Saul Company a monthly payment, the current amount of which is set forth on such Schedule 5. For legal services, Saul Centers shall pay to Saul Company, on a monthly basis, a fixed fee for each hour of legal services performed by Saul Company employees for Saul Centers. Such fee for each legal employee shall be determined by mutual agreement of the parties, and based upon the "all-in" employment costs to Saul Company for such employee.
(c)    The Administrative Services, monthly payment for non-legal services, and hourly rate for legal services, as set forth on Schedule 5, shall be reviewed by authorized officers of each of the parties on an annual basis (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by such authorized officers). Any changes therein made by mutual agreement of such authorized officers shall be deemed amendments to this Agreement, and shall be attached to the original copy of this Agreement held by each such party.
 
(a)    The parties acknowledge that a number of operational and other costs are billed by outside vendors directly to Saul Company and Saul Centers. The parties will make all reasonable efforts to confirm that such costs are billed to
 
and paid by the correct party in each case. On a quarterly basis (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by authorized officers of each of the parties), any misapplied invoices and payments shall be reconciled and appropriate payments shall be made by each party to the other.
(b)    The parties also agree that they will make all reasonable efforts to ensure that all allocations, charges and payments made pursuant to Sections 1 through 5 of this Agreement are accurate. On an annual basis (or more frequently to the extent deemed appropriate by authorized officers of each of the parties), such allocations, charges and payments shall be reviewed and reconciled, and any appropriate payments shall be made by each party to the other.
 
(a)    Nothing herein contained shall prevent employees of Saul Company from engaging in other activities, including, without limitation, the rendering of advice to, and performance of services for, other entities engaged in similar lines of business to Saul Centers.
(b)    This Agreement shall have a term of one year from the date set forth above, and thereafter shall automatically continue for additional one-year terms unless terminated by either party upon not less than thirty (30) days' notice to the other party. The parties may terminate this Agreement at any time by mutual written agreement. Within 30 days after the effective date of such termination (i) all unpaid payments or reimbursements for services performed by Saul Company officers or employees prior to such termination shall be paid by Saul Centers, and (ii) a reconciliation pursuant to Section 6 above shall be agreed upon and paid.
(c)    Any notice, report or other communication required or permitted to be given hereunder shall be in writing and shall be provided by personal delivery, interoffice mail or recognized overnight courier. Any such notices to either party shall be given to the Headquarters address unless a party has provided the other party with notice, pursuant to this subsection (c), of a different notice address.
(d)    This Agreement shall not be changed, modified, terminated, or discharged, in whole or in part, except by an instrument in writing signed by all parties hereto, or their respective successors or assignees.
(e)    The provisions of this Agreement are independent of and severable from each other, and no provision shall be affected or rendered invalid or unenforceable by virtue of the fact that for any reason any other or others of them may be invalid or unenforceable in whole or in part.
(f)    This Agreement shall be construed and interpreted in accordance with the laws of the State of Maryland, without regard to conflict of law principles.
 
(g)    This Agreement contains the entire agreement and understanding among the parties hereto with respect to the subject matter hereof, and supersedes all prior and contemporaneous agreements, understandings, inducements and conditions, express or implied, oral or written, of any nature whatsoever with respect to the subject matter hereof. The express terms hereof control and supersede any course of performance and/or usage of the trade inconsistent with any of the terms hereof.
(h)    Neither the failure nor any delay on the part of a party to exercise any right, remedy, power or privilege under this Agreement shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any right, remedy, power or privilege preclude any other or further exercise of the same or of any other right, remedy, power or privilege, nor shall any waiver of any right, remedy, power or privilege with respect to any occurrence be construed as a waiver of such right, remedy, power or privilege with respect to any other occurrence. No waiver shall be effective unless it is in writing and is signed by the party asserted to have granted such waiver
(i)    The titles of paragraphs and subparagraphs contained in this Agreement are for convenience only, and they neither form a part of this Agreement nor are they to be used in the construction or interpretation hereof.
(j)    This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original as against any party whose signature appears thereon, and all of which shall together constitute one and the same instrument. This Agreement shall become binding when one or more counterparts hereof, individually or taken together, shall bear the signatures of all of the parties reflected hereon as the signatories.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have executed this Agreement as of the date and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
Paper and supplies
Plant and facilities maintenance contracts
Lunchroom charges
Copier and other equipment rental and maintenance
Telephone switch costs
Telephone call charges
Company-sponsored special events
7501 parking costs
IT hardware and software maintenance and lease costs
Offsite storage costs
Postage charges (regular mail)
Depreciation
Pantry supplies
 
Group health
Group life
Fidelity bonds
EAP and other employee support services
For purposes of Section 2, "Excluded Employees" includes the hotel division field-based employees of Saul Co. or its subsidiaries.
:
Designated Program
The company-leased car programs.
:
Shared Costs
Company-purchase auto insurance. (the lease and operating costs for leased cars are billed to the respective company based on the officer for whom the car is leased).
Shared Costs
19.1% percentage costs
1
IT employee compensation (including benefits and employer payroll taxes)
Rent for IT space
IT Training and Conferences expenses
IT parking and mileage
Travel, business meals and entertainment
Membership Dues and subscription
Recruitment and employee relocation
Temporary IT help
32.8% percentage costs
2
Headquarters and company-wide shared Shared Costs allocable to IT
New System Hardware and software
System hardware and software maintenance
Operating leases
Telephone costs
Consulting fees
Allocable SCI IT Percentage
Blended rate of 22.1% based on the budgets for each of the above.
 
Administrative Services
Treasury services
Mailroom staff
Construction and development accounting management
Payroll services
Benefits management
Monthly Payment
$6200 (Six Thousand Two Hundred Dollars)
Hourly Legal Billing Rates
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20101104163604.txt.gz
TIME:20101104163604
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On November 4, 2010, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2010. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
(c) Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: November 4, 2010
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
November 4, 2010, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended September 30, 2010. Total revenue for the three months ended September 30, 2010 ("2010 Quarter") decreased 1.7% to $39,551,000 compared to $40,235,000 for the three months ended September 30, 2009 ("2009 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before loss on early extinguishment of debt, gains on property dispositions, acquisition related costs, income attributable to the noncontrolling interest and preferred stock dividends, decreased 8.2% to $10,411,000 for the 2010 Quarter compared to $11,344,000 for the 2009 Quarter, primarily due to a single-location office tenant default. Net income increased 36.6% to $15,503,000 for the 2010 Quarter compared to $11,349,000 for the 2009 Quarter primarily due to a $3,591,000 gain on the sale of the Company's Lexington property and a gain on casualty settlement of $1,700,000 arising from the excess of estimated insurance proceeds over the carrying value of assets damaged during a severe hail storm at French Market. All of the insurance proceeds will be used to restore the damaged assets. Net income available to common stockholders was $9,046,000, or $0.49 per diluted share, for the 2010 Quarter compared to $5,822,000, or $0.32 per diluted share, for the 2009 Quarter.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio decreased 2.3% for the 2010 Quarter compared to the 2009 Quarter and same property operating income decreased 3.7%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not fully in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio decreased 2.0% for the 2010 Quarter compared to the 2009 Quarter, due primarily to reduced termination fee income and increased repair and maintenance expenses. Same property operating income in the office portfolio decreased 9.3% for the 2010 Quarter compared to the 2009 Quarter due primarily to a single-location office tenant default.
 
 
For the nine months ended September 30, 2010 ("2010 Period"), total revenue increased 3.3% to $123,251,000 compared to $119,270,000 for the nine months ended September 30, 2009 ("2009 Period") and operating income increased 0.7% to $33,769,000 compared to $33,539,000 for the 2009 Period. Net income available to common stockholders was $17,702,000 or $0.97 per diluted share for the 2010 Period, compared to $15,712,000 or $0.88 per diluted share for the 2009 Period. Overall same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 2.4% for the 2010 Period compared to the 2009 Period and same property operating income increased 0.9%. For the 2010 Period, shopping center same property operating income increased 2.6%, the primary cause of which was the collection of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant. Excluding this one-time revenue, same property shopping center operating income decreased 0.3% compared to the prior year. Same property operating income in the office portfolio decreased 4.7% for the 2010 Period due primarily to a single-location office tenant default.
As of September 30, 2010, 92.0% of the operating portfolio was leased compared to 91.8% at September 30, 2009. On a same property basis, 92.9% of the portfolio was leased as of the end of both periods.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) decreased 7.9% to $13,488,000 in the 2010 Quarter compared to $14,648,000 for the 2009 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders decreased 9.5% to $0.57 per share for the 2010 Quarter compared to $0.63 per share for the 2009 Quarter. FFO decreased in the 2010 Quarter primarily due to a single-location office tenant default and initial costs related to a fourth quarter 2010 property acquisition. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus real estate depreciation and amortization, and excluding gains from property dispositions and extraordinary items. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2010 Period decreased 6.1% to $39,120,000 from $41,666,000 during the 2009 Period. Per share FFO available to common shareholders for the 2010 Period decreased 7.8% to $1.65 per diluted share compared to $1.79 per diluted share for the 2009 Period. FFO decreased in the 2010 Period primarily due to higher losses on early extinguishment of debt (approximately $2,819,000 or $0.12 per diluted share) and by a decline in property operating income during the 1
st
quarter 2010, due to increased snow removal expense, net of tenant recoveries, from severe winter storms impacting the Mid-Atlantic region (approximately $1,200,000 or $0.05 per diluted share), offset in part by the one-time collection of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant ($1,939,000 or $0.08 per diluted share) during the 1
st
quarter 2010.
 
 
During the third quarter, the Company sold its Lexington property for $8,100,000 and recognized a gain of $3,591,000. On October 1, 2010, net proceeds from the sale of Lexington together with additional cash of $7,400,000 were used to purchase a property containing approximately 20,000 square feet of retail space located near the White Flint Metro Station in Montgomery County, Maryland. The Company incurred acquisition costs of approximately $450,000, of which $170,000 were incurred and recognized as expense during the third quarter and the remaining $280,000 costs were incurred and will be recognized as expense in the fourth quarter. The property, which is fully leased, is zoned for up to 297,000 square feet of rentable mixed use space. The Company does not anticipate redeveloping this property in the foreseeable future.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 52 community and neighborhood shopping center and office properties totaling approximately 8.4 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20110302135836.txt.gz
TIME:20110302135836
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On March 1, 2011, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2010. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
99.1 Press Release, dated March 1, 2011, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: March 1, 2011
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
March 1, 2011, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended December 31, 2010. Total revenue for the three months ended December 31, 2010 ("2010 Quarter") decreased 3.4% to $40,295,000 compared to $41,698,000 for the three months ended December 31, 2009 ("2009 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before loss on early extinguishment of debt, gain on casualty settlements, acquisition related costs, discontinued operations, income attributable to the noncontrolling interest and preferred stock dividends, decreased 13.8% to $10,049,000 for the 2010 Quarter compared to $11,660,000 for the 2009 Quarter, primarily due to a single-location office tenant default ($700,000) and increased general and administrative expense ($385,000). Net income decreased 22.3% to $8,870,000 for the 2010 Quarter compared to $11,417,000 for the 2009 Quarter primarily due to acquisition related costs arising from the purchases of two retail properties ($1,009,000), the office tenant default ($700,000) and increased general and administrative expense ($385,000). Net income available to common stockholders was $3,921,000, or $0.21 per diluted share, for the 2010 Quarter compared to $5,861,000, or $0.33 per diluted share, for the 2009 Quarter.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio decreased 4.7% for the 2010 Quarter compared to the 2009 Quarter and same property operating income decreased 5.3%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not fully in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio decreased 2.2% for the 2010 Quarter compared to the 2009 Quarter, due to reduced minimum rent income ($325,000) and reduced termination fee income ($240,000). Same property operating income in the office/mixed-use portfolio decreased 15.6% for the 2010 Quarter compared to the 2009 Quarter primarily due to a single-location office tenant default ($700,000).
For the year ended December 31, 2010 ("2010 Year"), total revenue increased 1.6% to $163,546,000 compared to $160,968,000 for the year ended December 31, 2009 ("2009 Year") and operating income decreased 3.1% to $43,818,000 compared to $45,199,000 for the 2009 Year primarily due to a single-location office tenant default ($1,400,000), increased snow removal expense, net of tenant recoveries, from severe winter storms impacting the Mid-Atlantic region ($1,200,000), increased general
 
and administrative expense ($1,000,000) and decreased lease termination fees ($750,000) offset in part by the collection of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant ($1,940,000) and operating income generated from shopping centers recently developed/acquired ($1,000,000). Net income available to common stockholders was $21,623,000 or $1.18 per diluted share for the 2010 Year, compared to $21,573,000 or $1.20 per diluted share for the 2009 Year.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio increased 0.6% for the 2010 Year compared to the 2009 Year and same property operating income decreased 0.7%. Shopping center same property operating income increased 1.4% for the 2010 Year primarily due to the collection of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant ($1,940,000). Excluding this one-time revenue, same property shopping center operating income decreased 0.7% compared to the prior year. Same property operating income in the office/mixed-use portfolio decreased 7.5% for the 2010 Year due primarily to a single-location office tenant default ($1,400,000).
As of December 31, 2010, 90.3% of retail and office space was leased compared to 91.5% at December 31, 2009. Clarendon Center's newly constructed apartments were 44% leased at December 31, 2010. On a same property basis, 92.0% of the portfolio was leased as of December 31, 2010 compared to 92.7% at December 31, 2009.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) decreased 20.4% to $11,436,000 in the 2010 Quarter compared to $14,359,000 for the 2009 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders decreased 21.3% to $0.48 per share for the 2010 Quarter compared to $0.61 per share for the 2009 Quarter. FFO decreased in the 2010 Quarter primarily due to costs related to the acquisition of two retail properties, a single-location office tenant default, increased general and administrative expense and the increase in the expense incurred to retire debt prior to its maturity. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus real estate depreciation and amortization, and excluding gains from property dispositions and extraordinary items. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2010 Year decreased 9.8% to $50,556,000 from $56,025,000 during the 2009 Year. Per share FFO available to common shareholders for the 2010 Year decreased 11.7% to $2.12 per diluted share compared to $2.40 per diluted share for the 2009 Year. FFO decreased in the 2010 Year primarily due to higher losses on early extinguishment of debt ($3,195,000 or $0.13 per diluted share), by a decline in property operating income due to (1) a single-location office tenant default, (2) increased snow removal expense, net of tenant recoveries, (3) increased general and administrative expense and (4) decreased lease termination fees, offset in part by (5) the collection of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant, and (6) operating income generated from shopping centers recently developed/acquired (collectively $1,410,000 or $0.06 per diluted share) and costs of acquiring two properties (approximately $1,179,000 or $0.05 per diluted share).
 
In September 2010, the Company sold its Lexington property for $8,100,000 and recognized a gain of $3,591,000. Net proceeds from the sale of Lexington together with additional cash of $7,400,000 were used to purchase 11503 Rockville Pike, a property containing approximately 20,000 square feet of retail space located on the east side of Rockville Pike near the White Flint Metro Station in Montgomery County, Maryland. The property, which is fully leased, is zoned for up to 297,000 square feet of rentable mixed use space. The Company does not anticipate redeveloping this property in the foreseeable future.
In December 2010, the Company purchased for $34.3 million the Metro Pike Center, approximately 67,000 square feet of retail space located on the west side of Rockville Pike near the White Flint Metro Station in Montgomery County, Maryland. The property was acquired subject to the assumption of a $16.2 million mortgage loan. The property, which is 89% leased, is zoned for up to 807,000 square feet of rentable mixed use space. The Company does not anticipate redeveloping this property in the foreseeable future.
As of December 31, 2010, the Company substantially completed construction of Clarendon Center adjacent to the Clarendon Metro Station in Arlington, Virginia. Clarendon Center will provide 45,000 square feet of retail space, 170,000 square feet of office space and 244 apartment units. As of February 28, 2011, the office and retail space is 66% leased and the apartments are 83% leased.
At December 31, 2010, approximately 85% of the Company's debt consisted of fixed rate, amortizing non-recourse mortgage loans, none of which mature before October 2012. As a result of the Company's 2010 refinancing activities, no more than $62 million of fixed-rate debt will mature in any future calendar year. The Company's $150 million revolving credit facility matures June 2012, can be extended for one year at the Company's option, and had no outstanding borrowings as of December 31, 2010.
During 2010, the Company paid quarterly dividends to its common stockholders totaling $1.44 per share, compared to $1.53 per share in 2009. On January 31, 2011, the Company paid a quarterly dividend of $0.36 per share to its common stockholders ($1.44 per share annual rate).
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 54 community and neighborhood shopping center and office/mixed-use properties totaling approximately 8.9 million square feet of leasable area. Over 80% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20110428171437.txt.gz
TIME:20110428171437
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On March 23, 2011, Clarendon Center LLC, a subsidiary of Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, the operating partnership for Saul Centers, Inc., entered into a new $125,000,000 loan (the "Mortgage Loan"), with The Prudential Insurance Company of America. The Mortgage Loan is secured by Clarendon Center, a mixed use development consisting of approximately 42,000 square feet of retail space, 171,000 square feet of office space and 244 residential units located adjacent to the Clarendon Metro Station in Arlington, Virginia. Saul Centers, Inc. has provided a limited guarantee with respect to certain obligations of Clarendon Center LLC under the Mortgage Loan.
The Mortgage Loan matures on April 5, 2026. Interest on amounts borrowed under the Mortgage Loan accrues at an annual rate of 5.31%. The Promissory Note and the Deed of Trust, Security Agreement and Fixture Filing relating to the Mortgage Loan contain various representations, warranties, covenants and events of default, all as more particularly set forth in therein.
Proceeds from the Mortgage Loan were used to repay $104,419,000 outstanding under the construction loan relating to Clarendon Center.
The foregoing description of the Mortgage Loan does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the complete text of the Promissory Note and the Deed of Trust, Security Agreement and Fixture Filing, which are attached as Exhibits 10.(a) and 10.(b) to this Current Report on Form 8-K and are incorporated herein by this reference, and to the other documents governing and securing the Mortgage Loan.
 
On March 23, 2011, Clarendon Center LLC entered into the Mortgage Loan, the terms of which are described in Item 1.01 above.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: April 28, 2011
 

Exhibit 10.(a)
 
FOR VALUE RECEIVED, CLARENDON CENTER LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (""), promises to pay to the order of THE PRUDENTIAL INSURANCE COMPANY OF AMERICA, a New Jersey corporation ("," which shall also mean successors and assigns who become holders of this Note), at 2100 Ross Avenue, Suite 2500, Dallas, Texas 75201, the principal sum of ONE HUNDRED TWENTY-FIVE MILLION AND NO/100 U.S. DOLLARS ($125,000,000.00), with interest on the unpaid balance ("") at the rate of five and thirty-one hundredths percent (5.31%) per annum ("") from and including the date of the first disbursement of Loan proceeds under this Note ("") until Maturity (defined below). Capitalized terms used without definition shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Instrument (defined below).
Borrower
Lender
Balance
Note Rate
Funding Date
1. . Principal and interest shall be payable as follows:
Regular Payments
(a) Interest from and including the Funding Date to April 5, 2011 shall be due and payable on the Funding Date.
(b) Principal and interest shall be paid in one hundred eighty (180) monthly installments of Seven Hundred Fifty-Three Thousand Four Hundred Ninety and 96/100 Dollars ($753,490.96) each, commencing on May 5, 2011 and continuing on the fifth (5th) day of each succeeding month to and including April 5, 2026. Each payment due date is referred to as a "."
Due Date
(c) The entire Obligations shall be due and payable on April 5, 2026 (""). "" shall mean the Maturity Date or earlier date that the Obligations may be due and payable by acceleration by Lender as provided in the Documents.
Maturity Date
Maturity
(d) Interest on the Balance for any full month shall be calculated on the basis of a three hundred sixty (360) day year consisting of twelve (12) months of thirty (30) days each. For any partial month, interest shall be due in an amount equal to (i) the Balance multiplied by (ii) the Note Rate divided by (iii) 360 multiplied by (iv) the number of days during such partial month that any Balance is outstanding to (but excluding) the date of payment.
(e) Provided there is no Event of Default, upon the occurrence of a principal paydown in excess of $2,500,000.00 pursuant to any of Sections 3.07(b), 3.08(c) or 5.03 of the Instrument, the monthly principal and interest payments required under Section 1(b) above shall be adjusted, commencing with the next payment due after such principal paydown, by reducing the monthly principal and interest payment to an amount equal to the unpaid principal balance of the Loan immediately after such principal paydown the effective monthly loan constant immediately prior to such principal paydown. The term "effective monthly loan constant" shall mean the quotient obtained by dividing (x) the initial monthly principal and interest payment (as set forth in Section 1(b) above) by (y) the unpaid principal balance of the Loan immediately prior to such principal paydown. The effective monthly loan constant shall be determined by Lender and shall be binding on Borrower absent a clear mathematical calculation error.
times
 
2. Late Payment and Default Interest.
(a) . If any scheduled payment due under this Note is not fully paid by its Due Date (other than the principal payment due on the Maturity Date), a charge of $750.00 per day (the "") shall be assessed for each day that elapses from and after the Due Date until such payment is made in full (including the date payment is made); provided, however, that if any such payment, together with all accrued Daily Charges, is not fully paid by the fourteenth (14
Late Charge
Daily Charge
th
) day following the applicable Due Date, a late charge equal to the lesser of (i) four percent (4%) of such payment or (ii) the maximum amount allowed by law (the "") shall be assessed and be immediately due and payable; provided, however, neither the Daily Charge nor the Late Charge shall be due on the principal payment due on the Maturity Date. The Late Charge shall be payable in lieu of Daily Charges that shall have accrued. The Late Charge may be assessed only once on each overdue payment. These charges shall be paid to defray the expenses incurred by Lender in handling and processing such delinquent payment(s) and to compensate Lender for the loss of the use of such funds. The Daily Charge and Late Charge shall be secured by the Documents. The imposition of the Daily Charge, Late Charge, and/or requirement that interest be paid at the Default Rate (defined below) shall not be construed in any way to (i) excuse Borrower from its obligation to make each payment under this Note promptly when due or (ii) preclude Lender from exercising any rights or remedies available under the Documents upon an Event of Default.
Late Charge
(b) . Upon any Event of Default, Lender may declare the Balance, unpaid accrued interest, the Prepayment Premium (defined below) and all other Obligations immediately due and payable in full.
Acceleration
(c) Upon an Event of Default or if the Obligations are not paid in full at Maturity, whether by acceleration (due to a voluntary or involuntary Event of Default) or otherwise, the entire Obligations (excluding accrued but unpaid interest if prohibited by law) shall bear interest at the Default Rate. The "" shall be the lesser of (i) the maximum rate allowed by law or (ii) five percent (5%) plus the greater of (A) the Note Rate or (B) the prime rate (for corporate loans at large United States money center commercial banks) published in on the first Business Day (defined below) of the month in which the Event of Default or Maturity (as the case may be) occurs and on the first Business Day of every month thereafter. The term "" shall mean each Monday through Friday except for days on which commercial banks are not authorized to open or are required by law to close in New York, New York.
Default Rate.
Default Rate
The Wall Street Journal
Business Day
3. . Until an Event of Default occurs, all payments received under this Note shall be applied in the following order: (a) to unpaid Daily Charges, Late Charges and costs of collection; (b) to any Prepayment Premium due; (c) to interest due on the Balance; and (d) then to the Balance. After an Event of Default, all payments shall be applied in any order determined by Lender in its sole discretion.
Application of Payments
4. . This Note may be prepaid, in whole or in part, upon at least thirty (30) days' prior written notice to Lender and upon payment of all accrued interest (and other Obligations due under the Documents) and a prepayment premium ("") equal to the greater of (a) one percent (1%) of the principal amount being prepaid multiplied by the quotient of the number of full months remaining until the Maturity Date, calculated as of the prepayment date, divided by the number of full months comprising the term of this Note, or (b) the Present Value of the Loan (defined below) less the amount of principal and accrued interest (if any) being prepaid, calculated as of the prepayment date. The Prepayment Premium shall be due and payable, except as provided in the Instrument, this Section 4, Section 5 hereinbelow, or as limited by law, upon any prepayment of this Note, whether voluntary or involuntary, and Lender shall not be obligated to accept any prepayment of this Note unless it is
Prepayment
Prepayment Premium
 
accompanied by the Prepayment Premium, all accrued interest and all other Obligations due under the Documents. Lender shall notify Borrower of the amount of and the calculation used to determine the Prepayment Premium. Borrower agrees that (a) Lender shall not be obligated to actually reinvest the amount prepaid in any Treasury obligation and (b) the Prepayment Premium is directly related to the damages that Lender will suffer as a result of the prepayment. The "" shall be determined by discounting all scheduled payments remaining to the Maturity Date attributable to the amount being prepaid at the Discount Rate (defined below). If prepayment occurs on a date other than a Due Date, the actual number of days remaining from the date of prepayment to the next Due Date will be used to discount within this period. The "" is the rate which, when compounded monthly, is equivalent to the Treasury Rate (defined below), when compounded semi-annually. The "" is the semi-annual yield on the Treasury Constant Maturity Series with maturity equal to the remaining weighted average life of the Loan, for the week prior to the prepayment date, as reported in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 - Selected Interest Rates, conclusively determined by Lender (absent a clear mathematical calculation error) on the prepayment date. The rate will be determined by linear interpolation between the yields reported in Release H.15, if necessary. If Release H.15 is no longer published, Lender shall select a comparable publication to determine the Treasury Rate. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing to the contrary, however, the Prepayment Premium shall be in the following amounts if the prepayment date occurs during the following time periods:
Present Value of the Loan
Discount Rate
Treasury Rate
 
 
 
With respect to the foregoing provisions, Borrower hereby expressly agrees as follows:
(a) The Note Rate provided herein has been determined based on the sum of (i) the treasury rate in effect at the time the Note Rate was determined under the Loan application submitted to Lender, plus (ii) an interest rate spread over such treasury rate, which together represent Lender's agreed-upon return for making the proceeds of the Loan hereunder available to Borrower over the term of such Loan.
(b) The determination of the Note Rate, and in particular the aforesaid interest rate spread, were based on the expectation and agreement of Borrower and Lender that the principal sums advanced hereunder would not be prepaid during the term of this Note, or if any such prepayment occurs, the Prepayment Premium (calculated in the manner set forth above) would apply (except as expressly permitted by this Note).
(c) The Lender's business involves making financial commitments to others based in part on the returns it expects to receive from this Note and other similar loans made by Lender, and Lender's financial performance as a business depends not only on the returns from each loan or investment it makes but also upon the aggregate amounts of the loans and investments it is able to make over any given period of time.
 
(d) In the event of a prepayment hereunder, Lender will be required to redeploy the funds received into other loans or investments, which (i) may not provide a return to Lender comparable to the return Lender anticipates based on the Note Rate and (ii) may reduce the total amount of loans or investments Lender is able to make during the term of the Loan, which in turn may impair the profitability of Lender's business. Therefore, in order to compensate Lender for the potential impact and risks to its business of prepayments under this Note, Lender has limited the Borrower's right to prepay this Note and has offered the method of calculation of the Prepayment Premium set forth above.
(e) Borrower acknowledges that (i) Lender could have determined that it would not permit any prepayments under the Note during its term, and therefore, in electing to permit prepayments hereunder, Lender is entitled to determine and negotiate the terms on which it will accept prepayments of its loans, and (ii) Borrower could have elected to negotiate more permissive prepayment provisions and/or a more favorable manner of calculating the Prepayment Premium, but in such event the applicable interest rate spread, and therefore the Note Rate, would have been higher to compensate Lender for the potential loss of income on account of the risk that Borrower might elect to prepay this Note at an earlier time and/or for a lesser Prepayment Premium than set forth herein.
Therefore, in consideration of Lender's agreement to the Note Rate set forth herein, and in recognition of Lender's reliance on the prepayment provisions of this Note (including the method of calculating the Prepayment Premium), Borrower agrees that the manner of calculation of the Prepayment Premium set forth in this Note represents bargained-for compensation to Lender for granting to Borrower the privilege of prepaying this Note on the terms set forth herein and for the potential loss of future income to Lender arising from having to redeploy the amounts prepaid under this Note into other loans or investments. As such, the Prepayment Premium constitutes reasonable compensation to Lender for making the Loan on the terms reflected in this Note and does not represent a penalty.
5. . Under no circumstances shall the aggregate amount paid or to be paid as interest under this Note exceed the highest lawful rate permitted under applicable usury law (""). If under any circumstances the aggregate amounts paid on this Note shall include interest payments which would exceed the Maximum Rate, Borrower stipulates that payment and collection of interest in excess of the Maximum Rate ("") shall be deemed the result of a mistake by both Borrower and Lender, and Lender shall promptly credit the Excess Amount against the Balance (without Prepayment Premium or other premium) or refund to Borrower any portion of the Excess Amount which cannot be so credited.
No Usury
Maximum Rate
Excess Amount
6. . This Note is the Note referred to and secured by, among other things, that certain Deed of Trust, Security Agreement and Fixture Filing of even date herewith from Borrower to Lawyers Title Realty Services, Inc., as trustee, conveying the Property for the benefit of Lender (the ""). Borrower shall observe and perform all of the terms and conditions in the Documents. The Documents are incorporated into this Note as if fully set forth in this Note.
Security and Documents Incorporated
Instrument
7. . All payments under this Note shall be made, without offset or deduction, (a) in lawful money of the United States of America at the office of Lender or at such other place (and in the manner) Lender may specify by written notice to Borrower, (b) in immediately available federal funds, and (c) if received by Lender prior to 2:00 p.m. Eastern Time at such place, shall be credited on that day, or, if received by Lender at or after 2:00 p.m. Eastern Time at such place, shall, at Lender's option, be credited on the next Business Day. Initially (unless waived by Lender), and until Lender shall direct Borrower otherwise, Borrower shall make all payments due under this Note in the manner set forth in Section 3.13 of the Instrument. If any Due Date falls on a day which is not a Business Day, then the Due Date shall be deemed to have fallen on the next succeeding Business Day.
Treatment of Payments
 
8. . Except to the extent set forth in Paragraph 8 and Paragraph 9 of this Note, Borrower shall not have any personal liability for the Obligations. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, Lender may bring a foreclosure action or other appropriate action to enforce the Documents or realize upon and protect the Property (including, without limitation, naming Borrower and any other necessary parties in the actions) :
Limited Recourse Liability
and
IN ADDITION BORROWER AND SAUL CENTERS, INC. (SINGULARLY OR COLLECTIVELY, THE "RECOURSE PARTIES") SHALL HAVE JOINT AND SEVERAL PERSONAL LIABILITY FOR
(a) any amounts accrued and/or payable under any Anti-Terrorism Laws provisions and indemnities or guaranties and any environmental and ERISA provisions and indemnities in the Documents and the duty to defend with respect to such indemnities as set forth in the Documents (including, without limitation, the provisions of Sections 8.04, 8.06 and 8.07 of the Instrument and the Environmental Indemnity);
(b) the amount of any assessments and taxes (accrued and/or payable) with respect to the Property and the amount of any recordation or similar such tax payable with respect to the recording of the Instrument;
(c) the amount of any unapplied security deposits (and the amount of security deposits that were applied to a Lease during the period when an Event of Default under the Documents was continuing), rents prepaid more than one (1) month in advance or prepaid expenses of tenants to the extent not turned over to (i) Lender upon foreclosure, sale (pursuant to power of sale), or conveyance in lieu thereof, or (ii) a receiver or trustee for the Property after appointment;
(d) the amount of any insurance proceeds or condemnation awards neither turned over to Lender nor used in compliance with Sections 3.07 and 3.08 of the Instrument;
(e) damages suffered or incurred by Lender as a result of Borrower (i) entering into a new Lease, (ii) entering into an amendment or termination of an existing Lease, or (iii) accepting a termination, cancellation or surrender of an existing Lease (other than with respect to a Lease with a Major Tenant which is addressed in Paragraphs 8(n) and 9(d) below), in each case to the extent such action is in breach of the leasing restrictions set forth in Section 7 of the Assignment (as defined in the Instrument);
(f) damages suffered or incurred by Lender by reason of any waste of the Property;
(g) the amount of any Rents or other income from the Property received by any of the Recourse Parties (i) during the period of time after an Event of Default under the Documents and until the earlier to occur of (A) the cure of such Event of Default and (B) the Transfer of Possession Date (defined below) and (ii) not otherwise applied to the indebtedness under the Documents or to the current (not deferred) operating expenses of the Property. As used in this subparagraph 8(g), the term "" shall mean the first to occur of: (i) the date on which Lender obtains title to the Property as a result of a foreclosure, (ii) the date on which a receiver is appointed for the benefit of the Property, or (iii) the date on which Borrower conveys the Property to Lender in compliance with all of the following requirements, which shall require that Borrower, at Borrower's sole cost and expense, shall deliver or cause to be delivered to Lender (A) a duly executed and acknowledged deed, in customary form for the jurisdiction in which the Property is located and in form and substance satisfactory to Lender, duly signed and acknowledged by Borrower conveying all of Borrower's right title and interest in the Property to Lender or Lender's nominee, as determined by Lender in its sole discretion, (B) a duly executed and acknowledged bill of sale and assignment (in form and substance satisfactory to Lender) conveying to
Transfer of Possession Date
 
Lender or Lender's nominee all of Borrower's right, title and interest to all Personal Property, (C) a duly executed affidavit (in form and substance satisfactory to Lender) of Borrower stating Borrower's United States taxpayer identification number and that Borrower is not a foreign person as defined in Internal Revenue Code Section 1445, (D) a duly executed release of Lender and/or Lender's nominee (in form and substance satisfactory to Lender) by Borrower and any guarantor, (E) originals of leases, licenses and permits pertaining to the Property, (F) a duly executed settlement statement (in form and substance satisfactory to Lender), (G) the irrevocable and unconditional commitment of a title company acceptable to Lender to issue the owner's title insurance policy described below, (H) appropriate UCC searches and/or certificates evidencing that there are no liens against any of Borrower's personal property pertaining to the Property, (I) all other documents affecting title to or possession of the Property and necessary to transfer or assign such title or possession to Lender, or at Lender's option, Lender's nominee, (J) the amount of all funds applicable to the Property and in the possession of Borrower or Borrower's management company, (K) a non merger endorsement to Lender's existing mortgagee's title policy, (L) any and all state, county, or local transfer tax forms covering the transfer provided hereby, all of which must be duly executed by Borrower, (M) a Form 1099, duly executed by Borrower, setting forth its name, address, tax identification number, description of the Property and the funding date of the Loan, (N) an amount in cash equal to the sum of (i) all transfer or similar taxes payable in connection with such transfer, (ii) all legal fees and expenses incurred by Lender in connection with reviewing all documentation and closing such deed in lieu transfer, (iii) the cost of the owner's title policy described below, and (iv) all other third party costs and expenses incurred by Lender in connection with such deed in lieu transfer, (O) all other customary documents, instruments or forms (all in form and substance satisfactory to Lender) required for the transfer of title in the jurisdiction in which the Property is located, duly signed and acknowledged by Borrower, (P) such owner's affidavits and other certifications, duly signed and acknowledged by Borrower, as may be reasonably necessary for Lender to obtain an ALTA owner's policy of title insurance for the Property, which shall show no liens, encumbrances or exceptions to title other than those set forth in Lender's mortgagee's policy of title insurance obtained by Lender in connection with the Loan and issued on or about the date of this Instrument, (Q) a property condition report and an environmental assessment report both of which must be prepared by consultants approved by Lender and both such reports must show no conditions with respect to the Property that are unacceptable to Lender, and (R) such other documents, deliveries, and certifications as Lender shall reasonably require; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, THAT THE RECOURSE PARTIES SHALL HAVE PERSONAL LIABILITY for amounts paid as expenses to a person or entity related to or affiliated with any of the Recourse Parties except for (A) reasonable salaries for on-site employees, (B) a reasonable allocation of the salaries of off-site employees for accounting and management, and (C) management fees and out-of-pocket expenses of Borrower's management company (including management fees and expenses paid to Borrower's affiliated management company) relating to the Property, but in no event shall such fees or expenses be greater than prevailing market rates for any such services;
(h) the face amount of any letter of credit required under the Documents or otherwise in connection with the Loan that Borrower fails to maintain;
(i) during an Event of Default under the Documents (1) the amount of any security deposit cashed or applied by Borrower, any termination fee, cancellation fee or any other fee received by, or on behalf of, any of the Recourse Parties in connection with any lease termination, cancellation, surrender or expiration, and (2) any judgment, settlement or other recovery (excluding recoveries for operating expenses) received by, or on behalf of, any of the Recourse Parties against or from any tenant under or any guarantor of, any Lease (with any item described in (1) or (2) above being herein called a ""), not applied to the indebtedness under the Documents;
Recovery
 
(j) with respect to any Lease that provides more than ten percent (10%) of the gross annual income from the Property during the twelve month period preceding payment of a Recovery with respect to such Lease, the amount of any Recovery if such Recovery is greater than one (1) month's base rent payable under the applicable Lease, which is received by, or on behalf of, any of the Recourse Parties at any time during the term of the Loan and which is not paid to Lender (or an escrow agent selected by Lender) to be disbursed for the payment of Lender approved (1) tenant improvements and/or (2) market leasing commissions as provided in the Assignment, except as may be otherwise agreed in writing by Lender; provided that such escrow shall not be required (or shall be released) if the Lease (which is the subject of said Recovery) is fully reinstated without change to the terms of said Lease;
(k) following the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default under the Documents, all reasonable attorneys' fees and other expenses incurred by Lender in enforcing the Documents if any of the Recourse Parties contests, delays, or otherwise hinders or opposes (including, without limitation, the filing of a bankruptcy by any of the Recourse Parties) any of Lender's enforcement actions; provided, however, that if in such action the Recourse Parties successfully prove that no Event of Default occurred under the Documents, the Recourse Parties shall not be required to reimburse Lender for such attorneys' fees, allocated costs and other expenses;
(l) damages suffered or incurred by Lender as a result of Borrower's breach or violation of Sections 2.10 and/or 3.21 of the Instrument;
(m) damages suffered or incurred by Lender as a result of any involuntary lien or encumbrance on the Property that is not removed, bonded off or otherwise discharged within sixty (60) days from the filing of such involuntary lien or encumbrance; and
(n) damages suffered or incurred by Lender as a result of any modification of a Lease with a Major Tenant that increases the obligations of landlord, decreases the term, decreases or accelerates rent, relieves the tenant of any liabilities under any such Lease with a Major Tenant, or extends the term of such Lease or grants options to extend or terminate the term of such Lease in each case in breach of the leasing restrictions set forth in the Assignment.
9. . Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph 8 of this Note, the for the Obligations if:
Full Recourse Liability
RECOURSE PARTIES SHALL HAVE JOINT AND SEVERAL PERSONAL LIABILITY
(a) there shall be any transfer of the Property or interests in Borrower in breach or violation of Article V of the Instrument or there shall be any secondary financing liens or any voluntary liens placed on or encumbering the Property in breach or violation of the Instrument; or
(b) there shall be any fraud or intentional misrepresentation by any of the Recourse Parties in connection with the Property, the Documents, the Loan application, or any other aspect of the Loan; or
(c) the Property or any part thereof shall become an asset in (i) a voluntary bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding or (ii) an involuntary bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding which is not dismissed within ninety (90) days of filing; provided, however, that this Paragraph 9(c) shall not apply if (A) an involuntary bankruptcy is filed by Lender or (B) the involuntary filing was initiated by a third-party creditor independent of any collusive action, participation or collusive communication by (1) Borrower, (2) any partner, shareholder or member of Borrower or Borrower's general partner or manager, or (3) any of the Recourse Parties; or
 
(d) Borrower (i) enters into a Lease with a Major Tenant, (ii) consents to, or otherwise accepts, an assignment of a Lease with a Major Tenant, which assignment would result in the Major Tenant being relieved from any liability under such Lease, or (iii) accepts the termination, cancellation or surrender of any Lease with a Major Tenant, in each case, only if in breach of the leasing restrictions set forth in the Assignment; or
(e) the Instrument or any of the other Documents are determined to be fraudulent conveyances or preferences or are otherwise determined to be void pursuant to any principles limiting the rights of creditors, whether such claims, demands or assertions are made under the Bankruptcy Code (as amended or replaced from time to time), including, without limitation, under Sections 544, 547 or 548 thereof, or under any applicable state fraudulent conveyance statues or similar laws.
10. . Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph 8 or Paragraph 9 of this Note, Borrower shall be fully liable for all amounts payable under that certain Partial Recourse Guaranty (the ""), dated of even date herewith, made by Saul Centers, Inc. in favor of Lender unless and until the Recourse Guaranty is terminated in accordance with its terms.
Guaranty
Recourse Guaranty
11. . This Note shall be the joint and several obligation of Borrower and all other makers and endorsers, if any, and shall be binding upon them and their respective successors and assigns and shall inure to the benefit of Lender and its successors and assigns.
Joint and Several Liability
12. . Borrower is and shall be obligated to pay principal, interest and any and all other amounts which became payable hereunder or under the other Documents absolutely and unconditionally and without abatement, postponement, diminution or deduction and without any reduction for counterclaim or setoff. In the event that at any time any payment received by Lender hereunder shall be deemed by a court of competent jurisdiction to have been a voidable preference or fraudulent conveyance under any bankruptcy, insolvency or other debtor relief law, then the obligation to make such payment shall survive any cancellation or satisfaction of this Note or return thereof to Borrower and shall not be discharged or satisfied with any prior payment thereof or cancellation of this Note, but shall remain a valid and binding obligation enforceable in accordance with the terms and provisions hereof, and such payment shall be immediately due and payable upon demand.
Unconditional Payment
13. . Borrower and all others who may become liable for the payment of all or any part of the Obligations do hereby severally waive presentment and demand for payment, notice of dishonor, protest and notice of protest, notice of non-payment and notice of intent to accelerate the maturity hereof (and of such acceleration), except for notices expressly required pursuant to the terms of the Documents. No release of any security for the Obligations or extension of time for payment of this Note or any installment hereof, and no alteration, amendment or waiver of any provision of this Note, the Instrument or the other Documents shall release, modify, amend, waive, extend, change, discharge, terminate or affect the liability of Borrower, and any other who may become liable for the payment of all or any part of the Obligations, under this Note, the Instrument and the other Documents.
Certain Waivers
14. . EACH OF BORROWER AND LENDER HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, THE RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION, PROCEEDING OR COUNTERCLAIM FILED BY EITHER PARTY, WHETHER IN CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, RELATING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY TO THE LOAN, THE DOCUMENTS, OR ANY ALLEGED ACTS OR OMISSIONS OF LENDER OR BORROWER IN CONNECTION THEREWITH.
WAIVER OF TRIAL BY JURY
 
15. . In the event of the passage of any law of the Commonwealth of Virginia, the County of Arlington or any other applicable taxing authority deducting from the value of real property for the purpose of taxation any lien or encumbrance thereon or changing in any way the laws for the taxation of mortgages or debts secured by mortgages for federal, state or local purposes or the manner of the collection of any such taxes, and imposing a tax (other than a tax on income, revenue, return of principal or reserves or the lack thereof), either directly or indirectly, on the Instrument, this Note, any of the other Documents or the entire outstanding principal balance of this Note, Borrower shall, if permitted by law, pay any tax imposed as a result of any such law within the statutory period or within twenty (20) days after demand by Lender, whichever is less; provided however, that if, in the opinion of counsel for Lender, Borrower is not permitted by law to pay such taxes, Lender shall have the right, at its option, to declare the entire outstanding principal balance of this Note immediately due and payable (without any Prepayment Premium) upon one hundred twenty (120) days' prior written notice to Borrower.
Local Law Provision - Changes in Laws Regarding Taxation
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, this Note has been executed by Borrower as of the date first set forth above.
 
 

Exhibit 10.(b)
PREPARED OUTSIDE THE COMMONWEALTH
OF VIRGINIA BY:
Seyfarth Shaw LLP
1075 Peachtree Street, N.E.
Suite 2500
Atlanta, Georgia 30309-3962
Attention: James H. Kaminer, Jr., Esq.
Prudential Deal Name: Clarendon Center
Prudential Loan Number: 706108495
RPC Nos.: 18012004 and 18013011
UPON RECORDATION RETURN TO:
Commonwealth Land Title Insurance Company
1015 15th Street, NW
Suite 300
Washington, DC 20005
Attn: David P. Nelson
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This Deed of Trust, Security Agreement and Fixture Filing (this "Deed of Trust"), securing the principal sum of $125,000,000, is a permanent loan deed of trust being recorded within three years after the recording of the construction loan deed of trust encumbering the same real property, which construction loan deed of trust secured the principal sum of $157,500,000 and was recorded May 14, 2008 in Deed Book 4189 at page 1758 among the Land Records of Arlington County, VA, with recordation tax having been paid on such principal sum of $157,500,000. Accordingly, pursuant to Section 58.1-804(C) of the Code of Virginia, this Deed of Trust is exempt from recordation tax.
 
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
EXHIBITS
Exhibit A- Legal Description of Land
Exhibit B- Description of Personal Property
Exhibit C- Permitted Encumbrances
Exhibit D- North Block Legal Description
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
The terms set forth below are defined in the following sections of this Instrument:
 
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
THIS DEED OF TRUST, SECURITY AGREEMENT AND FIXTURE FILING (this "") is made as of the 23rd day of March, 2011, by CLARENDON CENTER LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, having its principal office and place of business at 7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500 East, Bethesda, Maryland 20814, as grantor (""), to LAWYERS TITLE REALTY SERVICES, INC., a Virginia corporation, Trustee, having its principal place of business at 7130 Glen Forest Dr # 403, Richmond, VA 23226, and having a mailing address of c/o Commonwealth Land Title Insurance Company, 1015 15th Street, N.W., Suite 300, Washington, DC 20005, as trustee/grantee (""), for the benefit of THE PRUDENTIAL INSURANCE COMPANY OF AMERICA, a New Jersey corporation, having an office at c/o Prudential Asset Resources, Inc., 2100 Ross Avenue, Suite 2500, Dallas, Texas 75201, Attention: Asset Management Department; Reference Loan No. 706108495, as beneficiary ("").
Instrument
Borrower
Trustee
Lender
1. Borrower, by the terms of its Promissory Note executed on the same date as this Instrument ("") and in connection with the loan ("") from Lender to Borrower, is indebted to Lender in the principal sum of ONE HUNDRED TWENTY-FIVE MILLION AND NO/100 U.S. DOLLARS ($125,000,000.00).
Note
Loan
2. Borrower desires to secure the payment of and the performance of all of the obligations of Borrower under the Note and certain additional Obligations (as defined in Section 1.01).
IN CONSIDERATION of Lender making the Loan to Borrower, and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are acknowledged, Borrower irrevocably:
A. Grants, bargains, sells, assigns, transfers, pledges, mortgages, warrants, and conveys to Trustee, for the benefit of Lender, and grants Trustee and Lender a security interest in, the following property, rights, interests and estates owned by Borrower (collectively, the ""):
Property
(i) The real property in Arlington County, Virginia and described in ("");
Exhibit A
Land
(ii) All buildings, structures and improvements (including fixtures) now or later located in or on the Land ("");
Improvements
(iii) All easements, estates, and interests including hereditaments, servitudes, appurtenances, tenements, mineral and oil/gas rights, water rights, air rights, development power or rights, options, reversion and remainder rights, and any other rights owned by Borrower and relating to or usable in connection with or providing access to the Land or Improvements;
(iv) All right, title, and interest owned by Borrower in and to all land lying within the rights-of-way, roads, or streets, open or proposed, adjoining the Land to the center line thereof, and all sidewalks, alleys, and strips and gores of land adjacent to or used in connection with the Land;
(v) All right, title, and interest of Borrower in, to, and under, to the extent assignable, all plans, specifications, surveys, studies, reports, permits, licenses, agreements, contracts, instruments, books of account, insurance policies, and any other documents relating to the use, construction, occupancy, leasing, activity, or operation of the Land or Improvements;
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
(vi) All of the fixtures and personal property described in owned by Borrower and replacements thereof; but excluding all personal property owned by any tenant (a "") of the Property, the garage operator or any other license and/or service provider;
Exhibit B
Tenant
(vii) All of Borrower's right, title and interest in the proceeds (including conversion to cash or liquidation claims) of (A) insurance relating to the Property and (B) all awards made for the taking by eminent domain (or by any proceeding or purchase in lieu thereof ) of the Property, including awards resulting from a change of any streets (whether as to grade, access, or otherwise) and for severance damages;
(viii) All of Borrower's right, title and interest in and to all tax refunds, including interest thereon, tax rebates, tax credits, and tax abatements, and the right to receive the same, which may be payable or available with respect to the Property;
(ix) All leasehold estates, ground leases, leases, subleases, licenses, or other agreements affecting the use, enjoyment or occupancy of the Property now or later existing (including any use or occupancy arrangements created pursuant to Title 7 or 11 of the United States Code, as amended from time to time, or any similar federal or state laws now or later enacted for the relief of debtors [the ""]) and all extensions and amendments thereto (collectively, the "") and all of Borrower's right, title and interest under the Leases, including all guaranties thereof;
Bankruptcy Code
Leases
(x) All rents, issues, profits, royalties, receivables, use and occupancy charges (including all oil, gas or other mineral royalties and bonuses), income and revenue and other benefits now or later derived from any portion or use of the Property (including, without limitation, any payments received with respect to any Tenant or the Property pursuant to the Bankruptcy Code) and all cash, security deposits, advance rentals, or similar payments relating thereto (collectively, the "") and all proceeds from the cancellation, termination, surrender, sale or other disposition of the Leases, and the right to receive and apply the Rents to the payment of the Obligations; and
Rents
(xi) All of Borrower's rights and privileges heretofore or hereafter otherwise arising in connection with or pertaining to the Property, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, all water and/or sewer capacity, all water, sewer and/or other utility deposits or prepaid fees, and/or all water and/or sewer and/or other utility tap rights or other utility rights, any right or privilege of Borrower under any loan commitment, lease, contract, declaration of covenants, restrictions and easements or like instrument, developer's agreement, or other agreement with any third party pertaining to the ownership, development, construction, operation, maintenance, marketing, sale or use of the Property.
B. Absolutely and unconditionally assigns, sets over, and transfers to Lender all of Borrower's right, title, interest and estates in and to the Leases and the Rents, subject to the terms and license granted to Borrower under that certain Assignment of Leases and Rents made by Borrower to Lender dated the same date as this Instrument (the ""), which document shall govern and control the provisions of this assignment.
Assignment
TO HAVE AND TO HOLD the Property unto Lender and Trustee, and their successors and assigns forever, subject to the matters listed in ("") and the provisions, terms and conditions of this Instrument.
Exhibit C
Permitted Encumbrances
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
IN TRUST, WITH POWER OF SALE, to secure payment and performance of the Obligations in the time and manner set forth in the Documents (defined below).
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, if Borrower shall pay and perform the Obligations as provided for in the Documents (defined below) and shall comply with all the provisions, terms and conditions in the Documents, these presents and the estates hereby granted (subject to survival of certain obligations of Borrower set forth in Sections 3.11 and 3.12 and Article VIII hereof) shall cease, terminate and be void.
IN FURTHERANCE of the foregoing, Borrower warrants, represents, covenants and agrees as follows:
This Instrument is executed, acknowledged, and delivered by Borrower to secure and enforce the following obligations (collectively, the ""):
Section 1.01
Obligations.
Obligations
(a) Payment of all obligations, indebtedness and liabilities under the Note and the other Documents including any renewals, extensions, and amendments of the Documents;
(b) Performance of every obligation, covenant, and agreement under the Documents including renewals, extensions, and amendments of the Documents; and
(c) Payment of all sums advanced (including costs and expenses) by Lender pursuant to the Documents including renewals, extensions, and amendments of the Documents.
The "" shall mean this Instrument, the Note, the Assignment, and any other written agreement executed by Borrower or any guarantor in connection with the Loan (but excluding the Loan application and Loan commitment) and by the party against whom enforcement is sought, including those given to evidence or further secure the payment and performance of any of the Obligations, and any written renewals, extensions, and amendments of the foregoing, executed by the party against whom enforcement is sought. All of the provisions of the Documents are incorporated into this Instrument as if fully set forth in this Instrument.
Section 1.02
Documents.
Documents
Borrower hereby represents and warrants to Lender that the following are true and correct on and as of the date hereof:
Borrower (i) to Borrower's knowledge, is seised of good and marketable fee title to the Land and the Improvements, free and clear of all liens, charges, encumbrances, and security interests, except the Permitted Encumbrances; (ii) will forever warrant and defend its title to the Property and the validity, enforceability, and priority of the lien and security interest created by this Instrument against the claims of all persons; (iii) is a limited liability company duly organized, validly existing, and in good standing and qualified to transact business under the laws of its state of organization or incorporation ("") and the state where the Property is located (""); and (iv) has all necessary approvals, governmental and otherwise, and full power and authority to own its properties (including the Property) and carry on its business.
Section 2.01
Title, Legal Status and Authority.
Organization State
Property State
The execution, delivery and performance of the Documents and the borrowing evidenced by the Note (i) are within the power of Borrower; (ii) have been authorized by all requisite action; (iii) have received all necessary approvals and consents; (iv) will not violate, conflict with, breach, or constitute (with notice or lapse of time, or both) a default under (1) to Borrower's
Section 2.02
Validity of Documents
.
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
knowledge (as to all but Borrower's governing instrument), any law, order or judgment of any court, governmental authority, or the governing instrument of Borrower or (2) any indenture, agreement, or other instrument to which Borrower is a party or by which it or any of its property is bound or affected; (v) will not result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge, or encumbrance upon any of its properties or assets except for those in this Instrument; and (vi) will not require any authorization or license from, or any filing with, any governmental or other body (except for the recordation of this Instrument, the Assignment and Uniform Commercial Code ("") filings). The Documents constitute legal, valid, and binding obligations of Borrower, subject to the limitations and qualifications set forth in the opinion of counsel provided to Lender in connection with the Loan.
U.C.C.
Except as disclosed to Lender in the Closing Certification, dated of even date herewith, there is no action, suit, or proceeding, judicial, administrative, or otherwise (including any condemnation or similar proceeding), pending or, to the best knowledge of Borrower, threatened or contemplated against, or affecting, Borrower or the Property which would have a material adverse effect on either the Property or Borrower's ability to perform its obligations.
Section 2.03
Litigation.
Section 2.04
Status of Property
.
(a) To Borrower's knowledge, except as may be noted on the survey delivered to Lender in connection with this Loan, the Land and Improvements are not located in an area identified by the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development, or any successor, as an area having special flood hazards pursuant to the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968, the Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973, or the National Flood Insurance Reform Act of 1994, as each have been or may be amended, or any successor law (collectively, the "") or, if located within any such area, Borrower has and will maintain the insurance prescribed in Section 3.06 below.
Flood Acts
(b) To Borrower's knowledge, Borrower has all necessary (i) certificates, licenses, and other approvals, governmental and otherwise, for the operation of the Property and the conduct of its business and (ii) zoning, building code, land use, environmental and other similar permits or approvals, all of which are currently in full force and effect and not subject to revocation, suspension, forfeiture, or modification. To Borrower's knowledge, except as disclosed to Lender in the Closing Certification, dated of even date herewith, the Property and its use and occupancy is in compliance with all Laws and Borrower has received no notice of any violation or potential violation of the Laws which has not been remedied or satisfied.
(c) The Property is served by all utilities (including water and sewer) required for its use.
(d) All public roads and streets necessary to serve the Property for its use have been completed, are serviceable, are legally open, and have been dedicated to and accepted by the appropriate governmental entities.
(e) The Property is free from damage caused by fire or other casualty.
(f) All costs and expenses for labor, materials, supplies, and equipment used in the construction of the Improvements have been paid in full except for the Permitted Encumbrances and costs for ongoing work which will be paid in the ordinary course of business.
(g) Borrower owns and has paid in full for all furnishings, fixtures, and equipment (other than property of Tenants, licensees and service providers) used in connection with the operation of the Property, free of all security interests, liens, or encumbrances except the Permitted Encumbrances and those created by this Instrument.
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
(h) The Property is assessed for real estate tax purposes as one or more wholly independent tax lot(s), separate from any adjoining land or improvements, and no other land or improvements are assessed and taxed together with the Property.
Borrower is not a "foreign person" within the meaning of Sections 1445 and 7701 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the regulations thereunder (the ""). Borrower further represents and warrants to Lender that Borrower is a "disregarded entity" as defined in Section 1.1445-2(b)(2)(iii) of the Income Tax Regulations issued under the Revenue Code; however, Borrower further represents and warrants to Lender that Saul Holdings Limited Partnership (""), Borrower's sole member, is not a "disregarded entity" as defined in said Section 1.1445-2(b)(2)(iii) of the Income Tax Regulations issued under the Revenue Code.
Section 2.05
Tax Status of Borrower.
Revenue Code
SHLP
Section 2.06
Bankruptcy and Equivalent Value.
(a) No bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, liquidation, or other proceeding for the relief of debtors has been instituted by or, to Borrower's knowledge, against Borrower, any general partner of Borrower (if Borrower is a partnership), or any manager or managing member of Borrower (if Borrower is a limited liability company);
(b) The Obligations incurred by Borrower under the Documents, the obligations of Borrower under the Note, and the mortgaging of the Property pursuant to this Instrument are not made or incurred with the intent to hinder, delay, or defraud any present or future creditor of Borrower;
(c) Borrower has not received less than reasonably equivalent value in exchange for incurring the Obligations and/or the mortgaging of the Property in connection with the Loan;
(d) Borrower is solvent as of the date hereof, and Borrower will not become insolvent as a result of incurring the Obligations and/or the mortgaging of the Property pursuant to this Instrument;
(e) Borrower is not engaged, and Borrower is not about to engage, in business or a transaction for which any property remaining with Borrower is an unreasonably small capital;
(f) Borrower has not and does not intend to incur, and Borrower does not believe that it will incur, debts that would be beyond Borrower's ability to pay as such debts mature; and
(g) Borrower is not mortgaging the Property and/or incurring the Obligations to or for the benefit of an insider (as defined in 11 U.S.C.  101(31)), under an employment contract and not in the ordinary course of business.
Borrower has disclosed to Lender all material facts and has not failed to disclose any material fact that could cause any representation or warranty made herein to be materially misleading. There has been no adverse change in any condition, fact, circumstance, or event that would make any such information materially inaccurate, incomplete or otherwise misleading.
Section 2.07
Disclosure.
No portion of the Property has been or will be purchased, improved, fixtured, equipped or furnished by Borrower with proceeds of any illegal activity and, to the best of Borrower's knowledge, there are no illegal activities at or on the Property.
Section 2.08
Illegal Activity.
That (i) neither Borrower, nor any persons or entities holding any legal or beneficial interest whatsoever in Borrower (whether directly or indirectly), are named on any list of persons, entities, and governments issued by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the United States
Section 2.09
OFAC Lists.
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
Department of the Treasury ("") pursuant to Executive Order 13224  Blocking Property and Prohibiting Transactions with Persons Who Commit, Threaten to Commit, or Support Terrorism (""), as in effect on the date hereof, or any similar list issued by OFAC or any other department or agency of the United States of America (collectively, the ""); provided, however, that (A) with respect to individual beneficiaries of any governmental plans or employee benefit plans holding interests in Borrower (collectively, the ""), the foregoing representations and warranties are limited to Borrower's actual knowledge, and (B) with respect to individual shareholders of any publicly-traded company holding an interest in Borrower (collectively, the ""), the foregoing representations and warranties are limited to Borrower's actual knowledge; (ii) neither Borrower, nor any persons or entities holding any legal or beneficial interest whatsoever in Borrower (whether directly or indirectly), are included in, owned by, controlled by, acting for or on behalf of, providing assistance, support, sponsorship, or services of any kind to, or otherwise associated with any of the persons or entities referred to or described in the OFAC Lists; provided, however, that (A) with respect to any Individual Beneficiaries holding interests in Borrower, the foregoing representations and warranties are limited to Borrower's actual knowledge, and (B) with respect to any Individual Shareholders holding interests in Borrower, the foregoing representations and warranties are limited to Borrower's actual knowledge; (iii) neither any guarantor, nor any persons or entities holding any legal or beneficial interest whatsoever in any guarantor (whether directly or indirectly), are named on any OFAC Lists; provided, however, that (A) with respect to any Individual Beneficiaries holding interests in any guarantor, the foregoing representations and warranties are limited to Borrower's actual knowledge, and (B) with respect to any Individual Shareholders holding interests in any guarantor, the foregoing representations and warranties are limited to Borrower's actual knowledge; (iv) neither any guarantor, nor any persons or entities holding any legal or beneficial interest whatsoever in any guarantor (whether directly or indirectly), are included in, owned by, controlled by, acting for or on behalf of, providing assistance, support, sponsorship, or services of any kind to, or otherwise associated with any of the persons or entities referred to or described in the OFAC Lists; provided, however, that (A) with respect to any Individual Beneficiaries holding interests in any guarantor, the foregoing representations and warranties are limited to Borrower's actual knowledge, and (B) with respect to any Individual Shareholders holding interests in any guarantor, the foregoing representations and warranties are limited to Borrower's actual knowledge; and (v) neither Borrower nor any guarantor has knowingly conducted business with or engaged in any transaction with any person or entity named on any of the OFAC Lists or any person or entity included in, owned by, controlled by, acting for or on behalf of, providing assistance, support, sponsorship, or services of any kind to, or otherwise associated with any of the persons or entities referred to or described in the OFAC Lists.
OFAC
Executive Order 13224
OFAC Lists
Individual Beneficiaries
Individual Shareholders
That (i) Borrower's only asset is the Property, and (ii) the Property generates substantially all of the gross income of Borrower and there is no substantial business being conducted by Borrower other than the business of operating the Property and the activities incidental thereto.
Section 2.10
Property as Single Asset.
Borrower covenants and agrees with Lender as follows:
Borrower shall timely pay and cause to be performed the Obligations.
Section 3.01
Payment of Obligations.
Borrower shall not (a) dissolve, terminate, or otherwise dispose of, directly, indirectly or by operation of law, all or substantially all of its assets; (b) reorganize or change its legal structure without Lender's prior written consent, except as otherwise expressly permitted under Article V below; (c) change its name, address, or the name under which Borrower conducts its
Section 3.02
Continuation of Existence.
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
business without promptly notifying Lender; or (d) do anything to cause the representations in Section 2.02 to become untrue. Borrower shall (a) maintain its existence as a limited liability company duly organized, validly existing, and in good standing and qualified to transact business under the laws of its Organization State and the Property State and (b) shall maintain all necessary approvals, governmental and otherwise, and full power and authority to own its properties (including the Property) and carry on its business.
Section 3.03
Taxes and Other Charges
.
(a) . Borrower shall pay when due all taxes, liens, assessments, utility charges (public or private and including sewer fees), ground rents, maintenance charges, dues, fines, impositions, and public and other charges of any character (including penalties and interest) assessed against, or which could become a lien against, the Property ("") and in all events prior to the date any fine, penalty, interest or charge for nonpayment may be imposed. Unless Borrower is making deposits per Section 3.10, Borrower shall provide Lender with receipts evidencing such payments (except for income taxes, franchise taxes, ground rents, maintenance charges, and utility charges) within thirty (30) days after their due date.
Payment of Assessments
Assessments
(b) . So long as no Event of Default (defined below) has occurred (unless Lender has accepted cure of such Event of Default by specific written statement from Lender to Borrower acknowledging Lender's acceptance of such cure, and Borrower specifically understands and agrees that Lender shall have no obligation to accept the cure of any Event of Default), Borrower may, prior to delinquency and at its sole expense, contest any Assessment, but this shall not change or extend Borrower's obligation to pay the Assessment as required above unless (i) Borrower gives Lender prior written notice of its intent to contest an Assessment; (ii) Borrower demonstrates to Lender's reasonable satisfaction that (A) the Property will not be sold to satisfy the Assessment prior to the final determination of the legal proceedings, (B) Borrower has taken such actions as are required or permitted to accomplish a stay of any such sale, and (C) Borrower has timely paid the uncontested portion of the Assessment and has furnished Lender evidence of such payment; and (iii) such proceeding shall be permitted under any other instrument to which Borrower or the Property is subject (whether superior or inferior to this Instrument); provided, however, that the foregoing shall not restrict the contesting of any income taxes, franchise taxes, ground rents, maintenance charges, and utility charges.
Right to Contest
(c) . Borrower shall pay all taxes, assessments, charges, expenses, costs and fees (including registration and recording fees and revenue, transfer, stamp, intangible, and any similar taxes) (collectively, the "") required in connection with the making and/or recording of the Documents. If Borrower fails to pay the Transaction Taxes after demand, Lender may (but is not obligated to) pay these and Borrower shall reimburse Lender on demand for any amount so paid with interest at the applicable interest rate specified in the Note, which shall be the Default Rate unless prohibited by Laws.
Documentary Stamps and Other Charges
Transaction Taxes
(d) . If any law (i) deducts from the value of real property for the purpose of taxation any lien or encumbrance thereon, (ii) taxes deeds of trust or debts secured by deeds of trust for federal, state or local purposes or changes the manner of the collection of any such existing taxes, and/or (iii) imposes a tax, either directly or indirectly, on any of the Documents or the Obligations, Borrower shall, if permitted by law, pay such tax within the statutory period or within twenty (20) days after demand by Lender, whichever is less; provided, however, that if, in the opinion of Lender based on advice of counsel, Borrower is not permitted by law to pay such taxes, Lender shall have the option to declare the Obligations immediately due and payable (without any Prepayment Premium) upon one hundred twenty (120) days' notice to Borrower.
Changes in Laws Regarding Taxation
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
Borrower shall forever warrant, defend and preserve Borrower's title to the Property, the validity, enforceability and priority of this Instrument and the lien or security interest created thereby, and any rights of Lender and/or Trustee under the Documents against the claims of all persons, and shall promptly notify Lender and Trustee of any such claims. Lender and/or Trustee (whether or not named as a party to such proceedings) is authorized and empowered (but shall not be obligated) to take such additional steps as it may deem necessary or proper for the defense of any such proceeding or the protection of the lien, security interest, validity, enforceability, or priority of this Instrument, title to the Property, or any rights of Lender and/or Trustee under the Documents, including the employment of counsel, the prosecution and/or defense of litigation, the compromise, release, or discharge of such adverse claims, the purchase of any tax title, the removal of any such liens and security interests, and any other actions Lender and/or Trustee deems necessary to protect its or their interests. Borrower authorizes Lender and/or Trustee to take any actions required to be taken by Borrower, or permitted to be taken by Lender and/or Trustee, in the Documents in the name and on behalf of Borrower if Borrower fails to take action timely. Borrower shall reimburse Lender and Trustee on demand for all expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees) incurred by it/them in connection with the foregoing and Lender's or Trustee's exercise of its or their rights under the Documents. All such expenses of Lender and/or Trustee, until reimbursed by Borrower, shall be part of the Obligations, bear interest upon demand at the Default Rate and shall be secured by this Instrument.
Section 3.04
Defense of Title, Litigation and Rights under Documents.
Section 3.05
Compliance with Laws and Operation and Maintenance of Property
.
(a) . Borrower will operate and maintain the Property in good order, repair, and operating condition. Borrower will promptly make all necessary repairs, replacements, additions, and improvements necessary to ensure that the Property shall not in any way be diminished or impaired. Borrower will not cause or allow any of the Property to be misused, wasted, or to deteriorate and Borrower will not abandon the Property. No new building, structure, or other improvement shall be constructed on the Land nor shall any material part of the Improvements be removed, demolished, or structurally or materially altered, without Lender's prior written consent.
Repair and Maintenance
(b) . Borrower will keep the Property fully equipped and will replace all worn out or obsolete personal property in a commercially reasonable manner with comparable fixtures or personal property. Borrower will not, without Lender's prior written consent, remove any personal property covered by this Instrument unless the same is replaced by Borrower in a commercially reasonable manner with a comparable article (i) owned by Borrower free and clear of any lien or security interest (other than the Permitted Encumbrances and those created by this Instrument) or (ii) leased by Borrower (A) with Lender's prior written consent or (B) if the replaced personal property was leased at the time of execution of this Instrument.
Replacement of Property
(c) . Borrower shall comply with and shall cause the Property to be maintained, used, and operated in compliance with all (i) present and future laws, Environmental Laws (defined below), ordinances, regulations, rules, orders and requirements (including zoning and building codes) of any governmental or quasi-governmental authority or agency applicable to Borrower or the Property (collectively, the ""); (ii) orders, rules, and regulations of any regulatory, licensing, accrediting, insurance underwriting or rating organization, or other body exercising similar functions; (iii) duties or obligations of any kind imposed under any Permitted Encumbrance (except with respect to covenants prohibiting the sale of liquor) or by law, covenant, condition, agreement, or easement, public or private; and (iv) policies of insurance at any time in force with respect to the Property. If proceedings are initiated or Borrower receives notice that Borrower or the Property is not in compliance with any of the foregoing, Borrower will promptly send Lender notice and a copy of the proceeding or violation notice. Without limiting Lender's rights and remedies under Article VI or otherwise, if Borrower or the Property are not in compliance with all Laws and Borrower does not promptly cure such non-compliance within
Compliance with Laws
Laws
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
the applicable grace or cure period provided thereunder, Lender may impose additional requirements upon Borrower for the purpose of securing such compliance obligation, including monetary reserves or financial equivalents. Borrower shall maintain all necessary (i) certificates, licenses, and other approvals, governmental and otherwise, for the operation of the Property and the conduct of its business and (ii) zoning, building code, land use, environmental and other similar permits or approvals, in full force and effect.
(d) . Borrower shall not, without Lender's prior written consent, (i) initiate or support any zoning reclassification of the Property or variance under existing zoning ordinances; (ii) modify or supplement any of the Permitted Encumbrances; (iii) impose any restrictive covenants or encumbrances upon the Property; (iv) execute or file any subdivision plat affecting the Property; (v) consent to the annexation of the Property to any municipality; (vi) permit the Property to be used by the public or any person in a way that might make a claim of adverse possession or any implied dedication or easement possible; (vii) cause or permit the Property to become a non-conforming use under zoning ordinances or any present or future non-conforming use of the Property to be discontinued; or (viii) fail to comply with the terms of the Permitted Encumbrances, except with respect to covenants prohibiting the sale of liquor, prohibiting uses that may be nuisances to other lot owners in the subdivision, such as a soap factory or like industry, 15-foot building set-back line, and Caucasians-only restrictions, all as more particularly set forth in the deeds identified in Item 2 of the Permitted Encumbrances (collectively, the ""); provided that, Lender shall not unreasonably withhold its consent to any easements or special exceptions requested by retail Tenants pursuant to Leases approved by Lender (or Leases for which Lender's approval is not required) under the Assignment and related solely to the Tenant's use of sidewalk space pursuant to the terms of its Lease.
Zoning and Title Matters
Unenforceable Restrictions
(e) . The Property shall be served by all utilities (including water and sewer) required for its use.
Utility Service
(f) . All public roads and streets necessary to serve the Property for its use shall be completed, serviceable, legally open, and dedicated to and accepted by the appropriate governmental entities.
Roads and Streets
(g) . Borrower shall own and shall have paid in full for all furnishings, fixtures, and equipment (other than Tenants' property) or property leased by Borrower pursuant to equipment leases in compliance with the terms of the Documents used in connection with the operation of the Property, free of all security interests, liens, or encumbrances except the Permitted Encumbrances and those created by this Instrument.
Ownership of FF&E
(h) . The Property shall be assessed for real estate tax purposes as one or more wholly independent tax lot(s), separate from any adjoining land or improvements and no other land or improvements shall be assessed and taxed together with the Property.
Separate Tax Lot
Section 3.06
Insurance
.
(a) . Borrower shall keep the Property insured for the benefit of Borrower and Lender (with Lender named as mortgagee) by (i) a "special form cause of loss" property insurance policy with an agreed amount endorsement for full replacement cost (defined below) without any coinsurance provisions or penalties, or the broadest form of coverage available, in an amount sufficient to prevent Lender from ever becoming a coinsurer under the policy or Laws, and with a deductible not to exceed One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00); (ii) a policy or endorsement insuring against acts of terrorism, if reasonably available; (iii) [INTENTIONALLY OMITTED]; (iv) a policy or endorsement providing business income insurance (including business interruption insurance,
Property and Time Element Insurance
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
and extra expense insurance and/or rent insurance) on an actual loss sustained basis in an amount equal to at least eighteen (18) months' total income from the Property including all Rents, which business interruption insurance shall also provide coverage as aforesaid for any additional hazards as may be required pursuant to the terms of this Instrument; (v) a policy or endorsement insuring against damage by flood if the Property is located in a Special Flood Hazard Area identified by the Federal Emergency Management Agency or any successor or related government agency as a 100 year flood plain currently classified as Flood Insurance Rate Map Zones "A", "AO", "AH", "A1-A30", "AE", "A99", "V", "V1-V30", and "VE" in an amount not less than $25,000,000.00 (unless coverage in such amount is not available at commercially reasonable rates, in which case Borrower shall obtain as much coverage as possible [up to the aforesaid limit] at commercially reasonable rates); (vi) a policy or endorsement covering against damage or loss from (A) sprinkler system leakage and (B) boilers, boiler tanks, HVAC systems, heating and air-conditioning equipment, pressure vessels, auxiliary piping, and similar apparatus, in the amount reasonably required by Lender; (vii) during the period of any construction, repair, restoration, or replacement of the Property or any portion thereof, a standard builder's risk policy with extended coverage in an amount at least equal to the full replacement cost of the Property (or such applicable portion thereof that is being constructed, repaired, restored or replaced); and (viii) a policy or endorsement covering against damage or loss by earthquake and other natural phenomenon in an amount not less than $25,000,000.00 (unless coverage in such amount is not available at commercially reasonable rates, in which case Borrower shall obtain as much coverage as possible [up to the aforesaid limit] at commercially reasonable rates). "" shall mean the one hundred percent (100%) replacement cost of the Property, without allowance for depreciation and exclusive of the cost of excavations, foundations, footings, and value of land, and shall be subject to verification by Lender. Full replacement cost will be determined, at Borrower's expense, periodically upon policy expiration or renewal by the insurance company or an appraiser, engineer, architect, or contractor approved by said company and Lender.
Full replacement cost
(b) . Borrower shall maintain commercial general liability insurance with per occurrence limits of $1,000,000, a products/completed operations limit of $2,000,000, and a general aggregate limit of $2,000,000, with an excess/umbrella liability policy of not less than $10,000,000 per occurrence and annual aggregate covering Borrower, with Lender named as an additional insured, against claims for bodily injury or death or property damage occurring in, upon, or about the Property. In addition to any other requirements, such commercial general liability and excess/umbrella liability insurance shall provide insurance against acts of terrorism, if reasonably available, or such coverage shall be provided by separate policies or endorsements. Upon request, Borrower shall also carry additional insurance or additional amounts of insurance covering Borrower or the Property as Lender shall reasonably require to the extent such additional coverage is available on commercially reasonable terms and at commercially reasonable rates.
Liability and Other Insurance
(c) . All insurance required under this Section shall be fully paid for (it being understood that the premiums for any coverage required under this Section 3.06 may be paid by Borrower in quarterly installments), non-assessable, and the policies shall contain such provisions, endorsements, and expiration dates as Lender shall reasonably require. The policies shall be issued by insurance companies authorized to do business in the Property State, approved by Lender, and must have and maintain a current financial strength rating of "A-, X" (or higher) from A.M. Best or equivalent (or if a rating by A.M. Best is no longer available, a similar rating from a similar or successor service). In addition, all policies shall (i) include a standard mortgagee clause, without contribution, in the name of Lender, (ii) provide that they shall not be canceled, amended, or materially altered (including reduction in the scope or limits of coverage) with respect to the Property without at least thirty (30) days' prior written notice to Lender except in the event of cancellation for non-payment of premium, in which case only ten (10) days' prior written notice will be given to Lender, and (iii) include a waiver of subrogation clause substantially equivalent to the following: "The Company may require from the Insured an assignment of
Form of Policy
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
all rights of recovery against any party for loss to the extent that payment therefor is made by the Company, but the Company shall not acquire any rights of recovery which the Insured has expressly waived prior to loss, nor shall such waiver affect the Insured's rights under this policy."
(d) . Borrower shall deliver to Lender (i) original or certified copies of all policies (and renewals) required under this Section and (ii) receipts evidencing payment of all premiums on such policies (or premiums then due under an installment payment plan) at least ten (10) days prior to their expiration. If original and renewal policies are unavailable or if coverage is under a blanket policy, Borrower shall deliver duplicate originals, or, if unavailable, (1) an MBA Evidence of Insurance - Commercial Property form certificate with respect to all insurance coverage required under Section 3.06(a) above and (2) an original ACORD 25 certificate with respect to all insurance coverage required under Section 3.06(b) above (or equivalent certificates acceptable to Lender; provided, however, that any property insurance certificate containing language to the effect that the certificate is provided "for information only" shall not qualify as adequate evidence, unless certificates containing such language become prevailing industry norm for property insurance certificates) evidencing that such policies are in full force and effect, together with certified copies of the original policies. Without limiting Lender's other rights with respect to the foregoing obligations, if, within ten (10) days prior to the expiration of the current applicable policy, Lender has not received the foregoing items in form and substance acceptable to Lender (as being in compliance with the terms of this Instrument), Lender may retain a commercial property insurance consultant to assist Lender in obtaining adequate evidence that the required insurance coverage is in effect, in which event Borrower shall (i) cooperate with such consultant in confirming that adequate evidence that the required insurance coverage is in effect, and (ii) pay all of the reasonable costs and expenses of such consultant.
Original Policies
(e) . Borrower shall not carry separate or additional insurance concurrent in form or contributing in the event of loss with that required under this Section unless endorsed in favor of Lender as per this Section and approved by Lender in all respects. In the event of foreclosure of this Instrument or other transfer of title or assignment of the Property in extinguishment, in whole or in part, of the Borrower Obligations, all right, title, and interest of Borrower in and to all pending claims and claim rights under all policies of insurance then in force regarding the Property, all proceeds payable thereunder and unearned premiums thereon shall immediately vest in the purchaser or other transferee of the Property. No approval by Lender of any insurer shall be construed to be a representation, certification, or warranty of its solvency. No approval by Lender as to the amount, type, or form of any insurance shall be construed to be a representation, certification, or warranty of its sufficiency. Borrower shall comply with all insurance requirements and shall not cause or permit any condition to exist which would be prohibited by any insurance requirement or would invalidate the insurance coverage on the Property. Borrower shall not be exempt from any of the requirements set forth in this Section 3.06 to the extent that a Tenant has agreed to provide the required insurance or a portion thereof pursuant to the terms and provisions of its respective Lease. If a Tenant is carrying any insurance required on the Property, such insurance must fully comply with this Section 3.06. Borrower shall obtain from any such Tenant(s) and provide to Lender documentation sufficient to satisfy the requirements of Section 3.06(d) above. Lender has no duty or obligation to contact any Tenant(s) regarding proof of insurance for the Property.
General Provisions
(f) . A waiver of subrogation shall be obtained by Borrower from its insurers and, consequently, Borrower for itself, and on behalf of its insurers, hereby waives and releases any and all right to claim or recover against Lender, its officers, employees, agents and representatives, for any loss of or damage to Borrower, other Persons, the Property, Borrower's property or the property of other Persons from any cause required to be insured against by the provisions of this Instrument or otherwise insured against by Borrower.
Waiver of Subrogation
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
Section 3.07
Damage and Destruction of Property.
(a) . If any damage to, loss, or destruction of the Property occurs (any ""), (i) Borrower shall promptly notify Lender and take all necessary steps to preserve any undamaged part of the Property and (ii) if the insurance proceeds are made available for Restoration (defined below) (but regardless of whether any proceeds are sufficient for Restoration), Borrower shall promptly commence and diligently pursue to completion the restoration, replacement, and rebuilding of the Property as nearly as possible to its value and condition immediately prior to the Damage or a Taking (defined below) in accordance with plans and specifications approved by Lender (""). Borrower shall comply with other reasonable requirements established by Lender to preserve the security under this Instrument.
Borrower's Obligations
Damage
Restoration
(b) . If any Damage occurs and some or all of it is covered by insurance, then (i) Lender may, but is not obligated to, make proof of loss if not made promptly by Borrower and Lender is authorized and empowered by Borrower to settle, adjust, or compromise any claims for the Damage; (ii) each insurance company concerned is authorized and directed to make payment directly to Lender for the Damage; and (iii) Lender may apply the insurance proceeds in any order it determines (1) to reimburse Lender for all Costs (defined below) related to collection of the proceeds, and (2) subject to Section 3.07(c) and at Lender's option, to (A) payment (without any Prepayment Premium) of all or part of the Obligations, whether or not then due and payable, in the order determined by Lender (provided that if any Obligations remain outstanding after this payment, the unpaid Obligations shall continue in full force and effect and Borrower shall not be excused in the payment thereof, except that the monthly principal and interest payment amount due under Section 1(b) of the Note may be adjusted in accordance with the provisions of Section 1(e) of the Note); (B) the cure of any Event of Default under the Documents; or (C) the Restoration. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if there shall then be no Event of Default, Borrower shall have the right to settle, adjust or compromise any claim for Damage and receive immediate payments of proceeds if the total amount of such claim is less than $1,250,000.00, provided, that Borrower promptly uses the full amount of such insurance proceeds for Restoration of the Damage and provides evidence thereof to Lender in a manner acceptable to Lender. Any insurance proceeds held by Lender shall be held without the payment of interest thereon. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary hereinabove, provided there is no Event of Default, and subject to Lender's reasonable approval, Borrower shall have the right to settle, adjust or compromise any claim for Damage in excess of $1,250,000.00. If Borrower receives any insurance proceeds for the Damage in excess of $1,250,000.00, Borrower shall promptly deliver the proceeds to Lender. Notwithstanding anything in this Instrument or at law or in equity to the contrary, none of the insurance proceeds paid to Lender shall be deemed trust funds and Lender may dispose of these proceeds as provided in this Section. Borrower expressly assumes all risk of loss from any Damage, whether or not insurable or insured against.
Lender's Rights
(c) . Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 3.07(b) above, Lender shall make the Net Proceeds (defined below) available to Borrower for Restoration if: (i) there shall then be no Event of Default; (ii) Lender shall be satisfied that (A) Restoration can and will be completed at least six (6) months prior to the maturity of the Note, and (B) Leases which are terminated or terminable as a result of the Damage cover an aggregate of less than fifteen percent (15%) of the total rentable square footage contained in the Property at the closing of the Loan or such Tenants agree in writing to continue their Leases; (iii) Borrower shall have entered into a general construction contract acceptable in all respects to Lender for Restoration, which contract must include provision for commercially reasonable retainage; and (iv) in Lender's reasonable judgment, after Restoration has been completed, the net cash flow of the Property will be sufficient to cover all costs and operating expenses of the Property, including payments due and reserves required under the Documents. Notwithstanding any provision of this Instrument to the contrary, Lender shall not be obligated to make any portion of the Net Proceeds available for Restoration (whether as a result of Damage or a Taking) unless, at the time of the disbursement request, Lender has determined in its reasonable discretion that (y) Restoration can be completed at a cost which does not exceed the aggregate of the remaining Net Proceeds and any funds
Application of Proceeds to Restoration
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
deposited with Lender by Borrower ("") and (z) the aggregate of any loss of rental income insurance proceeds which the carrier has acknowledged to be payable ("") and any funds deposited with Lender by Borrower are sufficient to cover all costs and operating expenses of the Property, including payments due and reserves required under the Documents.
Additional Funds
Rent Loss Proceeds
(d) . If Lender elects or is required to make insurance proceeds or the Award (defined below), as the case may be, available for Restoration, Lender shall, through a disbursement procedure established by Lender, periodically make available to Borrower in installments the net amount of all insurance proceeds or the Award, as the case may be, received by Lender after deduction of all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by Lender in connection with the collection and disbursement of such proceeds ("") and, if any, the Additional Funds. The amounts periodically disbursed to Borrower shall be based upon the amounts currently due under the construction contract for Restoration and Lender's receipt of (i) appropriate lien waivers, (ii) a certification of the percentage of Restoration completed by an architect or engineer acceptable to Lender, and (iii) title insurance protection against materialmen's and mechanics' liens. At Lender's election, a disbursing agent selected by Lender shall disburse such funds, and Borrower shall pay such agent's reasonable fees and expenses. The Net Proceeds, Rent Loss Proceeds, and any Additional Funds shall constitute additional security for the Loan and Borrower shall execute, deliver, file and/or record, at its expense, such instruments as Lender requires to grant to Lender a perfected, first-priority security interest in these funds. If the Net Proceeds are made available for Restoration and (x) Borrower refuses or fails to complete the Restoration, (y) an Event of Default occurs, or (z) the Net Proceeds or Additional Funds are not applied to Restoration, then any undisbursed portion may, at Lender's option, be applied to the Obligations in any order of priority, and any such application to principal shall be deemed a voluntary prepayment subject to the Prepayment Premium.
Disbursement of Proceeds
Net Proceeds
Section 3.08
Condemnation
.
(a) . Borrower will promptly notify Lender of any threatened or instituted proceedings for the condemnation or taking by eminent domain of the Property including any change in any street (whether as to grade, access, or otherwise) (a ""). Borrower shall, at its expense, (i) diligently prosecute these proceedings, (ii) deliver to Lender copies of all papers served in connection therewith, and (iii) consult and cooperate with Lender in the handling of these proceedings. No settlement of these proceedings shall be made by Borrower without Lender's prior written consent not to be unreasonably withheld. Lender may participate in these proceedings (but shall not be obligated to do so) and Borrower will sign and deliver all instruments requested by Lender to permit this participation.
Borrower's Obligations
Taking
(b) . All condemnation awards, judgments, decrees, or proceeds of sale in lieu of condemnation ("") are assigned and shall be paid, to Lender. Borrower authorizes Lender to collect and receive them, to give receipts for them, to accept them in the amount received without question or appeal, and/or to appeal any judgment, decree, or award. Borrower will sign and deliver all instruments requested by Lender to permit these actions.
Lender's Rights to Proceeds
Award
(c) . Lender may apply any Award in any order it determines (1) to reimburse Lender for all Costs related to collection of the Award and (2) subject to Section 3.08(d) and at Lender's option, to (A) payment (without any Prepayment Premium) of all or part of the Obligations, whether or not then due and payable, in the order determined by Lender (provided that if any Obligations remain outstanding after this payment, the unpaid Obligations shall continue in full force and effect and Borrower shall not be excused in the payment thereof, except that the monthly principal and interest payment amount due under Section 1(b) of the Note may be adjusted in accordance with the provisions of Section 1(e) of the Note); (B) the cure of any Event of Default under the Documents; or (C) the Restoration. If Borrower receives any Award, Borrower shall promptly deliver such Award to Lender.
Application of Award
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
Notwithstanding anything in this Instrument or at law or in equity to the contrary, none of the Award paid to Lender shall be deemed trust funds and Lender may dispose of these proceeds as provided in this Section.
(d) . Lender shall permit the application of the Award to Restoration if: (i) no more than (A) twenty percent (20%) of the gross area of the Improvements; or (B) twenty percent (20%) of the parking spaces is affected by the Taking, (ii) the amount of the loss does not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the original amount of the Note; (iii) the Taking does not affect access to the Property from any public right-of-way; (iv) there is no Event of Default at the time of the Taking or the application of the Award; (v) after Restoration, the Property and its use will be in compliance with all Laws; (vi) in Lender's reasonable judgment, Restoration is practical and can be completed at least six (6) months prior to the maturity of the Note; (vii) the Tenants under Major Leases (as defined in the Assignment) agree in writing to continue their Leases without abatement of rent (other than for any portion of their Lease premises which was taken in the Taking); (viii) Borrower shall have entered into a general construction contract acceptable in all respects to Lender for Restoration, which contract must include provision for commercially reasonable retainage; and (ix) in Lender's reasonable judgment, after Restoration has been completed the net cash flow of the Property will be sufficient to cover all costs and operating expenses of the Property, including payments due and reserves required under the Documents. Any portion of the Award that is (i) for loss of value or property or (ii) in excess of the cost of any Restoration permitted above, may, in Lender's sole discretion, be applied against the Obligations or paid to Borrower. If the Award is disbursed to Borrower under the provisions of this Section 3.08(d), then such Award shall be disbursed to Borrower in accordance with the terms and conditions of Section 3.07(d).
Application of Award to Restoration
(e) . Notwithstanding any Taking, Borrower shall continue to pay and perform the Obligations as provided in the Documents, as they may be adjusted pursuant to Paragraph 1(e) of the Note. Any reduction in the Obligations due to application of the Award shall take effect only upon Lender's actual receipt and application of the Award to the Obligations. If the Property shall have been foreclosed, sold pursuant to any power of sale granted hereunder, or transferred by deed-in-lieu of foreclosure prior to Lender's actual receipt of the Award, Lender may apply the Award received to the extent of any deficiency upon such sale and Costs incurred by Lender in connection with such sale.
Effect on the Obligations
Borrower shall pay when due all claims and demands of mechanics, materialmen, laborers and others for any work performed or materials delivered for the Property or the Improvements (collectively, ""); provided, however, Borrower shall have the right to contest in good faith any such claim or demand, so long as it does so diligently, by appropriate proceedings and without prejudice to Lender and provided that neither the Property nor any interest therein would be in any danger of sale, loss or forfeiture as a result of such proceeding or contest. In the event Borrower shall contest any such claim or demand, Borrower shall promptly notify Lender of such contest and thereafter shall, upon Lender's request, promptly provide a bond, cash deposit or other security satisfactory to Lender to protect Lender's interest and security should the contest be unsuccessful, unless the lien has already been bonded off in which case no additional security shall be required. If Borrower shall fail to discharge or provide security against any such claim or demand within sixty (60) days after the filing of a mechanic's lien, Lender or Trustee may do so and any and all expenses incurred by Lender or Trustee, together with interest thereon at the Default Rate from the date incurred by Lender until actually paid by Borrower, shall be immediately paid by Borrower on demand and shall be secured by this Instrument and by all other Documents securing all or any part of the Obligations. Borrower shall, at its sole expense, do everything necessary to preserve the lien and security interest created by this Instrument and its priority. Nothing in the Documents shall be deemed or construed as constituting the consent or request by Lender or Trustee, express or implied, to any contractor, subcontractor, laborer, mechanic or materialman for the performance of any labor or the furnishing of any
Section 3.09
Liens and Liabilities.
Property Payables
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
material for any improvement, construction, alteration, or repair of the Property. Borrower further agrees that neither Lender nor Trustee stands in any fiduciary relationship to Borrower. Any contributions made, directly or indirectly, to Borrower by or on behalf of any of its partners, members, principals or any party related to such parties shall be treated as equity or Affiliate Loans (to the extent permitted by Section 5.01 hereof) and shall be subordinate and inferior to the rights of Lender under the Documents.
At Lender's option (i) following an Event of Default (unless Lender has accepted cure of such Event of Default by specific written statement from Lender to Borrower acknowledging Lender's acceptance of such cure, and Borrower specifically understands and agrees that Lender shall have no obligation to accept the cure of any Event of Default) or (ii) in the event that Borrower fails, within thirty (30) days after request from Lender, to timely deliver to Lender evidence of payment of Assessments or evidence that required insurance policies have been renewed, as required by Section 3.03(a) and Section 3.06(d), respectively, Borrower shall make monthly deposits ("") with Lender equal to one-twelfth (1/12) of the annual Assessments (except for income taxes, franchise taxes, ground rents, maintenance charges and utility charges) and the premiums for insurance required under Section 3.06 (the "") together with amounts sufficient to pay these items thirty (30) days before they are due (collectively, the ""). Lender shall estimate the amount of the Deposits until ascertainable. At that time, Borrower shall promptly deposit any deficiency. Borrower shall promptly notify Lender of any changes to the amounts, schedules and instructions for payment of the Impositions. Borrower authorizes Lender or its agent to obtain the bills for Assessments directly from the appropriate tax or governmental authority. All Deposits are pledged to Lender and shall constitute additional security for the Obligations. The Deposits shall be held by Lender without interest (except to the extent required under Laws) and may be commingled with other funds. If (i) there is no Event of Default at the time of payment, (ii) Borrower has delivered bills or invoices to Lender for the Impositions in sufficient time to pay them when due, and (iii) the Deposits are sufficient to pay the Impositions or Borrower has deposited the necessary additional amount, then Lender shall pay the Impositions prior to their due date. Any Deposits remaining after payment of the Impositions shall, at Lender's option, be credited against the Deposits required for the following year or paid to Borrower. If an Event of Default occurs, the Deposits may, at Lender's option, be applied to the Obligations in any order of priority. Any application to principal shall be deemed a voluntary prepayment subject to the Prepayment Premium. Borrower shall not claim any credit against the principal and interest due under the Note for the Deposits. Upon an assignment or other transfer of this Instrument, Lender may pay over the Deposits in its possession to the assignee or transferee and then it shall be completely released from all liability with respect to the Deposits. Borrower shall look solely to the assignee or transferee with respect thereto. This provision shall apply to every transfer of the Deposits to a new assignee or transferee. Subject to Article V, a transfer of title to the Land shall automatically transfer to the new owner the beneficial interest in the Deposits. Upon full payment and satisfaction of this Instrument or, at Lender's option, at any prior time, the balance of the Deposits in Lender's possession shall be paid over to the record owner of the Property and no other party shall have any right or claim to the Deposits. Lender may transfer all its duties under this Section to such servicer or financial institution as Lender may periodically designate and Borrower agrees to make the Deposits to such servicer or institution.
Section 3.10
Tax and Insurance Deposits.
Deposits
Insurance Premiums
Impositions
Section 3.11
ERISA
.
(a) Borrower understands and acknowledges that, as of the date hereof, the source of funds from which Lender is extending the Loan will include one or more of the following accounts: (i) an "insurance company general account," as that term is defined in Prohibited Transaction Class Exemption ("") 95-60 (60 Fed. Reg. 35925 (Jul. 12, 1995)), as to which Lender meets the conditions for relief in Sections I and IV of PTE 95-60, and as to which no plan exceeds the 10% limit in Section I(a) of PTE 95-60; (ii) [INTENTIONALLY OMITTED]; and (iii) one or more insurance company separate accounts maintained solely in connection with fixed contractual obligations of the insurance company, under which the amounts payable or credited to the plan are not affected in any manner by the investment performance of the separate account.
PTE
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
(b) Borrower represents and warrants to Lender that (i) Borrower is not an "employee benefit plan" as defined in Section 3(3) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended (""), or a "governmental plan" within the meaning of Section 3(32) of ERISA; (ii) [INTENTIONALLY OMITTED]; (iii) Borrower is not subject to state statutes regulating investments and fiduciary obligations with respect to governmental plans, or if subject to such statutes, is not in violation thereof in the execution of the Documents and the making of the Loan thereunder; (iv) the assets of Borrower do not constitute "plan assets" of one or more plans within the meaning of 29 C.F.R. Section 2510.3-101; and (v) one or more of the following circumstances is true: (1) equity interests in Borrower are publicly offered securities, within the meaning of 29 C.F.R. Section 2510.3-101(b)(2); (2) less than twenty-five percent (25%) of all equity interests in Borrower are held by "benefit plan investors" within the meaning of 29 C.F.R. Section 2510.3-101(f)(2); or (3) Borrower qualifies as an "operating company," a "venture capital operating company" or a "real estate operating company" within the meaning of 29 C.F.R. Section 2510.3-101(c), (d) or (e), respectively.
ERISA
(c) Borrower shall deliver to Lender such certifications and/or other evidence periodically requested by Lender, in its sole discretion, to verify the representations and warranties in Section 3.11(b) above. Failure to deliver these certifications or evidence, breach of these representations and warranties, or consummation of any transaction which would cause this Instrument or any exercise of Lender's rights under this Instrument to (i) constitute a non-exempt prohibited transaction under ERISA or (ii) violate ERISA or any state statute regulating governmental plans (collectively, a ""), shall be an Event of Default. Notwithstanding anything in the Documents to the contrary, no sale, assignment, or transfer of any direct or indirect right, title, or interest in Borrower or the Property (including creation of a junior lien, encumbrance or leasehold interest) shall be permitted which would, in Lender's opinion, negate Borrower's representations in this Section or cause a Violation. Except with respect to transfers not subject to Lender consent pursuant to Section 5.01(b) hereof (but without limiting the certification requirements set forth in Section 5.01), at least fifteen (15) days before consummation of any of the foregoing, Borrower shall obtain from the proposed transferee or lienholder (i) a certification to Lender that the representations and warranties of Section 3.11(b) will be true after consummation and (ii) an agreement to comply with this Section 3.11.
Violation
Section 3.12
Environmental Representations, Warranties, and Covenants
.
(a) . Borrower represents and warrants, to the best of Borrower's knowledge and additionally based upon the environmental site assessment report of the Property prepared by ATC Associates Inc., dated February 21, 2011 (the ""), that except as disclosed in the Environmental Report: (i) there are no Hazardous Materials (defined below) or underground storage tanks affecting the Property ("" shall mean "in, on, under, stored, used or migrating to or from the Property") except for (A) routine office, cleaning, janitorial and other materials and supplies necessary to operate the Property for its current use and (B) Hazardous Materials that are (1) in compliance with Environmental Laws (defined below), (2) have all required permits, and (3) are in only the amounts necessary to operate the Property; (ii) there are no past, present or threatened Releases (defined below) of Hazardous Materials in violation of any Environmental Law affecting the Property except for Releases which have been fully remediated in accordance with Environmental Laws; (iii) there is no past or present non-compliance with Environmental Laws or with permits issued pursuant thereto except for Releases which have been fully remediated in accordance with Environmental Laws; (iv) Borrower does not know of, and has not received, any written or oral notice or communication from any person relating to Hazardous Materials affecting the Property; and (v) Borrower has provided to Lender, in writing, all information relating to violations of Environmental Laws affecting
Environmental Representations and Warranties
Environmental Report
affecting the Property
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
the Property known to Borrower or contained in Borrower's files (unless such violations have been cured in accordance with Environmental Laws). "" means any present and future federal, state and local laws, statutes, ordinances, rules, regulations, standards, policies and other government directives or requirements, as well as common law, that apply to Borrower or the Property and relate to Hazardous Materials including the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act and the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act. "" shall mean petroleum and petroleum products and compounds containing them, including gasoline, diesel fuel and oil; explosives, flammable materials; radioactive materials; polychlorinated biphenyls ("") and compounds containing them; lead and lead-based paint; Microbial Matter, infectious substances, asbestos or asbestos-containing materials in any form that is or could become friable; underground or above-ground storage tanks, whether empty or containing any substance; any substance the presence of which on the Property is prohibited by any federal, state or local authority; any substance that requires special handling; and any other material or substance now or in the future defined as a "hazardous substance," "hazardous material," "hazardous waste," "toxic substance," "toxic pollutant," "contaminant," or "pollutant" within the meaning of any Environmental Law. "" of any Hazardous Materials includes any release, deposit, discharge, emission, leaking, spilling, seeping, migrating, pumping, pouring, escaping, dumping, disposing or other movement of Hazardous Materials. "" shall mean the presence of fungi or bacterial matter which reproduces through the release of spores or the splitting of cells, including, but not limited to, mold, mildew and viruses, whether or not such Microbial Matter is living.
Environmental Law
Hazardous Materials
PCBs
Release
Microbial Matter
(b) . Borrower covenants and agrees that: (i) Borrower shall use and operate (and shall use commercially reasonable efforts to cause all tenants, invitees and other parties having access to the Premises to use and operate) the Property in compliance with all Environmental Laws and required permits; (ii) it shall use all reasonable efforts to prevent Releases of Hazardous Materials on or in the operation of the Property in violation of Environmental Laws; (iii) there shall be no Hazardous Materials on or in the operation of the Property except (A) routine office, cleaning and janitorial supplies, (B) in compliance with all Environmental Laws, (C) in compliance with all required permits, and (D) (1) in only the amounts necessary to operate the Property or (2) as shall have been fully disclosed to and approved by Lender in writing; (iv) Borrower shall keep the Property free and clear of all liens and encumbrances imposed by any Environmental Laws due to any act or omission by Borrower or any person (the ""); (v) Borrower shall, at its sole expense, fully and expeditiously cooperate in all activities performed under Section 3.12(c) including providing all relevant information and making knowledgeable persons available for interviews; (vi) Borrower shall, at its sole expense, (A) cause to be performed any environmental site assessment or other investigation of environmental conditions at the Property upon Lender's request based on Lender's reasonable belief that the Property is not in compliance with all Environmental Laws, (B) share with Lender the results and reports and Lender and the Indemnified Parties (defined below) shall be entitled to rely on such results and reports, and (C) complete any remediation of Hazardous Materials affecting the Property or other actions required by any Environmental Laws; (vii) Borrower shall use commercially reasonable efforts to prevent any Tenant or other user of the Property from violating any Environmental Law; (viii) Borrower shall immediately notify Lender in writing after it becomes aware of (A) the presence, Release, or threatened Release of Hazardous Materials affecting the Property, (B) any non-compliance of the Property with any Environmental Laws, (C) any actual or potential Environmental Lien, (D) any required or proposed remediation of environmental conditions relating to the Property, or (E) any written communication or notice from any person relating to Hazardous Materials, or any oral communication relating to or alleging any violation or potential violation of Environmental Law, and (ix) if an Asbestos Operation and Maintenance Plan and any other Operation and Maintenance Plan (collectively, the "") is in effect (or required by Lender to be implemented) at the time of the closing of the Loan, then Borrower shall, at its sole expense, implement and continue the O&M Plan (with any modifications required to comply with applicable Laws) until payment and full satisfaction of the Obligations.
Environmental Covenants
Environmental Liens
O&M Plan
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
(c) . Lender and any person designated by Lender may enter the Property to assess the environmental condition of the Property and its use including (i) conducting any environmental assessment or audit (the scope of which shall be determined by Lender) and (ii) taking samples of soil, groundwater or other water, air, or building materials, and conducting other invasive testing at all reasonable times when (A) an Event of Default has occurred under the Documents, (B) Lender reasonably believes that a Release has occurred or the Property is not in compliance with all Environmental Laws, or (C) the Loan is being considered for sale (any out-of-pocket expenses incurred in connection with the entry under clause (C) only shall be at Lender's expense). Borrower shall cooperate with and provide access to Lender and such person, and/or grant licenses to Lender enabling Lender to conduct any testing and remediation that Lender is entitled to undertake pursuant to the terms hereof.
Lender's Rights
(d) . This Section 3.12 (and the Environmental Indemnity) shall terminate if: (i) the Loan is paid in full in accordance with the terms of the Documents other than through or as a result of Lender taking enforcement action (including, but not limited to, foreclosure, trustee's sale, or deed-in-lieu of foreclosure), (ii) Borrower requests in writing, pursuant to a notice delivered to Lender not sooner than twenty-four (24) months after the date of the payment of the Loan in full by Borrower pursuant to the terms of the Documents (other than through or as a result of Lender taking enforcement action, including, but not limited to, foreclosure, trustee's sale, or deed-in-lieu of foreclosure), that Lender provide the Confirmation of Termination (as defined below), (iii) at the time Borrower requests that Lender deliver the Confirmation of Termination, Borrower shall deliver to Lender a then-current environmental report of the Property from an environmental consultant acceptable to Lender showing neither any violation of Environmental Laws nor the presence of any Hazardous Materials on the Property in violation of Environmental Laws and in all other respects acceptable in form and substance to Lender, and (iv) there is no pending or threatened environmental claim, investigation, violation or action related to the Property or related to this Section 3.12 (or the Environmental Indemnity) at the time Borrower requests Lender to provide the Confirmation of Termination. If each of the foregoing conditions is complied with, then Lender shall provide Borrower with the Confirmation of Termination. The "" shall mean that Lender shall provide Borrower with a written confirmation that this Section 3.12 of the Instrument and the Environmental Indemnity are terminated.
Confirmation of Termination
Confirmation of Termination
Unless directed otherwise in writing by Lender, all payments due under the Documents shall be made by electronic funds transfer debit entries to Borrower's account at an Automated Clearing House member bank satisfactory to Lender or by similar electronic transfer process selected by Lender. Each payment due under the Documents shall be initiated by Lender through the Automated Clearing House network (or similar electronic process) for settlement on the Due Date (as defined in the Note) for the payment. Borrower shall, at Borrower's sole cost and expense, direct its bank in writing to permit such electronic fund transfer debit entries (or similar electronic transfer) to be made by Lender. Prior to each payment Due Date under the Documents, Borrower shall deposit and/or maintain sufficient funds in Borrower's account to cover each debit entry. Any charges or costs, if any, by Borrower's bank for the foregoing shall be paid by Borrower.
Section 3.13
Electronic Payments.
Borrower shall allow Lender and any person designated by Lender to enter upon the Property and conduct tests or inspect the Property at all reasonable times. Borrower shall assist Lender and such person in effecting said inspection.
Section 3.14
Inspection.
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
Section 3.15
Records, Reports, and Audits
.
(a) . (i) Borrower shall maintain complete and accurate books and records with respect to all operations of, or transactions involving, the Property. Annually (and upon Lender's request, quarterly) Borrower shall furnish Lender financial statements for the most current fiscal year (including a schedule of all related Obligations and contingent liabilities) for (A) Borrower, (B) any general partner or managing member of Borrower, and any general partner or managing member of any general partner of Borrower, (C) Saul Centers, Inc. ("") and any other guarantors or sureties of the Note, and (D) any Major Tenants to the extent Borrower can obtain them with commercially reasonable efforts. Annually (and upon Lender's request, quarterly), Borrower shall furnish Lender (1) operating statements showing cash flow and capital expenditures for the Property including income and expenses (before and after Obligations service), major capital improvements, a schedule showing tenant sales and percentage rent for retail properties where sales are reported, and the average daily rate and average daily occupancy for hotel properties; (2) copies of paid tax receipts for the Property; (3) a certified rent roll including security deposits held, the expiration of the terms of the Leases, and identification and explanation of any Tenants to whom Borrower has sent a notice of default, which default has not been cured; (4) a budget showing projected income and expenses (before and after Obligations service) for the next twelve (12) month budget period; (5) any appraisals of the Property performed on behalf of any Recourse Parties and/or SHLP during the previous year; and (6) upon Lender's request following an Event of Default, (x) a schedule showing Borrower's tax basis in the Property, (y) the distribution of economic interests in the Property, and (z) copies of any other loan documents affecting the Property.
Records and Reports
SCI
(ii) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Section 3.15 (a) (i) above, Borrower shall, until the Property has achieved the Targeted Leasing Standard (as defined below), deliver the following information to Lender within sixty (60) days following the end of each calendar quarter:
(1) An operating statement showing cash flow and capital expenditures for the Property including income and expenses (before and after the debt service on the Loan), major capital improvements, and if applicable, a schedule showing tenant sales and percentage rent for retail properties;
(2) A certified rent roll including security deposits held, the expiration of the terms of the Leases, and identification and explanation of any tenants in default;
(3) Borrower's written analysis (with the format of such analysis being reasonably satisfactory to Lender) of (A) the Property's actual property performance during the most recent quarter, including leasing velocity, rental rates and cash flow in comparison to the pro forma Borrower delivered to Lender prior to date of this Instrument, (B) the concessions granted in connection with Leases entered into during the most recent quarter, the average rental rate achieved on such Leases, and projections of leasing expected to be achieved during the current quarter as well as projections of concessions that will be offered during the current quarter, and (C) whether Borrower is on time and on budget with respect to capital improvements to the Property, renovation and rehabilitation expenses, and tenant finish costs; and
(4) A comparison of the budget for the Property to actual quarterly results with both monthly and year-to-date information included.
The "" shall be achieved when the Property is ninety-two percent (92%) leased to tenants in physical occupancy, paying full rent, open for business (with respect to retail tenant only), with credit reasonably acceptable to Lender (with respect to office and retail tenants under Leases first entered into after the Closing of the Loan only), and not in monetary default or material non-monetary default under the terms of such tenant's Lease and the Debt Service Coverage Ratio (as defined below) is at least 1.35 to 1.00. The term "" shall mean the ratio, as
Targeted Leasing Standard
Debt Service Coverage Ratio
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
reasonably determined by Lender, calculated by dividing (i) net operating income ("") by (ii) total annual debt service (""). NOI is the gross annual income realized from operations of the Property for the applicable twelve (12) month period after subtracting all necessary and ordinary operating expenses (both fixed and variable) for that twelve (12) month period (assuming for expense purposes only that the Property is ninety-five percent (95%) leased and occupied if actual leasing is less than ninety-five percent [95%]), including, without limitation, utilities, administrative, cleaning, landscaping, security, repairs, and maintenance, ground rent payments, management fees, reserves for replacements, real estate and other taxes (on a fully-assessed basis after transfer of the Property), assessments and insurance, but excluding deduction for federal, state and other income taxes, debt service expense, depreciation or amortization of capital expenditures (including but not limited to initial construction), and other similar non-cash items. Gross income shall be based on the cash actually received for the preceding twelve months and projected income based on leases in place for the next succeeding twelve months, and ordinary operating expenses shall not be prepaid. Documentation of NOI and expenses shall be certified by an officer of Borrower with detail satisfactory to Lender and shall be subject to the approval of Lender. TADS shall mean the aggregate debt service payments for any given calendar year on the Loan and on all other indebtedness secured, or to be secured, by any part of the Property. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this paragraph, for the purposes of calculating NOI in connection with determining whether the Targeted Leasing Standard has been achieved, or the minimum Debt Service Coverage Ratio has been achieved pursuant to Section 2(c) of the Escrow Agreement (Debt Service) or Section 24(c) of the Partial Recourse Guaranty, gross annual income realized from operations of the Property shall be calculated based on the cash actually received for the preceding three months and then annualized. For the avoidance of doubt, the immediately preceding sentence shall only be applicable in connection with calculations made pursuant to this Section 3.15(a)(ii) or elsewhere in the Documents where this Section 3.15 is specifically referenced in connection with the calculation of NOI.
NOI
TADS
(b) . All of the reports, statements, and items required under this Section shall be (i) certified as being true, correct, and accurate by an authorized person, partner, or officer of the delivering party or, at the deliverer's option, audited by a Certified Public Accountant; (ii) satisfactory to Lender in form and substance (Lender acknowledges that the form and substance of the financial statements submitted to Lender in connection with the Application were satisfactory); and (iii) delivered within (A) ninety (90) days after the end of Borrower's fiscal year for annual reports and (B) forty-five (45) days after the end of each calendar quarter for quarterly reports. If any one report, statement, or item is not received by Lender on its due date, a late fee of Five Hundred and No/100 Dollars ($500.00) per month shall be due and payable by Borrower; provided, that before the first late fee is imposed each calendar year, Lender will give Borrower written notice of such failure and fifteen (15) days to deliver such report, statement or item. If any one report, statement, or item is not received after the expiration of (y) thirty (30) days after written notice from Lender (the "") and (z) ten (10) days after delivery of a second written notice from Lender (the ""), which Second Notice shall not be delivered before the date that is thirty (30) days after delivery of the First Notice, Lender may immediately declare an Event of Default under the Documents. Borrower shall (i) provide Lender with such additional financial, management, or other information regarding Borrower, the sole member of Borrower, or the Property, as Lender may reasonably request and (ii) upon Lender's request, deliver all items required by Section 3.15 in an electronic format (i.e. on computer disks) or by electronic transmission acceptable to Lender.
Delivery of Reports
First Notice
Second Notice
(c) . Borrower shall allow Lender or any person designated by Lender to examine, audit, and make copies of all such books and records and all supporting data at the place where these items are located at all reasonable times after reasonable advance notice; provided that no notice shall be required after any Event of Default under the Documents. Borrower shall assist Lender in effecting such examination. Upon five (5) days' prior notice, Lender may inspect and make copies of Borrower's or the sole member of Borrower's income tax returns with respect to the Property for the purpose of verifying any items referenced in this Section.
Inspection of Records
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
Within ten (10) days after Lender's request, Borrower shall furnish a written certification to Lender and any Investors (defined below) as to (a) the amount of the Obligations outstanding; (b) the interest rate, terms of payment, and maturity date of the Note; (c) the date to which payments have been paid under the Note; (d) whether any offsets or defenses exist against the Obligations and a detailed description of any listed; (e) whether all Leases are in full force and effect and have not been modified (or if modified, setting forth all modifications); (f) the date to which the Rents have been paid; (g) whether, to the best knowledge of Borrower, any material defaults exist under the Leases and a detailed description of any listed; (h) the security deposit held by Borrower under each Lease and that such amount is the amount required under such Lease; (i) whether there are any defaults (or events which with the passage of time and/or giving of notice would constitute a default) under the Documents and a detailed description of any listed; (j) whether the Documents are in full force and effect; and (k) any other matters reasonably requested by Lender related to the Leases, the Obligations, the Property, or the Documents. For all non-residential properties and promptly upon Lender's request, Borrower shall use good faith, commercially reasonable efforts to deliver a written certification to Lender and Investors from Tenants specified by Lender that: (a) their Leases are in full force and effect; (b) there are no defaults (or events which with the passage of time and/or notice would constitute a default) under their Leases and a detailed description of any listed; (c) none of the Rents have been paid more than one month in advance; (d) there are no offsets or defenses against the Rents and a detailed description of any listed; and (e) any other matters reasonably requested by Lender related to the Leases; provided, however, that Borrower shall not have to pay money to a Tenant to obtain such certification, but it will deliver a landlord's certification for any certification it cannot obtain.
Section 3.16
Borrower's Certificates.
Section 3.17
Intentionally Deleted.
No other security now existing or taken later to secure the Obligations shall be affected by the execution of the Documents and all additional security shall be held as cumulative. The taking of additional security, execution of partial releases, or extension of the time for the payment obligations of Borrower shall not diminish the effect and lien of this Instrument and shall not affect the liability or obligations of any maker or guarantor. Neither the acceptance of the Documents nor their enforcement shall prejudice or affect Lender's or Trustee's right to realize upon or enforce any other security now or later held by Lender or Trustee. Lender and/or Trustee may enforce the Documents or any other security in such order and manner as either of them may determine in its respective discretion.
Section 3.18
Additional Security.
Borrower shall take all necessary actions to (i) keep valid and effective the lien and rights of Lender and Trustee under the Documents and (ii) protect the lawful owner of the Documents. Promptly upon request by Lender or Trustee, and at Borrower's expense, Borrower shall execute additional instruments and take such actions as Lender and/or Trustee reasonably believes are necessary or desirable to (a) maintain or grant Lender and Trustee a first-priority, perfected lien on the Property, (b) grant to Lender and Trustee, to the fullest extent permitted by Laws, the right to foreclose on, or transfer title to, the Property non-judicially, (c) correct any error or omission in the Documents, and (d) effect the intent of the Documents, including filing/recording the Documents, additional mortgages or deeds of trust, financing statements, and other instruments.
Section 3.19
Further Acts.
Section 3.20
Compliance with Anti-Terrorism Regulations.
(a) Borrower hereby covenants and agrees that (i) neither Borrower nor any guarantor, will knowingly conduct business with or engage in any transaction with any person or entity named on any of the OFAC Lists or any person or entity included in, owned by, controlled by, acting for or on behalf of,
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
providing assistance, support, sponsorship, or services of any kind to, or otherwise associated with any of the persons or entities referred to or described in the OFAC Lists; and (ii) Borrower shall take such actions as may be required by Laws to prevent any persons or entities holding any legal or beneficial interests whatsoever in Borrower or any guarantor (whether directly or indirectly), from knowingly conducting business with or engaging in any transaction with any person or entity named on any of the OFAC Lists or any person or entity included in, owned by, controlled by, acting for, or on behalf of, providing assistance, support, sponsorship or services of any kind to, or otherwise associated with any of the persons or entities referred to or described in the OFAC Lists.
(b) Borrower hereby covenants and agrees that it will comply at all times with the requirements of Executive Order 13224; the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, 50 U.S.C. Sections 1701-06; the United and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001, Pub. L. 107-56; the Iraqi Sanctions Act, Pub. L. 101-513, 104 Stat. 2047-55; the United Nations Participation Act, 22 U.S.C. Section 287c; the Antiterrorism and Effective Death Penalty Act, (enacting 8 U.S.C. Section 219, 18 U.S.C. Section 2332d, and 18 U.S.C. Section 2339b); the International Security and Development Cooperation Act, 22 U.S.C. Section 2349 aa-9; the Terrorism Sanctions Regulations, 31 C.F.R. Part 595; the Terrorism List Governments Sanctions Regulations, 31 C.F.R. Part 596; and the Foreign Terrorist Organizations Sanctions Regulations, 31 C.F.R. Part 597 and any similar laws or regulations currently in force or hereafter enacted (collectively, the "").
Anti-Terrorism Regulations
(c) Borrower hereby covenants and agrees that if it becomes aware or receives any notice that Borrower, any guarantor or the Property, or any person or entity holding any legal or beneficial interest whatsoever (whether directly or indirectly) in Borrower, any guarantor or in the Property, is named on any of the OFAC Lists (such occurrence, an ""), Borrower will immediately (i) give notice to Lender of such OFAC Violation, and (ii) comply with all Laws applicable to such OFAC Violation (regardless of whether the party included on any of the OFAC Lists is located within the jurisdiction of the United States of America), including, without limitation, the Anti-Terrorism Regulations, and Borrower hereby authorizes and consents to Lender's taking any and all steps Lender deems necessary, in its sole discretion, to comply with all Laws applicable to any such OFAC Violation, including, without limitation, the requirements of the Anti-Terrorism Regulations (including the "freezing" and/or "blocking" of assets).
OFAC Violation
(d) Upon Lender's request from time to time during the term of the Loan, Borrower agrees to deliver a certification confirming that the representations and warranties set forth in Section 2.09 above remain true and correct as of the date of such certificate and confirming Borrower's and any guarantor's compliance with this Section 3.20.
Borrower hereby covenants and agrees that (i) during the term of the Loan, Borrower shall not own any assets in addition to the Property, (ii) the Property shall remain as a single property or project comprised of three (3) separate buildings (prior to any Partial Release that may occur pursuant to Section 5.03 hereof), and (iii) during the term of the Loan, the Property shall generate substantially all of the gross income of Borrower and there shall be no substantial business being conducted, either directly or indirectly, by Borrower other than the business of operating the Property and the activities incidental thereto.
Section 3.21
Compliance with Property as Single Asset.
Intentionally Deleted.
Section 3.22
Intentionally Deleted.
Section 3.23
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
Borrower shall not be a "foreign person" within the meaning of Sections 1445 and 7701 of the Revenue Code. Borrower currently is a "disregarded entity" as defined in Section 1.1445-2(b)(2)(iii) of the Income Tax Regulations issued under the Revenue Code, and Borrower shall not change such tax status if such change would violate the provisions of Section 5.01 below.
Section 3.24
Tax Status of Borrower.
Borrower shall disclose to Lender any material fact that could cause any representation or warranty made in this Instrument to be materially misleading.
Section 3.25
Disclosure.
No portion of the Property will be purchased, improved, fixtured, equipped or furnished by Borrower with proceeds of any illegal activity, and neither Borrower nor Borrower shall engage in, and Borrower shall take commercially reasonable efforts to prevent others from engaging in, illegal activities at or on the Property.
Section 3.26
Illegal Activity.
Borrower shall pay all reasonable appraisal, recording, filing, registration, brokerage, abstract, title insurance (including premiums), title searches and examinations, surveys and similar data and assurances with respect to title, U.C.C. search, escrow, attorneys' (both in-house staff and retained attorneys), engineers', environmental engineers', environmental testing, and architects' fees, costs (including travel), expenses, and disbursements incurred by Borrower, Lender, or Trustee and reasonable fees charged by Lender and/or Trustee in connection with the granting, closing, servicing (other than routine loan servicing performed in the ordinary course of business and for the performance of which Lender is not routinely reimbursed by other borrowers in the ordinary course of Lender's business), and enforcement of the Loan and the Documents or other costs and expenses payable by Borrower or reimburseable to Lender under the Documents. The term "Costs" shall mean any of the foregoing incurred in connection with (a) any default by Borrower under the Documents, (b) the servicing (other than routine loan servicing performed in the ordinary course of business and for the performance of which Lender is not routinely reimbursed by other borrowers in the ordinary course of Lender's business) of the Loan, or (c) the exercise, enforcement, compromise, defense, litigation, or settlement of any of Lender's and Trustee's rights or remedies under the Documents or relating to the Loan or the Obligations. If Borrower fails to pay any amounts or perform any actions required under the Documents and the same is not cured within applicable grace or cure periods, Lender or Trustee may (but shall not be obligated to) advance sums to pay such amounts or perform such actions. Borrower grants Lender or Trustee the right to enter upon and take possession of the Property to remedy any such failure and the right to take such actions in Borrower's name if such failure is not cured within applicable grace or cure period. No advance or performance shall be deemed to have cured a default by Borrower. All (a) sums advanced by or payable to Lender or Trustee per this Section or under applicable Laws, (b) except as expressly provided in the Documents, payments due under the Documents which are not paid in full when due (subject to applicable notice, grace and cure periods), and (c) Costs, shall: (i) be deemed demand obligations, (ii) bear interest upon demand at the Default Rate until paid if not paid on demand, (iii) be part of, together with such interest, the Obligations, and (iv) be secured by the Documents. Lender or Trustee, upon making any such advance, shall also be subrogated to rights of the person receiving such advance.
Section 4.01
Expenses and Advances.
If any proceeds of the Note were used to extinguish, extend or renew any indebtedness on the Property, then, to the extent of the funds so used, (a) Lender and Trustee shall be subrogated to all liens, titles and interests existing on the Property held by the holder of such indebtedness and (b) these liens, titles and interests are not waived but rather shall (i) continue in full force and effect in favor of Lender and Trustee and (ii) are merged with the lien and security interest created by the Documents as cumulative security for the payment and performance of the Obligations.
Section 4.02
Subrogation.
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
Section 5.01
Due-on-Sale or Encumbrance.
(a) It shall be an Event of Default and, at the sole option of Lender, Lender may accelerate the Obligations and the entire Obligations (including any Prepayment Premium) shall become immediately due and payable, if, without Lender's prior written consent (which consent may be given or withheld for any or for no reason or given conditionally, in Lender's sole discretion) any of the following shall occur:
(i) Borrower shall sell, convey, assign, transfer, dispose of or be divested of its title to, convey security title to, mortgage, encumber or cause to be encumbered (except for the imposition of mechanics' or materialmen's liens which are removed, bonded off, or otherwise discharged within sixty (60) days after the filing of such mechanics' or materialmen's lien) the Property or any interest therein, in any manner or way, whether voluntary or involuntary; or
(ii) in the event of any merger, consolidation, sale, transfer, assignment, liquidation, or dissolution involving any or all of the assets of Borrower (except for the sale or transfer of physical personal property at the end of its useful life) or all or substantially all of the assets of any general partner or managing member of Borrower; or
(iii) in the event of the assignment, transfer, pledge, voluntary or involuntary sale, or encumbrance (or any of the foregoing at one time or over any period of time) of:
(1) (1) any ownership interests in Borrower, regardless of the type or form of entity of Borrower, (2) the voting stock or ownership interest of any corporation or limited liability company which is, respectively, general partner or managing member of Borrower or any corporation or limited liability company directly or indirectly owning ten percent (10%) or more of any such corporation or limited liability company, or (3) the ownership interests in any owner of ten percent (10%) or more of the beneficial interests of Borrower if Borrower is a trust; or
(2) any general partnership, managing member or controlling interest in (1) Borrower, (2) an entity which is in Borrower's chain of ownership and which is derivatively liable for the obligations of Borrower, or (3) any entity that has the right to participate directly or indirectly in the control of the management or operations of Borrower; or
(iv) in the event of the conversion of any general partnership interest in Borrower to a limited partnership interest, if Borrower is a partnership; or
(v) in the event of any substitution, removal, or resignation of any general partner of Borrower, if Borrower is a partnership; or
(vi) in the event of any change, removal, addition or resignation of a managing member of Borrower (or if no managing member, any member) if Borrower is a limited liability company; or
(vii) Borrower shall (A) guarantee, or otherwise agree to be liable for (whether conditionally or unconditionally), any obligations of any person or entity or (B) obtain any unsecured debt except for (1) customary and reasonable short-term trade payables obtained by Borrower and repaid by Borrower in the ordinary course of Borrower's business and (2) as long as there is no Event of Default under the Loan, loans to Borrower from natural persons or entities that directly or indirectly own an
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
interest in Borrower or share common ownership with Borrower (""), provided such Affiliate Loans shall be unsecured, shall be expressly subordinate in all respects to the Loan and the rights of Lender (which subordination shall be pursuant to documentation acceptable to Lender and shall contain such controls with respect to such subordination as Lender shall require, including, but not limited to, the payment obligations under such Affiliate Loans and the collection rights of the holders of such Affiliate Loans shall be subordinate in all respects to the Loan), and do not exceed in the aggregate Ten Million and No/100 Dollars ($10,000,000.00), and Borrower shall pay (x) all costs and expenses incurred by Lender for the processing of Borrower's request for such Affiliate Loans including a processing fee of $1,500 and (y) all other costs and expenses (including attorneys' fees and expenses for Lender's outside counsel) involved in such proposed Affiliate Loans, the drafting and negotiation of the subordination and intercreditor agreement (which shall provide for certain controls over such Affiliate Loans in the event of a bankruptcy of Borrower), and the preparation, review and negotiation of any other documents deemed reasonably necessary by Lender.
Affiliate Loans
(b) Notwithstanding any of the foregoing to the contrary, the provisions of Section 5.01(a) above will not apply to transfers by B.F. Saul II or B.F. Saul III of ownership interests in SHLP and SCI as a result of the death of either of them, or in connection with conveyances by either B.F. Saul II or B.F. Saul III in connection with estate planning to a spouse, son or daughter or descendant of either, or to a stepson or stepdaughter or descendant of either. Additionally, provided that no non-monetary Event of Default for which Borrower has received written notice from Lender or monetary Event of Default exists at the time of any transfer described in items (A) and (B) of this Section 5.01(b) below, then the provisions of Section 5.01(a) shall not apply to the following ( the ""):
Saul Permitted Transfers
(A) transfers of interests, admissions of additional members, limited partners or shareholders, and other structural changes, in SHLP or SCI, or any owner of a direct or indirect legal or beneficial interest in either of them, including, but not limited to, their respective partners, members or shareholders (a ""), provided after giving effect thereto (i) no Merger (as defined below) shall result from such Transfer, whether considered individually or when considered in the aggregate with other related transactions; (it being agreed by the parties that a Merger shall require the prior written consent of Lender, which consent shall be in the sole discretion of Lender); (ii) Borrower remains owned 100% by SHLP; (iii) B.F. Saul II or B.F. Saul III, each an individual, members of their respective families, trusts for the benefit of any of the same, and/or companies or entities controlled, directly or indirectly, by any of the same (individually or collectively the ""), continue to own, directly or indirectly, at least ten percent (10%) of the partnership units of SHLP, whether directly or indirectly through ownership of limited partnership interests or directly or indirectly through ownership of the common stock of SHLP's sole managing general partner, SCI on a fully diluted basis (the ""); and (iv) SCI remains at all times the sole managing general partner of SHLP, with not less than a 51% partnership interest in SHLP as general partner, and maintains, at all times, effective legal and day to day management control of Borrower, SHLP and the Property; and
Transfer
Saul Parties
Saul Parties' Minimum Ownership Percentage
(B) pledges of direct or indirect ownership interests in SHLP, including pledges of stock of SCI but excluding any pledge by SCI of its general partnership interest in SHLP (collectively, ""); provided that (i) the Saul Parties continue to own the Saul Parties' Minimum Ownership Percentage; (ii) SCI remains at all times the sole managing general partner of SHLP, with not less than a 51% partnership interest in SHLP as general partner, and maintains, at all times, effective legal and day to day management control of Borrower, SHLP and the Property; and (iii) no Merger (as defined below) shall result from such Transfer, whether considered individually or when
Permitted Pledges
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
considered in the aggregate with other related transactions; (it being agreed by the parties that a Merger shall require the prior written consent of Lender, which consent shall be in the sole discretion of Lender); it is further agreed that (i) any transfer of a direct or indirect interest in Borrower, whether through foreclosure of a pledge or transfer in lieu of foreclosure of a pledge or otherwise, that results in a violation of subparts (i), (ii) or (iii) above shall constitute an Event of Default under the Documents and shall not be deemed a Saul Permitted Transfer; and (y) any Permitted Pledge shall not be deemed a transfer of the interest so pledged and, therefore, shall not reduce the Saul Parties' Minimum Ownership Percentage unless and until it is foreclosed or transferred in lieu of foreclosure.
Borrower shall pay all costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees and disbursements, incurred by Lender in connection with any transfer.
(c) (i) Within thirty (30) days following a written request to Borrower by Lender, Borrower shall deliver to Lender (a) a statement showing the current direct ownership of the Borrower (and a then current organizational chart of SHLP and SCI), (b) a certification from Borrower that Borrower remains in compliance with Section 3.11 of this Instrument, (c) a certification from Borrower that Borrower remains in compliance with the representations, warranties and covenants in Section 2.09 and 3.20 of this Instrument; provided, however, that with respect to shareholders in SCI any such certification shall be made to Borrower's actual knowledge. Without limiting the provisions of the preceding sentence, in the event of a Saul Permitted Transfer, Borrower and the transferee of the ownership interests in Borrower being transferred shall be deemed to have made the certification, as of the date of the applicable transfer, described in subsections (b) and (c) (in the immediately preceding sentence) in favor of Lender, as a result of the transfer, and the acceptance thereof, of the applicable ownership interests in Borrower.
(ii) The term "" shall mean when (w) at one time or over time, fifty-one percent (51%) or more by value of the assets of SHLP and/or SCI are sold, transferred or assigned to one or more third parties ("" being parties other than SCI, SHLP and any entities 100% owned by either SCI or SHLP), other than for the reasonable market value of such assets at the time of transfer; or (x) any Person or two or more Persons, other than Saul Parties, acting in concert shall have acquired beneficial ownership (within the meaning of Rule 13d-3 of the Securities and Exchange Commission under the Securities Act of 1934), of voting equity interests of SCI representing fifty-one percent (51%) or more of all voting equity interests in SCI; or (y) any Person or two or more Persons, other than Saul Parties, acting in concert shall have acquired by contract or otherwise control over voting equity interests in the SCI (or other interests convertible into such interests) representing fifty-one percent (51%) or more of all voting equity interests in the SCI. For purposes of this provision, the term "" shall mean and include an individual, a partnership, a joint venture, a corporation, a limited liability company, a limited liability partnership, any other entity having limited liability for its owners under the law of its creation, a trust, an unincorporated organization and a government or any department or agency thereof.
Merger
third parties
Person
Notwithstanding Section 5.01 above, and so long as (i) a transfer pursuant to this Section 5.02 shall not occur prior to the first day following the full release of that certain Partial Recourse Guaranty of even date herewith from SCI in favor of Lender (the ""), and (ii) there is no default under the Documents, Lender agrees, upon thirty (30) days' prior written request, to consent to the original Borrower's one transfer of the entire Property if:
Section 5.02
One-Time Transfer.
Recourse Guaranty
(a) the proposed transferee of the Property shall be a newly formed special purpose entity that meets the special purpose entity requirements set forth in Section 3.22 of this Instrument and that is wholly owned and controlled by a person which, in the judgment of Lender, has financial capability and
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
creditworthiness, reputation and experience in the ownership, operation, management, and leasing of similar properties, equal to or greater than that of Borrower's principals; it being understood, without limiting the foregoing, that the proposed transferee shall not be acceptable if (i) upon assumption of the Loan, such transferee's and/or its parent, affiliates', and/or related entities' credit obligations shall exceed Lender's individual or related borrower limits as established by Lender from time to time in its sole discretion or (ii) the proposed transferee is related to Lender or advised by Lender or any affiliate of Lender;
(b) at the time of transfer the Loan to Value Ratio (defined below) does not exceed fifty five percent (55 %);
(c) Borrower pays Lender a non-refundable servicing fee (as specified by Lender) at the time of the request and an additional fee equal to sixty-five hundredths percent (0.65%) of the outstanding principal balance of the Loan at the time of the transfer, less the amount of the non-refundable servicing fee paid to Lender;
(d) at Lender's option, Lender's title policy is endorsed to verify the first priority of the Documents at Borrower's expense;
(e) the Debt Service Coverage Ratio (defined below) is at least 1.75 to 1.00 for the preceding twelve (12) month period, and Lender receives satisfactory evidence that this Debt Service Coverage Ratio will be maintained for the next succeeding twelve (12) months;
(f) the transferee expressly assumes all obligations under the Documents and executes any documents reasonably required by Lender, and all of these documents are satisfactory in form and substance to Lender, and a guarantor acceptable to Lender executes a guaranty and indemnities (pursuant to documents satisfactory in form and substance to Lender) with respect to all of the obligations contained in Paragraphs 8 and 9 of the Note, Sections 3.11, 3.12, 8.04 and 8.05 of this Instrument, and the Environmental Indemnity;
(g) Lender reasonably approves the form and content of all transfer documents and the transferee's organizational documents, and Lender is furnished with a certified copy of the recorded transfer documents;
(h) the transferee complies with and delivers the ERISA certification required under Section 3.11 of this Instrument and the Environmental Indemnity of even date herewith;
(i) Borrower shall provide a copy of (i) the purchase and sale agreement (and all amendments thereto) for the Property at the time of the transfer request or within five (5) days of execution, (ii) all amendments to the purchase and sale agreement after delivery of said agreement to Lender, and (iii) a fully-executed closing statement upon closing of the transfer;
(j) the transferee shall sign and deliver Lender's current credit certification at the time of the request, which shall include a representation that the proposed transferee and all persons or entities holding any legal or beneficial interest whatsoever in the proposed transferee are not included in, owned by, controlled by, acting for or on behalf of, providing assistance, support, sponsorship, or services of any kind to, or otherwise associated with any of the persons or entities referred to or described in the OFAC Lists; and
(k) Borrower or the transferee pays all reasonable fees, costs, and expenses incurred by Lender in connection with the proposed transfer, including, without limitation, all legal fees and
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
disbursements (for both outside counsel and Lender's staff attorneys), accounting, title insurance, documentary stamps taxes, intangible taxes, mortgage taxes, recording fees, and appraisal fees, whether or not the transfer is actually consummated.
The term "" shall mean the ratio, as reasonably determined by Lender, of (i) the aggregate principal balance of all encumbrances against the Property to (ii) the fair market value of the Property. The term "" shall mean the ratio, as reasonably determined by Lender, calculated by dividing (i) net operating income ("") by (ii) total annual debt service (""). NOI is the gross annual income realized from operations of the Property for the applicable twelve (12) month period after subtracting all necessary and ordinary operating expenses (both fixed and variable) for that twelve (12) month period (assuming for expense purposes only that the Property is ninety-five percent [95%] leased and occupied if actual leasing is less than ninety-five percent [95%]), including, without limitation, utilities, administrative, cleaning, landscaping, security, repairs, and maintenance, ground rent payments, management fees, reserves for replacements, real estate and other taxes (on a fully-assessed basis after transfer of the Property), assessments and insurance, but excluding deduction for federal, state and other income taxes, debt service expense, depreciation or amortization of capital expenditures, and other similar non-cash items (including, but not limited to, initial construction). Gross income shall be based on the cash actually received for the preceding twelve months and projected income based on leases in place for the next succeeding twelve months, and ordinary operating expenses shall not be prepaid. Documentation of NOI and expenses shall be certified by an officer of Grantor with detail satisfactory to Lender and shall be subject to the approval of Lender. TADS shall mean the aggregate debt service payments for any given calendar year on the Loan and on all other indebtedness secured, or to be secured, by any part of the Property.
Loan to Value Ratio
Debt Service Coverage Ratio
NOI
TADS
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 5.02, Borrower shall not have the right to a one-time transfer until such time as Lender has fully released the Recourse Guaranty in accordance with the terms of such guaranty.
Section 5.03
Partial Release.
(a) Upon not less than thirty (30) days' prior written notice from Borrower, Lender shall release (the "") from the lien of this Instrument that portion of the Property known as the "North Block" and more particularly described in attached hereto (the ""), provided that (i) at the time such request is made and at the time of the Partial Release, there is no Event of Default under the Documents; (ii) Borrower pays to Lender at the time of the release an amount equal to the sum of (a) an amount equal to 28.8% of the unpaid principal balance of the Loan at that time (the "") plus (b) the Prepayment Premium applicable to the North Parcel Allocated Loan Amount; plus (c) all accrued interest with respect to the North Parcel Allocated Loan Amount, (iii) Borrower delivers to Lender, at Borrower's sole cost, such title insurance coverage as Lender may deem reasonably necessary to insure that this Instrument remains a valid first lien against the remainder of the Property (the ""), with access to all of the public sidewalks surrounding the Remaining Property and with access at the same access points as exist on the date hereof to the publicly dedicated streets of North Garfield Street and North Highland Street, subject only to such exceptions to title as were evidenced in the title policy insuring this Instrument, current taxes due but not yet payable, such exceptions approved in writing by Lender after the date hereof, and such other exceptions as may be approved by Lender, in its sole discretion; (iv) Lender shall have received evidence satisfactory to it that the Debt Service Coverage Ratio (using the Debt Service Coverage Ratio and NOI definitions contained in Section 5.02) is at least 1.60 to 1.00 for the preceding twelve (12) month period and Lender receives satisfactory evidence that this Debt Service Coverage Ratio will be maintained for the next succeeding twelve (12) months with respect to the Remaining Property; (v) the Loan to Value Ratio (as defined in Section 5.02) of the Loan (after the payment of the North Parcel Allocated Loan
Partial Release
Exhibit D
Release Parcel
North Parcel Allocated Loan Amount
Remaining Property
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
Amount) to the Remaining Property shall not exceed fifty-five percent (55%); (vi) Lender shall have received satisfactory evidence that both the Release Parcel and the Remaining Property shall be in compliance with all applicable laws, ordinances, rules and regulations, including, but not limited to, lot split and platting requirements, building codes, subdivision, zoning, and land use laws; (vii) Lender shall have received satisfactory evidence that both the Release Parcel and the Remaining Property will constitute separate real estate tax parcels, and accordingly each will be separately taxed and assessed; (viii) any space lease applicable to the Release Parcel shall be separate from all space leases applicable to the Remaining Property and any lease on the Remaining Property shall not be dependent on or tied in any way to any space lease on the Release Parcel; (ix) Borrower shall pay, at the time of the request for the Partial Release, a servicing fee of $10,000 and Lender's legal fees and disbursements and expenses incurred in connection with the request for the Partial Release whether or not the request for the Partial Release is granted by Lender; (x) Lender shall have determined, in its sole discretion, that the Remaining Property will have all of the underground parking below the Remaining Property (which is comprised of 460 spaces) and no other property or property owner shall be granted an easement to use any of such 460 parking spaces under the Remaining Property except for an easement (in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to Lender) for use by the public and customers of the retail tenants on the Release Parcel; (xi) Lender shall have received evidence satisfactory to Lender that all necessary Tenant approvals (if any) have been obtained in connection with the Partial Release; (xii) Borrower and any guarantor shall reaffirm their respective obligations under the Documents; (xiii) the Partial Release shall not affect any obligations of Borrower or any guarantor under the Documents, except that the monthly principal and interest payment amount due under Section 1(b) of the Note shall be adjusted in accordance with the provisions of Paragraph 1(e) of the Note; (xiv) Borrower shall have created easements for utilities, signage, drainage, parking, ingress and egress and other appropriate purposes in, on and over the Release Parcel for the benefit of the Remaining Property to the extent required by Lender and such easements shall be insured as appurtenances in Lender's title insurance policy via appropriate endorsements; and (xv) Lender shall receive an updated survey and legal descriptions of the Release Parcel and the Remaining Property. Notwithstanding anything contained herein to the contrary, if after payment of the North Parcel Allocated Loan Amount the financial tests set forth in clauses (iv) and (v) above would not be satisfied, then Borrower shall have the right to increase the North Parcel Allocated Loan Amount to the amount that would need to be repaid in order to cause the conditions set forth in clauses (iv) and (v) to be satisfied.
(b) This Section 5.03 shall be personal to the original Borrower under the Loan, and no transferee (including, but not limited to a transferee pursuant to Section 5.02) shall have any rights under this Section 5.03.
(c) In the event there is Damage to only the Release Parcel or a Taking involving only the Release Parcel, and Lender elects, pursuant to Section 3.07(b) or 3.08(c), to apply the insurance proceeds or the Award to payment of the Obligations (the ""), then Borrower may elect, by written notice to Lender within 10 days after Borrower has been given notice of the Application Election by Lender, to obtain the Partial Release so long as Borrower complies with all the requirements of Section 5.03(a) above. In such event Borrower will be entitled to a credit against the payment of the North Parcel Allocated Loan Amount equal to the net payment received by Lender pursuant to Section 3.07(b)(iii)(2)(A) or Section 3.08(c)(2)(A) (the "Paydown Credit"). No Prepayment Premium will be due in connection with the Paydown Credit, but Borrower will be required to pay a Prepayment Premium on the difference between the North Parcel Allocated Loan Amount and the Paydown Credit.
Application Election
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 3.05(d) above, Lender agrees to consider in good faith requests from Borrower for Lender's consent to any easements over the Remaining Property for the benefit of the Release Parcel in connection with the Partial Release.
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
The following shall be an "Event of Default":
Section 6.01
Events of Default
.
(a) if Borrower fails to make any payment required under the Note or other Documents when due and such failure continues for five (5) days after written notice; provided, however, that if Lender gives one (1) notice of such a monetary default within any twelve (12) month period, Borrower shall not have any further right to any notice of a monetary default during the next following twelve (12) month period; provided, further, however, Borrower shall not have any right to any such notice upon the maturity date of the Note;
(b) except for defaults listed in the other subsections of this Section 6.01, if Borrower fails to perform or comply with any other provision contained in the Documents and the default is not cured within thirty (30) days of Lender's providing written notice thereof (the "Grace Period"); provided, however, that Lender will extend the Grace Period up to an additional ninety (90) days (for a total of one hundred twenty (120) days from the date of default) if (i) Borrower promptly commences and diligently pursues the cure of such default and delivers (within the Grace Period) to Lender a written request for more time and (ii) Lender determines in good faith that (1) such default cannot be cured within the Grace Period but can be cured within one hundred twenty (120) days after the default, (2) no lien or security interest created by the Documents will be impaired prior to completion of such cure, and (3) Lender's immediate exercise of any remedies provided hereunder or by law is not necessary for the protection or preservation of the Property or Lender's or Trustee's security interest;
(c) if any representation made (i) in connection with the Loan or the Obligations or (ii) in the Loan application or Documents shall be false or misleading in any material respect;
(d) if there is a transfer of the Property or any direct or indirect interest therein in violation of Article V;
(e) if Borrower shall (i) become insolvent, (ii) make a transfer in fraud of creditors, (iii) make an assignment for the benefit of its creditors, (iv) not be able to pay its debts as such debts become due, or (v) admit in writing its inability to pay its debts as they become due;
(f) if any bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, insolvency, or liquidation proceeding, or any other proceedings for the relief of debtors, is instituted by or against Borrower, and, if instituted against Borrower, is allowed, consented to, or not dismissed within the earlier to occur of (i) ninety (90) days after such institution or (ii) the filing of an order for relief;
(g) if any of the events in Sections 6.01 (e) or (f) shall occur with respect to any (i) managing member of Borrower (if Borrower is a limited liability company), (ii) general partner of Borrower (if Borrower is a partnership), or (iii) guarantor of payment and/or performance of any of the Obligations;
(h) if the Property shall be taken, attached, or sequestered on execution or other process of law in any action against Borrower (including, by way of example, a Federal seizure of the Property on account of illegal activity, but excluding condemnation and the filing of Liens [which are addressed in Sections 3.08, 3.09 and 5.01(a)(i) hereinabove]) and such default is not cured within thirty (30) days after notice from Lender; provided, that if Lender reasonably determines that title to the Property is in danger of being irretrievably lost, then Tenant shall not be entitled to any notice or cure period;
(i) if any default occurs under the Environmental Indemnity (defined below) and such default is not cured within the cure period set forth in Section 6.01(b) above;
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
(j) if Borrower shall fail at any time to obtain, maintain, renew, or keep in force the insurance policies required by Section 3.06 within ten (10) days after written notice;
(k) if Borrower shall be in default beyond applicable cure period under any other mortgage, deed of trust, or security agreement covering any part of the Property, whether it be superior or junior in lien to this Instrument;
(l) if any claim of priority (except based upon a Permitted Encumbrance) to the Documents by title, lien, or otherwise shall be upheld by any court of competent jurisdiction or shall be consented to by Borrower;
(m) (i) the consummation by Borrower of any transaction which would cause (A) the Loan or any exercise of Lender's rights under the Documents to constitute a non-exempt prohibited transaction under ERISA or (B) a violation of a state statute regulating governmental plans; (ii) the failure of any representation in Section 3.11 to be true and correct in all respects; or (iii) the failure of Borrower to provide Lender with the written certifications required by Section 3.11(c), unless such default is cured within the lesser of (x) fifteen (15) days after written notice of such default to Borrower or (y) the shortest cure period, if any, provided for under any Laws applicable to such matters (including, without limitation, ERISA); and
(n) (i) the consummation by Borrower of any transaction which would cause an OFAC Violation; (ii) the failure of any representation in Section 2.09 to be true and correct in all respects; or (iii) the failure of Borrower to comply with the provisions of Section 3.20, unless such default is cured within the lesser of (A) fifteen (15) days after written notice of such default to Borrower or (B) the shortest cure period, if any, provided for under any Laws applicable to such matters (including, without limitation, the Anti-Terrorism Regulations).
If an Event of Default occurs (unless Lender has accepted cure of such Event of Default by specific written statement from Lender to Borrower acknowledging Lender's acceptance of such cure, and Borrower specifically understands and agrees that Lender shall have no obligation to accept the cure of any Event of Default), Lender, or any person designated by Lender or Lender acting by or through Trustee, may (but shall not be obligated to) take any enforcement action (separately, concurrently, cumulatively, and at any time and in any order) permitted under any Laws, without notice, demand, presentment, or protest (all of which are hereby waived), to protect and enforce Lender's or Trustee's rights under the Documents or Laws including the following actions:
Section 6.02
Remedies.
(a) accelerate and declare the entire unpaid Obligations immediately due and payable, except for defaults under Section 6.01 (f), (g), or (h) which shall automatically make the Obligations immediately due and payable;
(b) judicially or otherwise, (i) completely foreclose this Instrument or (ii) partially foreclose this Instrument for any portion of the Obligations due and the lien and security interest created by this Instrument shall continue unimpaired and without loss of priority as to the remaining Obligations not yet due;
(c) sell for cash or upon credit the Property and all right, title and interest of Borrower therein and rights of redemption thereof, pursuant to power of sale;
(d) subject to the limitations referred to in Section 8.01 hereof, recover judgment on the Note either before, during or after any proceedings for the enforcement of the Documents and without any requirement of any action being taken to (i) realize on the Property or (ii) otherwise enforce the Documents;
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
(e) seek specific performance of any provisions in the Documents;
(f) apply for the appointment of a receiver, custodian, trustee, liquidator, or conservator of the Property without (i) notice to any person, (ii) regard for (A) the adequacy of the security for the Obligations or (B) the solvency of Borrower or any person liable for the payment of the Obligations; and Borrower and any person so liable waives or shall be deemed to have waived the foregoing and any other objections to the fullest extent permitted by Laws and consents or shall be deemed to have consented to such appointment;
(g) with or without entering upon the Property, (i) exclude Borrower and any person from the Property without liability for trespass, damages, or otherwise (other than that arising directly from Lender's gross negligence or willful misconduct); (ii) take possession of, and Borrower shall surrender on demand, all books, records, and accounts relating to the Property; (iii) give notice to Tenants or any person, make demand for, collect, receive, sue for, and recover in its own name all Rents and cash collateral derived from the Property; (iv) use, operate, manage, preserve, control, and otherwise deal with every aspect of the Property including (A) conducting its business, (B) insuring it, (C) making all repairs, renewals, replacements, alterations, additions, and improvements to or on it, (D) completing the construction of any Improvements in manner and form as Lender deems advisable, and (E) executing, modifying, enforcing, and terminating new and existing Leases on such terms as Lender deems advisable and evicting any Tenants in default; (v) apply the receipts from the Property to payment of the Obligations, in any order or priority determined by Lender, after first deducting all Costs, expenses, and liabilities incurred by Lender or Trustee in connection with the foregoing operations and all amounts needed to pay the Impositions and other expenses of the Property, as well as just and reasonable compensation for the services of Lender, Trustee, and their attorneys, agents, and employees; and/or (vi) in every case in connection with the foregoing, exercise all rights and powers of Borrower, or Lender or Trustee with respect to the Property, either in Borrower's name or otherwise;
(h) release any portion of the Property for such consideration, if any, as Lender may require without, as to the remainder of the Property, impairing or affecting the lien or priority of this Instrument or improving the position of any subordinate lienholder with respect thereto, except to the extent that the Obligations shall have been actually reduced, and Lender may accept by assignment, pledge, or otherwise any other property in place thereof as Lender may require without being accountable for so doing to any other lienholder;
(i) apply any Deposits to the following items in any order and in Lender's sole discretion: (A) the Obligations, (B) Costs, (C) advances made by Lender or Trustee under the Documents, and/or (D) Impositions;
(j) take all actions permitted under the U.C.C. of the Property State including (i) the right to take possession of all tangible and intangible personal property now or hereafter included within the Property ("") and take such actions as Lender or Trustee deems advisable for the care, protection and preservation of the Personal Property and (ii) request Borrower at its expense to assemble the Personal Property and make it available to Lender or Trustee at a convenient place acceptable to Lender or Trustee. Any notice of sale, disposition or other intended action by Lender or Trustee with respect to the Personal Property sent to Borrower at least five (5) days prior to such action shall constitute commercially reasonable notice to Borrower; or
Personal Property
(k) take any other action permitted under any Laws.
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
If Lender or Trustee exercises any of its rights under Section 6.02(g), Lender and Trustee shall not (a) be deemed to have entered upon or taken possession of the Property except upon the exercise of its option to do so, evidenced by its demand and overt act for such purpose; (b) be deemed a beneficiary or mortgagee in possession by reason of such entry or taking possession; nor (c) be liable (i) to account for any action taken pursuant to such exercise other than for Rents actually received by Lender or Trustee, (ii) for any loss sustained by Borrower resulting from any failure to lease the Property, or (iii) any other act or omission of Lender or Trustee except for losses caused by Lender's or Trustee's willful misconduct or gross negligence. Borrower hereby consents to, ratifies, and confirms the exercise by Lender and Trustee of its or their rights under this Instrument and appoints Lender and Trustee as its attorney-in-fact, which appointment shall be deemed to be coupled with an interest and irrevocable, for such purposes.
All Costs, expenses, or other amounts paid or incurred by Lender or Trustee in the exercise of its or their rights under the Documents, together with interest thereon at the applicable interest rate specified in the Note, which shall be the Default Rate unless prohibited by Laws, shall be (a) part of the Obligations, (b) secured by this Instrument, and (c) allowed and included as part of the Obligations in any foreclosure, decree for sale, power of sale, or other judgment or decree enforcing Lender's and/or Trustee's rights under the Documents.
Section 6.03
Expenses.
To the extent permitted under (and in accordance with) any Laws, the following provisions shall, as Lender or Trustee may determine in its or their sole discretion, apply to any sales of the Property under Article VI, whether by judicial proceeding, judgment, decree, power of sale, foreclosure or otherwise: (a) Lender or Trustee may conduct a single sale of the Property or multiple sales of any part of the Property in separate tracts or in its entirety or any other manner consistent with applicable Laws as Lender deems in its best interests and each of Borrower waives any right to require otherwise; (b) if Lender elects more than one sale of the Property, Lender may at its option cause the same to be conducted simultaneously or successively, on the same day or on such different days or times and in such order as Lender may deem to be in its best interests, no such sale shall terminate or otherwise affect the lien of this Instrument on any part of the Property not then sold, and Borrower shall pay the costs and expenses of each such sale; (c) any sale may be postponed or adjourned by public announcement at the time and place appointed for such sale or for such postponed or adjourned sale without further notice or such sale may occur, without further notice, at the time fixed by the last postponement or a new notice of sale may be given; and (d) Lender may acquire the Property and, in lieu of paying cash, may pay by crediting against the Obligations the amount of its bid, after deducting therefrom any sums which Lender or Trustee is authorized to deduct under the provisions of the Documents. After any such sale, Trustee shall deliver to the purchaser at such sale the Trustee's deed conveying the property so sold, but without any covenant or warranty, express or implied. The recitals in any such deed of any matters or facts shall be conclusive proof of the truthfulness thereof. Any Person, including Borrower, Trustee or Lender, may purchase at such sale.
Section 6.04
Rights Pertaining to Sales.
Any proceeds received from any sale or disposition under Article VI or otherwise, together with any other sums held by Lender or Trustee, shall, except as expressly provided to the contrary, be applied in the order determined by Lender to: (a) payment of all Costs and expenses of any enforcement action, or foreclosure sale, transfer of title by power of sale (including the expenses of the Trustee), or otherwise, including interest thereon at the applicable interest rate specified in the Note, which shall be the Default Rate unless prohibited by Laws, (b) all taxes, Assessments, and other charges unless the Property was sold subject to these items; (c) payment of the Obligations in such order as Lender may elect; (d) payment of any other sums secured or required to be paid by Borrower; and (e) payment of the surplus, if any, to any person lawfully entitled to receive it. Borrower and Lender intend and agree that during any period of time between any foreclosure judgment that may be obtained and the actual foreclosure sale that the foreclosure judgment will not extinguish the Documents or any rights contained therein including the obligation of Borrower to pay all Costs and to pay interest at the applicable interest rate specified in the Note, which shall be the Default Rate unless prohibited by Laws.
Section 6.05
Application of Proceeds.
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
No failure, refusal, waiver, or delay by Lender or Trustee to exercise any rights under the Documents upon any default or Event of Default shall impair Lender's or Trustee's rights or be construed as a waiver of, or acquiescence to, such or any subsequent default or Event of Default. No recovery of any judgment by Lender or Trustee and no levy of an execution upon the Property or any other property of Borrower shall affect the lien and security interest created by this Instrument and such liens, rights, powers, and remedies shall continue unimpaired as before. Lender or Trustee may resort to any security given by this Instrument or any other security now given or hereafter existing to secure the Obligations, in whole or in part, in such portions and in such order as Lender or Trustee may deem advisable, and no such action shall be construed as a waiver of any of the liens, rights, or benefits granted hereunder. Acceptance of any payment after any Event of Default shall not be deemed a waiver or a cure of such Event of Default and such acceptance shall be deemed an acceptance on account only (unless Lender has accepted cure of such Event of Default by specific written statement from Lender to Borrower acknowledging Lender's acceptance of such cure, and Borrower specifically understands and agrees that Lender shall have no obligation to accept the cure of any Event of Default). If Lender or Trustee has started enforcement of any right by foreclosure, sale, entry, or otherwise and such proceeding shall be discontinued, abandoned, or determined adversely for any reason, then Borrower, Lender and Trustee shall be restored to their former positions and rights under the Documents with respect to the Property, subject to the lien and security interest hereof.
Section 6.06
Additional Provisions as to Remedies.
To the fullest extent Borrower may do so under Laws, Borrower (a) will not at any time insist on, plead, claim, or take the benefit of any statute or rule of law now or later enacted providing for any appraisement, valuation, stay, extension, moratorium, or redemption; (b) for itself, its successors and assigns, and for any person ever claiming an interest in the Property (other than Lender), waives and releases all rights of redemption, reinstatement, valuation, appraisement, notice of intention to mature or declare due the whole of the Obligations, all rights to a marshaling of the assets of Borrower, including the Property, or to a sale in inverse order of alienation, in the event of foreclosure (or extinguishment by transfer of title by power of sale) of the liens and security interests created under the Documents; (c) shall not be relieved of its obligation to pay the Obligations as required in the Documents nor shall the lien or priority of the Documents be impaired by any agreement renewing, extending, or modifying the time of payment or the provisions of the Documents (including a modification of any interest rate), unless expressly released, discharged, or modified by such agreement. Regardless of consideration and without any notice to or consent by the holder of any subordinate lien, security interest, encumbrance, right, title, or interest in or to the Property, Lender may (a) release any person liable for payment of the Obligations or any portion thereof or any part of the security held for the Obligations or (b) modify any of the provisions of the Documents without impairing or affecting the Documents or the lien, security interest, or the priority of the modified Documents as security for the Obligations over any such subordinate lien, security interest, encumbrance, right, title, or interest.
Section 6.07
Waiver of Rights and Defenses.
In connection with any sale of the Property pursuant to Section 363 of the Bankruptcy Code or any plan under the Bankruptcy Code, Lender shall have the right to acquire the Property and, in lieu of paying cash, Lender shall have the right (at its option) to pay by crediting against the Obligations the amount of its bid, after deducting therefrom any sums which Lender is authorized to deduct under the provisions of the Documents.
Section 6.08
Additional Credit Bidding.
This Instrument constitutes both a real property deed of trust and a "security agreement" within the meaning of the U.C.C. The Property includes real and personal property
Section 7.01
Security Agreement.
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
and all tangible and intangible rights and interest of Borrower in the Property. Borrower grants to Lender and Trustee, as security for the Obligations, a security interest in the Personal Property to the fullest extent that the Personal Property may be subject to the U.C.C. Borrower authorizes Lender to file any financing or continuation statements and amendments thereto relating to the Personal Property without the signature of Borrower if permitted by Laws.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, the liability of Borrower hereunder and under the other Documents is limited in the same manner and to the same extent as Borrower's liability is limited as provided in Paragraphs 8, 9 and 10 of the Note.
Section 8.01
Limited Recourse Liability.
Borrower agrees that while Lender has no liability to any person in tort or otherwise as lender and that Lender is not an owner or operator of the Property, Borrower shall, at its sole expense (but subject to the provisions of Section 8.01 above), protect, defend, release, indemnify and hold harmless ("") the Indemnified Parties from any Losses (defined below) imposed on, incurred by, or asserted against the Indemnified Parties, directly or indirectly, arising out of or in connection with the Property, the Loan, or the Documents, including Losses; provided, however, that the foregoing indemnities shall not apply to any Losses caused by (i) the gross negligence of Lender, (ii) the willful misconduct of Lender, (iii) an illegal act by Lender, or (iv) fraud on the part of Lender; and provided further that the foregoing indemnities shall not apply to claims brought by or on behalf of Lender or any of the other Indemnified Parties unless such claims are for indemnification against claims imposed on, incurred by, or asserted against Lender or such other Indemnified Parties by a third party. The term "" shall mean any claims, suits, liabilities (including strict liabilities), actions, proceedings, obligations, debts, damages, losses (including, without limitation, unrealized loss of value of the Property), Costs, expenses, fines, penalties, charges, fees, judgments, awards, and amounts paid in settlement of whatever kind including attorneys' fees (both in-house staff and retained attorneys) and all other costs of defense. The term "" shall mean (a) Lender, (b) any prior owner or holder of the Note, (c) any existing or prior servicer of the Loan, (d) Trustee, (e) the officers, directors, shareholders, partners, members, employees and trustees of any of the foregoing, and (f) the heirs, legal representatives, successors and assigns of each of the foregoing.
Section 8.02
General Indemnity.
indemnify
Losses
Indemnified Parties
Borrower shall, at its sole expense, indemnify the Indemnified Parties from all Losses imposed upon, incurred by, or asserted against the Indemnified Parties or the Documents relating to Transaction Taxes.
Section 8.03
Transaction Taxes Indemnity.
Borrower shall, at its sole expense, indemnify the Indemnified Parties against all Losses imposed upon, incurred by, or asserted against the Indemnified Parties (a) as a result of a transaction by Borrower that causes a Violation, (b) in the investigation, defense, and settlement of a Violation caused by a transaction of Borrower, (c) as a result of a breach of Borrower's representations in Section 3.11 or default thereunder, (d) in correcting any prohibited transaction or the sale of a prohibited loan, by reason of Borrower's breach of the representations contained in Section 3.11(b), and (e) in obtaining any individual prohibited transaction exemption under ERISA that may be required, in Lender's sole discretion, by reason of Borrower's breach of the representations contained in Section 3.11(b).
Section 8.04
ERISA Indemnity.
Borrower and other persons, if any, have executed and delivered the Environmental and ERISA Indemnity Agreement dated the date hereof to Lender ("").
Section 8.05
Environmental Indemnity.
Environmental Indemnity
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
Upon request, whether Borrower's obligation to indemnify Lender arises under Article VIII or in the Documents, Borrower shall defend the Indemnified Parties (in Borrower's or the Indemnified Parties' names) for the matters specified in Sections 8.03, 8.04 and 8.05 above by attorneys and other professionals approved by the Indemnified Parties. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Indemnified Parties may, in their sole discretion, engage their own attorneys and professionals to defend or assist them and, at their option, their attorneys shall control the resolution of any claims or proceedings. Upon demand, Borrower shall pay or, in the sole discretion of the Indemnified Parties, reimburse and/or indemnify the Indemnified Parties for all Costs imposed on, incurred by, or asserted against the Indemnified Parties by reason of any items set forth in this Article VIII and/or the enforcement or preservation of the Indemnified Parties' rights under the Documents. Any amount payable to the Indemnified Parties under this Section shall (a) be deemed a demand obligation, (b) be part of the Obligations, (c) bear interest upon demand at the Default Rate until paid if not paid on demand, and (d) be secured by this Instrument.
Section 8.06
Duty to Defend, Costs and Expenses.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Documents and in addition to the recourse obligations in the Note, the obligations of Borrower under Sections 8.03, 8.04, 8.05, and 8.06 shall be a full recourse obligation of Borrower, shall not be subject to any limitation on personal liability in the Documents, and shall survive (a) repayment of the Obligations, (b) any termination, satisfaction, transfer of title by power of sale, assignment or foreclosure of this Instrument, (c) the acceptance by Lender (or any nominee) of a deed in lieu of foreclosure, (d) a plan of reorganization for Borrower filed under the Bankruptcy Code, or (e) the exercise by Lender of any rights in the Documents. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the liability of Borrower under the Environmental Indemnity shall be subject to the limitations set forth in Sections 6 and 19 of such document. Borrower's obligations under Article VIII shall not be affected by the absence or unavailability of insurance covering the same or by the failure or refusal by any insurance carrier to perform any obligation under any applicable insurance policy.
Section 8.07
Recourse Obligation and Survival.
All agreements in the Documents are expressly limited so that in no event whatsoever shall the amount paid or agreed to be paid under the Documents for the use, forbearance, or detention of money exceed the highest lawful rate permitted by Laws. If, at the time of performance, fulfillment of any provision of the Documents shall involve transcending the limit of validity prescribed by Laws, then, ipso facto, the obligation to be fulfilled shall be reduced to the limit of such validity. If Lender shall ever receive as interest an amount which would exceed the highest lawful rate, the receipt of such excess shall be deemed a mistake and (a) shall be canceled automatically or (b) if paid, such excess shall be (i) credited against the principal amount of the Obligations to the extent permitted by Laws or (ii) rebated to Borrower if it cannot be so credited under Laws. Furthermore, all sums paid or agreed to be paid under the Documents for the use, forbearance, or detention of money shall to the extent permitted by Laws be amortized, prorated, allocated, and spread throughout the full stated term of the Note until payment in full so that the rate or amount of interest on account of the Obligations does not exceed the maximum lawful rate of interest from time to time in effect and applicable to the Obligations for so long as the Obligations are outstanding.
Section 9.01
Usury Savings Clause.
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
Any notice, request, demand, consent, approval, direction, agreement, or other communication (any "") required or permitted under the Documents shall be in writing and shall be validly given if sent by a nationally-recognized courier that obtains receipts, delivered personally by a courier that obtains receipts, or mailed by United States certified mail (with return receipt requested and postage prepaid) addressed to the applicable person as follows:
Section 9.02
Notices.
notice
 
Each notice shall be effective upon being so sent, delivered, or mailed, but the time period for response or action shall run from the date of receipt as shown on the delivery receipt. Refusal to accept delivery or the inability to deliver because of a changed address for which no notice was given shall be deemed receipt. Any party may periodically change its address for notice and specify up to two (2) additional addresses for copies by giving the other party at least ten (10) days' prior notice.
Except as otherwise expressly stated, whenever Lender's judgment, consent, or approval is required or Lender shall have an option or election under the Documents, such judgment, the decision as to whether or not to consent to or approve the same, or the exercise of such option or election shall be in the sole and absolute discretion of Lender (exercised in good faith).
Section 9.03
Sole Discretion of Lender.
The Documents shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the Property State and the applicable laws of the United States of America. Without limiting Lender's or Trustee's right to bring any action or proceeding against Borrower or the Property relating to the Obligations (an "") in the courts of other jurisdictions, Borrower irrevocably (a) submits to the jurisdiction of any state or federal court in the Property State, (b) agrees that any Action may be heard and determined in such court, and (c) waives, to the fullest extent permitted by Laws, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of any Action in such jurisdiction.
Section 9.04
Applicable Law and Submission to Jurisdiction.
Action
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
The following rules of construction shall apply for all purposes of this Instrument unless the context otherwise requires: (a) all references to numbered Articles or Sections or to lettered Exhibits are references to the Articles and Sections hereof and the Exhibits annexed to this Instrument and such Exhibits are incorporated into this Instrument as if fully set forth in the body of this Instrument; (b) all Article, Section, and Exhibit captions are used for convenience and reference only and in no way define, limit, or in any way affect this Instrument; (c) words of masculine, feminine, or neuter gender shall mean and include the correlative words of the other genders, and words importing the singular number shall mean and include the plural number, and vice versa; (d) no inference in favor of or against any party shall be drawn from the fact that such party has drafted any portion of. this Instrument; (e) all obligations of Borrower hereunder shall be performed and satisfied by or on behalf of Borrower at Borrower's sole expense; (f) the terms "," "," and similar terms shall be construed as if followed by the phrase ""; (g) the terms "," "," "," and "" shall be construed as if followed by the phrase ""; (h) the term "" shall be construed as if followed by the phrase ""; (i) the term "" shall include natural persons, firms, partnerships, limited liability companies, trusts, corporations, governmental authorities or agencies, and any other public or private legal entities; (j) the term "," when used with respect hereto or to any other document or instrument, shall be construed as if preceded by the phrase ""; (k) the term "" shall mean "," the term "" shall mean "," and the term "Tenants" or "" shall mean ""; (l) the term "" shall mean ""; (m) the terms "" and "" shall mean ""; (n) the term "" or "" shall mean ""; and (o) the term "" shall mean "".
Section 9.05
Construction of Provisions.
include
including
without being limited to
Property
Land
Improvements
Personal Property
or any part thereof
Obligations
or any other sums secured hereby, or any part thereof
person
provisions
terms, covenants, agreements, requirements, and/or conditions
lease
tenancy, subtenancy, lease, sublease, or rental agreement
lessor
landlord, sublandlord, lessor, and sublessor
lessee
tenant, subtenant, lessee, and sublessee
owned
now owned or later acquired
any
all
any or all
on demand
upon demand
within five (5) business days after written notice
Trustee
Trustee, its successors and assigns, and any substitute or successor Trustee of the estates, properties, powers, trusts and rights conferred upon Trustee pursuant to the Documents
Section 9.06
Transfer of Loan
.
(a) Lender may, at any time, (i) sell, transfer or assign the Documents and any servicing rights with respect thereto or (ii) grant participations therein or issue mortgage or deed of trust pass-through certificates or other securities evidencing a beneficial interest in a rated or unrated public offering or private placement (collectively, the ""). Lender may forward to any purchaser, transferee, assignee, servicer, participant, or investor in such Securities (collectively, ""), to any Rating Agency (defined below) rating such Securities and to any prospective Investor, all documents and information which Lender now has or may later acquire relating to the Obligations, Borrower, any guarantor, any indemnitor(s), the Leases, and the Property, whether furnished by Borrower, any guarantor, any indemnitor(s) or otherwise, as Lender determines advisable. Borrower, any guarantor and any indemnitor agree to cooperate with Lender in connection with any transfer made or any Securities created pursuant to this Section including the delivery of an estoppel certificate in accordance with Section 3.16 and such other documents as may be reasonably requested by Lender. Borrower shall also furnish consent of any borrower, any guarantor and any indemnitor in order to permit Lender to furnish such Investors or such prospective Investors or such Rating Agency with any and all information concerning the Property, the Leases, the financial condition of Borrower, any guarantor and any indemnitor, as may be reasonably requested by Lender, any Investor, any prospective Investor or any Rating Agency and which may be complied with without undue expense. "Rating Agency" shall mean any one or more credit rating agencies approved by Lender.
Securities
Investors
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
(b) Borrower agree that upon any assignment or transfer of the Documents by Lender to any third party, Lender shall have no obligations or liabilities under the Documents, such third party shall be substituted as the lender under the Documents for all purposes and Borrower shall look solely to such third party for the performance of any obligations under the Documents or with respect to the Loan.
If any provision of the Documents shall be held to be invalid, illegal, or unenforceable in any respect, this shall not affect any other provisions of the Documents and such provision shall be limited and construed as if it were not in the Documents. If title to the Property becomes vested in any person other than Borrower, Lender and Trustee may, without notice to Borrower, deal with such person regarding the Documents or the Obligations in the same manner as with Borrower without in any way vitiating or discharging Borrower's liability under the Documents or being deemed to have consented to the vesting. If both the lessor's and lessee's interest under any Lease ever becomes vested in any one person, this Instrument and the lien and security interest created hereby shall not be destroyed or terminated by the application of the doctrine of merger and Lender and Trustee shall continue to have and enjoy all its rights and privileges as to each separate estate. Upon foreclosure (or transfer of title by power of sale) of this Instrument, none of the Leases shall be destroyed or terminated as a result of such foreclosure (or sale), by application of the doctrine of merger or as a matter of law, unless Lender or Trustee takes all actions required by law to terminate the Leases as a result of foreclosure or sale. All of Borrower's covenants and agreements under the Documents shall run with the land and time is of the essence. Borrower appoints Lender as its attorney-in-fact, which appointment is irrevocable and shall be deemed to be coupled with an interest, with respect to the execution, acknowledgment, delivery, filing or recording for and in the name of Borrower of any of the documents listed in Sections 3.04, 3.19, 4.01 and 6.02, provided that Lender will not exercise such power unless Borrower fails to act within the timeframes required under the Documents. The Documents cannot be amended, terminated, or discharged except in a writing signed by the party against whom enforcement is sought. No waiver, release, or other forbearance by Lender will be effective unless it is in a writing signed by Lender and then only to the extent expressly stated. The provisions of the Documents shall be binding upon Borrower and its heirs, devisees, representatives, successors, and assigns including successors in interest to the Property and inure to the benefit of Lender and Trustee and its or their heirs, successors, substitutes, and assigns. Where two or more persons have executed the Documents, the obligations of such persons shall be joint and several, except to the extent the context clearly indicates otherwise. The Documents may be executed in any number of counterparts with the same effect as if all parties had executed the same document. All such counterparts shall be construed together and shall constitute one instrument, but in making proof hereof it shall only be necessary to produce one such counterpart. Upon receipt of an affidavit of an officer of Lender as to the loss, theft, destruction or mutilation of any Document which is not of public record, and, in the case of any mutilation, upon surrender and cancellation of the Document, Borrower will issue, in lieu thereof, a replacement Document, dated the date of the lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated Document containing the same provisions. Any reviews, inspections, reports, approvals or similar items conducted, made or produced by or on behalf of Lender with respect to Borrower, the Property or the Loan are for loan underwriting and servicing purposes only, and shall not constitute an acknowledgment, representation or warranty of the accuracy thereof, or an assumption of liability with respect to Borrower, Borrower's contractors, architects, engineers, employees, agents or invitees, present or future tenants, occupants or owners of the Property, or any other party.
Section 9.07
Miscellaneous.
(a) the Documents constitute the entire understanding and agreement between Borrower, Lender and Trustee with respect to the Loan and supersede all prior written or oral understandings and agreements with respect to the Loan including the Loan application and Loan commitment and (b) Borrower is not relying on any representations or warranties of Lender except as expressly set forth in the Documents.
Section 9.08
Entire Agreement.
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
By recording a written substitution in the county where the Property is located or by any other means permitted by Laws, Lender may (a) remove Trustee or any successor Trustee at any time (or times) without notice or cause and (b) replace any Trustee who dies or resigns. To the extent permitted by Laws, Trustee waives any statutory fee for its services and agrees to accept reasonable compensation in lieu thereof. Trustee may resign upon thirty (30) days notice to Lender and Borrower. If more than one person is appointed Trustee, all rights granted to Trustee under this Instrument may be exercised by any of them, without the others, with the same effect as if exercised by all of them jointly. In addition to exercising all rights set forth in this Instrument, Trustee may exercise all rights under Laws.
Section 9.09
Concerning the Trustee.
EACH OF BORROWER AND LENDER HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, THE RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION, PROCEEDING OR COUNTERCLAIM FILED BY EITHER PARTY, WHETHER IN CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, RELATING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY TO THE LOAN, THE DOCUMENTS, OR ANY ALLEGED ACTS OR OMISSIONS OF LENDER OR BORROWER IN CONNECTION THEREWITH.
Section 9.10
WAIVER OF TRIAL BY JURY.
The following short form provisions are hereby made applicable and are incorporated into this Instrument as permitted under the Code of Virginia (1950), Section 55-60 (1986 Rep. Vol. and 1988 Cum. Supp.) and shall have the meanings set forth therein: (a) "Exemptions Waived," (b) "Subject to call upon default," (c) "Substitution of trustee permitted," and (d) "Any trustee may act."
Section 10.01
Statutory Provisions.
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has executed this Instrument as of the day first set forth above.
 
STATE OF MARYLAND)
COUNTY OF MONTGOMERY)
I, Laurenia Jenkins, a notary public in and for the state and county aforesaid do certify that B. Francis Saul II, whose name is signed to the writing above, being the Chief Executive Officer of SAUL CENTERS, INC., a Maryland corporation, as Manager of CLARENDON CENTER LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, has acknowledged the same before me this 22nd day of March, 2011, in my county aforesaid.
 
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
TRACT ONE
All of Parcel "B", Block E, Lyon's Addition to Clarendon, as the same is shown on a plat attached to the Deed of Resubdivision and Easements recorded in Deed Book 4160 at page 294, among the Land Records of Arlington County, Virginia, being more particularly described by metes and bounds as follows:
Beginning at a point where the southerly right-of-way line of Wilson Boulevard (variable width) intersects the westerly right-of-way line of North Garfield Street (variable width); thence with the said line of North Garfield Street:
S 06 32' 23" E, 158.46 feet to a point where the said line of North Garfield Street intersects the northerly right-of-way line of Clarendon Boulevard (variable width); thence with the said line of Clarendon Boulevard
S 55 15' 05" W, 188.53 feet to a point marking a corner to a part of Lot 3, Block E, Lyons Addition to Clarendon; thence departing the said line of Clarendon Boulevard and running with the line of said part of Lot 3 and part of Lot 2, Block E, Lyons Addition to Clarendon and also a portion of the aforementioned right-of-way line of Wilson Boulevard
N 21 51' 21" W, 115.66 feet to a point; thence with the said line of Wilson Boulevard on the following three (3) courses and distances:
N 45 11' 50" E, 56.60 feet to a point; thence
S 12 33' 46" E, 17.72 feet to a point; thence
N 45 12' 07" E, 191.52 feet to the point of beginning. Containing 25,201 square feet, or 0.57854 acres of land, more or less.
TOGETHER WITH the beneficial easements and other items in the nature of real property rights contained in the Declaration of Covenants and Easements recorded in Deed Book 4009 at page 639 among the aforesaid Land Records.
TOGETHER WITH the rights in the nature of real property rights arising from the Encroachment Ordinance recorded in Deed Book 4108 at page 1998, among the aforesaid Land Records.
FURTHER TOGETHER WITH the Party Wall Agreements dated October 2, 1937 and recorded May 31, 1938 in Deed Book 436 at page 41; dated January 15, 1938 and recorded May 31, 1938 in Deed Book 436 at page 42; dated June 28, 1938 and recorded August 26, 1938 in Deed Book 442 at page 577, as affected by Agreement and dated May 9, 1939 and recorded December 26, 1940 in Deed Book 527 at page 45; as supplemented by Declaration (Supplemental Party Wall Agreement) dated December 19, 1990 and recorded January 4, 1991 in Deed Book 2459 at page 1712, among the aforesaid Land Records
NOTE FOR INFORMATIONAL PURPOSES ONLY:
RPC Number:    18012004
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
TRACT TWO
All of Parcel "A", Block F, Lyon's Addition to Clarendon, as the same is shown on a plat attached to the Deed of Resubdivision and Easements recorded in Deed Book 4156 at page 723, among the Land Records of Arlington County, Virginia, being more particularly described by metes and bounds as follows:
Beginning at a point where the southerly right-of-way line of Clarendon Boulevard (variable width) intersects the westerly right-of-way line of North Garfield Street (variable width); thence with the said line of North Garfield Street on the following three (3) courses and distances:
S 06 32' 23" E, 121.34 feet to a point; thence
N 55 15' 07" E, 5.67 feet to a point; thence
S 06 32' 23" E, 245.33 feet to a point where the said line of North Garfield Street intersects the northerly right-of-way line of 11th Street North (variable width); thence with the said line of 11th Street North on the following three (3) courses and distances:
S 84 33' 37" W, 110.02 feet to a point; thence
N 06 32' 23" W, 15.00 feet to a point; thence
S 84 33' 37" W, 5.00 feet to the southeasterly corner to Outlot "A":, Block F, Lyon's Addition to Clarendon; thence departing the said line of 11th Street North and running with the easterly line of said Outlot "A"
N 06 32' 23" W, 96.72 feet to a point; thence with the northerly line of Outlot "A" and also Lot 110, Block F, Lyon's Addition to Clarendon
S 83 27' 41" W, 102.50 feet to a point in the easterly right-of-way line of North Highland Street (variable width) thence departing the line of said Lot 110 and running with the said line of North Highland Street
N 06 32' 23" W, 136.08 feet to a point where the said line of North Highland Street intersects the aforementioned line of Clarendon Boulevard; thence with the said line of Clarendon Boulevard
N 55 15' 07" E, 241.14 feet to the point of beginning. Containing 54,578 square feet or 1.25293 acres of land, more or less.
TOGETHER WITH Terms and conditions contained in Agreement dated January 16, 1946 and recorded September 17, 1947 in Deed Book 793 at page 310, among the aforesaid Land Records.
TOGETHER WITH the beneficial easements and other items in the nature of real property rights contained in the Declaration of Covenants and Easements recorded in Deed Book 4009 at page 639 among the aforesaid Land Records.
TOGETHER WITH the rights in the nature of real property rights arising from the Encroachment Ordinance recorded in Deed Book 4108 at page 2009 among the aforesaid Land Records.
TOGETHER WITH the rights in the nature of real property rights arising from the Development Agreement dated June 7, 2006, as evidenced by Memorandum of Development Agreement recorded in Deed Book 4008 at page 2113 as amended by unrecorded First Amendment to Development Agreement dated September 5, 2007, as evidenced by Memorandum of First Amendment to Development Agreement recorded in Deed Book 4136 at page 152 both among the aforesaid Land Records.
TOGETHER WITH the easement granted Saul Holdings Limited Partnership by Sanitary Sewer Easement Agreement from Leadership Institute dated April 9, 2008 and recorded in Deed Book 4181 at page 1624, among the aforesaid Land Records.
FURTHER TOGETHER WITH the easement granted Saul Holdings Limited Partnership by Encroachment Easement Agreement dated June 29, 2010 and recorded July 2, 2010 in Deed Book 4375 at page 669, among the aforesaid Land Records.
NOTE FOR INFORMATIONAL PURPOSES ONLY:
RPC Number:    18013011
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
All of Borrower's right, title and interest in, to and under the following:
1. All machinery, apparatus, goods, equipment, materials, fittings, fixtures, chattels, and tangible personal property, and all appurtenances and additions thereto and betterments, renewals, substitutions, and replacements thereof, owned by Borrower, wherever situate, and now or hereafter located on, attached to, contained in, or used in connection with the real property described in attached hereto and incorporated herein (the ""), and all improvements located thereon (the "") or placed on any part thereof, though not attached thereto, including all screens, awnings, shades, blinds, curtains, draperies, carpets, rugs, furniture and furnishings, heating, electrical, lighting, plumbing, ventilating, air-conditioning, refrigerating, incinerating and/or compacting plants, systems, fixtures and equipment, elevators, hoists, stoves, ranges, vacuum and other cleaning systems, call systems, sprinkler systems and other fire prevention and extinguishing apparatus and materials, motors, machinery, pipes, ducts, conduits, dynamos, engines, compressors, generators, boilers, stokers, furnaces, pumps, tanks, appliances, equipment, fittings, and fixtures.
Exhibit A
Land
Improvements
2. All funds, accounts, deposits, instruments, documents, contract rights, general intangibles, notes, and chattel paper arising from or by virtue of any transaction related to the Land, the Improvements, or any of the personal property described in this .
Exhibit B
3. All permits, licenses, franchises, certificates, and other rights and privileges now held or hereafter acquired by Borrower in connection with the Land, the Improvements, or any of the personal property described in this , to the extent assignable.
Exhibit B
4. All right, title, and interest of Borrower in and to the name by which the Land and/or the Improvements are known, including trademarks and trade names relating thereto.
5. All right, title, and interest of Borrower in, to, and under all plans, specifications, maps, surveys, reports, permits, licenses, architectural, engineering and construction contracts, books of account, insurance policies, and other documents of whatever kind or character, relating to the use, construction upon, occupancy, leasing, sale, or operation of the Land and/or the Improvements, to the extent assignable.
6. All interests, estates, or other claims or demands, in law and in equity, which Borrower now has or may hereafter acquire in the Land, the Improvements, or the personal property described in this .
Exhibit B
7. All right, title, and interest owned by Borrower in and to all options to purchase or lease the Land, the Improvements, or any other personal property described in this , or any portion thereof or interest therein, and in and to any greater estate in the Land, the Improvements, or any of the personal property described in this .
Exhibit B
Exhibit B
8. All of the estate, interest, right, title, other claim or demand, both in law and in equity, including claims or demands with respect to the proceeds of insurance relating thereto, which Borrower now has or may hereafter acquire in the Land, the Improvements, or any of the personal property described in this , or any portion thereof or interest therein, and any and all awards made for the taking by eminent domain, or by any proceeding or purchase in lieu thereof, of the whole or any part of such property, including without limitation, any award resulting from a change of any streets (whether as to grade, access, or otherwise) and any award for severance damages.
Exhibit B
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
9. All right, title, and interest of Borrower in and to all contracts, permits, certificates, licenses, approvals, utility deposits, utility capacity, and utility rights issued, granted, agreed upon, or otherwise provided by any governmental or private authority, person or entity relating to the ownership, development, construction, operation, maintenance, marketing, sale, or use of the Land and/or the Improvements (to the extent assignable), including all of Borrower's rights and privileges hereto or hereafter otherwise arising in connection with or pertaining to the Land and/or the Improvements, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, all water and/or sewer capacity, all water, sewer and/or other utility deposits or prepaid fees, and/or all water and/or sewer and/or other utility tap rights or other utility rights, any right or privilege of Borrower under any loan commitment, lease, contract, declaration of covenants, restrictions and easements or like instrument, developer's agreement, or other agreement with any third party pertaining to the ownership, development, construction, operation, maintenance, marketing, sale, or use of the Land and/or the Improvements, to the extent assignable.
AND ALL PROCEEDS AND PRODUCTS OF THE FOREGOING PERSONAL PROPERTY DESCRIBED IN THIS .
EXHIBIT B
A PORTION OF THE ABOVE DESCRIBED GOODS ARE OR ARE TO BE AFFIXED TO THE REAL PROPERTY DESCRIBED IN .
EXHIBIT A
BORROWER IS THE RECORD TITLE HOLDER AND OWNER OF THE REAL PROPERTY DESCRIBED IN .
EXHIBIT A
ALL TERMS USED IN THIS (AND NOT OTHERWISE DEFINED IN THIS ) SHALL HAVE THE MEANING, IF ANY, ASCRIBED TO SUCH TERM UNDER THE UNIFORM COMMERCIAL CODE AS ADOPTED AND IN FORCE IN THE JURISDICTION IN WHICH THIS FINANCING STATEMENT HAS BEEN FILED/RECORDED (THE "").
EXHIBIT B
EXHIBIT B
U.C.C.
WITH RESPECT TO ANY FINANCING STATEMENT TO WHICH THIS IS ATTACHED, THE TERM "BORROWER" SHALL MEAN "DEBTOR" AS SUCH TERM IS DEFINED IN THE CODE.
EXHIBIT B
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
THE FOLLOWING ITEMS AFFECT BOTH TRACT ONE AND TRACT TWO:
 
 
 
THE FOLLOWING ITEMS AFFECT TRACT ONE:
 
 
 
 
 
 
THE FOLLOWING ITEMS AFFECT TRACT TWO:
 
 
 
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust
All of Parcel "B", Block E, Lyon's Addition to Clarendon, as the same is shown on a plat attached to the Deed of Resubdivision and Easements recorded in Deed Book 4160 at page 294, among the Land Records of Arlington County, Virginia, being more particularly described by metes and bounds as follows:
Beginning at a point where the southerly right-of-way line of Wilson Boulevard (variable width) intersects the westerly right-of-way line of North Garfield Street (variable width); thence with the said line of North Garfield Street:
S 06 32' 23" E, 158.46 feet to a point where the said line of North Garfield Street intersects the northerly right-of-way line of Clarendon Boulevard (variable width); thence with the said line of Clarendon Boulevard
S 55 15' 05" W, 188.53 feet to a point marking a corner to a part of Lot 3, Block E, Lyons Addition to Clarendon; thence departing the said line of Clarendon Boulevard and running with the line of said part of Lot 3 and part of Lot 2, Block E, Lyons Addition to Clarendon and also a portion of the aforementioned right-of-way line of Wilson Boulevard
N 21 51' 21" W, 115.66 feet to a point; thence with the said line of Wilson Boulevard on the following three (3) courses and distances:
N 45 11' 50" E, 56.60 feet to a point; thence
S 12 33' 46" E, 17.72 feet to a point; thence
N 45 12' 07" E, 191.52 feet to the point of beginning. Containing 25,201 square feet, or 0.57854 acres of land, more or less.
TOGETHER WITH the beneficial easements and other items in the nature of real property rights contained in the Declaration of Covenants and Easements recorded in Deed Book 4009 at page 639 among the aforesaid Land Records.
TOGETHER WITH the rights in the nature of real property rights arising from the Encroachment Ordinance recorded in Deed Book 4108 at page 1998. among the aforesaid Land Records.
FURTHER TOGETHER WITH the Party Wall Agreements dated October 2, 1937 and recorded May 31, 1938 in Deed Book 436 at page 41; dated January 15, 1938 and recorded May 31, 1938 in Deed Book 436 at page 42; dated June 28, 1938 and recorded August 26, 1938 in Deed Book 442 at page 577, as affected by Agreement and dated May 9, 1939 and recorded December 26, 1940 in Deed Book 527 at page 45; as supplemented by Declaration (Supplemental Party Wall Agreement) dated December 19, 1990 and recorded January 4, 1991 in Deed Book 2459 at page 1712, among the aforesaid Land Records
NOTE FOR INFORMATIONAL PURPOSES ONLY:
RPC Number: 18012004
 
Prudential Loan No. 706108495
Clarendon Center/Deed of Trust


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20110429162448.txt.gz
TIME:20110429162448
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 28, 2011, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2011. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: April 28, 2011
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
April 28, 2011, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended March 31, 2011. Total revenue for the three months ended March 31, 2011 ("2011 Quarter") decreased 4.1% to $41,820,000 compared to $43,613,000 for the three months ended March 31, 2010 ("2010 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before income attributable to the noncontrolling interest and preferred stock dividends, decreased 33.4% to $8,406,000 for the 2011 Quarter compared to $12,612,000 for the 2010 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $3,524,000, or $0.19 per diluted share, for the 2011 Quarter compared to net income available to common stockholders of $6,768,000, or $0.37 per diluted share, for the 2010 Quarter. From time to time, non-recurring events impact earnings and the 2011 Quarter was negatively affected by two such occurrences. The $3,244,000 decline in net income compared to the 2010 Quarter was almost entirely due to 1) the collection in the 2010 Quarter of $1,939,000 of past due rents from a former tenant , and 2) a loss of $1,435,000 arising from the start of operations during the initial lease-up period at the newly constructed Clarendon Center when construction interest expense and depreciation and amortization exceeded the property operating income. Also of significance during the 2011 Quarter were the offsetting affects of a $1,100,000 property income decline due to reduced occupancy in the Mixed-Use portfolio, and a comparative $1,200,000 property income increase due to lower 2011 snow removal expenses.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio decreased 10.1% for the 2011 Quarter compared to the 2010 Quarter and same property operating income decreased 8.6%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio decreased 6.5% for the 2011 Quarter compared to the 2010 Quarter. The primary cause of this decrease was the prior year's collection of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant. Excluding this one-time revenue, same property shopping center operating income increased 1.7% compared to the prior year. Same property operating income in the mixed-use portfolio decreased 16.3% for the 2011 Quarter compared to the 2010 Quarter, primarily due to decreased occupancy.
 
As of March 31, 2011, 89.6% of the commercial portfolio (all properties except Clarendon Center's apartments) was leased compared to 91.6% at March 31, 2010. On a same property basis, 90.2% of the commercial portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 91.6%. The Clarendon Center apartments were 92.2% leased at March 31, 2011. The 2011 commercial leasing percentages decreased due to a net decrease of approximately 115,000 square feet of leased space, of which approximately 94,000 square feet was attributable to mixed-use properties.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) decreased 18.9% to $12,871,000 in the 2011 Quarter compared to $15,862,000 for the 2010 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders decreased 20.9% to $0.53 per share for the 2011 Quarter compared to $0.67 per share for the 2010 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus real estate depreciation and amortization, and excluding gains from property dispositions and extraordinary items. FFO decreased in the 2011 Quarter compared to the 2010 Quarter primarily due to (1) the collection of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant in the 2010 Quarter ($1,939,000 or $0.08 per diluted share), (2) reduced occupancy in the Mixed-Use portfolio ($1,101,000 or $0.05 per diluted share) and (3) the start of operations at Clarendon Center ($489,000 or $0.02 per diluted share ), all of which was partially offset by (4) the improvement in property operating income resulting from reduced snow removal expense, net of tenant recoveries, compared to the 2010 Quarter ($1,200,000 or $0.05 per diluted share).
In light of the current favorable long-term interest rate environment and the potential for future interest rate increases, in late March 2011, the Company replaced its Clarendon Center construction loan with long-term financing. The new 15-year, $125 million loan requires monthly payments of principal and interest based upon a 5.31% interest rate and 25 year amortization schedule. The loan proceeds repaid the $104 million outstanding under the construction loan, and provided net cash proceeds of approximately $20 million, which will be used primarily to fund the remaining Clarendon Center development costs. At March 31, 2011, approximately 97% of the Company's total debt consisted of fixed-rate, amortizing non-recourse mortgage loans, none of which matures before October 2012.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 55 community and neighborhood shopping center and mixed-use properties totaling approximately 9.0 million square feet of leasable area. Over 85% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
Contact:     Scott V. Schneider
          (301) 986-6220
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20110503164738.txt.gz
TIME:20110503164738
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 29, 2011, Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the "Company"), furnished a Form 8-K (the "8-K") for the purpose of providing, under Items 2.02 and 9.01, the Company's results of operations and financial condition and a press release reporting such financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2011.
This Form 8-K/A is being furnished to amend the press release attachment provided as an exhibit to the 8-K to bring it into conformity with the press release issued by the Company. In addition to the Company's results of operations for the quarter ended March 31, 2011 (which are unchanged), the condensed consolidated statement of operations on the filed exhibit inadvertently included additional columns of extraneous information not presented in the press release. In accordance with the applicable rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"), the Company is refurnishing Items 2.02 and 9.01 and Exhibit 99.1 in their entirety.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: April 28, 2011
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
April 28, 2011, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended March 31, 2011. Total revenue for the three months ended March 31, 2011 ("2011 Quarter") decreased 4.1% to $41,820,000 compared to $43,613,000 for the three months ended March 31, 2010 ("2010 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before income attributable to the noncontrolling interest and preferred stock dividends, decreased 33.4% to $8,406,000 for the 2011 Quarter compared to $12,612,000 for the 2010 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $3,524,000, or $0.19 per diluted share, for the 2011 Quarter compared to net income available to common stockholders of $6,768,000, or $0.37 per diluted share, for the 2010 Quarter. From time to time, non-recurring events impact earnings and the 2011 Quarter was negatively affected by two such occurrences. The $3,244,000 decline in net income compared to the 2010 Quarter was almost entirely due to 1) the collection in the 2010 Quarter of $1,939,000 of past due rents from a former tenant , and 2) a loss of $1,435,000 arising from the start of operations during the initial lease-up period at the newly constructed Clarendon Center when construction interest expense and depreciation and amortization exceeded the property operating income. Also of significance during the 2011 Quarter were the offsetting affects of a $1,100,000 property income decline due to reduced occupancy in the Mixed-Use portfolio, and a comparative $1,200,000 property income increase due to lower 2011 snow removal expenses.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio decreased 10.1% for the 2011 Quarter compared to the 2010 Quarter and same property operating income decreased 8.6%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio decreased 6.5% for the 2011 Quarter compared to the 2010 Quarter. The primary cause of this decrease was the prior year's collection of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant. Excluding this one-time revenue, same property shopping center operating income increased 1.7% compared to the prior year. Same property operating income in the mixed-use portfolio decreased 16.3% for the 2011 Quarter compared to the 2010 Quarter, primarily due to decreased occupancy.
 
As of March 31, 2011, 89.6% of the commercial portfolio (all properties except Clarendon Center's apartments) was leased compared to 91.6% at March 31, 2010. On a same property basis, 90.2% of the commercial portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 91.6%. The Clarendon Center apartments were 92.2% leased at March 31, 2011. The 2011 commercial leasing percentages decreased due to a net decrease of approximately 115,000 square feet of leased space, of which approximately 94,000 square feet was attributable to mixed-use properties.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) decreased 18.9% to $12,871,000 in the 2011 Quarter compared to $15,862,000 for the 2010 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders decreased 20.9% to $0.53 per share for the 2011 Quarter compared to $0.67 per share for the 2010 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus real estate depreciation and amortization, and excluding gains from property dispositions and extraordinary items. FFO decreased in the 2011 Quarter compared to the 2010 Quarter primarily due to (1) the collection of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant in the 2010 Quarter ($1,939,000 or $0.08 per diluted share), (2) reduced occupancy in the Mixed-Use portfolio ($1,101,000 or $0.05 per diluted share) and (3) the start of operations at Clarendon Center ($489,000 or $0.02 per diluted share ), all of which was partially offset by (4) the improvement in property operating income resulting from reduced snow removal expense, net of tenant recoveries, compared to the 2010 Quarter ($1,200,000 or $0.05 per diluted share).
In light of the current favorable long-term interest rate environment and the potential for future interest rate increases, in late March 2011, the Company replaced its Clarendon Center construction loan with long-term financing. The new 15-year, $125 million loan requires monthly payments of principal and interest based upon a 5.31% interest rate and 25 year amortization schedule. The loan proceeds repaid the $104 million outstanding under the construction loan, and provided net cash proceeds of approximately $20 million, which will be used primarily to fund the remaining Clarendon Center development costs. At March 31, 2011, approximately 97% of the Company's total debt consisted of fixed-rate, amortizing non-recourse mortgage loans, none of which matures before October 2012.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 55 community and neighborhood shopping center and mixed-use properties totaling approximately 9.0 million square feet of leasable area. Over 85% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
Contact:     Scott V. Schneider
          (301) 986-6220
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20110517152843.txt.gz
TIME:20110517152843
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.07. Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
On May 13, 2011, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") held its Annual Meeting of Stockholders, at which John E. Chapoton, B. Francis Saul II, James W. Symington and John R. Whitmore were reelected to the Board of Directors for three year terms expiring at the 2014 Annual Meeting. The terms of the remaining Board members did not expire as of the May 13, 2011 meeting and those individuals continue as directors of the Company. Holders of 17,599,292 shares of the Company's common stock voted in person at the meeting or by proxy (representing 95.3% of the 18,460,881 shares eligible to vote) as follows:
 
The stockholders voted for the ratification of Ernst & Young as independent public accountants as follows:
 
The stockholders voted to approve the 2010 compensation paid to the Company's named executive officers, as disclosed in the Company's Proxy Statement for the 2011 Annual Meeting as follows:
 
The stockholders voted to indicate how frequently the company should seek an advisory vote on executive compensation as follows:
 
In accordance with the majority of the votes cast at the annual meeting with respect to this item, the Company has determined to include the advisory vote on executive compensation in the Company's proxy materials every three years.
Item 8.01. Other Events.
The Company posted on its web site, , a presentation given by management at the Company's annual meeting of stockholders. The presentation is Exhibit 99. (a) to this current report on Form 8-K.
www.saulcenters.com
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: May 17, 2011
 
 

 
Annual Meeting of Shareholders
We have prepared a brief slide show to present highlights of 2010 including successful activity in the debt markets, our core operating performance, financial results and recent development activities.
 
Debt Maturities Entering 2010
2010 Maturities
 None
2010 Maturities
 Clarendon construction loan
Matures 11/2011, two 9-month extensions
2012 Maturities
 Fixed-rate debt
$111 million outstanding, due 10/2012, secured by 9 shopping centers
In light of the favorable long-term interest rate environment over the past year and the potential for future interest rate increases, we have focused on refinancing all of our near term debt maturities with long term mortgage debt.
We started 2010 with $576 million of fixed-rate mortgage debt, none of which was scheduled to mature in 2010 or 2011.
We had our Clarendon Center construction loan maturing in late 2011.
2012 maturities of fixed-rate debt totalled $111 millionin a pooled mortgage secured by 9 shopping centers, with an interest rate of 7.7%.
 
Debt Transactions  2010
 Thruway and Ravenwood
Each loan generated net cash proceeds, $17 million in total
Pre-payment costs of $5 million
Avg 11.4-year term, 25-year amortization, 5.93% rate
During 2010, we completed 2 new long term non-recourse mortgage loans totalling $63 million to pay-off a portion of the $111 million in loans maturing in 2012. After loan closing costs and early pre-payment penalties of approximately $5 million, we netted $17 million of cash proceeds.
The new loans mature in 2020 and 2025, and the weighted average interest rate is 5.9%, compared to the 7.7% existing rate for the debt that was paid-off.
 
Debt Transactions  2011
Clarendon Center Mortgage
Seven Corners Mortgage
During the 1st quarter 2011, we replaced our Clarendon Center construction loan with long-term financing. The new 15-year, $125 million loan has a 5.31% interest rate and 25 year amortization. The loan proceeds repaid the $104 million outstanding under the construction loan, and provided net cash proceeds of $20 million, which is expected to fund the remaining tenant buildout costs.
We most recently entered into an agreement to borrow $73 million secured by the Seven Corners shopping center. As background, in 1997 we entered into a $147 million mortgage loan with Nomura, secured by a pool of 9 shopping centers. This was our largest loan and is scheduled to mature in October 2012. During 2010, we refinanced Thruway and Ravenwood from this pool, leaving 7 assets, the largest being Seven Corners. The new 15-year loan will not close until April 2012, but we locked the interest rate at 5.84%. Proceeds from this loan will be used to pay-off the remaining Nomura debt and provide cash of $10 million. The remaining six shopping centers, including White Oak, Hampshire Langley, Great Eastern, Southside, Giant Center and Belvedere will be left free and clear.
 
Mortgage Debt Maturities
March 31, 2011
Weighted average maturity of mortgage debt 10.7 years
Year Debt Matures
(Excludes scheduled amortization, includes Seven Corners April 2012 financing)
Subject to the May 2012 closing of the Seven Corners loan, our mortgage debt maturities are shown here.
Over the next seven years, from 2011 through 2017, our total maturities are $98 million. No more than $80 million will mature in any single year between now and 2027.
Five properties secure the loans maturing in 2013, the most significant of which is our flagship office building-601 Pennsylvania Avenue. The 601 Pennsylvania Avenue loan will have a balance of $23 million at maturity, and recent market comparables indicate a value near $200 million.
As of May 2012, twenty of our 55 operating properties will be held free and clear of debt. In our view, we think these properties are worth somewhere between $400 to $425 million.
 
Debt Summary
March 31, 2011
97% of our debt is now fixed rate, non-recourse property debt.
The weighted average interest rate is 6.2%.
Our property operating income provides an interest expense coverage of 2.7 times.
We have a $150 million revolving credit line which matures in June 2012, with a one-year extension to June 2013. There are no outstanding borrowings under the line.
As of March 31,2011, we had $33 million in cash.
 
Capital structure Highlights
Year End
As of March 31, 2011, we had a total combined debt and equity capitalization of approximately $2 billion, compared to $1.4 billion 5 years ago.
Total debt is currently $741 million, represented here in blue.
Preferred stock, of $180 million, shown here in yellow, represents about 9% of our capital base. Both issues are perpetual and $100 million is currently callable by the Company, with the balance of $80 million callable beginning in March 2013.
Our capital structure now has a leverage ratio of approximately 37% debt to total capitalization.
 
Clarendon Center
At year end 2010, construction at our Clarendon Center development was substantally completed. The project includes a residential tower with 244 luxury apartment units, 42,000 square feet of street-level retail stores and 170,000 square feet of office space, all located on two blocks adjacent to the Clarendon Metro station in Arlington County, Virginia.
Clarendon is one of the premier residential and commercial submarkets in the metropolitan Washington, DC area.
The above photo captures just one of the many fantastic views of downtown Washington from the upper floors of the project.
 
Clarendon Center
South Block
Here is a shot of Clarendon Center South. The first residential leases for the 244 apartments were signed in November 2010, prior to construction completion. Tenants began occupying the building on December 26, 2010, and as of today, all but 2 apartments are leased and only 10 units remain unoccupied.
All of the ground floor retail space is leasedtenants include Circa Restaurant and Burke & Herbert Bank. Trader Joe's is expected to have permits issued to begin construction within the next 30 days.
Approximately 45,000 square feet of office space remains to be leased in this block.
 
Clarendon Center
North Block
The North Block contains ground floor retail under 5 stories of office space. The 68,000 square foot Airline Reporting Corporation anchors this block, commencing operations in March 2011. The retail space is 100% leased to restaurant and other small shop service oriented tenants.
A total of 25,000 square feet of office space remains in the north block.
While the initial operating results of Clarendon Center were a drag on first quarter earnings, the successful lease-up of the residential and retail space will continue to improve the property operating results through the balance of 2011.
 
Acquisitions
Rockville Pike, Rockville, Maryland
A moment about acquisitions. There are limited opportunities in the market to continue to acquire grocery anchored shopping centers at prices that we consider to be attractive for investment.
However, during late 2010, we were able to acquire two retail locations on Rockville Pike, adjacent to the White Flint Metro Station. Shown here is an aerial of the White Flint area. The Metro Station can be seen at the top of the photo circled in green and our two sites are outlined in red.
1
 
Acquisitions
11503 Rockville Pike, Rockville, Maryland
Metro Pike Center, Rockville, Maryland
The first, on the east side of Rockville Pike is a 20,000 square foot retail property, fully leased to two tenants, Staples being the anchor.
The second, on the west side, is a 67,000 square foot multi-tenant retail property that is 89% leased.
The price for the two was $50 million, and we assumed $16 million in debt. While providing an acceptable current cash flow yield, the real attraction of these sites is the future development rights. The sites are zoned for over 1.0 million square feet of mixed-use space. While we do not anticipate redeveloping the properties in the foreseeable future, the convenient Metro location of these two assets should provide an attractive future redevelopment opportunity.
2
 
Geographic Mix & Property Type
2010 Property Operating Income
Looking at our overall portfolio, our geographic focus continues to be in the metropolitan Washington, DC market.
Over 85% of our 2010 property operating income was generated in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area. This focus continues to be our strength in this period of economic crisis. With nationwide unemployment still at 9% in early 2011, the Washington area jobless rate is approximately 6%.
The retail component of our portfolio's income was 79%, with office producing 21%.
3
 
Overall Portfolio Leasing Percentage
(Excluding properties under development)
The economic challenges of the past few years continue to impact our portfolio's operating performance, primarily as a result of decreased leasing percentage as shown here.
Our leasing percentage declined from a peak annual average of 96.8% during 2006, to 91.9% during 2010, and 90.2% during the 1st quarter of 2011.
Deal volume in the retail portfolio has increased since early 2010, stabilizing the retail leasing percentages over the past year. The occupancy decline in the 1st Quarter of 2011 was largely caused by office vacancies.
 
Retail Leasing Summary
(Excluding properties under development)
With the decline in overall consumer spending, retailers continue to struggle with declining sales and limited access to capital. Declining retail sales lead to higher vacancies and lower rental rates. We expect rental rate pressures to remain until overall occupancy rebounds and tenant sales begin to increase.
On a same space basis, retail rental rate increases over expiring rents averaged 8.7% for the 5 year period prior to 2008. The most recent year of same space rent increases was 2008, with very strong 10.1% increases in new and renewal rents. Retail rents decreased by 1.2% in 2009 and by 6.8% in 2010. The first quarter of 2011 was down 10%.
15
 
Retail Same Property NOI Growth
Over the five years from 2003 to 2007, we achieved average annual retail net operating income growth of 2.8% on a same property basis.
Retail same property growth averaged 1.2% during 2008. Since then, same property operating income has declined, dropping 3.5% in 2009 and 0.7% in 2010. (The above figures exclude the impact of a $1.9 million collection in early 2010 of past due rents from a former anchor tenant).
The declines were primarily the result of increased small shop vacancy and higher credit loss reserves for tenants struggling to make rent payments.
Most of the increased vacancies were closings of shop tenants consisting primarily of restaurants, tanning salons, small fitness centers and video stores. Much of this weakness continues to be concentrated in our Loudoun County, Virginia and our Florida properties.
16
 
Shopping Centers
(2010)
Harris Teeter, Lansdowne Town Center
48 retail properties generate 79% of property operating income
32 centers are grocery anchored & produce 84% of retail operating income
Tenants reported sales averaging $322 per square foot
Grocers reported sales averaging $482 per square foot
During 2010, property operating income from our 48 retail properties produced 79% of overall operating income.
32 of our centers are anchored by a food store, and these grocery-anchored properties produced 84% of our retail operating income.
Total retail sales for the portfolio, from tenants who report sales, were $322 per square foot in 2010, a decrease of 1% from 2009, an improvement from a 3.1% decrease a year earlier.
Grocery store sales are a key driver of customer traffic in neighborhood centers. The overall sales volume reported by our grocery stores averaged $482 per square foot, with same store sales flat from 2009 levels.
17
 
Favorable Demographics
Average household income within three mile radius of Saul Centers' retail properties exceeds the national average
Saul Centers Avg. $98,400
National Avg. $70,200
Source: U.S. Census Bureau, Census 2000 ESRI forecasts for 2010.
The long-term success of our core portfolio hinges largely on prime infill locations.
Saul Centers' demographics are well above the national averages.
Saul Centers' properties 3-mile trade areas have average household incomes of $98,400, compared to the national average of $70,200.
Our 3 and 5 mile population counts average 94,000, and 228,000, respectively, which are representative of very strong infill locations.
18
 
Core Shopping Centers
(2010)
Smallwood Village Center, Waldorf, MD
221 retail leases signed (180 prior year)
67% renewal rate compared to 71% previous 3 years
Over 1,000,000 square feet leased
Lease volume increased but rental rates are decreasing
While anchor tenants provide the traffic to the centers, small shop leasing is a major driver of growth in our business.
During 2010, we executed 221 new and renewal leases representing over 1,000,000 square feet of space.
Over the past three years, 71% of the tenants whose leases expired have renewed their leases, a strong retention rate. The 2010 rate was slightly lower at 67%.
Lease volumes have increased over the past year, however as previously mentioned, rental rates have declined. We expect continued rental rate pressure until market occupancy rates again reach pre-2008 levels.
19
 
Major Retail Tenants
Top 10 retail tenants provided only 20% of 2010 Revenue
Tenant Name
Locations
SF %
2010 Revenue
Giant Food
7
4.6%
4.3%
Safeway
8
4.4%
3.1%
Capital One Bank
20
0.8%
2.8%
CVS
6
1.2%
1.8%
Publix
5
2.7%
1.7%
Lowe's Home Center
2
2.9%
1.6%
Harris Teeter
3
1.6%
1.5%
Home Depot
2
2.7%
1.4%
Super Fresh
2
1.1%
1.1%
Office Depot
4
1.4%
0.9%
Totals
59
23.4%
20.2%
A diverse retail tenant base minimizes exposure to any one tenant's credit.
Of 2010 rental revenue, only Giant Food, at 4.3%, Safeway at 3.1% and Capital One Bank at 2.8% accounted for more than 2% of total Company revenue.
Our top 10 tenants comprise only 20% of total revenue, with 58% of this revenue generated by supermarkets, a very stable source of income.
20
 
Retail Bankruptcies
Tenant Name
Locations
SF %
2010 Revenue
Super Fresh
2
1.1%
1.1%
Borders Books
1
0.2%
0.5%
Blockbuster
4
0.1%
0.2%
Totals
7
1.4%
1.8%
The recent bankruptcies of chain's such as Blockbuster Video, A&P operating as Super Fresh, and Border's Books will continue to put pressure on the shopping center industry. Rents from these three tenants in our portfolio amounted to 1.8% of our 2010 annual revenues.
Blockbuster has vacated 2 of its 4 stores and has entered into lease renewals to retain the others.
Borders at Thruway has not included our single lease in its list of store closings.
Superfresh has closed its Lumberton, New Jersey store and at the end of April rejected this lease as part of its bankruptcy. Their second lease with us is subleased to Super H Grocery at Fairfax, one of the top sales volume grocers in our portfolio.
21
 
Seven Corners
Seven Corners, Falls Church, Virginia
I'll now review leasing and operations at a few of our significant assets.
Seven Corners is a 568,000 square foot community shopping center in Falls Church, Virginia.
It is anchored by a Shoppers Food Warehouse and a Home Depot.
During 2010, we added a free-standing 6,000 square foot Red Robin family restaurant on the Route 7 side of the center. On the center's Route 50 side, a 28,000 square foot furniture store vacated in April 2011, and we have released their space to Ski Chalet, relocating from a near-by Arlington location and scheduled to open this fall.
The center is our largest retail property as measured both by square footage and operating income, and is our top producing shopping center with over $170 million in annual sales reported by our tenants.
An indicator of the strength of this location, the leasing percentage of Seven Corners has remained above 98% during each of the last five years.
22
 
Lansdowne Town Center
Lansdowne Town Center, Leesburg, Virginia
Lansdowne Towne Center is a 189,000 square foot, Harris Teeter anchored shopping center, located off Route 7, near Leesburg, Virginia.
We completed our development of Lansdowne in 2007, our fourth shopping center in Loudoun County.
Despite the relative prosperity of Loudoun County, small shop retailers have struggled for the past few years.
Occupancy fell to a low point of 87% in the first quarter of 2011. While leasing activity has rebounded somewhat in the past six months, Lansdowne has lost four restaurant operators in the past 12 months.
We own four centers in Loudoun County, totaling over 700,000 square feet of space. Loudoun has been one of our most impacted markets, as the turmoil in the housing market has caused dramatically decreased retail sales, and tenant delinquencies at many restaurants, health fitness centers and other discretionary type retail uses.
Our overall Loudoun County leasing percentage was just below 90% at March 31, 2011.
23
 
Westview Village
Westview Village, Fredrick, Maryland
We constructed Westview Village on MD Route 85 in Frederick, MD in 2009.
This development includes 60,000 square feet of retail shop space, 30,000 square feet of professional office space, and 11,000 square feet of pad space.
Leasing was slow throughout 2010, with 36% of the 100,000 square feet leased as of December 2010. Activity has improved, and we have signed an additional 14,000 square feet of space since the first of the year, bringing the total leased to just under 50%.
24
 
Southdale
Southdale, Glen Burnie, Maryland
Southdale is a 484,000 square foot community shopping center located in Glen Burnie, MD, south of Baltimore.
The center is anchored by Home Depot, Marshall's, Value City Furniture, and a Fresh World grocery store.
Southdale had our only Circuit City store, which vacated 37,000 square feet in 2009 with their corporate liquidation.
We released 20,000 square feet of this box to Gallo Clothing, a chain of 18 off-price clothing stores in the Mid-Atlantic region.
Southdale is currently 94% leased.
25
 
Thruway
Thruway, Winston Salem, North Carolina
Thruway is generally regarded as the leading community shopping center in Winston-Salem, North Carolina.
This 363,000 square foot shopping center is anchored by Harris Teeter and Stein Mart, and has of number of nationally recognized tenants such as Rite Aid, Hanesbrands, Talbots, Borders Books, Chicos, Joseph Banks, Ann Taylor, Coldwater Creek and most recently, Carter's Kids.
Earlier this quarter, Bed, Bath and Beyond vacated a 28,000 square foot store. Thruway is currently 90% leased, largely as a result of this box vacancy. We are in discussions with several tenant prospects for this space.
26
 
Office/Mixed-Use Properties
1.6 million square feet
21% of property operating income
Property operating income decreased 7.5% in 2010
601 Pennsylvania Ave, Washington DC
Van Ness Square, Washington DC
Our office/mixed-use space totals over 1.6 million square feet.
Operating income in the office/mixed-use portfolio was 21% of our total property operating income in 2010.
On a same property basis, the office property income decreased 7.5% over 2009 levels, primarily due to a 40,000 square foot tenant at Van Ness defaulting on rent payments and vacating their space at year end 2010. While we have a few tenant prospects, lease-up of this space is expected to take time and this vacancy will likely continue to affect property income results throughout 2011.
27
 
Washington Square
Washington Square, Old Town Alexandria, Verginia
Also at year-end 2010, leases expired for two full floor users totalling 64,000 square feet at our Washington Square building in Alexandria, Virginia. Due to business contraction, these tenants required only 15,000 square feet of space collectively upon renewal. As a result, we had an additional 40,000 square feet to lease at this project. A total of 6,000 square feet has been leased, but 2011 results will again be negatively impacted by this vacancy.
Office markets throughout the region are generally slow in tenant expansion prospects entering 2011.
28
 
Funds From Operations (FFO) & Dividends
Current dividend of $.36/share equates to an annual dividend of $1.44/share.
FFO results for the past 10 years are highlighted here.
Compounded annual FFO growth per share from 2001 through 2007 was 4.8%. Beginning in 2008, we have experienced FFO declines due to the economic downturn's impact on our portfolio and several non-recurring events.
After increasing the common stock dividend from 2005 to 2008, we reduced the January 2009 dividend by 17%, from a quarterly amount of $0.47 per share to $0.39 per share. In October 2009 we decreased the payout to the current $0.36 per share.
29
 
Dividend as a % of FFO
Over the past 5 years, we paid out an average of 66% of our FFO as dividends. As you may know, REITs are required to pay out 90% of taxable income. We have followed a policy of setting the common stock dividend approximately equal to taxable income, to comply with these REIT regulations, and not pay federal corporate income tax. In this uncertain economic climate, this practice has allowed us to maintain the maximum amount of excess cash flow to fund development activities or to retire debt.
Taxable income declined during the past year, largely due to non-recurring, loan pre-payment costs of $5 million in conjunction with extending our debt maturities, however the Board chose to maintain our dividend throughout 2010. We paid dividends equal to 68% of our 2010 FFO
30
 
Total Shareholder Return
(assumes reinvestment of dividends)
Our 10-year compounded total return now averages 15.1% per year and our 5-year total return is 4.4% per year.
31
 
Saul Centers
NYSE Symbol: B F S
We remain committed to, and confident in, the long-term performance of our core retail and office properties.
Our balance sheet is strong, and we are prepared to endure the potential for continued economic stress.
32
 
Forward-looking Statements
This presentation contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the federal securities laws. These statements are generally characterized by terms such as "believe," "expect" and "may."
Although we believe that the expectations reflected in such forward-looking statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, our actual results could differ materially from those given in the forward-looking statements as a result of changes in factors which include, among others, the following:
 -  continuing risks related to the challenging domestic and global credit markets and their effect on discretionary spending;
risks related to our tenants' ability to pay rent and our reliance on significant tenants;
risks related to our substantial relationships with entities affiliated with our senior management;
risks of financing, such as increases in interest rates, restrictions imposed by our debt, our ability to meet existing financial covenants and our ability to consummate planned and additional financings on acceptable terms;
risks related to our development activities;
risks that our growth will be limited if we cannot obtain additional capital;
risks that planned and additional acquisitions or redevelopments may not be consummated, or if they are consummated, that they will not perform as expected;
risks generally incident to the ownership of real property;
risks related to our status as a REIT for federal income tax purposes; and
such other risks as described in Part I, Item IA of our Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010.
33


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20110804130759.txt.gz
TIME:20110804130759
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On August 3, 2011, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2011. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: August 3, 2011
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
August 3, 2011, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended June 30, 2011. Total revenue for the three months ended June 30, 2011 ("2011 Quarter") increased 6.7% to $42,779,000 compared to $40,087,000 for the three months ended June 30, 2010 ("2010 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before income attributable to the noncontrolling interest and preferred stock dividends, decreased 23.8% to $8,193,000 for the 2011 Quarter compared to $10,746,000 for the 2010 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $2,613,000, or $0.14 per diluted share, for the 2011 Quarter compared to $1,888,000, or $0.10 per diluted share, for the 2010 Quarter. In the 2011 Quarter, operating income decreased because (1) property operating income declined $1,285,000 compared to the 2010 quarter due to reduced occupancy in the mixed-use portfolio, and (2) Clarendon Center, portions of which continue to be in their initial lease-up period, adversely impacted operating income by $1,256,000, primarily because interest, depreciation and amortization expenses exceeded the property operating income ($265,000) and the amount of interest capitalized on the portion of the project not yet placed into service declined compared to the 2010 Quarter ($991,000). The increase in net income available to common shareholders in the 2011 Quarter was primarily caused by $4,479,000 of expense in the 2010 Quarter related to the early extinguishment of debt when the Company refinanced the mortgage loan secured by its Thruway shopping center located in Winston Salem, North Carolina, offset in part by a non-cash expense of $1,244,000 during the 2011 Quarter, due to a decline in the fair value of the Company's interest rate swaps.
Same property revenue for the total portfolio decreased 3.6% for the 2011 Quarter compared to the 2010 Quarter and same property operating income decreased 5.8%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of operations of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. Same property operating income in the shopping center portfolio decreased 2.1% in the 2011 Quarter compared to the 2010 Quarter due primarily to the (a) impact of the bankruptcy and departure of Superfresh from Lumberton shopping center and (b) the loss of two restaurant tenants prior to their lease expirations. Same property operating income in the mixed-use portfolio decreased 18.3% for the 2011 Quarter compared to the 2010 Quarter, primarily due to a decrease in occupancy that occurred in the latter part of 2010 and the first quarter of 2011.
 
For the six months ended June 30, 2011 ("2011 Period"), total revenue increased 1.0% to $84,512,000 compared to $83,700,000 for the six months ended June 30, 2010 ("2010 Period"), and operating income decreased 29.3% to $16,512,000 compared to $23,358,000 for the 2010 Period. Net income available to common stockholders was $6,137,000, or $0.33 per diluted share, for the 2011 Period, compared to $8,656,000, or $0.47 per diluted share, for the 2010 Period. Overall same property revenue and operating income for the total portfolio each decreased 7.6% in the 2011 Period compared to the 2010 Period. In the 2011 Period, same property shopping center operating income decreased 4.7%, primarily due to the collection in the prior year of $1,939,000 of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant. Excluding this one-time revenue, same property shopping center operating income decreased 0.7% compared to the prior year. Same property operating income in the mixed-use portfolio decreased 17.3% for the 2011 Period, primarily due to decreased occupancy.
As of June 30, 2011, 89.8% of the commercial portfolio (all properties except the apartments at Clarendon Center) was leased, compared to 91.9% at June 30, 2010. On a same property basis, 90.2% of the commercial portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 91.9%. The Clarendon Center apartments were 100% leased at June 30, 2011. The 2011 commercial leasing percentages were impacted by a net decrease of approximately 145,000 square feet of leased space, of which approximately 90,000 square feet was attributable to mixed-use properties.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 19.1% to $11,636,000 in the 2011 Quarter compared to $9,770,000 in the 2010 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 17.1% to $0.48 per share for the 2011 Quarter compared to $0.41 per share for the 2010 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus real estate depreciation and amortization, and excluding gains from property dispositions and extraordinary items. FFO increased in the 2011 Quarter compared to the 2010 Quarter primarily due to the prior year's expense associated with the Thruway refinancing ($4,479,000 or $0.18 per diluted share), offset in part by (1) reduced occupancy in the same property mixed-use portfolio ($1,285,000 or $0.05 per diluted share) and (2) non-cash expense caused by the decrease in fair value of interest rate swaps ($1,244,000 or $0.05 per diluted share). Clarendon Center operations adversely impacted FFO by $126,000 during the 2011 Quarter because (a) the construction loan was replaced with higher rate permanent financing during March 2011, causing an increase in interest expense, net of amounts capitalized ($2,250,000 or $0.09 per diluted share) which was partially offset by (b) property operating income ($2,124,000 or $0.09 per diluted share).
 
FFO available to common shareholders for the 2011 Period decreased 4.4% to $24,507,000 from $25,632,000 during the 2010 Period. Per share FFO available to common shareholders for the 2011 Period decreased 6.5% to $1.01 per diluted share from $1.08 per diluted share for the 2010 Period. FFO decreased in the 2011 Period primarily due to (1) reduced occupancy in the same property mixed-use portfolio ($2,386,000 or $0.10 per diluted share), (2) prior year collection of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant ($1,939,000 or $0.08 per diluted share), (3) non-cash expense caused by the decrease in fair value of interest rate swaps ($1,157,000 or $0.05 per diluted share) and (4) the adverse impact of the commencement of operations at Clarendon Center ($1,145,000 or $0.05 per diluted share) comprised of an increase in interest expense, net of amounts capitalized ($3,986,000) in excess of property operating income ($2,841,000), all of which were partially offset by (1) the prior year expense associated with the Thruway refinancing ($4,479,000 or $0.18 per diluted share) and (2) the prior year net expense associated with snow removal ($1,200,000 or $0.05 per diluted share).
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 55 community and neighborhood shopping center and mixed-use properties totaling approximately 9.0 million square feet of leasable area. Over 85% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20110819171027.txt.gz
TIME:20110819171027
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") has received notice that Mr. David B. Kay, a Director of the Company and a member of the Audit Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company, would resign as a Director of the Company effective September 1, 2011 to pursue other interests. Mr. Kay's resignation is not the result of any disagreement with the Company on any matter relating to the Company's operations, policies or practices.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20110927161135.txt.gz
TIME:20110927161135
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
On August 9, 2011, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") entered into agreements with Kentlands Retail, Inc., Severna Retail, Inc. and Cranberry Retail, Inc., to acquire three shopping center properties known as Kentlands Square in Gaithersburg, Maryland, Severna Park Marketplace in Severna Park, Maryland and Cranberry Square in Westminster, Maryland, for an aggregate purchase price of $168.5 million (the "Property Acquisition").
Also on August 9, 2011, in connection with the Property Acquisition, the Company and Saul Holdings Limited Partnership ("Saul Holdings") entered into an agreement (the "Purchase Agreement") with B.F. Saul Real Estate Investment Trust ("Saul Trust") for the purchase and sale of shares of the Company's common stock, par value $0.01 per share ("Shares") and units of limited partnership interests in Saul Holdings ("Units") with an aggregate value of $55.8 million. The Purchase Agreement provides that the price per Share and per Unit shall be equal to the average closing prices of the Company's common stock listed on the New York Stock Exchange for the five trading days ending with the trading day immediately preceding the date of closing of the Property Acquisition (the "Purchase Price").
Item 2.01. Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
The information set forth in Item 1.01 above with respect to the completion of the Property Acquisition is incorporated herein by reference.
On September 23, 2011, the Company completed the Property Acquisition. The Property Acquisition was financed with $60.0 million from two secured-bridge loans, a $38.0 million non-recourse permanent loan, approximately $17.1 million in cash and borrowings from the Company's line of credit and $55.8 million through the sale the Shares and Units described above.
The two secured-bridge loans, with an aggregate value of $60.0 million, each have an initial term of six months and accrue interest at a rate equal to LIBOR plus 175 basis points. The $38.0 million non-recourse permanent loan is secured by the Severna Park Marketplace property and has a 15-year term that requires monthly principal and interest payments based upon a 4.30% interest rate and 25-year amortization schedule.
The Property Acquisition adds 635,000 square feet of leasable area, approximately 98% of which is currently leased, to the Company's real estate portfolio.
Item 3.02. Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities.
The information set forth in Item 1.01 above with respect to the offer and sale of Shares to Saul Trust pursuant to the Purchase Agreement is incorporated herein by reference.
On September 23, 2011, the Company closed the issuance and sale of the Shares and Units pursuant to the Purchase Agreement. The Shares and Units were sold a purchase price of approximately $33.12 per Share and per Unit. The Company raised an aggregate of $55.8 million through the equity offering, generating approximately $6.2 million from the issuance of the 186,968 Shares and approximately $49.6 million from the sale of 1,497,814 Units.
The Company is offering and selling the Shares and Units as a private placement pursuant to an exemption from registration provided by Section 4(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. The Company relied on the representations made by Saul Trust that it is an "accredited investor" as defined in Rule 501 of Regulation D and the fact that the offer and sale of the Shares was a transaction by an issuer not involving a public offering.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
(a) and (b) financial statements of businesses acquired and pro forma financial information
The financial statements and pro forma financial information required by Item 9.01(a) and Item 9.01(b) are currently being prepared. The Company will file the required financial statements and pro forma financial information under the cover of Form 8-K/A as soon as practicable, but in no event later than December 5, 2011.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: September 27, 2011


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20111102162144.txt.gz
TIME:20111102162144
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On November 2, 2011, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2011. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: November 2, 2011
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
November 2, 2011, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended September 30, 2011. Total revenue for the three months ended September 30, 2011 ("2011 Quarter") increased 8.4% to $42,878,000 compared to $39,551,000 for the three months ended September 30, 2010 ("2010 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before income attributable to noncontrolling interests and preferred stock dividends, decreased 16.8% to $8,656,000 for the 2011 Quarter compared to $10,411,000 for the 2010 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $1,719,000, or $0.09 per diluted share, for the 2011 Quarter compared to $9,046,000, or $0.49 per diluted share, for the 2010 Quarter.
On September 23, 2011, the Company acquired three Giant Food-anchored neighborhood shopping centers, located in the metropolitan Washington DC / Baltimore area, totaling 635,000 square feet of leasable area. The shopping centers were purchased for an aggregate price of $168,500,000 plus acquisition costs of approximately $2,439,000. Because the properties were acquired just prior to the end of the quarter, their impact on revenue and operating income for the quarter is negligible, however, the acquisition costs were immediately expensed and adversely impacted net income available to common stockholders for the quarter.
Operating income for the 2011 Quarter decreased due to Clarendon Center, portions of which continue to be in their initial lease-up period, because interest and depreciation expense exceeded property operating income by approximately $1,351,000. The Company's operating income also declined due to a $1,303,000 decrease in same property operating income, offset in part by the $540,000 addition to operating income generated by properties acquired during 2010 and 2011. The decrease in net income available to common stockholders for the 2011 Quarter was primarily caused by (1) a $3,591,000 gain on sale of real estate and $1,700,000 gain on casualty settlement, both of which occurred in the 2010 Quarter, (2) $2,439,000 of property acquisition costs described above and, (3) a $1,755,000 decline in operating income, all of which were partially offset by a $2,176,000 decrease in income attributable to noncontrolling interests.
 
Same property revenue decreased 3.2% for the 2011 Quarter and same property operating income decreased 4.4%. The same property comparisons exclude the operating results of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting quarters. For the shopping center portfolio, same property operating income decreased 3.6% due primarily to reduced base rent and increased provision for credit losses resulting primarily from two anchor tenant bankruptcies and, to a lesser extent, vacancies at several core shopping centers. For the mixed-use portfolio, same property operating income decreased 7.3%, primarily due to a decrease in occupancy that occurred in the latter part of 2010 and the first quarter of 2011.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2011 ("2011 Period"), total revenue increased 3.4% to $127,390,000 compared to $123,251,000 for the nine months ended September 30, 2010 ("2010 Period"), and operating income decreased 25.4% to $25,168,000 compared to $33,769,000 for the 2010 Period. Net income available to common stockholders was $7,856,000, or $0.42 per diluted share, for the 2011 Period, compared to $17,702,000, or $0.97 per diluted share, for the 2010 Period. Same property revenue decreased 6.3% and same property operating income decreased 6.7%. For the shopping center portfolio, same property operating income decreased 4.6%, primarily due to the collection in the prior year of $1,939,000 of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant. Excluding the one-time revenue, shopping center same property operating income decreased 1.9%, due to reduced base rent and increased provision for credit losses resulting primarily from the two tenant bankruptcies and, to a lesser extent, increased vacancies at several core shopping centers. For the mixed-use portfolio, same property operating income decreased 14.2% for the 2011 Period, primarily due to decreased occupancy.
As of September 30, 2011, 89.7% of the commercial portfolio was leased (all properties except the apartments at Clarendon Center), compared to 92.0% at September 30, 2010. On a same property basis, 89.2% of the commercial portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 92.0%. The Clarendon Center apartments were 100% leased at September 30, 2011. The 2011 commercial leasing percentages were impacted by a net decrease of approximately 233,000 square feet of leased space, of which approximately 70,000 square feet was caused by the SuperFresh and Borders Books bankruptcies, 48,000 square feet resulted from the early lease termination of a local grocer and 75,000 square feet was an increase in office vacancies in the mixed-use properties.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) decreased 20.4% to $10,727,000 in the 2011 Quarter compared to $13,488,000 in the 2010 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders decreased 22.8% to $0.44 per share for the 2011 Quarter compared to $0.57 per share for the 2010 Quarter.
 
FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus real estate depreciation and amortization, and excluding gains and losses from property dispositions and extraordinary items. FFO decreased in the 2011 Quarter primarily due to property acquisition costs ($2,439,000 or $0.10 per diluted share). Clarendon Center operations adversely impacted FFO by $127,000 during the 2011 Quarter because (a) interest expense capitalized decreased and the construction loan was replaced with higher rate permanent financing during March 2011, causing an increase in interest expense ($2,513,000 or $0.10 per diluted share) which was partially offset by (b) property operating income ($2,386,000 or $0.10 per diluted share).
FFO available to common shareholders for the 2011 Period decreased 9.9% to $35,234,000 from $39,120,000 during the 2010 Period. Per share FFO available to common shareholders for the 2011 Period decreased 12.1% to $1.45 per diluted share from $1.65 per diluted share for the 2010 Period. FFO decreased in the 2011 Period primarily due to (1) reduced occupancy in the same property mixed-use portfolio ($2,841,000 or $0.12 per diluted share), (2) property acquisition costs ($2,513,000 or $0.10 per diluted share), (3) prior year collection of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant ($1,939,000 or $0.08 per diluted share), (4) non-cash expense caused by the decrease in fair value of interest rate swaps ($1,374,000 or $0.06 per diluted share) and (5) the adverse impact of the commencement of operations at Clarendon Center ($744,000 or $0.03 per diluted share) caused by a $5,970,000 increase in interest expense, net of amounts capitalized, in excess of $5,226,000 of property operating income, the combined impact of which were partially offset by (1) the prior year expense associated with the Thruway refinancing ($4,479,000 or $0.18 per diluted share) and (2) the prior year net expense associated with snow removal ($1,200,000 or $0.05 per diluted share).
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 58 community and neighborhood shopping center and mixed-use properties totaling approximately 9.6 million square feet of leasable area. Over 85% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20111209164435.txt.gz
TIME:20111209164435
EVENTS:	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This Current Report on Form 8-K/A amends Item 2.01 and Item 9.01 of the Current Report on Form 8-K, filed on September 27, 2011 (the "Original Form 8-K"), to include certain historical financial statements and certain unaudited pro forma financial information.
Item 2.01. Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
On September 27, 2011, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") filed the Original Form 8-K in connection with the consummation of an acquisition of three shopping center properties known as Kentlands Square II in Gaithersburg, Maryland, Severna Park MarketPlace in Severna Park, Maryland and Cranberry Square in Westminster, Maryland, for an aggregate purchase price of $168.5 million.
In acquiring the properties, the Company evaluated the following factors:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Kentlands Square II
Kentlands Square II is a 241,000 square foot neighborhood shopping center located in Gaithersburg, Maryland, in Montgomery County, the state's most populous and affluent county. More than 38,000 households, with annual household incomes averaging over $114,000, are located within a three-mile radius of the center. The center was constructed in 1993, is 100% leased and is anchored by a 61,000 square foot Giant Food supermarket and a 104,000 square foot Kmart. The property is adjacent to the Company's Kentlands Square I, which is anchored by Lowe's Home Improvement, and Kentlands Place. The Company has no material renovation, improvement or development plans for this property.
Severna Park MarketPlace
Severna Park MarketPlace is a 254,000 square foot neighborhood shopping center located in Severna Park, Maryland, in Anne Arundel County. More than 15,000 households, with annual household incomes averaging over $112,000, are located within a three-mile radius of the center. The center was constructed in 1974 and renovated in 2000, is 100% leased and is anchored by a 63,000 square foot Giant Food supermarket and a 92,000 square foot Kohl's. The Company has no material renovation, improvement or development plans for this property.
Cranberry Square
Cranberry Square is a 140,000 square foot neighborhood shopping center located in Westminster, Maryland, in Carroll County. More than 12,000 households, with annual household incomes averaging over $72,000, are located within a three-mile radius of the center. The center was constructed in 1991, is 91.2% leased and is anchored by a 56,000 square foot Giant Food supermarket and a 24,000 square foot Staples. The Company has no material renovation, improvement or development plans for this property.
The Company is not aware of any material factors relating to the properties other than those discussed above that would cause the financial information included in Item 9.01 below not to be necessarily indicative of future operating results.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: December 9, 2011

Exhibit 23.1
We consent to the incorporation by reference in the following Registration Statements of Saul Centers, Inc. and in the related Prospectuses, where applicable, of our reports dated December 9, 2011, with respect to the statements of revenues and certain expenses of Cranberry Square, Kentlands Square II, and Severna Park MarketPlace for the year ended December 31, 2010 included in this Current Report (Form 8-K/A) of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
 
McLean, Virginia
December 9, 2011

Exhibit 99.1
Board of Directors
Saul Centers, Inc.
We have audited the accompanying statement of revenues and certain expenses of Kentlands Square II (the "Center") for the year ended December 31, 2010. The statement of revenues and certain expenses is the responsibility of the Center's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the statement of revenues and certain expenses based on our audit.
We conducted our audit in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the statement of revenues and certain expenses is free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the statement of revenues and certain expenses. An audit also includes assessing the basis of accounting used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the statement of revenues and certain expenses. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
The accompanying statement of revenues and certain expenses was prepared for the purpose of complying with the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission for inclusion in a Form 8-K/A to be filed by Saul Centers, Inc. as described in Note 1, and is not intended to be a complete presentation of the Center's revenues and expenses.
In our opinion, the statement of revenues and certain expenses referred to above presents fairly, in all material respects, the revenues and certain expenses described in Note 1 of the Center for the year ended December 31, 2010, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
 
McLean, Virginia
December 9, 2011
 
 
On September 23, 2011, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") purchased Kentlands Square II (the "Center"), a 240,683 square foot grocery-anchored community shopping center located in Gaithersburg, Maryland, from Kentlands Retail, Inc.
The accompanying statements of revenues and certain expenses relate to the operations of Kentlands Square II and were prepared for the purpose of complying with Rule 3-14 of Regulation S-X of the Securities and Exchange Commission and, as such, certain expenses such as depreciation and amortization, mortgage interest expense, and entity level expense are not reflected in the statement of revenues and certain expenses. Consequently, the statements of revenues and certain expenses are not intended to be a complete presentation of the actual operations of Kentlands Square II because certain revenues and expenses which may be in the proposed future operations of Kentlands Square II have been excluded in accordance with Rule 3-14 of Regulation S-X.
Unaudited Interim Financial Information
The accompanying unaudited statement of revenues and certain expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2011 has been prepared pursuant to the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission. Certain information and footnote disclosures normally included in the statements of revenues and certain expenses prepared in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP") may have been condensed or omitted pursuant to such rules and regulations, although management believes that the disclosures are adequate to make the presentation not misleading. The unaudited statement of revenues and certain expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2011, includes, in the opinion of management, all adjustments, consisting of normal recurring adjustments, necessary to present fairly the financial information therein. The results of operations for the interim period ended June 30, 2011 are not necessarily indicative of the results that may be expected for the year ended December 31, 2011. The unaudited statement of revenues and certain expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2011 should be read in conjunction with the audited statement of revenues and certain expenses for the year ended December 31, 2010.
 
Basis of Accounting
The accompanying statements of revenues and certain expenses have been prepared using the accrual method of accounting in accordance with US GAAP.
Revenue Recognition
Space at the property is leased to commercial tenants under noncancelable operating leases. When rental payments due under leases vary from a straight-line basis because of free rent periods or scheduled rent increases, income is recognized on a straight-line basis over the lease term. Expense recoveries represent a portion of property operating expenses billed to tenants, including common area maintenance, real estate taxes and other recoverable costs, and are included within other property revenues.
 
Repairs and Maintenance
Repairs and maintenance costs are expensed as incurred, while significant improvements, renovations and replacements are capitalized.
Advertising Costs
Advertising costs, net of tenant reimbursements, if any, are expensed as incurred and reported on the statements of revenues and certain expenses within the line item, "Administrative and Marketing."
Bad Debt Expense
Amounts due from tenants in accordance with the terms of the respective leases are reviewed by management and a charge to current period operations is made when, in the opinion of management, collection of the receivable is doubtful. This charge is reported on the statements of revenues and certain expenses within the line item, "Administrative and Marketing."
Use of Estimates
The preparation of the statements of revenues and certain expenses in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires management to make certain estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts and disclosures of revenues and certain expenses of the Center during the reporting periods. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
Future Minimum Lease Payments
Future minimum contractual payments under noncancelable leases for years ended December 31 (which exclude the effect of straight-line rents), are as follows:
 
 
Management of Kentlands Square II has evaluated subsequent events through December 9, 2011, the date on which the statements of revenues and certain expenses were issued, and determined there are no subsequent events required to be disclosed other than what has been described in Note 1.

Exhibit 99.2
Board of Directors
Saul Centers, Inc.
We have audited the accompanying statement of revenues and certain expenses of Severna Park MarketPlace (the "Center") for the year ended December 31, 2010. The statement of revenues and certain expenses is the responsibility of the Center's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the statement of revenues and certain expenses based on our audit.
We conducted our audit in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the statement of revenues and certain expenses is free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the statement of revenues and certain expenses. An audit also includes assessing the basis of accounting used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the statement of revenues and certain expenses. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
The accompanying statement of revenues and certain expenses was prepared for the purpose of complying with the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission for inclusion in a Form 8-K/A to be filed by Saul Centers, Inc. as described in Note 1, and is not intended to be a complete presentation of the Center's revenues and expenses.
In our opinion, the statement of revenues and certain expenses referred to above presents fairly, in all material respects, the revenues and certain expenses described in Note 1 of the Center for the year ended December 31, 2010, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
 
McLean, Virginia
December 9, 2011
 
 
On September 23, 2011, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") purchased Severna Park MarketPlace (the "Center"), a 254,174 square foot grocery-anchored community shopping center located in Severna Park, Maryland, from Severna Retail, Inc.
The accompanying statements of revenues and certain expenses relate to the operations of Severna Park MarketPlace and were prepared for the purpose of complying with Rule 3-14 of Regulation S-X of the Securities and Exchange Commission and, as such, certain expenses such as depreciation and amortization, mortgage interest expense, and entity level expense are not reflected in the statement of revenues and certain expenses. Consequently, the statements of revenues and certain expenses are not intended to be a complete presentation of the actual operations of Severna Park MarketPlace because certain revenues and expenses which may be in the proposed future operations of Severna Park MarketPlace have been excluded in accordance with Rule 3-14 of Regulation S-X.
Unaudited Interim Financial Information
The accompanying unaudited statement of revenues and certain expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2011 has been prepared pursuant to the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission. Certain information and footnote disclosures normally included in the statements of revenues and certain expenses prepared in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP") may have been condensed or omitted pursuant to such rules and regulations, although management believes that the disclosures are adequate to make the presentation not misleading. The unaudited statement of revenues and certain expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2011, includes, in the opinion of management, all adjustments, consisting of normal recurring adjustments, necessary to present fairly the financial information therein. The results of operations for the interim period ended June 30, 2011 are not necessarily indicative of the results that may be expected for the year ended December 31, 2011. The unaudited statement of revenues and certain expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2011 should be read in conjunction with the audited statement of revenues and certain expenses for the year ended December 31, 2010.
 
Basis of Accounting
The accompanying statements of revenues and certain expenses have been prepared using the accrual method of accounting in accordance with US GAAP.
 
Revenue Recognition
Space at the property is leased to commercial tenants under noncancelable operating leases. When rental payments due under leases vary from a straight-line basis because of free rent periods or scheduled rent increases, income is recognized on a straight-line basis over the lease term. Expense recoveries represent a portion of property operating expenses billed to tenants, including common area maintenance, real estate taxes and other recoverable costs, and are included within other property revenues.
Repairs and Maintenance
Repairs and maintenance costs are expensed as incurred, while significant improvements, renovations and replacements are capitalized.
Advertising Costs
Advertising costs, net of tenant reimbursements, if any, are expensed as incurred and reported on the statements of revenues and certain expenses within the line item, "Administrative and Marketing."
Bad Debt Expense
Amounts due from tenants in accordance with the terms of the respective leases are reviewed by management and a charge to current period operations is made when, in the opinion of management, collection of the receivable is doubtful. This charge is reported on the statements of revenues and certain expenses within the line item, "Administrative and Marketing."
Use of Estimates
The preparation of the statements of revenues and certain expenses in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires management to make certain estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts and disclosures of revenues and certain expenses of the Center during the reporting periods. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
 
Future Minimum Lease Payments
Future minimum contractual payments under noncancelable leases for years ended December 31 (which exclude the effect of straight-line rents), are as follows:
 
 
Management of Severna Park MarketPlace has evaluated subsequent events through December 9, 2011, the date on which the statements of revenues and certain expenses were issued, and determined there are no subsequent events required to be disclosed other than what has been described in Note 1.

Exhibit 99.3
Board of Directors
Saul Centers, Inc.
We have audited the accompanying statement of revenues and certain expenses of Cranberry Square (the "Center") for the year ended December 31, 2010. The statement of revenues and certain expenses is the responsibility of the Center's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the statement of revenues and certain expenses based on our audit.
We conducted our audit in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the statement of revenues and certain expenses is free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the statement of revenues and certain expenses. An audit also includes assessing the basis of accounting used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the statement of revenues and certain expenses. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
The accompanying statement of revenues and certain expenses was prepared for the purpose of complying with the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission for inclusion in a Form 8-K/A to be filed by Saul Centers, Inc. as described in Note 1, and is not intended to be a complete presentation of the Center's revenues and expenses.
In our opinion, the statement of revenues and certain expenses referred to above presents fairly, in all material respects, the revenues and certain expenses described in Note 1 of the Center for the year ended December 31, 2010, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
 
McLean, Virginia
December 9, 2011
 
 
 
On September 23, 2011, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") purchased Cranberry Square (the "Center"), a 141,569 square foot grocery-anchored community shopping center located in Westminster, Maryland, from Cranberry Retail, Inc.
The accompanying statements of revenues and certain expenses relate to the operations of Cranberry Square and were prepared for the purpose of complying with Rule 3-14 of Regulation S-X of the Securities and Exchange Commission and, as such, certain expenses such as depreciation and amortization, mortgage interest expense, and entity level expense are not reflected in the statement of revenues and certain expenses. Consequently, the statements of revenues and certain expenses are not intended to be a complete presentation of the actual operations of Cranberry Square because certain revenues and expenses which may be in the proposed future operations of Cranberry Square have been excluded in accordance with Rule 3-14 of Regulation S-X.
Unaudited Interim Financial Information
The accompanying unaudited statement of revenues and certain expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2011 has been prepared by the Company pursuant to the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission. Certain information and footnote disclosures normally included in the statements of revenues and certain expenses prepared in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP") may have been condensed or omitted pursuant to such rules and regulations, although management believes that the disclosures are adequate to make the presentation not misleading. The unaudited statement of revenues and certain expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2011, includes, in the opinion of management, all adjustments, consisting of normal recurring adjustments, necessary to present fairly the financial information therein. The results of operations for the interim period ended June 30, 2011 are not necessarily indicative of the results that may be expected for the year ended December 31, 2011. The unaudited statement of revenues and certain expenses for the six months ended June 30, 2011 should be read in conjunction with the audited statement of revenues and certain expenses for the year ended December 31, 2010.
 
Basis of Accounting
The accompanying statements of revenues and certain expenses have been prepared using the accrual method of accounting in accordance with US GAAP.
 
Revenue Recognition
Space at the property is leased to commercial tenants under noncancelable operating leases. When rental payments due under leases vary from a straight-line basis because of free rent periods or scheduled rent increases, income is recognized on a straight-line basis over the lease term. Expense recoveries represent a portion of property operating expenses billed to tenants, including common area maintenance, real estate taxes and other recoverable costs and, are included within other property revenues.
Repairs and Maintenance
Repairs and maintenance costs are expensed as incurred, while significant improvements, renovations and replacements are capitalized.
Advertising Costs
Advertising costs, net of tenant reimbursements, if any, are expensed as incurred and reported on the statements of revenues and certain expenses within the line item, "Administrative and Marketing."
Bad Debt Expense
Amounts due from tenants in accordance with the terms of the respective leases are reviewed by management and a charge to current period operations is made when, in the opinion of management, collection of the receivable is doubtful. This charge is reported on the statements of revenues and certain expenses within the line item, "Administrative and Marketing."
Use of Estimates
The preparation of the statements of revenues and certain expenses in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires management to make certain estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts and disclosures of revenues and certain expenses of the Center during the reporting periods. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
 
Future Minimum Lease Payments
Future minimum contractual payments under noncancelable leases for years ended December 31 (which exclude the effect of straight-line rents), are as follows:
 
 
Management of Cranberry Square has evaluated subsequent events through December 9, 2011, the date on which the statements of revenues and certain expenses were issued, and determined there are no subsequent events required to be disclosed other than what has been described in Note 1.

Exhibit 99.4
The pro forma consolidated statements of operations for the year ended December 31, 2010, and for the nine months ended September 30, 2011, present the pro forma results of operations as if the acquisitions had taken place as of the beginning of the respective period. The pro forma statements of operations illustrate the operating results of Kentlands Square II, Severna Park MarketPlace and Cranberry Square. Further explanation and details concerning the pro forma adjustments are included in the notes accompanying the financial statements.
Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") acquired Kentlands Square II, Severna Park MarketPlace and Cranberry Square, each a shopping center property, on September 23, 2011 for an aggregate purchase price of $168.5 million.
The unaudited consolidated pro forma financial information is not necessarily indicative of what the Company's actual results of operations would have been had these transactions been consummated on the dates indicated, nor is it intended to represent the Company's results of operations or financial position for any future period. The pro forma results of operations for the periods ended December 31, 2010 and September 30, 2011 are not necessarily indicative of the results that may be expected for the year ended December 31, 2011.
The unaudited consolidated pro forma financial information should be read in conjunction with the Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on September 27, 2011, announcing the property acquisitions; the consolidated financial statements and the accompanying notes included in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010 and Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30, 2011; and the Statements of Revenues and Certain Expenses included as exhibits in this Current Report on Form 8-K/A. In management's opinion, all adjustments, consisting of normal recurring adjustments, necessary to reflect these acquisitions and related transactions have been made.
Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Saul Centers, Inc.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20120308163043.txt.gz
TIME:20120308163043
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On March 8, 2012, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2011. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On March 5, 2012, the Board of Directors (the "Board") of Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company"), acting pursuant to the Company's Amended and Restated Bylaws, increased the size of the Board by two persons, bringing the total number of seats on the Board to fourteen. The Board appointed George P. Clancy, Jr. and H. Gregory Platts to fill the vacancies created by such increase.
Mr. Clancy, age 68, is a retired Executive Vice President and Mid-Atlantic Region Market President of Chevy Chase Bank, a division of Capital One, N.A. (1995-2010). Mr. Clancy has extensive experience in banking, which includes serving as President and Chief Operating Officer of the Riggs National Corporation (1985-1986) and President and Chief Executive Officer of Signet Bank, N.A. (1988-1995). He serves on the board of directors of ASB Capital Management, Inc., Chevy Chase Trust Company, Washington Gas Light Company and WGL Holdings. Mr. Clancy also serves on the board of directors or trustees of the Catholic Charities Foundation, Catholic Charities, the Mary and Daniel Loughran Foundation, the University System of Maryland Foundation, Inc. and the University of Maryland College Park Foundation. Mr. Clancy also serves on the executive committee of the Washington D.C. Police Foundation. Mr. Clancy has a B.A. in English from the University of Maryland and an M.B.A. degree from Loyola University.
Mr. Platts retired from the National Geographic Society in 2011 after a 31-year career. He had been Senior Vice President and Treasurer since 1991, responsible for all investment and banking activities. Prior to joining the National Geographic Society in 1980, Mr. Platts served as a trust investment officer with the First American Bank in Washington, DC from 1972 to 1978. Mr. Platts currently serves on the boards of the Center for the Study of the Presidency & Congress, the Walter A. Bloedorn Foundation and the Hattie M. Strong Foundation. He is an emeritus board member of Decatur House, a National Trust property. He has served as a director and president of the Washington Society of Investment Analysts and chairman of the American Red Cross Blood Services Mid-Atlantic Region.
The Board, upon the unanimous recommendation of the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee, determined that Messrs. Clancy and Platt meet the definition of "independent directors" under the New York Stock Exchange listing standards.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
99.1 Press Release, dated March 8, 2012, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: March 8, 2012
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
March 8, 2012, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended December 31, 2011. Total revenue for the three months ended December 31, 2011 ("2011 Quarter") increased to $47.0 million compared to $40.3 million for the three months ended December 31, 2010 ("2010 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before income attributable to noncontrolling interests and preferred stock dividends, decreased to $8.7 million for the 2011 Quarter compared to $10.0 million for the 2010 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $3.7 million, or $0.19 per diluted share, for the 2011 Quarter compared to $3.9 million, or $0.21 per diluted share, for the 2010 Quarter. The revenue increase was caused by $4.0 million of rents received at the Clarendon Center development and $3.8 million in revenue from shopping center acquisitions, offset in part by decreased revenue at properties impacted by reduced leasing levels. While Clarendon Center was a significant revenue contributor, it caused operating income, after property operating and depreciation expense and the change in interest expense, to decrease by $1.4 million, as the project continued to lease-up. Offsetting the Clarendon Center decline in operating income were changes in acquisition related costs, loss on early extinguishment of debt and casualty settlement gains.
Same property revenue decreased 2.7% for the 2011 Quarter and same property operating income decreased 1.6%. The same property comparisons exclude the operating results of properties not in operation for each of the comparable reporting periods. For the shopping center portfolio, same property operating income decreased 2.3% due primarily to reduced base rent and increased credit losses resulting from two anchor tenant bankruptcies and the early lease termination of a local grocer. For the mixed-use portfolio, same property operating income increased 1.3%.
For the year ended December 31, 2011 ("2011"), total revenue increased to $174.4 million compared to $163.5 million for the year ended December 31, 2010 ("2010"), and operating income decreased to $33.9 million compared to $43.8 million for 2010. Net income available to common stockholders was $11.6 million, or $0.61 per diluted share, for 2011, compared to $21.6 million, or $1.18 per diluted share, for 2010. The revenue increase was caused by (1) $12.1 million of rents received at the Clarendon Center development and $7.0 million from shopping center acquisitions, offset in part by revenue decreases in the mixed-use portfolio of $4.1 million, primarily due to
 
tenant roll-over at Washington Square, (2) shopping center portfolio decreases of $2.9 million due to anchor tenant bankruptcies and delinquencies and reduced leasing levels, and (3) the collection in the prior year of $1.9 million of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant. Again, Clarendon Center adversely impacted operating income, after property operating and depreciation expense and the change in interest expense, by $5.4 million. The balance of the operating income change was caused by decreased mixed-use same property operating income of $2.8 million, decreased shopping center same property operating income of $2.0 million and the collection in the prior year of rents and other past due charges from a former anchor tenant of $1.9 million. The operating income decreases were partially offset by $2.3 million from five newly acquired shopping centers.
For 2011, same property revenue and same property operating income each decreased 5.6%. Shopping center same property operating income decreased 4.2% for 2011, in part, due to the collection in the prior year of $1.9 million of rents and other past due charges from the former anchor tenant. Excluding the one-time revenue, 2011 shopping center same property operating income decreased 2.2%. Mixed-use same property operating income decreased 10.6%. The 2011 results were impacted by reduced base rent and increased credit losses resulting primarily from (1) two anchor tenant bankruptcies, SuperFresh and Borders Books, (2) the early lease termination of a local grocer (3) decreased occupancy at Washington Square, and (4) increased vacancies at several shopping centers.
As of December 31, 2011, 90.0% of the portfolio was leased (all properties except the apartments at Clarendon Center, which were 100% leased), compared to 90.3% at December 31, 2010. On a same property basis, 89.4% of the portfolio was leased, compared to the prior year level of 91.1%. The 2011 leasing percentages were impacted by a net decrease of approximately 140,000 square feet of leased space, of which approximately 98,000 square feet was caused by the SuperFresh, Borders Books and Syms bankruptcies with the balance of the decrease resulting from the early lease termination of a local grocer.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 31.8% to $15.1 million in the 2011 Quarter compared to $11.4 million in the 2010 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 20.8% to $0.58 per share for the 2011 Quarter compared to $0.48 per share for the 2010 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus real estate depreciation and amortization, and excluding gains and losses from property dispositions, impairment charges on depreciable real estate assets and extraordinary
 
items. FFO increased in the 2011 Quarter primarily due to income contributed by three recently acquired shopping center properties of $1.8 million and the impact of decreased acquisition related and debt extinguishment costs incurred in the 2010 Quarter of $1.0 million and $0.9 million, respectively.
FFO available to common shareholders for 2011 decreased 0.5% to $50.3 million from $50.6 million during 2010. Per share FFO available to common shareholders for 2011 decreased 4.2% to $2.03 per diluted share from $2.12 per diluted share in 2010. FFO decreased in 2011 by:
 
 
 
 
 
 
These decreases in FFO were partially offset by:
 
 
 
Per share FFO comparisons were also adversely impacted by a 947,000 share increase in weighted average shares for 2011.
 
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 58 community and neighborhood shopping center and mixed-use properties totaling approximately 9.6 million square feet of leasable area. Over 85% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20120501163438.txt.gz
TIME:20120501163438
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On May 1, 2012, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2012. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
(c) Exhibits
99.1 Press Release, dated May 1, 2012, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
May 1, 2012, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 ("2012 Quarter"). Total revenue for the 2012 Quarter increased to $47.1 million from $41.7 million for the three months ended March 31, 2011 ("2011 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before income attributable to noncontrolling interests and preferred stock dividends, increased to $9.3 million for the 2012 Quarter from $8.3 million for the 2011 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $4.1 million, or $0.21 per diluted share, for the 2012 Quarter compared to $3.5 million, or $0.19 per diluted share, for the 2011 Quarter. The revenue increase was primarily caused by $3.3 million of rents received from shopping centers acquired in 2011 and $2.5 million of revenue generated by the Clarendon Center development, offset in part by decreased revenue at properties impacted by reduced leasing levels. Operating income increased $0.7 million from the core properties and $0.4 million from the recently acquired shopping centers. In part, because rental income has not commenced for 28,000 square feet of leased office space, Clarendon Center had little impact on the quarterly change in operating income.
Same property revenue decreased 1.0% for the 2012 Quarter compared to the 2011 Quarter, but same property operating income increased 0.6%, due to lower property operating expenses. The same property comparisons exclude the operating results of properties not in operation for the entirety of the comparable reporting periods. Shopping center portfolio same property operating income decreased 0.5% and, primarily due to improved leasing at Washington Square, the mixed-use portfolio same property operating income increased 5.3%.
As of March 31, 2012, 90.9% of the commercial portfolio was leased (all properties except the apartments at Clarendon Center, which were 98% leased), compared to 89.6% at March 31, 2011. On a same property basis, 90.4% of the portfolio was leased compared to the prior year level of 90.2%. The 2012 leasing percentages were impacted by a net increase of approximately 33,000 square feet of space leased in the mixed-use portfolio caused by increases at Washington Square, offset in part by a net decrease of approximately 19,000 square feet of space leased in the shopping center portfolio.
 
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 19.0% to $15.3 million in the 2012 Quarter from $12.9 million in the 2011 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 9.4% to $0.58 per share for the 2012 Quarter from $0.53 per share for the 2011 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus real estate depreciation and amortization, and excluding gains and losses from property dispositions, impairment charges on depreciable real estate assets and extraordinary items. FFO increased in the 2012 Quarter primarily due to $1.7 million generated by the three recently acquired shopping center properties and $0.5 million generated by the recently completed Clarendon Center.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 58 community and neighborhood shopping center and mixed-use properties totaling approximately 9.6 million square feet of leasable area. Over 85% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20120514162500.txt.gz
TIME:20120514162500
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.07. Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
On May 4, 2012, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") held its Annual Meeting of Stockholders, at which Philip D. Caraci, Gilbert M. Grosvenor, Philip C. Jackson Jr. and Mark Sullivan III, were reelected to the Board of Directors for three year terms expiring at the 2015 Annual Meeting. The terms of the remaining Board members did not expire as of the May 4, 2012 meeting and those individuals continue as directors of the Company. Holders of 18,602,050 shares of the Company's common stock voted in person at the meeting or by proxy (representing 96.8% of the 19,225,398 shares eligible to vote) as follows:
 
The stockholders voted for the ratification of Ernst & Young as independent public accountants as follows:
 
The stockholders voted to approve the Saul Organization's right to convert certain limited partnership units into shares of Common Stock.:
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
The Company posted on its web site, , a presentation given by management at the Company's annual meeting of stockholders. The presentation is Exhibit 99. (a) to this current report on Form 8-K.
www.saulcenters.com
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: May 14, 2012
 
 

Exhibit 99(a)
 
Saul Centers
Annual
Meeting of
Shareholders
Saul Centers
2011 ANNUAL REPORT TO SHAREHOLDERS
We have prepared a brief slide show to present highlights of 2011 including successful development and acquisition activity, and our core operating performance and financial results.
 
Development
Clarendon Center
South Block
Saul Centers
At year-end 2010, construction at our Clarendon Center development was substantially completed. The project includes a residential tower with 244 luxury apartment units, 42.000 square feet of street-level retail stores and 170,000 square feet of office space, all located on two blocks adjacent to the Clarendon Metro station in Arlington County, Virginia.
The first residential tenants for the 244 apartments took occupancy during the last week of December 2010, and by early May 2011, the apartments were over 95% leased and occupied.
Throughout the latter half of 2011 the apartments were fully leased, and remain so today.
All of the street level retail space is leased and occupied - Trader Joe's opened in November 2011 and has been a very popular draw to the community.
 
Development
Clarendon Center
North Block
Saul Centers
The North Block contains street level retail with 5 stories of office space above.
The 68,000 square foot Airline Reporting Corporation took occupancy as the anchor office tenant in March 2011.
16,000 square feet of office space in this project remains to be leased.
While the initial FFO contribution of Clarendon Center was negative during lease-up in 2011, 1
st
Quarter 2012 FFO was positive.
The commencement of rental income for 28,000 square feet of space recently leased should continue to drive property operating results through the balance of 2012.
 
Acquisitions
3 shopping centers
acquired in 2011 from
State of Maryland
Teachers Fund
Severna Park Marketplace, Severna Park, Maryland
Kentlands Square, Gaithersburg, Maryland
Cranberry Square, Westminster, Maryland
Saul Centers
A moment about acquisitions. There continue to be limited opportunities in the market to acquire grocery anchored shopping centers at prices that we consider to be attractive.
However, during late 2011, we were able to acquire three solid Giant Food anchored shopping centers in Maryland for $168.5 million.
 
Acquisition
Cranberry Square
Cranberry Square, Westminster, Maryland
Saul Centers
We purchased Cranberry Square for $33 million.
Cranberry Square, the dominant grocery-anchored neighborhood shopping center in Westminster, MD contains 140,000 square feet.
The center was constructed in 1991, is 91.2% leased and is anchored by a 56,000 square foot Giant Food supermarket, Pier One, Party City and Staples.
 
Acquisition
Severna Park Marketplace
Severna Park Marketplace, Severna Park, Maryland
Saul Centers
We purchased Severna Park Marketplace for $61 million.
Severna Park Marketplace is a 254,000 square foot shopping center located in Severna Park, Maryland, in Anne Arundel County.
More than 15,000 households with annual household incomes averaging over $112,000 are located within a three-mile radius of the center.
The center was constructed in 1974 and renovated in 2000, is 100% leased and is anchored by a 92,000 square foot Kohl's and a 63,000 square foot Giant Food supermarket, which is the highest volume grocer in our portfolio, at over $50 million in sales.
 
Acquisition
Kentlands Square
Kentlands Square, Gaithersburg, Gaithersburg, Maryland
Saul Centers
We purchased Kentlands Square for $74.5 million.
Kentlands Square is a 214,000 square foot community shopping center located in Gaithersburg, Maryland, in Montgomery County, adjacent to two of our existing retail properties.
More than 38,000 households, with annual household incomes averaging over $114,000, are located within a three-mile radius of the center.
The center was constructed in 1993, is 100% leased and is anchored by a 61,000 square foot Giant Food supermarket and a 104,000 square foot Kmart.
While providing an acceptable current cash flow yield, the real attraction of this property is its future development rights. The Gaithersburg master plan calls for mixed-use town-center development on this site. While the redevelopment of this property is many years away, this property has great potential for future value creation.
 
Geographic Mix & Property Type
DC. / Baltimore 85%
Other 15%
Shopping Centers 76%
Mixed-Use 24%
2011 Property Operating Income
Saul Centers
Looking at our overall portfolio, our geographic focus continues to be in the metropolitan Washington, DC market.
About 85% of our 2011 property operating income was generated in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area. This focus continues to be our strength especially during these challenging economic times. Nationwide unemployment still hovers between 8 and 9%, while the Washington area jobless rate is below 6%.
The retail component of our portfolio's income was 76%, with mixed-use producing 24%.
 
Overall Portfolio Leasing Percentage
(Excluding properties under development)
Average Leasing Percentage
94.1%
93.3%
94.0%
94.7%
96.8%
95.8%
94.9%
91.9%
91.9%
90.5%
89.9%
2002
2003
2004
2005
2006
2007
2008
2009
2010
2011
1st Q 2012
10-year average = 93.7%
Saul Centers
The economic challenges of the past few years continue to impact our portfolio's operating performance, primarily as a result of decreased leasing percentage as shown here.
Our leasing percentage declined from a peak annual average of 96.8% during 2006, to 89.9% for 2011.
The 1
st
Quarter 2012 leasing percentage has improved to 90.5%.
 
Retail Leasing Summary
(Excluding properties under development)
Average Leasing Percentage
94.8%
93.4%
92.2%
91.0%
91.5%
2008
2009
2010
2011
IQ '12
Same Space Rental Rate Change
5-yr avg. prior to 2008 = 8.7%
10.1%
-1.2%
-6.8%
-6.3%
2.8%
2008
2009
2010
2011
IQ '12
Saul Centers
After several challenging years in the financial and real estate markets, there have been recent signs of economic improvement. During the last several quarters, we have seen modestly improved retail sales and retail leasing activity, however, rents remain under pressure.
On a same space basis, retail rental rate increases over expiring rents averaged 8.7% for the 5 year period prior to 2008. The most recent year of increases was 2008, with very strong 10.1% increases in new and renewal rents. Retail rents decreased 1.2% in 2009, 6.8% in 2010, and 6.3% in 2011. For the first quarter of 2012, retail rental rates turned positive, at 2.8%.
 
Retail Same Property NOI Growth
Percentage Change
5-yr avg. prior to 2008 = 2.8%
1.2%
-3.5%
-0.7%
-2.2%
-0.5%
2008
2009
2010
2011
IQ 12
Saul Centers
During the 5-years prior to 2008, on a same property basis, we achieved average annual retail net operating income growth of 2.8%.
Retail same property growth averaged 1.2% during 2008. Since then, same property operating income has declined, dropping 3.5% in 2009, 0.7% in 2010 and 2.2% in 2011. (The above figures exclude the impact of a $1.9 million collection in early 2010 of past due rents from a former anchor tenant).
Retail same property NOI for Q1 2012 decreased just 0.5%.
 
Shopping Centers
(2011)
Northrock, Warrenton, Virginia
51 retail properties generate 76% of property operating income
35 centers are grocery anchored & produce 82% of retail operating income
Tenants reported sales averaging $323 per square foot
Grocers reported sales averaging $486 per square foot
Saul Centers
During 2011, property operating income from our 51 retail properties produced 76% of overall operating income.
35 of our centers are anchored by a food store, and these grocery-anchored properties produced 82% of our retail operating income.
Total retail sales for the portfolio, from tenants who report sales, were $323 per square foot in 2011, a small increase from 2010, an improvement compared to a 1% decrease the prior year and 3.1% decrease a year earlier.
Grocery store sales are a key driver of customer traffic in neighborhood centers. The overall sales volume reported by our 28 national and regional grocery stores averaged $486 per square foot, a 1% increase over 2010.
 
Favorable Demographics
$100,000
$90,000
$80,000
$70,000
$60,000
$50,000
Saul Centers Avg.
National Avg.
Average household income within three mile radius of Saul Centers' retail properties exceeds the national average
Saul Centers Avg.. $97,600
National Avg.. $71,400
Source: U.S. Census Bureau, Census 2000
ESRI forecasts for 2011.
Saul Centers
The long-term success of our core portfolio hinges on prime infill locations.
Saul Centers' demographics are well above the national averages.
Saul Centers' properties 3-mile trade areas have average household incomes of $97,600 compared to the national average of $71,400.
Our 3 and 5 mile population counts average 94,000 and 224,000, respectively, which are representative of very strong infill locations.
 
Core Shopping Centers
(2011)
Boulevard, Fairfax, VA
224 retail leases signed
Over 1,000,000 square feet leased
Lease volume increased but rental rates remain under pressure
Saul Centers
While anchor tenants provide stability and traffic to the centers, small shop leasing is a major driver of growth in our business.
During 2011, we executed 224 new and renewal leases, our single largest annual total, representing over 1,000,000 square feet of space.
While lease volumes have increased, rental rates declined during 2011. We expect continued rental rate pressure until market occupancy rates again reach pre-2008 levels.
 
Major Retail Tenants
Top 10 retail tenants provided only 19% of the Company's 2011 Total Revenue
Tenant Name Locations Retail SF % 2011 Total Revenue
Giant Food 10 7.4% 4.3%
Safeway 8 5.0% 3.0%
Capital One Bank 20 0.8% 2.6%
CVS 6 1.4% 1.6%
Publix 5 3.1% 1.6%
Lowe's Home Center 2 3.2% 1.5%
Harris Teeter 3 1.8% 1.4%
Home Depot 2 3.1% 1.2%
Office Depot 5 1.5% 0.9%
Staples 3 0.8% 0.8%
Totals 64 28.1% 18.9%
Saul Centers
A diverse retail tenant base minimizes exposure to any one tenant's credit.
Only Giant Food, at 4.3%, Safeway at 3.0% and Capital One Bank at 2.6% accounted for more than 2% of our total revenue in 2011.
Our top 10 retail tenants comprise only 19% of total revenue, with 58% of this revenue generated by supermarkets, a very stable source of income.
 
Major Office Tenants
Top 10 office tenants provided only 8% of the Company's 2011 Total Revenue
Tenant Name Locations M-U SF % 2011 Total Year
Revenue Expiring
American Health Ins. Plans 1 3.9% 1.6% 2014
National Gallery of Art 1 2.5% 1.2% 2014
Credit Union Natl. Assn. 1 2.0% 1.0% 2023
HQ Global Workplace 1 1.4% 0.9% 2014
Southern Company 1 2.4% 0.7% 2021
U. S. Government 2 2.2% 0.6% 2013
AECOM (former Earth Tech) 1 2.3% 0.6% 2014
BRLI Acquisition Corp. 1 3.2% 0.6% 2016
Seracare Life Sciences 1 1.8% 0.5% 2017
Pharmaceutical Care 1 1.0% 0.5% 2015
Totals 11 22.7% 8.2%
Saul Centers
The lack of clarity on federal government spending continues to depress demand for office space throughout the Washington, DC area. Demand for space throughout our office portfolio has slowed dramatically during the past few quarters.
Our top 10 office tenants produced only 8.2% of our 2011 revenue, with no single tenant in more than 1 location in our portfolio, except the U.S. Government occupying 2 office spaces. Only the U.S. Government leases have lease expirations before 2014 - a positive in a currently slow office market.
Additionally only 75,000 square feet, or 5.3% of our total 1.4 million square foot commercial portfolio expires prior to the end of 2012.
 
Anchor Tenant Vacancies
79 % of vacated space has been re-leased.
Tenant Name Property Square Feet SF % Square Feet
Re-leased Super Fresh Lumberton Plaza 45,200 0.5% 21,300
Borders Books Thruway 25,100 0.3% 13,800
Syms Seven Corners 49,100 0.5% 49,100
All Green Market Southdale 48,100 0.5% 48,100
Totals 167,500 1.8% 132,300
4 Retail anchor tenants caused a
$2.1 million ($0.08/sh) FFO loss in 2011
Saul Centers
During 2011, our retail portfolio occupancy and operating results were negatively impacted by anchor tenant bankruptcies and closings.
Three of our significant tenants were involved in bankruptcy proceedings. Within our shopping center portfolio, Border Books, Superfresh and Syms each closed a single store. Additionally, an independent grocer defaulted and vacated a store in our Southdale shopping center.
These store closings, totaling 168,000 square feet, reduced 2011 FFO by $0.08/share.
We have successfully signed leases for 132,000 square feet of this space, or 79% of the total anchor closings, with all of these new tenants projected to commence rent during the second half of 2012.
 
Seven Corners
Seven Corners, Falls Church, Virginia
Saul Centers
Seven Corners is a 568,000 square foot community shopping center in Falls Church, Virginia.
It is anchored by a Shoppers Food Warehouse and a Home Depot.
During 2011, Syms declared chapter 7 bankruptcy and terminated their lease early on December 31, 2011. We just re-leased the space to Burlington Coat Factory, projected to open in the fall of this year.
The center is our largest retail property as measured both by square footage and operating income, and is our top producing shopping center with over $170 million in annual sales reported by our tenants.
An indicator of the strength of this location, the leasing percentage of Seven Corners has remained above 98% during each of the last five years.
 
Thruway
Thruway, Winston-Salem, North Carolina
Saul Centers
Thruway is generally regarded as the leading community shopping center in Winston-Salem, North Carolina.
This 363,000 square foot shopping center is anchored by Harris Teeter and Stein Mart, and has a number of nationally recognized tenants such as Hanesbrands, Talbots, Chico's, Joseph Banks, Ann Taylor, Plow & Hearth and Coldwater Creek.
During 2011 Borders Books returned their 25,000 square foot store to us. We leased half of this space to Trader Joe's, which is expected to open for business this summer.
 
Southdale
Southdale, Glen Burnie, Maryland
Saul Centers
Southdale is a 484,000 square foot community shopping center located in Glen Burnie, MD, south of Baltimore.
The center is anchored by Home Depot, Marshall's, and Value City Furniture.
In 2011, a 48,000 square foot tenant defaulted on their lease land left the center. We have since re-leased the space to Foodvalu, a local independent grocery store, which plans to open later this spring.
Southdale is currently 93% leased.
 
Retail Small Shop Tenant Defaults
Tenants Leasing Spaces of Less Than 10,000 SF
Small Shop Tenant Defaults Continue to Decline
Tenants
Total Small Shop Defaulting &
Space Leased Vacating Early % Defaulting &
Year (SF) (SF) Vacating Early
2009 2,399,482 166,539 6.9%
2010 2,358,848 108,519 4.6%
2011 2,302,208 80,132 3.5%
Saul Centers
The financial strength of our small shop tenants, (those leasing spaces smaller than 10,000 square feet) is showing signs of improvement.
Rent defaults by small shop tenants have decreased, with only 3.5% of these tenants vacating space prior to lease expiration in 2011, compared to an average of 5.8% per year in the prior two years.
 
Office/Mixed-Use Properties
1.4 million square feet (commercial)
24% of property operating income
Property operating income decreased 10.6% in 2011
- 55,000 square feet of downsizing tenants at Washington Square
Avenel Business Park, Gaithersburg, MD
Washington Square, Alexandria, VA
601 Pennsylvania Ave., Washington DC
Saul Centers
Our office/mixed-use commercial space totals over 1.4 million square feet.
Operating income in the office/mixed-use portfolio was 24% of our total property operating income in 2011.
On a same property basis, the office property income decreased 10.6% over 2010 levels, primarily due to the default and early termination of a 40,000 square foot tenant at Van Ness Square and the downsizing of tenants totaling 55,000 square feet at Washington Square.
 
Washington Square
Washington Square, Old Town Alexandria, Virginia
Saul Centers
Tenants downsizing their spaces upon lease renewal gave back 55,000 square feet of vacant space at Washington Square in Alexandria, Virginia.
As of March 2011, Washington Square was 74% leased, but new leases signed during 2011 have increased the leasing percentage to 92%.
Despite depressed demand for office space throughout the Washington, DC area, the Saul Centers mixed-use portfolio reported a 5.3% improvement in same space operating performance for the 1
st
Quarter 2012.
 
Funds From Operations (FFO) & Dividends
5-yr avg. FFO per share growth prior to 2008 = 4.6%/yr
$2.20
1.56
$2.10
1.56
$2.20
1.56
$2.42
1.60
$2.57
1.68
$2.75
1.77
$2.68
1.88
$2.40
1.53
$2.12
1.44
$2.03
1.44
2002
2003
2004
2005
2006
2007
2008
2009
2010
2011
FFO Dividends
Current dividend of $.36/share equates to an annual dividend of $1.44/share.
Saul Centers
FFO results for the past 10 years are highlighted here.
The 5-year average FFO/share growth prior to 2008 was 4.6%/year. Beginning in 2008, annual FFO has declined each year, due to the economic downturn's impact on our portfolio and several nonrecurring events. However we reported 1
st
Quarter 2012 FFO of $0.58 per share, an increase over the 1
st
quarter 2011 of $0.53 per share.
After increasing the common stock dividend from 2005 to 2008, we reduced the January 2009 dividend by 17%, from a quarterly amount of $0.47 per share to $0.39 per share. In October 2009 we decreased the payout to the current quarterly rate of $0.36 per share.
 
Dividend as a % of FFO
Dividend Payout
65%
64%
70%
64%
68%
71%
62%
2006
2007
2008
2009
2010
2011
IQ 12
Conservative FFO payout ratio: 71% of 2011 FFO was paid out in dividends.
Saul Centers
Over the past 5 years, we paid out an average of 66% of our FFO as dividends.
As you may know, REITs are required to pay out 90% of taxable income. We have historically followed a policy of setting the common stock dividend approximately equal to taxable income, to comply with these REIT regulations, and not pay federal corporate income tax. In this uncertain economic climate, this practice has allowed us to maintain the maximum amount of excess cash flow to fund development activities or to retire debt.
While taxable income declined during the past few years, the Board has maintained the current $1.44/share dividend. We paid dividends equal to 71% of our 2011 FFO, decreasing to 62% in the first quarter of 2012.
 
Debt Summary - 2011
2011 Maturities
- Clarendon construction loan
2011 New Loans
- Clarendon Center Mortgage
$125 million, 15-year term, 25-year amortization, 5.31% rate
- Acquisition Loans - 3 shopping centers
$101 million, 15-year term, 25-year amortization, 4.48% rate
Saul Centers
In light of the favorable long-term interest rate environment over the past year and the potential for future interest rate increases, during 2011 and early 2012, we focused on refinancing all of our near term debt maturities with long term mortgage debt.
We started 2011 with $601 million of fixed-rate mortgage debt, none of which was scheduled to mature in 2011, however our Clarendon Center construction loan was due to mature in late 2011.
During the 2011 1
st
quarter, we replaced the construction loan with long-term financing. The new 15-year, $125 million loan closed in March 2011, has a 5.31% interest rate, 25-year principal amortization.
Following the acquisition of three shopping centers in September 2011, we closed new non-recourse permanent financings secured by each of the centers. The loans, totaling $101 million, all had 15-year terms, 25-year principal amortization and a weighted average interest rate of 4.48%.
 
Debt Summary - 2012
2012 Maturities
- $63 million outstanding, due 10/2012, 10/20 secured by 7 shopping centers
2012 New Loans
- Seven Corners Mortgage
- $73 million, 15-year term, 25-year amortization, 5.84% rate
- Proceeds repaid all debt secured by the 7 shopping centers
- White Oak Mortgage
- $10.5 million new proceeds, 15-year term, 25-year amortization, 4.90% rate
Saul Centers
2012 maturities totaled $63 million - a pooled mortgage secured by 7 shopping centers, with an interest rate of 7.7% due to mature in October 2012.
On April 11, 2012, the Company closed on a $73 million mortgage loan secured by Seven Corners. Proceeds from this loan were used to pay-off the pooled mortgage and provide cash of $10 million. The new 15-year loan has a 5.84% interest rate and 25-year principal amortization.
On April 26, 2012, the Company substituted the White Oak shopping center for Van Ness Square as collateral for one of its existing mortgage loans which will allow the Company to analyze the feasibility of repositioning Van Ness Square. The terms of the original loan are unchanged, and in conjunction with the collateral substitution, the Company borrowed and additional $10.5 million. The new borrowing has a 4.90% interest rate and 25-year principal amortization, maturing in July 2024.
 
Mortgage Debt Maturities
May 1, 2012
Weighted average maturity of mortgage debt 10.3 years
Millions
$150
$100
$50
$0
$70
$13
$15
$28
$62
$61
$11
$37
$9
$67
$20
$135
$42
2011
2012
2013
2014
2015
2016
2017
2018
2019
2020
2021
2022
2023
2024
2025
2026
2027
Year Debt Matures
(Excludes scheduled amortization)
Saul Centers
Our mortgage debt maturities are shown here.
Total maturities for the next six years are $98 million.
Five properties secure the loans maturing in 2013, the most significant of which is our flagship office building - 601 Pennsylvania Avenue. The 601 Pennsylvania Avenue loan has a balance of $23 million at maturity, and recent market comparables indicate a market value near $200 million.
As of May 2012, twenty of our 58 operating properties will be held free and clear of debt. In our view, we think these properties are worth somewhere between $375 and $400 million.
 
Debt Summary
May 1, 2012
- 98% fixed rate, nonrecourse debt
- Average mortgage debt interest rate is 6.0%
- Interest coverage = 2.6 times
- $150 million credit line, none drawn
- Over $30 million in cash balances
Saul Centers
98% of our debt is now fixed rate, non-recourse property debt.
The weighted average interest rate is 6.0%.
Our property operating income provides an interest expense coverage of 2.6 times.
We have a $150 million revolving credit line which matures in June 2012, with a one-year extension to June 2013. There are no outstanding borrowings under the line. We are currently negotiating a new 4-year credit line, with more favorable market terms that we expect to announce later this quarter.
Currently, we have over $30 million in cash on hand.
 
Capital Structure Highlights
3/31/2012 closing price = $40.57/sh
Common Equity
Preferred Equity
Debt
Millions
$2,000
$1,500
$1,000
$500
$424
$352
$2,082
$1,060
$190
$822
2001
2002
2003
2004
2005
2006
2007
2008
2009
2010
2011
IQ 12
Year End
Saul Centers
As of March 31, 2012, we had a total combined debt and equity capitalization of $2.1 billion, compared to $776 million 10 years ago.
Total debt is currently $822 million, represented here in blue.
Preferred stock of $190 million, show here in yellow, represents about 9% of our capital base. Both issues are perpetual and $100 million is currently callable by the Company, with the balance of $90 million callable beginning in March 2013.
Our capital structure now has a leverage ratio of approximately 39% debt to total capitalization.
 
Total Shareholder Return
(assumes reinvestment of dividends)
Saul Centers' compounded compounded annual return: 10 year = 10.3%
Total Return $100 Invested
$350
$300
$250
$200
$150
$100
Dec 2001
Dec 2003
Dec 2005
Dec 2007
Dec 2009
Dec 2011
Dec 2002
Dec 2004
Dec 2006
Dec 2008
Dec 2010
Apr 2012
Saul Centers
NAREIT Equity
Russell 2000
S & P 500
Saul Centers
At the end of 2011, our 10-year compounded total return averaged 10.3% per year as shown here in yellow. This exceeds the NAREIT Equity Index, the Russell 2000 Index and the S&P 500 Index total returns for the same period.
 
Saul Centers
NYSE Symbol: B F S
Annual Meeting of Shareholders
Westview Village, Frederick, Maryland
Saul Centers
We remain committed to, and confident in, the long-term performance of our core retail and mixed-use properties.
Our balance sheet is strong, and we are prepared to endure the challenges of the current economic recovery.
I now welcome any questions you may have.
(after questions)
Adjournment
 
Forward-looking Statements
This presentation contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the federal securities laws. These statements are generally characterized by terms such as "believe," "expect" and "may."
Although we believe that the expectations reflected in such forward-looking statements are based upon reasonable assumptions, our actual results could differ materially from those given in the forward-looking statements as a result of changes in factors which include, among others, the following:
- continuing risks related to the challenging domestic and global credit markets and their effect on discretionary spending;
- risks related to our tenants' ability to pay rent and our reliance on significant tenants;
- risks related to our substantial relationships with entities affiliated with our senior management;
- risks of financing, such as increases in interest rates, restrictions imposed by our debt, our ability to meet existing financial covenants and our ability to consummate planned and additional financings on acceptable terms;
- risks related to our development activities;
- risks that our growth will be limited if we cannot obtain additional capital;
- risks that planned and additional acquisitions or redevelopments may not be consummated, or if they are consummated, that they will not perform as expected;
- risks generally incident to the ownership of real property;
- risks related to our status as a REIT for federal income tax purposes; and
- such other risks as described in Part I, Item 1A of our Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011.
Saul Centers
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20120524160514.txt.gz
TIME:20120524160514
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
Saul Holdings Limited Partnership (the "Partnership"), the operating partnership for Saul Centers, Inc., entered into that certain Credit Agreement, dated May 21, 2012, by and among the Partnership, as Borrower, the financial institutions party thereto and their assignees under Section 13.6, as Lenders, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Syndication Agent, and Wells Fargo Securities, LLC, as Sole Lead Arranger and Sole Bookrunner (the "Agreement").
The Agreement replaces that certain Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of December 19, 2007, by and among the Partnership, as Borrower, U.S. Bank National Association, as Administrative Agent and Sole Lead Arranger, Wells Fargo Bank National Association, as Syndication Agent, and U.S. Bank National Association, Wells Fargo Bank National Association, Compass Bank, and Capital One, N.A., as Lenders (as amended, the "Old Agreement"). The Old Agreement consisted of a $150,000,000 unsecured revolving credit facility (the "Old Facility") with a maturity date of June 30, 2012, as extended pursuant to the terms thereof. As of the date the Old Facility was replaced, the applicable interest rate was 5.275% (LIBOR floor of 1.500% plus a spread of 3.775%).
The Agreement consists of a $175,000,000 revolving credit facility (the "New Facility") maturing on May 20, 2016, which term may be extended by the Company for one additional year, subject to satisfaction of certain conditions.
Saul Centers, Inc. and certain subsidiaries of Saul Holdings Limited Partnership and Saul Centers, Inc. have guaranteed the payment obligations of the Partnership under the New Facility. For purposes of this Current Report on Form 8-K, all references to the "Company" refer, collectively, to Saul Centers, Inc., the Partnership and each of their subsidiaries that are parties to the New Facility.
Currently, no amounts are outstanding under the New Facility and $175,000,000 is available for borrowing. In general, loan availability under the New Facility is primarily determined by operating income from the Company's existing unencumbered properties. Interest accrues at a rate of LIBOR plus a spread of 1.60% to 2.50% as determined by certain leverage tests. As of the May 21, 2012, the applicable spread for borrowings under the New Facility would be 1.90%.
The Agreement, similar to the Old Agreement, contains a number of covenants related to the Company's ability to make investments, incur liens, engage in certain affiliate transactions, and engage in major transactions such as mergers. In addition, the Agreement requires the Company and its subsidiaries to satisfy certain financial covenants, including, but not limited to:
 
 
 
 
 
Each of Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Capital One, N.A. and Citizens Bank of Pennsylvania is a lender under the New Facility. Some of the lenders or their affiliates from time to time have provided in the past, and may provide in the future, commercial lending services to the Company and its affiliates in the ordinary course of business.
The foregoing does not constitute a complete summary of the terms and conditions of the Agreement, which is attached hereto as Exhibit 10.1, or of the Old Agreement, which was attached as Exhibit 10.(b) to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K, dated August 11, 2010, as Exhibit 10.(l) of the June 30, 2009 Quarterly Report of the Company (with respect to the Modification to Revolving Credit Agreement, dated April 30, 2009), as Exhibit 10.(l) of the June 30, 2009 Quarterly Report of the Company (with respect to the Second Modification to Revolving Credit Agreement, dated July 9, 2009), as Exhibit 10.(l) of the June 30, 2009 Quarterly Report of the Company (with respect to the Third Modification to Revolving Credit Agreement, dated July 28, 2009), and as Exhibit 10.(j) of the September 30, 2010 Quarterly Report of the Company (with respect to the Fourth Modification to Revolving Credit Agreement dated August 30, 2010). The description contained herein of the terms and conditions of the Agreement and the Old Agreement is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Agreement and Old Agreement, respectively.
Item 1.02. Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement.
The disclosure required by this Item 1.02 is included in Item 1.01 and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 2.03. Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
The disclosure required by this Item 2.03 is included in Item 1.01 and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: May 24, 2012

Exhibit 10.1
 
EXECUTION COPY
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT (this "Agreement") dated as of May 21, 2012 by and among SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, a limited partnership formed under the laws of the State of Maryland (together with its successors and assigns, the "Borrower"), each of the financial institutions initially a signatory hereto together with their successors and assigns under Section 13.6. (the "Lenders"), the Lenders from time to time party hereto as Issuing Banks, WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent"), and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Syndication Agent (the "Syndication Agent").
WHEREAS, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders desire to make available to the Borrower a revolving credit facility in the amount of $175,000,000, with a $30,000,000 swingline subfacility and a $15,000,000 letter of credit subfacility, on the terms and conditions contained herein.
NOW, THEREFORE, for good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged by the parties hereto, the parties hereto agree as follows:
 
In addition to terms defined elsewhere herein, the following terms shall have the following meanings for the purposes of this Agreement:
"" means the real property and improvements at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Washington, D.C, comprised of approximately 225,000 square feet of office space and ancillary ground floor retail space.
601 Pennsylvania Property
"" means an Accession Agreement substantially in the form of Annex I to the Guaranty.
Accession Agreement
"" has the meaning given that term in Section 5.1.(b).
Additional Costs
"" means, for any Person for any given period, (a) the EBITDA of such Person and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis for such period, (b) Capital Reserves.
Adjusted EBITDA
minus
"" means Total Asset Value determined exclusive of assets that are owned by Excluded Subsidiaries or Unconsolidated Affiliates.
Adjusted Total Asset Value
"" means Wells Fargo Bank, National Association as contractual representative of the Lenders under this Agreement, or any successor Administrative Agent appointed pursuant to Section 12.8.
Administrative Agent
"" means the Administrative Questionnaire completed by each Lender and delivered to the Administrative Agent in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent to the Lenders from time to time.
Administrative Questionnaire
"" has the meaning given that term in Section 5.6.
Affected Lender
"" means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified. In no event shall the Administrative Agent or any Lender be deemed to be an Affiliate of the Borrower or the Parent.
Affiliate
"" means the date as of which this Agreement is dated.
Agreement Date
"" means all applicable provisions of federal, state and local statutes, treaties, rules, guidelines, regulations, ordinances, codes, executive orders, and binding administrative or judicial precedents or authorities, including the interpretation or administration thereof by any Governmental Authority charged with the enforcement, interpretation or administration thereof, and all applicable administrative orders, directed duties, licenses, authorizations and permits of, and agreements with, any Governmental Authority, in each case having the force of law.
Applicable Law
"" means the percentage rate set forth below corresponding to the ratio of Total Indebtedness of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries to Total Asset Value of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries:
Applicable Margin
 
The Applicable Margin for Loans shall be determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time, based on the ratio of Total Indebtedness to Total Asset Value as set forth in the Compliance Certificate most recently delivered by the Borrower pursuant to Section 9.3. Any adjustment to the Applicable Margin shall be effective as of the first day of the calendar month immediately following the month during which the Borrower delivers to the Administrative Agent the applicable Compliance Certificate pursuant to Section 9.3. If the Borrower fails to deliver a Compliance Certificate pursuant to Section 9.3., the Applicable Margin shall equal the percentages corresponding to Level 4 until the first day of the calendar month immediately following the month that the required Compliance Certificate is delivered. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for the period from the Effective Date through but excluding the date on which the Administrative Agent first determines the Applicable Margin for Loans as set forth above, the Applicable Margin shall be determined based on Level 2. Thereafter, such Applicable Margin shall be adjusted from time to time as set forth in this definition. The provisions of this definition shall be subject to Section 2.4.(c).
"" means any Fund that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender, or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of any entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
"" means Wells Fargo Securities, LLC, in its capacity as sole lead arranger and sole bookrunner, and its successors.
Arranger
"" means an Assignment and Assumption Agreement among a Lender, an Eligible Assignee and the Administrative Agent, substantially in the form of Exhibit A.
Assignment and Assumption
"" means the Bankruptcy Code of 1978, as amended.
Bankruptcy Code
 
"" means the LIBOR Market Index Rate; provided, that if for any reason the LIBOR Market Index Rate is unavailable, Base Rate shall mean the per annum rate of interest equal to the Federal Funds Rate one and one-half of one percent (1.50%).
Base Rate
plus
"" means a Revolving Loan (or any portion thereof) bearing interest at a rate based on the Base Rate.
Base Rate Loan
"" means at any time an employee benefit plan within the meaning of Section 3(3) of ERISA which is not a Plan or a Multiemployer Plan and which is maintained or otherwise contributed to by any member of the ERISA Group.
Benefit Arrangement
"" has the meaning set forth in the introductory paragraph hereof.
Borrower
"" has the meaning given that term in Section 2.4.(c).
Borrower Information
"" means (a) a day of the week (but not a Saturday, Sunday or holiday) on which the offices of the Administrative Agent in Minneapolis, Minnesota are open to the public for carrying on substantially all of the Administrative Agent's business functions, and (b) if such day relates to a LIBOR Loan, any such day that is also a day on which dealings in Dollars are carried on in the London interbank market. Unless specifically referenced in this Agreement as a Business Day, all references to "days" shall be to calendar days.
Business Day
"" means, for any period and with respect to any Property, an amount equal to (a) the aggregate square footage of all completed space of such Property (b) $0.15 (c) the number of days in such period (d) 365. If the term Capital Reserves is used without reference to any specific Property, then it shall be determined on an aggregate basis with respect to all Properties and the applicable Ownership Shares of all Properties of all Unconsolidated Affiliates.
Capital Reserves
times
times
divided by
"" means 7.5% for all Properties except with respect to Multifamily Properties or Washington DC CBD Office Properties. For Properties qualified as Multifamily Properties or Washington DC CBD Office Properties, Capitalization Rate will mean 7.0%. As of the Agreement Date, the following two (2) Properties will be considered Washington DC CBD Office Properties and Multifamily Properties: 601 Pennsylvania Property and the Clarendon Center Project. For the avoidance of doubt, the Capitalization Rate of 7.0% shall apply with respect to all income from the Clarendon Center Project, including from the multifamily portion and the other portions of the Property.
Capitalization Rate
"" means obligations under a lease (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) to pay rent or other amounts, in each case that are required to be capitalized for financial reporting purposes in accordance with GAAP. The amount of a Capitalized Lease Obligation is the capitalized amount of such obligation as would be required to be reflected on a balance sheet of the applicable Person prepared in accordance with GAAP as of the applicable date.
Capitalized Lease Obligation
"" means, to pledge and deposit with or deliver to the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Issuing Banks or the Lenders, as collateral for Letter of Credit Liabilities or obligations of Lenders to fund participations in respect of Letter of Credit Liabilities, cash or deposit account balances or, if the Administrative Agent and the applicable Issuing Bank shall agree in their sole discretion, other credit support, in each case pursuant to documentation in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and such Issuing Bank. "Cash Collateral" shall have a meaning correlative to the foregoing and shall include the proceeds of such cash collateral and other credit support.
Cash Collateralize
 
"" means: (a) securities issued, guaranteed or insured by the United States of America or any of its agencies with maturities of not more than one year from the date acquired; (b) certificates of deposit with maturities of not more than one year from the date acquired issued by a United States federal or state chartered commercial bank of recognized standing, or a commercial bank organized under the laws of any other country which is a member of the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development, or a political subdivision of any such country, acting through a branch or agency, which bank has capital and unimpaired surplus in excess of $500,000,000 and which bank or its holding company has a short-term commercial paper rating of at least A-2 or the equivalent by S&P or at least P-2 or the equivalent by Moody's; (c) reverse repurchase agreements with terms of not more than seven days from the date acquired, for securities of the type described in clause (a) above and entered into only with commercial banks having the qualifications described in clause (b) above; (d) commercial paper issued by any Person incorporated under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof and rated at least A-2 or the equivalent thereof by S&P or at least P-2 or the equivalent thereof by Moody's, in each case with maturities of not more than one year from the date acquired; and (e) investments in money market funds registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, which have net assets of at least $500,000,000 and at least 85% of whose assets consist of securities and other obligations of the type described in clauses (a) through (d) above.
Cash Equivalents
"" means a mixed use development comprised of approximately 244 rental apartment units, +/-170,000 square feet of office space and +/- 42,000 square feet of retail space located on two parcels at the intersections of Clarendon Boulevard with North Highland and North Garfield Streets in Clarendon, Arlington County, Virginia.
Clarendon Center Project
"" means, as to a Lender, such Lender's Revolving Commitment.
Commitment
"" has the meaning given that term in Section 9.3.
Compliance Certificate
"" "" and "" each refers to the continuation of a LIBOR Loan from one Interest Period to another Interest Period pursuant to Section 2.8.
Continue,
Continuation
Continued
"" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise. "Controlling" and "Controlled" have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
"" "" and "" each refers to the conversion of a Loan of one Type into a Loan of another Type pursuant to Section 2.9.
Convert,
Conversion
Converted
"" means any of the following: (a) the making (or deemed making) of any Loan, (b) the Conversion of a Base Rate Loan into a LIBOR Loan, (c) the Continuation of a LIBOR Loan and (d) the issuance of a Letter of Credit.
Credit Event
"" means the rating assigned by a Rating Agency to the senior unsecured long term Indebtedness of a Person.
Credit Rating
"" means the Bankruptcy Code, and all other liquidation, conservatorship, bankruptcy, assignment for the benefit of creditors, moratorium, rearrangement, receivership, insolvency, reorganization, or similar Applicable Laws relating to the relief of debtors in the United States of America or other applicable jurisdictions from time to time in effect.
Debtor Relief Laws
"" means any of the events specified in Section 11.1., whether or not there has been satisfied any requirement for the giving of notice, the lapse of time, or both.
Default
 
"" means, subject to Section 3.9.(f), any Revolving Lender that (a) has failed to (i) fund all or any portion of its Loans within two (2) Business Days of the date such Loans were required to be funded hereunder unless such Revolving Lender notifies the Administrative Agent and the Borrower in writing that such failure is the result of such Revolving Lender's reasonable determination that one or more conditions precedent to funding (each of which conditions precedent, together with any applicable default, shall be specifically identified in such writing) has not been satisfied, or (ii) pay to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, the Swingline Lender or any other Lender any other amount required to be paid by it hereunder (including in respect of its participation in Letters of Credit or Swingline Loans) within two (2) Business Days of the date when due, (b) has notified the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender in writing that it does not intend to comply with its funding obligations hereunder, or has made a public statement to that effect (unless such writing or public statement relates to such Revolving Lender's obligation to fund a Loan hereunder and states that such position is based on such Revolving Lender's reasonable determination that a condition precedent to funding (which condition precedent, together with any applicable default, shall be specifically identified in such writing or public statement) cannot be satisfied), (c) has failed, within three (3) Business Days after written request by the Administrative Agent or the Borrower, to confirm in writing to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower that it will comply with its prospective funding obligations hereunder (provided that such Revolving Lender shall cease to be a Defaulting Lender pursuant to this clause (c) upon receipt of such written confirmation by the Administrative Agent and the Borrower), or (d) has, or has a direct or indirect parent company that has, (i) become the subject of a proceeding under any Debtor Relief Law, or (ii) had appointed for it a receiver, custodian, conservator, trustee, administrator, assignee for the benefit of creditors or similar Person charged with reorganization or liquidation of its business or assets, including the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other state or federal regulatory authority acting in such a capacity; provided that a Revolving Lender shall not be a Defaulting Lender solely by virtue of the ownership or acquisition of any equity interest in that Revolving Lender or any direct or indirect parent company thereof by a Governmental Authority so long as such ownership interest does not result in or provide such Revolving Lender with immunity from the jurisdiction of courts within the United States of America or from the enforcement of judgments or writs of attachment on its assets or permit such Revolving Lender (or such Governmental Authority) to reject, repudiate, disavow or disaffirm any contracts or agreements made with such Revolving Lender. Any determination by the Administrative Agent that a Revolving Lender is a Defaulting Lender under clauses (a) through (d) above shall be conclusive and binding absent manifest error, and such Revolving Lender shall be deemed to be a Defaulting Lender (subject to Section 3.9.(f)) upon delivery of written notice of such determination to the Borrower, each Issuing Bank, the Swingline Lender and each Revolving Lender.
Defaulting Lender
"" means (a) any transaction (including any master agreement, confirmation or other agreement with respect to any such transaction) now existing or hereafter entered into by the Parent and the Borrower or any of their respective Subsidiaries (i) which is a rate swap transaction, swap option, basis swap, forward rate transaction, commodity swap, commodity option, equity or equity index swap, equity or equity index option, bond option, interest rate option, foreign exchange transaction, cap transaction, floor transaction, collar transaction, currency swap transaction, cross-currency rate swap transaction, currency option, credit protection transaction, credit swap, credit default swap, credit default option, total return swap, credit spread transaction, repurchase transaction, reverse repurchase transaction, buy/sell-back transaction, securities lending transaction, weather index transaction or forward purchase or sale of a security, commodity or other financial instrument or interest (including any option with respect to any of these transactions) or (ii) which is a type of transaction that is similar to any transaction referred to in clause (i) above that is currently, or in the future becomes, recurrently entered into in the financial markets (including terms and conditions incorporated by reference in such agreement) and which is a forward, swap, future, option or other derivative on one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity securities or other equity instruments, debt securities or other debt instruments, economic indices or measures of economic risk or value, or other benchmarks against which payments or deliveries are to be made, and (b) any combination of these transactions.
Derivatives Contract
 
"" means (i) any Credit Support Annex comprising part of (and as defined in) any Specified Derivatives Contract, and (ii) any document or agreement pursuant to which cash, deposit accounts, securities accounts or similar financial asset collateral are pledged to or made available for set-off by, a Specified Derivatives Provider, including any banker's lien or similar right, securing or supporting Specified Derivatives Obligation.
Derivatives Support Document
"" means, in respect of any one or more Derivatives Contracts, after taking into account the effect of any legally enforceable netting agreement or provision relating thereto, (a) for any date on or after the date such Derivatives Contracts have been terminated or closed out, the termination amount or value determined in accordance therewith, and (b) for any date prior to the date such Derivatives Contracts have been terminated or closed out, the then-current mark-to-market value for such Derivatives Contracts, determined based upon one or more mid-market quotations or estimates provided by any recognized dealer in Derivatives Contracts (which may include the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Affiliate of any thereof).
Derivatives Termination Value
"" means a Property currently under development that has not achieved an Occupancy Rate of 80.0% or more or, subject to the last two sentences of this definition, on which the improvements (other than tenant improvements on unoccupied space) related to the development have not been completed. The term "Development Property" shall include real property of the type described in the immediately preceding sentence that satisfies both of the following conditions: (i) it is to be (but has not yet been) acquired by the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any Unconsolidated Affiliate upon completion of construction pursuant to a contract in which the seller of such real property is required to develop or renovate prior to, and as a condition precedent to, such acquisition and (ii) a third party is developing such property using the proceeds of a loan that is Guaranteed by, or is otherwise recourse to the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any Unconsolidated Affiliate. A Development Property on which all improvements (other than tenant improvements on unoccupied space) related to the development of such Property have been completed for at least twelve (12) months shall cease to constitute a Development Property notwithstanding the fact that such Property has not achieved an Occupancy Rate of at least 80.0%. Notwithstanding the above, Clarendon Center Project will be considered a Development Property until December 31, 2012.
Development Property
"" or "" means the lawful currency of the United States of America.
Dollars
$
"" means, with respect to a Person for any period and without duplication, the sum of (a) net income (loss) of such Person for such period determined on a consolidated basis excluding the following (but only to the extent included in determining net income (loss) for such period): (i) depreciation and amortization; (ii) interest expense; (iii) income tax expense; (iv) extraordinary or nonrecurring items, including without limitation, gains and losses from the sale of operating Properties (but not from the sale of Properties developed for the purpose of sale); and (v) equity in net income (loss) of its Unconsolidated Affiliates  (b) such Person's Ownership Share of EBITDA of its Unconsolidated Affiliates. EBITDA shall be adjusted to remove any impact from amortization of intangibles pursuant to FASB ASC 805. For purposes of this definition, nonrecurring items shall be deemed to include (x) gains and losses on early extinguishment of Indebtedness, and gains or losses on hedging transactions relating to protection against variable interest rates on Indebtedness, (y) severance and other restructuring charges and (z) transaction costs of acquisitions not permitted to be capitalized pursuant to GAAP.
EBITDA
plus
 
"" means the later of (a) the Agreement Date and (b) the date on which all of the conditions precedent set forth in Section 6.1. shall have been fulfilled or waived by all of the Lenders.
Effective Date
"" means (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender, (c) an Approved Fund and (d) any other Person (other than a natural person) approved by the Administrative Agent (such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed); provided that notwithstanding the foregoing, "Eligible Assignee" shall not include the Parent, the Borrower or any of the Parent's or the Borrower's respective Affiliates or Subsidiaries or any Defaulting Lender or its Affiliates.
Eligible Assignee
"" means a Property which satisfies all of the following requirements: (a) such Property is fully developed as a retail, office, industrial or mixed use Property; (b) such Property is either (x) owned in fee simple by the Borrower, a Guarantor (other than the Parent) or a Wholly Owned Subsidiary of the Borrower (other than an Excluded Subsidiary), (y) one of the following Properties with respect to which the Borrower, a Guarantor (other than the Parent) or a Wholly Owned Subsidiary (other than an Excluded Subsidiary) of the Borrower owns a leasehold interest under a Ground Lease: Beacon Center at 6700-6800 Richmond Highway, Alexandria, Virginia, Olney Center at 3410-3494 Olney Laytonsville Road, Olney, Maryland and Southdale Center at 4R Mountain Road, Glen Burnie, Maryland 21061 or (z) any other Property with respect to which the Borrower, a Guarantor (other than the Parent) or a Wholly Owned Subsidiary of the Borrower (other than an Excluded Subsidiary) owns a leasehold interest under a Ground Lease which has been approved as an "Eligible Property" by the Administrative Agent, such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed; , that to the extent the amount of Unencumbered Asset Value attributable to Eligible Properties leased under Ground Leases, which are Eligible Properties under this clause (z), would exceed 10.0% of the aggregate Unencumbered Asset Value at any time, such excess shall be excluded; (c) such Property is located in a State of the United States of America or in the District of Columbia; (d) neither such Property, nor any interest of the Borrower, any Guarantor or any Wholly Owned Subsidiary of the Borrower therein, is subject to (i) any Lien (other than Permitted Liens) or (ii) any Negative Pledge; (e) if such Property is owned by a Guarantor or a Wholly Owned Subsidiary of the Borrower, neither the Parent's nor the Borrower's direct or indirect ownership interest in such Guarantor or such Wholly Owned Subsidiary of the Borrower, as applicable, is subject to (i) any Lien or (ii) any Negative Pledge; (f) regardless of whether such Property is owned by the Borrower, a Guarantor or a Wholly Owned Subsidiary, the Borrower or a Guarantor has the right directly, or indirectly through a Subsidiary, to take the following actions without the need to obtain the consent of any Person: (i) to create Liens on such Property as security for Indebtedness of the Borrower, such Guarantor or such Wholly Owned Subsidiary, as applicable, and (ii) to sell, transfer or otherwise dispose of such Property; and (g) such Property is free of all structural defects or major architectural deficiencies, title defects (other than Permitted Liens), environmental conditions or other adverse matters except for defects, deficiencies, conditions or other matters individually or collectively which are not material to the profitable operation of such Property. The initial list of Eligible Properties shall be provided by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders on the Agreement Date in the Officer's Certificate. For the avoidance of doubt, no Property owned or leased by an Excluded Subsidiary shall be an "Eligible Property" hereunder.
Eligible Property
provided
"" means any Applicable Law relating to environmental protection or the manufacture, storage, remediation, disposal or clean-up of Hazardous Materials including, without limitation, the following: Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C.  7401 et seq.; Federal Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C.  1251 et seq.; Solid Waste Disposal Act, as amended by the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, 42 U.S.C.  6901 et seq.; Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, 42 U.S.C.  9601 et seq.; National Environmental Policy Act, 42 U.S.C.  4321 et seq.; regulations of the Environmental Protection Agency, any applicable rule of common law and any judicial interpretation thereof relating primarily to the environment or Hazardous Materials, and any analogous or comparable state or local laws, regulations or ordinances that concern Hazardous Materials or protection of the environment, in each case to the extent constituting Applicable Law.
Environmental Laws
 
"" means, with respect to any Person, any share of capital stock of (or other ownership or profit interests in) such Person, any warrant, option or other right for the purchase or other acquisition from such Person of any share of capital stock of (or other ownership or profit interests in) such Person, whether or not certificated, any security convertible into or exchangeable for any share of capital stock of (or other ownership or profit interests in) such Person or warrant, right or option for the purchase or other acquisition from such Person of such shares (or such other interests), and any other ownership or profit interest in such Person (including, without limitation, partnership, member or trust interests therein), whether voting or nonvoting, and whether or not such share, warrant, option, right or other interest is authorized or otherwise existing on any date of determination.
Equity Interest
"" means any issuance or sale by a Person of any Equity Interest in such Person and shall in any event include the issuance of any Equity Interest upon the conversion or exchange of any security constituting Indebtedness that is convertible or exchangeable, or is being converted or exchanged, for Equity Interests.
Equity Issuance
"" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as in effect from time to time.
ERISA
"" means, with respect to the ERISA Group, (a) any "reportable event" as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived); (b) the withdrawal of a member of the ERISA Group from a Plan subject to Section 4063 of ERISA during a plan year in which it was a "substantial employer" as defined in Section 4001(a)(2) of ERISA or a cessation of operations that is treated as such a withdrawal under Section 4062(e) of ERISA; (c) the incurrence by a member of the ERISA Group of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Multiemployer Plan; (d) the incurrence by any member of the ERISA Group of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan or Multiemployer Plan; (e) the institution of proceedings to terminate a Plan or Multiemployer Plan by the PBGC; (f) the failure by any member of the ERISA Group to make when due required contributions to a Multiemployer Plan or Plan unless such failure is cured within 30 days or the filing pursuant to Section 412(c) of the Internal Revenue Code or Section 302(c) of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard; (g) any other event or condition that might reasonably be expected to constitute grounds under Section 4042 of ERISA for the termination of, or the appointment of a trustee to administer, any Plan or Multiemployer Plan or the imposition of liability under Section 4069 or 4212(c) of ERISA; (h) the receipt by any member of the ERISA Group of any notice or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from any member of the ERISA Group of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent (within the meaning of Section 4245 of ERISA), in reorganization (within the meaning of Section 4241 of ERISA), or in "critical" status (within the meaning of Section 432 of the Internal Revenue Code or Section 305 of ERISA); (i) the imposition of any liability under Title IV of ERISA, other than for PBGC premiums due but not delinquent under Section 4007 of ERISA, upon any member of the ERISA Group or the imposition of any Lien in favor of the PBGC under Title IV of ERISA; or (j) a determination that a Plan is, or is reasonably expected to be, in "at risk" status (within the meaning of Section 430 of the Internal Revenue Code or Section 303 of ERISA).
ERISA Event
"" means the Parent, the Borrower, any Subsidiary of the Parent and all members of a controlled group of corporations and all trades or businesses (whether or not incorporated) under common control, which, together with the Parent, the Borrower or any such Subsidiary, are treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Internal Revenue Code.
ERISA Group
 
"" means any of the events specified in Section 11.1., provided that any requirement for notice or lapse of time or any other condition has been satisfied.
Event of Default
"" means (1) Saul Subsidiary II Limited Partnership, a Delaware limited partnership, so long as it owns only the Properties at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, Van Ness Square and 4469 Connecticut Avenue; (2) any Subsidiary of the Borrower (a) holding title to assets that are or are to become collateral for any Secured Indebtedness of such Subsidiary and (b) that is prohibited from Guaranteeing the Indebtedness of any other Person pursuant to (i) any document, instrument or agreement evidencing such Secured Indebtedness or (ii) a provision of such Subsidiary's organizational documents which provision was included in such Subsidiary's organizational documents as a condition to the extension of such Secured Indebtedness; (3) any Subsidiary of the Borrower which is otherwise identified by the Borrower in writing to the Administrative Agent and approved in writing by the Administrative Agent (such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) as an "Excluded Subsidiary," and whose Property is, effective as of the date of such designation (which designation shall not have retroactive effect) not included in, or removed from, the calculation of Unencumbered Asset Value, provided that for purposes of this clause (3), (i) immediately before and after such designation, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing and (ii) immediately after giving effect to such designation, the Borrower shall be in compliance with the covenants set forth in Section 10.1. on a pro forma basis in accordance with Section 1.4. (and upon the reasonable request of the Administrative Agent the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent a certificate setting forth in reasonable detail the calculations demonstrating such compliance); and (4) any IDOT Finance Subsidiary. The initial list of Excluded Subsidiaries shall be provided by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders on the Agreement Date in the Officer's Certificate.
Excluded Subsidiary
"" means that certain Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of December 19, 2007, by and among Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, as borrower, U.S. Bank National Association, as administrative agent and sole lead arranger, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as syndication agent, and the lenders party thereto.
Existing Credit Agreement
"" means, (a) with respect to a security listed on a national securities exchange or the NASDAQ National Market, the price of such security as reported on such exchange or market by any widely recognized reporting method customarily relied upon by financial institutions and (b) with respect to any other property, the price which could be negotiated in an arm's-length free market transaction, for cash, between a willing seller and a willing buyer, neither of which is under pressure or compulsion to complete the transaction. Except as otherwise provided herein, Fair Market Value shall be determined by the Responsible Officers of the Parent acting together in good faith and determining value in accordance with GAAP, as conclusively evidenced by a certification thereof delivered to the Administrative Agent or, with respect to any asset valued at no more than $1,000,000, such determination may be made by the chief financial officer of the Parent evidenced by an officer's certificate delivered to the Administrative Agent.
Fair Market Value
"" means the Accounting Standards Codification of the Financial Accounting Standards Board.
FASB ASC
"" means, for any period, a fluctuating interest rate per annum equal for each day during such period to the weighted average of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published for such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, for the next preceding Business Day) by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day which is a Business Day, the average of the quotations for such day on such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal Funds brokers of recognized standing selected by the Administrative Agent.
Federal Funds Rate
 
"" means the fees and commissions provided for or referred to in Section 3.5. and any other fees payable by the Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document.
Fees
"" means the Financial Institution Recovery, Reform and Enforcement Act of 1989, as amended.
FIRREA
"" means, with respect to any Person and for a given period, the sum of (a) the Interest Expense of such Person for such period, (b) the aggregate of all regularly scheduled principal payments on Indebtedness payable by such Person during such period (excluding balloon, bullet or similar payments of principal due upon the stated maturity of Indebtedness), (c) the aggregate amount of all Preferred Dividends paid by such Person during such period. Such Person's Ownership Share of the Fixed Charges of its Unconsolidated Affiliates will be included when determining the Fixed Charges of such Person.
Fixed Charges
plus
plus
"" means all Indebtedness of a Person which bears interest at a variable rate during the scheduled life of such Indebtedness to the extent that such Person has not entered into an interest rate swap agreement, interest rate "cap" or "collar" agreement or other similar Derivatives Contract with a Person not an Affiliate of such Person and which, as of the date of determination, effectively limits such interest rate exposure in respect of such Indebtedness to a fixed rate less than or equal to 7.00% .
Floating Rate Indebtedness
per annum
"" means any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is resident for tax purposes. For purposes of this definition, the United States of America, each State thereof and the District of Columbia shall be deemed to constitute a single jurisdiction.
Foreign Lender
"" means, at any time there is a Defaulting Lender, (a) with respect to an Issuing Bank, such Defaulting Lender's Revolving Commitment Percentage of the outstanding Letter of Credit Liabilities with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank other than Letter of Credit Liabilities as to which such Defaulting Lender's participation obligation has been reallocated to other Revolving Lenders or Cash Collateralized in accordance with the terms hereof, and (b) with respect to the Swingline Lender, such Defaulting Lender's Revolving Commitment Percentage of outstanding Swingline Loans other than Swingline Loans as to which such Defaulting Lender's participation obligation has been reallocated to other Revolving Lenders.
Fronting Exposure
"" means any Person (other than a natural person) that is (or will be) engaged in making, purchasing, holding or otherwise investing in commercial loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its business.
Fund
"" means, with respect to a Person and for a given period, Funds from Operations as defined from time to time by National Association of Real Estate Investment Trusts, Inc.
Funds From Operations
"" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board (including Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 168, "The FASB Accounting Standards Codification") or in such other statements by such other entity as may be approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession in the United States of America, which are applicable to the circumstances as of the date of determination.
GAAP
 
"" means all authorizations, consents, approvals, licenses and exemptions of, registrations and filings with, and reports to, all Governmental Authorities.
Governmental Approvals
"" means any national, state or local government (whether domestic or foreign), any political subdivision thereof or any other governmental, quasi-governmental, judicial, administrative, public or statutory instrumentality, authority, body, agency, bureau, commission, board, department or other entity (including, without limitation, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Comptroller of the Currency or the Federal Reserve Board, any central bank or any comparable authority) or any arbitrator with authority to bind a party at law.
Governmental Authority
"" means a ground lease containing the following terms and conditions: (a) a remaining term (exclusive of any unexercised extension options) of forty (40) years or more from the Agreement Date; (b) the right of the lessee to mortgage and encumber its interest in the leased property without the consent of the lessor; (c) the obligation of the lessor to give the holder of any mortgage Lien on such leased property written notice of any defaults on the part of the lessee and agreement of such lessor that such lease will not be terminated until such holder has had a reasonable opportunity to cure or complete foreclosures, and fails to do so; (d) reasonable transferability of the lessee's interest under such lease, including ability to sublease; and (e) such other rights customarily required by mortgagees making a loan secured by the interest of the holder of the leasehold estate demised pursuant to a ground lease.
Ground Lease
"" means any Person that is party to the Guaranty as a "Guarantor" and shall in any event include the Parent, Saul Subsidiary I Limited Partnership and each Material Subsidiary (unless an Excluded Subsidiary).
Guarantor
"" "" or to "" as applied to any obligation means and includes: (a) a guaranty (other than by endorsement of negotiable instruments for collection in the ordinary course of business), directly or indirectly, in any manner, of any part or all of such obligation, or (b) an agreement, direct or indirect, contingent or otherwise, and whether or not constituting a guaranty, the practical effect of which is to assure the payment or performance (or payment of damages in the event of nonperformance) of any part or all of such obligation whether by: (i) the purchase of securities or obligations, (ii) the purchase, sale or lease (as lessee or lessor) of property or the purchase or sale of services primarily for the purpose of enabling the obligor with respect to such obligation to make any payment or performance (or payment of damages in the event of nonperformance) of or on account of any part or all of such obligation, or to assure the owner of such obligation against loss, (iii) the supplying of funds to or in any other manner investing in the obligor with respect to such obligation, (iv) repayment of amounts drawn down by beneficiaries of letters of credit (including Letters of Credit), or (v) the supplying of funds to or investing in a Person on account of all or any part of such Person's obligation under a Guaranty of any obligation or indemnifying or holding harmless, in any way, such Person against any part or all of such obligation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a guaranty of customary nonrecourse carveouts shall not be deemed a "Guaranty" for purposes of this Agreement. As the context requires, "Guaranty" shall also mean the guaranty executed and delivered pursuant to Section 6.1. or 8.14. and substantially in the form of Exhibit B.
Guaranty,
Guaranteed
Guarantee
"" means all or any of the following: (a) substances that are defined or listed in, or otherwise classified pursuant to, any applicable Environmental Laws as "hazardous substances," "hazardous materials," "hazardous wastes," "toxic substances" or any other formulation intended to define, list or classify substances by reason of deleterious properties such as ignitability, corrosivity, reactivity, carcinogenicity, reproductive toxicity, "TCLP" toxicity, or "EP toxicity"; (b) oil, petroleum or petroleum derived substances, natural gas, natural gas liquids or synthetic gas and drilling fluids, produced waters and other wastes associated with the exploration, development or production of crude oil, natural gas or geothermal resources; (c) any flammable substances or explosives or any
Hazardous Materials
 
radioactive materials; (d) asbestos in any form; (e) toxic mold; and (f) electrical equipment which contains any oil or dielectric fluid containing levels of polychlorinated biphenyls in excess of fifty parts per million.
"" means any Subsidiary of the Borrower that (i) has been formed solely for the purpose of entering into financing transactions in the ordinary course of the Borrower's and its Subsidiaries' business and consistent with past practice, and (ii) is not a Material Subsidiary.
IDOT Finance Subsidiary
"" means, with respect to a Person, at the time of computation thereof, all of the following (without duplication): (a) all obligations of such Person in respect of money borrowed or for the deferred purchase price of property or services, however trade debt incurred in the ordinary course of business), and all accrued expenses; (b) all obligations of such Person, whether or not for money borrowed (i) represented by notes payable, or drafts accepted, in each case representing extensions of credit, (ii) evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, or (iii) constituting purchase money indebtedness, conditional sales contracts, title retention debt instruments or other similar instruments, upon which interest charges are customarily paid or that are issued or assumed as full or partial payment for property or for services rendered; (c) Capitalized Lease Obligations of such Person; (d) all reimbursement obligations (contingent or otherwise) of such Person under or in respect of any letters of credit or acceptances (whether or not the same have been presented for payment); (e) all Off-Balance Sheet Obligations of such Person; (f) all obligations of such Person to purchase, redeem, retire, defease or otherwise make any payment in respect of any Mandatorily Redeemable Stock issued by such Person or any other Person, valued at the greater of its voluntary or involuntary liquidation preference plus accrued and unpaid dividends; (g) all obligations of such Person in respect of any purchase obligation, repurchase obligation, takeout commitment or forward equity commitment, in each case evidenced by a binding agreement (excluding any such obligation to the extent the obligation can be satisfied by the issuance of Equity Interests (other than Mandatorily Redeemable Stock)); (h) net obligations under any Derivatives Contract not entered into as a hedge against variable interest rates on Indebtedness, in an amount equal to the Derivatives Termination Value thereof at such time but in no event shall be less than zero; (i) all Indebtedness of other Persons which such Person has Guaranteed or is otherwise recourse to such Person (except for guaranties of customary exceptions for fraud, misapplication of funds, environmental indemnities, voluntary bankruptcy, collusive involuntary bankruptcy and other similar customary exceptions to non-recourse liability); (j) all Indebtedness of another Person secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property or assets owned by such Person, even though such Person has not assumed or become liable for the payment of such Indebtedness or other payment obligation; and (k) such Person's Ownership Share of the Indebtedness of any Unconsolidated Affiliate of such Person. Indebtedness of any Person shall include Indebtedness of any partnership or joint venture in which such Person is a general partner or joint venturer to the extent of such Person's Ownership Share of such partnership or joint venture (except if such Indebtedness, or portion thereof, is recourse to such Person, in which case the greater of such Person's Ownership Share of such Indebtedness or the amount of the recourse portion of the Indebtedness, shall be included as Indebtedness of such Person). All Loans and Letter of Credit Liabilities shall constitute "Indebtedness" of the Borrower.
Indebtedness
excluding
excluding
"" has the meaning given that term in Section 7.1.(s).
Intellectual Property
"" means, with respect to a Person for any period, without duplication, (a) total interest expense of such Person, including capitalized interest not funded under a construction loan interest reserve account, and in any event shall include all interest expense with respect to any Indebtedness of Borrower and its Subsidiaries in respect of which such Person is wholly or partially liable whether pursuant to any repayment, interest carry, performance guarantee or otherwise, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP for such period, (b) such Person's Ownership Share of Interest Expense of Unconsolidated Affiliates for such period.
Interest Expense
plus
 
"" means with respect to each LIBOR Loan, each period commencing on the date such LIBOR Loan is made, or in the case of the Continuation of a LIBOR Loan the last day of the preceding Interest Period for such LIBOR Loan, and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the first calendar month thereafter, as the Borrower may select in a Notice of Borrowing, Notice of Continuation or Notice of Conversion, as the case may be, except that each Interest Period that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on any day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the appropriate subsequent calendar month) shall end on the last Business Day of the appropriate subsequent calendar month. Notwithstanding the foregoing: (a) if any Interest Period would otherwise end after the Termination Date, such Interest Period shall end on the Termination Date and (b) each Interest Period that would otherwise end on a day which is not a Business Day shall end on the immediately following Business Day (or, if such immediately following Business Day falls in the next calendar month, on the immediately preceding Business Day).
Interest Period
"" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
Internal Revenue Code
"" means, with respect to any Person, any acquisition or investment (whether or not of a controlling interest) by such Person, by means of any of the following: (a) the purchase or other acquisition of any Equity Interest in another Person, (b) a loan, advance or extension of credit to, capital contribution to, Guaranty of Indebtedness of, or purchase or other acquisition of any Indebtedness of, another Person, including any partnership or joint venture interest in such other Person, or (c) the purchase or other acquisition (in one transaction or a series of transactions) of assets of another Person that constitute the business or a division or operating unit of another Person. Any commitment to make an Investment in any other Person, as well as any option of another Person to require an Investment in such Person, shall constitute an Investment. Except as expressly provided otherwise, for purposes of determining compliance with any covenant contained in the Loan Documents, the amount of any Investment shall be the amount actually invested, without adjustment for subsequent increases or decreases in the value of such Investment.
Investment
"" means Wells Fargo or any other Lender, each in its capacity as an issuer of Letters of Credit pursuant to Section 2.2.
Issuing Bank
"" has the meaning given to that term in Section 2.2.(a).
L/C Commitment Amount
"" has the meaning given to that term in Section 3.9.(b).
L/C Disbursement
"" means each financial institution from time to time party hereto as a "Lender," together with its respective successors and permitted assigns, and, as the context requires, includes the Swingline Lender; provided, however, that except as otherwise expressly provided herein, the term "Lender" shall exclude any Lender (or its Affiliates) in its capacity as a Specified Derivatives Provider.
Lender
"" means, for each Lender and for each Type of Loan, the office of such Lender specified in such Lender's Administrative Questionnaire or in the applicable Assignment and Assumption, or such other office of such Lender as such Lender may notify the Administrative Agent in writing from time to time.
Lending Office
"" has the meaning given that term in Section 2.2.(a).
Letter of Credit
 
"" means a special deposit account maintained by the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders, and under its sole dominion and control.
Letter of Credit Collateral Account
"" means, with respect to any Letter of Credit, collectively, any application therefor, any certificate or other document presented in connection with a drawing under such Letter of Credit and any other agreement, instrument or other document governing or providing for (a) the rights and obligations of the parties concerned or at risk with respect to such Letter of Credit or (b) any collateral security for any of such obligations.
Letter of Credit Documents
"" means, without duplication, at any time and in respect of any Letter of Credit, the sum of (a) the Stated Amount of such Letter of Credit (b) the aggregate unpaid principal amount of all Reimbursement Obligations of the Borrower at such time due and payable in respect of all drawings made under such Letter of Credit. For purposes of this Agreement, a Lender (other than the Lender then acting as the applicable Issuing Bank) shall be deemed to hold a Letter of Credit Liability in an amount equal to its participation interest under Section 2.2. in the related Letter of Credit, and the Lender then acting as the applicable Issuing Bank shall be deemed to hold a Letter of Credit Liability in an amount equal to its retained interest in the related Letter of Credit after giving effect to the acquisition by the Lenders (other than the Lender then acting as the applicable Issuing Bank) of their participation interests under such Section.
Letter of Credit Liabilities
plus
"" has the meaning given that term in the definition of the term "Applicable Margin."
Level
"" means, for the Interest Period for any LIBOR Loan, the rate of interest, rounded up to the nearest whole multiple of one-hundredth of one percent (0.01%), obtained by dividing (i) the rate of interest, rounded upward to the nearest whole multiple of one-hundredth of one percent (0.01%), referred to as the BBA (British Bankers' Association) LIBOR rate as set forth by any service selected by the Administrative Agent that has been nominated by the British Bankers' Association as an authorized information vendor for the purpose of displaying such rate for deposits in U.S. Dollars at approximately 11:00 a.m. Central time, two (2) Business Days prior to the date of commencement of such Interest Period for purposes of calculating effective rates of interest for loans or obligations making reference thereto, for an amount approximately equal to the applicable LIBOR Loan and for a period of time approximately equal to such Interest Period (ii) a percentage equal to one (1)  the stated maximum rate (stated as a decimal) of all reserves, if any, required to be maintained with respect to Eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as "Eurocurrency liabilities") as specified in Regulation D of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or against any other category of liabilities which includes deposits by reference to which the interest rate on LIBOR Loans is determined or any applicable category of extensions of credit or other assets which includes loans by an office of any Lender outside of the United States of America). Any change in such maximum rate shall result in a change in LIBOR on the date on which such change in such maximum rate becomes effective.
LIBOR
by
minus
"" means a Revolving Loan (or any portion thereof) (other than a Base Rate Loan) bearing interest at a rate based on LIBOR.
LIBOR Loan
"" means, for any day, LIBOR as of that day that would be applicable for a LIBOR Loan having a one-month Interest Period determined at approximately 11:00 a.m. Central time for such day (or if such day is not a Business Day, the immediately preceding Business Day). The LIBOR Market Index Rate shall be determined on a daily basis.
LIBOR Market Index Rate
"" as applied to the property of any Person means: (a) any security interest, encumbrance, mortgage, deed to secure debt, deed of trust, assignment of leases and rents, pledge, lien, hypothecation,
Lien
 
assignment, charge or lease constituting a Capitalized Lease Obligation, conditional sale or other title retention agreement, or other security title or encumbrance of any kind in respect of any property of such Person, or upon the income, rents or profits therefrom; (b) any arrangement, express or implied, under which any property of such Person is transferred, sequestered or otherwise identified for the purpose of subjecting the same to the payment of Indebtedness or performance of any other obligation in priority to the payment of the general, unsecured creditors of such Person; and (c) the filing of any financing statement under the UCC or its equivalent in any jurisdiction, other than any precautionary filing not otherwise constituting or giving rise to a Lien, including a financing statement filed (i) in respect of a lease not constituting a Capitalized Lease Obligation pursuant to Section 9-505 (or a successor provision) of the Uniform Commercial Code or its equivalent as in effect in an applicable jurisdiction or (ii) in connection with a sale or other disposition of accounts or other assets not prohibited by this Agreement in a transaction not otherwise constituting or giving rise to a Lien.
"" means a Revolving Loan or a Swingline Loan.
Loan
"" means this Agreement, each Note, the Guaranty, each Letter of Credit Document and each other document or instrument now or hereafter executed and delivered by a Loan Party in connection with, pursuant to or relating to this Agreement (other than any Specified Derivatives Contract).
Loan Document
"" means each of the Borrower, the Parent and each other Person who guarantees all or a portion of the Obligations. Schedule 1.1. sets forth the Loan Parties in addition to the Borrower and the Parent as of the Agreement Date.
Loan Party
"" means, with respect to any Person, any Equity Interest of such Person which by the terms of such Equity Interest (or by the terms of any security into which it is convertible or for which it is exchangeable or exercisable), upon the happening of any event or otherwise, (a) matures or is mandatorily redeemable, pursuant to a sinking fund obligation or otherwise (other than an Equity Interest to the extent redeemable in exchange for common stock or other equivalent common Equity Interests at the option of the issuer of such Equity Interest), (b) is convertible into or exchangeable or exercisable for Indebtedness or Mandatorily Redeemable Stock, or (c) is redeemable at the option of the holder thereof, in whole or in part (other than an Equity Interest which is redeemable solely in exchange for common stock or other equivalent common Equity Interests); in each case, on or prior to the date on which all Loans are scheduled to be due and payable in full.
Mandatorily Redeemable Stock
"" means a materially adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, liabilities, financial condition or results of operations of the Parent and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (b) the ability of the Parent, the Borrower and the other Loan Parties, taken as a whole, to perform their obligations under the Loan Documents, (c) the validity or enforceability of the Loan Documents taken as a whole, or (d) the rights and remedies of the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the Administrative Agent under the Loan Documents taken as a whole.
Material Adverse Effect
"" means (a) any Tenant Lease the termination of which, prior to the end of its term, could reasonably be expected to cause a Material Adverse Effect and (b) any contract or other arrangement (other than Loan Documents and Specified Derivatives Contracts), whether written or oral, to which the Parent, the Borrower, any Subsidiary of the Borrower or any other Loan Party is a party as to which the breach, nonperformance, cancellation or failure to renew (if renewable by its terms) by any party thereto could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Material Contract
"" means any Subsidiary of the Parent having assets with a Fair Market Value equal to or greater than $2,500,000.
Material Subsidiary
 
"" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc. and its successors.
Moody's
"" means a mortgage, deed of trust, deed to secure debt or similar security instrument made by a Person owning an interest in real estate granting a Lien on such interest in real estate as security for the payment of Indebtedness.
Mortgage
"" means a promissory note secured by a Mortgage of which the Parent, the Borrower or a Subsidiary of the Parent is the holder and retains the rights of collection of all payments thereunder.
Mortgage Receivable
"" means at any time a multiemployer plan within the meaning of Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA to which any member of the ERISA Group is then making or accruing an obligation to make contributions or has within the preceding six plan years made contributions, including for these purposes any Person which ceased to be a member of the ERISA Group during such six-year period.
Multiemployer Plan
means (a) the Clarendon Center Project and (b) each other Property which is designated as such by the Administrative Agent and the Borrower from time to time.
"Multifamily Property"
"" means, with respect to a given asset, any provision of a document, instrument or agreement (other than any Loan Document) which prohibits or purports to prohibit the creation or assumption of any Lien on such asset as security for Indebtedness of the Person owning such asset or any other Person; provided, however, that an agreement that conditions a Person's ability to encumber its assets upon the maintenance of one or more specified ratios that limit such Person's ability to encumber its assets but that do not generally prohibit the encumbrance of its assets, or the encumbrance of specific assets, shall not constitute a Negative Pledge.
Negative Pledge
"" or "" means, for any Property and for a given period, the sum of the following (without duplication and determined on a consistent basis with prior periods): (a) rents and other revenues received in the ordinary course from such Property (including proceeds of rent loss or business interruption insurance but excluding pre-paid rents and revenues and security deposits except to the extent applied in satisfaction of tenants' obligations for rent) (b) all expenses paid (excluding interest but including an appropriate accrual for property taxes and insurance) related to the ownership, operation or maintenance of such Property, including but not limited to property taxes, assessments and the like, insurance, utilities, payroll costs, maintenance, repair and landscaping expenses, marketing expenses, and general and administrative expenses (including an appropriate allocation for legal, accounting, advertising, marketing and other expenses incurred in connection with such Property, but specifically excluding general overhead expenses of the Parent or the Borrower and the Subsidiaries of the Parent and any property management fees) (c) the Capital Reserves for such Property as of the end of such period (d) the greater of (i) the actual property management fee paid during such period with respect to such property, and (ii) an imputed management fee in the amount of 3% of the gross revenues for such Property for such period.
Net Operating Income
NOI
minus
minus
minus
"" means with respect to an Equity Issuance by a Person, the aggregate amount of all cash and the Fair Market Value of all other property (other than securities of such Person being converted or exchanged in connection with such Equity Issuance) received by such Person in respect of such Equity Issuance net of investment banking fees, legal fees, accountants' fees, underwriting discounts and commissions and other customary fees and expenses actually incurred by such Person in connection with such Equity Issuance.
Net Proceeds
 
"" means, at any time, each Lender that is not a Defaulting Lender at such time.
Non-Defaulting Lender
"" means, with respect to a Person, Indebtedness for borrowed money in respect of which recourse for payment (except for customary exceptions for fraud, misapplication of funds, environmental indemnities, voluntary bankruptcy, collusive involuntary bankruptcy and other similar customary exceptions to non-recourse liability) is contractually limited to specific assets of such Person encumbered by a Lien securing such Indebtedness.
Nonrecourse Indebtedness
"" means a Revolving Note or a Swingline Note.
Note
"" means a notice substantially in the form of Exhibit C (or such other form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and containing the information required in such Exhibit) to be delivered to the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 2.1.(b) evidencing the Borrower's request for a borrowing of Revolving Loans.
Notice of Borrowing
"" means a notice substantially in the form of Exhibit D (or such other form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and containing the information required in such Exhibit) to be delivered to the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 2.8. evidencing the Borrower's request for the Continuation of a LIBOR Loan.
Notice of Continuation
"" means a notice substantially in the form of Exhibit E (or such other form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and containing the information required in such Exhibit) to be delivered to the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 2.9. evidencing the Borrower's request for the Conversion of a Loan from one Type to another Type.
Notice of Conversion
"" means a notice substantially in the form of Exhibit F (or such other form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and containing the information required in such Exhibit) to be delivered to the Swingline Lender pursuant to Section 2.3.(b) evidencing the Borrower's request for a Swingline Loan.
Notice of Swingline Borrowing
"" means, individually and collectively: (a) the aggregate principal balance of, and all accrued and unpaid interest on, all Loans; (b) all Reimbursement Obligations and all other Letter of Credit Liabilities; and (c) all other indebtedness, liabilities, obligations, covenants and duties of the Borrower and the other Loan Parties owing to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender of every kind, nature and description, under or in respect of this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents, including, without limitation, the Fees and indemnification obligations, whether direct or indirect, absolute or contingent, due or not due, contractual or tortious, liquidated or unliquidated, and whether or not evidenced by any promissory note. For the avoidance of doubt, "Obligations" shall not include Specified Derivatives Obligations.
Obligations
"" means, with respect to a Property at any time, the ratio, expressed as a percentage, of (a) the net rentable square footage of such Property actually occupied by tenants that are not affiliated with the Borrower and paying rent at rates not materially less than rates generally prevailing at the time the applicable lease was entered into, pursuant to binding leases as to which no material monetary default has occurred and has continued to the date of determination unremedied for 60 or more days to (b) the aggregate net rentable square footage of such Property. For the purposes of the definition of "Occupancy Rate," a tenant shall be deemed to actually occupy a Property notwithstanding a temporary cessation of operations for renovation, repairs or other temporary reason, or for the purpose of completing tenant build out or that is otherwise scheduled to be open for business within 180 days of such date.
Occupancy Rate
 
"" has the meaning given that term in Section 7.1.(x).
OFAC
"" means a certificate from the chief executive officer or chief financial officer of the Parent certifying the "Eligible Properties" and "Excluded Subsidiaries" as of the Agreement Date and a description of the "Permitted Ground Lease Encumbrance".
Officer's Certificate
"" means liabilities and obligations of the Parent, the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any other Person in respect of "off-balance sheet arrangements" (as defined in Item 303(a)(4)(ii) of Regulation S-K promulgated under the Securities Act) which the Parent would be required to disclose in the "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations" section of the Parent's report on Form 10-Q or Form 10-K (or their equivalents) which the Parent is required to file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (or any Governmental Authority substituted therefor).
Off-Balance Sheet Obligations
"" means, with respect to any Subsidiary of a Person (other than a Wholly Owned Subsidiary) or any Unconsolidated Affiliate of a Person, the greater of (a) such Person's relative nominal direct and indirect ownership interest (expressed as a percentage) in such Subsidiary or Unconsolidated Affiliate or (b) subject to compliance with Section 9.4.(n), such Person's relative direct and indirect economic interest (calculated as a percentage) in such Subsidiary or Unconsolidated Affiliate determined in accordance with the applicable provisions of the declaration of trust, articles or certificate of incorporation, articles of organization, partnership agreement, joint venture agreement or other applicable organizational document of such Subsidiary or Unconsolidated Affiliate.
Ownership Share
"" means Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation, its successors and assigns.
Parent
"" has the meaning given that term in Section 13.6.(d).
Participant
"" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation and any successor agency.
PBGC
"" means the encumbrance in respect of one of the Properties owned by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries existing as of the Agreement Date and described in the Officer's Certificate.
Permitted Ground Lease Encumbrance
"" means, with respect to any asset or property of a Person, (a) Liens securing taxes, assessments and other charges or levies imposed by any Governmental Authority (excluding any Lien imposed pursuant to any of the provisions of ERISA or pursuant to any Environmental Laws), in all cases which are not yet due or which are being contested in good faith and with respect to which adequate reserves or other appropriate provisions are being maintained in accordance with GAAP; (b) the claims of materialmen, mechanics, carriers, warehousemen or landlords for labor, materials, supplies or rentals incurred in the ordinary course of business, which, in each case, are not at the time required to be paid or discharged under Section 8.6.; (c) Liens consisting of deposits or pledges made, in the ordinary course of business, in connection with, or to secure payment of, obligations under workers' compensation, unemployment insurance or similar Applicable Laws; (d) Liens consisting of encumbrances in the nature of zoning restrictions, easements, customary declarations, and rights or restrictions of record or otherwise imposed by an applicable Governmental Authority on the use of real property, which do not materially detract from the value of such property or impair the intended use thereof in the business of such Person; (e) the rights of tenants under leases or subleases (including customary "no build" restrictions) not interfering with the ordinary conduct of business of such Person; and (f) Liens in favor of (x) any Loan Party, existing as of the Agreement Date and set forth on Schedule 10.2. or (y) the Administrative Agent for its benefit and the benefit of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks.
Permitted Liens
 
"" means any natural person, corporation, limited partnership, general partnership, joint stock company, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, joint venture, association, company, trust, bank, trust company, land trust, business trust or other organization, whether or not a legal entity, or any other nongovernmental entity, or any Governmental Authority.
Person
"" means at any time an employee pension benefit plan (other than a Multiemployer Plan) which is covered by Title IV of ERISA or subject to the minimum funding standards under Section 412 of the Internal Revenue Code and either (a) is maintained, or contributed to, by any member of the ERISA Group for employees of any member of the ERISA Group or (b) has at any time within the preceding six years been maintained, or contributed to, by any Person which was at such time a member of the ERISA Group for employees of any Person which was at such time a member of the ERISA Group.
Plan
"" means, in respect of any principal of any Loan or any Reimbursement Obligation that is not paid when due, the rate otherwise applicable an additional five percent (5.0%) per annum and with respect to any other Obligation that is not paid when due (whether at stated maturity, by acceleration, by optional or mandatory prepayment or otherwise), a rate per annum equal to the Base Rate as in effect from time to time the Applicable Margin five percent (5.0%).
Post-Default Rate
plus
plus
plus
"" means, for any period and without duplication, all Restricted Payments paid during such period on Preferred Equity Interests issued by the Parent the Borrower or any Subsidiary. Preferred Dividends shall not include dividends or distributions (a) paid or payable solely in Equity Interests (other than Mandatorily Redeemable Stock) payable to holders of such class of Equity Interests, (b) paid or payable to the Parent, the Borrower or a Subsidiary, or (c) constituting or resulting in the redemption of Preferred Equity Interests, other than scheduled redemptions not constituting balloon, bullet or similar redemptions in full.
Preferred Dividends
,
"" means, with respect to any Person, Equity Interests in such Person which are entitled to preference or priority over any other Equity Interest in such Person in respect of the payment of dividends or distribution of assets upon liquidation or both.
Preferred Equity Interest
"" means the office of the Administrative Agent located at 608 Second Avenue S., 11
Principal Office
th
Floor, Minneapolis, Minnesota 55402-1916, or any other subsequent office that the Administrative Agent shall have specified as the Principal Office by written notice to the Borrower and the Lenders.
"" means a parcel (or group of related parcels) of real property developed (or to be developed) by the Borrower, or any Subsidiary of the Borrower or any Unconsolidated Affiliate.
Property
"" means, collectively, all agreements entered into by the Borrower or any other Loan Party pursuant to which the Borrower or such other Loan Party engages a Person to advise it with respect to the management of a given Property and/or to manage a given Property.
Property Management Agreements
"" means, as to each Lender, the ratio, expressed as a percentage of (a) the amount of such Lender's Revolving Commitment to (b) the aggregate amount of the Revolving Commitments of all Lenders; provided, however, that if at the time of determination the Revolving Commitments have terminated or been reduced to zero, the "Pro Rata Share" of each Lender shall be the ratio, expressed as a percentage of (A) the sum of the unpaid principal amount of all outstanding Revolving Loans, Swingline Loans and Letter of Credit Liabilities owing to such Lender as of such date to (B) the sum of the aggregate unpaid principal amount of all outstanding Revolving Loans, Swingline Loans and Letter of Credit Liabilities of all Lenders as of such date.
Pro Rata Share
 
"" means a Benefit Arrangement that is intended to be tax-qualified under Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
Qualified Plan
"" means S&P, Moody's or any other nationally recognized securities rating agency selected by the Borrower and approved of by the Administrative Agent in writing.
Rating Agency
"" has the meaning given that term in Section 13.6.(c).
Register
"" means, with respect to any Lender, any change effective after the Agreement Date in Applicable Law (including without limitation, Regulation D of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System) or the adoption or making after such date of any interpretation, directive or request applying to a class of banks, including such Lender, of or under any Applicable Law (whether or not having the force of law and whether or not failure to comply therewith would be unlawful) by any Governmental Authority or monetary authority charged with the interpretation or administration thereof or compliance by any Lender with any request or directive regarding capital adequacy or liquidity requirements. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, (a) the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, rules, guidelines or directives thereunder or issued in connection therewith and (b) all requests, rules, guidelines or directives promulgated by the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (or any successor or similar authority) or the United States or foreign regulatory authorities, in each case pursuant to Basel III, shall in each case be deemed to be a "Regulatory Change," regardless of the date enacted, adopted or issued.
Regulatory Change
"" means the absolute, unconditional and irrevocable obligation of the Borrower to reimburse the applicable Issuing Bank for any drawing honored by such Issuing Bank under a Letter of Credit.
Reimbursement Obligation
"" means a Person qualifying for treatment as a "real estate investment trust" under the Internal Revenue Code.
REIT
"" means, with respect to any Person, such Person's Affiliates and the partners, directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and of such Person's Affiliates.
Related Parties
"" means, as of any date, (a) Lenders having at least 66-2/3% of the aggregate amount of the Revolving Commitments, or (b) if the Revolving Commitments have been terminated or reduced to zero, Lenders holding at least 66-2/3% of the principal amount of the aggregate outstanding Loans and Letter of Credit Liabilities; provided that (i) in determining such percentage at any given time, all then existing Defaulting Lenders will be disregarded and excluded, and (ii) at all times when two or more Lenders (excluding Defaulting Lenders) are party to this Agreement, the term "Requisite Lenders" shall in no event mean less than two Lenders. For purposes of this definition, a Lender shall be deemed to hold a Swingline Loan or a Letter of Credit Liability to the extent such Lender has acquired a participation therein under the terms of this Agreement and has not failed to perform its obligations in respect of such participation.
Requisite Lenders
"" means with respect to the Parent, the Borrower or any other Subsidiary of the Parent, the chief financial officer and President of the Parent, the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable. For purposes of this Agreement, references to the Borrower's or a Subsidiary's Responsible Officers shall be deemed to refer to the Parent's Responsible Officers.
Responsible Officer
"" means: (a) any dividend or other distribution, direct or indirect, on account of any Equity Interest of the Parent, the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries of the Parent now or
Restricted Payment
 
hereafter outstanding, except a dividend payable solely in shares of that class of Equity Interest to the holders of that class; (b) any redemption, conversion, exchange, retirement, sinking fund or similar payment, purchase or other acquisition for value, direct or indirect, of any Equity Interest of the Parent, the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries of the Parent now or hereafter outstanding; (c)any payment or prepayment of principal of, premium, if any, or interest on, redemption, conversion, exchange, purchase, retirement, defeasance, sinking fund or similar payment with respect to, any Subordinated Debt; and (d) any payment made to retire, or to obtain the surrender of, any outstanding warrants, options or other rights to acquire any Equity Interests of the Parent, the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries of the Parent now or hereafter outstanding.
 
"" means, as to each Lender (other than the Swingline Lender), such Lender's obligation to make Revolving Loans pursuant to Section 2.1., to issue (in the case of the Issuing Banks) and to participate (in the case of the other Lenders) in Letters of Credit pursuant to Section 2.2.(i), and to participate in Swingline Loans pursuant to Section 2.3.(e), in an amount up to, but not exceeding the amount set forth for such Lender on Schedule I as such Lender's "Revolving Commitment Amount" or as set forth in any applicable Assignment and Assumption, as the same may be reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.11. or increased or reduced as appropriate to reflect any assignments to or by such Lender effected in accordance with Section 13.6.
Revolving Commitment
"" means, as to each Lender with a Revolving Commitment, the ratio, expressed as a percentage, of (a) the amount of such Lender's Revolving Commitment to (b) the aggregate amount of the Revolving Commitments of all Revolving Lenders; provided, however, that if at the time of determination the Revolving Commitments have been terminated or been reduced to zero, the "Revolving Commitment Percentage" of each Lender with a Revolving Commitment shall be the "Revolving Commitment Percentage" of such Lender in effect immediately prior to such termination or reduction.
Revolving Commitment Percentage
"" means, as to any Revolving Lender at any time, the aggregate principal amount at such time of its outstanding Revolving Loans and such Revolving Lender's participation in Letter of Credit Liabilities and Swingline Loans at such time.
Revolving Credit Exposure
"" means a Lender having a Revolving Commitment.
Revolving Lender
"" means a loan made by a Lender to the Borrower pursuant to Section 2.1.(a).
Revolving Loan
"" means a promissory note of the Borrower substantially in the form of Exhibit G, payable to the order of a Lender in a principal amount equal to the amount of such Lender's Revolving Commitment.
Revolving Note
"" means May 20, 2016, or such later date to which the Revolving Termination Date may be extended pursuant to Section 2.12.
Revolving Termination Date
"" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Services, a Standard & Poor's Financial Services LLC business, and its successors.
S&P
means B. Francis Saul II and his spouse, siblings, and lineal descendants and the spouses of such siblings and lineal descendants and the heirs, beneficiaries, devisees or legatees that are or were members of the same family by blood, marriage or adoption as any of the same or any of the foregoing (and for purposes of this definition, any shares of Equity Interests which a Person no longer owns as a result of death shall be deemed still to be owned by such Person unless not held by such Person's estate, trusts established under such Person's will, or the heirs, beneficiaries, devisees or legatees
"Saul Family"
 
of such Person that are or were members of the same family by blood, marriage or adoption as such Person). Entities owned or controlled by members of the Saul Family shall be deemed owned by such members for purposes of this Agreement.
"" means, with respect to a Person as of an given date, the aggregate principal amount of all Indebtedness of such Person outstanding on such date that is secured in any manner by any Lien on any property, and in the case of the Borrower, shall include (without duplication), the Borrower's Ownership Share of the Secured Indebtedness of its Unconsolidated Affiliates, as applicable.
Secured Indebtedness
"" means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended from time to time, together with all rules and regulations issued thereunder.
Securities Act
"" means, when used with respect to any Person, that (a) the fair value and the fair salable value of its assets (excluding any Indebtedness due from any Affiliate of such Person) are each in excess of the fair valuation of its total liabilities (including all contingent liabilities computed at the amount which, in light of all facts and circumstances existing at such time, represents the amount that could reasonably be expected to become an actual and matured liability); (b) such Person is able to pay its debts or other obligations in the ordinary course as they mature; and (c) such Person has capital not unreasonably small to carry on its business and all business in which it proposes to be engaged.
Solvent
"" means any Derivatives Contract, together with any Derivatives Support Document relating thereto, that is made or entered into at any time, or in effect at any time now or hereafter, whether as a result of an assignment or transfer or otherwise, between the Borrower, the Parent or any other Loan Party and any Specified Derivatives Provider.
Specified Derivatives Contract
"" means all indebtedness, liabilities, obligations, covenants and duties of the Parent, the Borrower or other Loan Party under or in respect of any Specified Derivatives Contract, whether direct or indirect, absolute or contingent, due or not due, liquidated or unliquidated, and whether or not evidenced by any written confirmation.
Specified Derivatives Obligations
"" means any Lender, or any Affiliate of a Lender that is a party to a Derivatives Contract at the time the Derivatives Contract is entered into.
Specified Derivatives Provider
"" means the amount available to be drawn by a beneficiary under a Letter of Credit from time to time, as such amount may be increased or reduced from time to time in accordance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
Stated Amount
"" means Indebtedness for money borrowed of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries that is subordinated in right of payment and otherwise to the Loans, the other Obligations and the Specified Derivatives Obligations, if any, in a manner satisfactory to the Administrative Agent in its sole and absolute discretion.
Subordinated Debt
"" means, for any Person, any corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other entity of which at least a majority of the Equity Interests having by the terms thereof ordinary voting power to elect a majority of the board of directors or other individuals performing similar functions of such corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other entity (without regard to the occurrence of any contingency) is at the time directly or indirectly owned or controlled by such Person or one or more Subsidiaries of such Person or by such Person and one or more Subsidiaries of such Person, and shall include all Persons the accounts of which are consolidated with those of such Person pursuant to GAAP.
Subsidiary
 
"" means, at the time of determination thereof, an amount in excess of 20.0% of total consolidated assets (exclusive of depreciation) at such time of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis.
Substantial Amount
"" means the Swingline Lender's obligation to make Swingline Loans pursuant to Section 2.3. in an amount up to, but not exceeding the amount set forth in the first sentence of Section 2.3.(a), as such amount may be reduced from time to time in accordance with the terms hereof.
Swingline Commitment
"" means Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, together with its respective successors and assigns.
Swingline Lender
"" means a loan made by the Swingline Lender to the Borrower pursuant to Section 2.3.
Swingline Loan
"" means the date which is seven (7) Business Days prior to the Revolving Termination Date.
Swingline Maturity Date
"" means the promissory note of the Borrower substantially in the form of Exhibit H, payable to the order of the Swingline Lender in a principal amount equal to the amount of the Swingline Commitment as originally in effect and otherwise duly completed.
Swingline Note
"" means, with respect to any Person as of a given date, the stockholders' equity of such Person determined on a consolidated basis, accumulated depreciation and amortization, (to the extent included when determining stockholders' equity): (a) the amount of any write-up in the book value of any assets reflected in any balance sheet resulting from revaluation thereof or any write-up in excess of the cost of such assets acquired, and (b) the aggregate of all amounts appearing on the assets side of any such balance sheet for franchises, licenses, permits, patents, patent applications, copyrights, trademarks, service marks, trade names, goodwill, treasury stock, experimental or organizational expenses and other like assets which would be classified as intangible assets under GAAP, all determined as of such date on a consolidated basis.
Tangible Net Worth
plus
minus
"" has the meaning given that term in Section 3.10.
Taxes
"" means any lease entered into by the Borrower, any Loan Party or any Subsidiary with respect to any portion of a Property.
Tenant Lease
"" means, with respect to any Person at a given time, the sum (without duplication) of all of the following of such Person determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP applied on a consistent basis: (a) cash and cash equivalents (other than tenant deposits and other cash and cash equivalents that are subject to a Lien or a Negative Pledge or the disposition of which is restricted in any way); (b) the quotient of (i) EBITDA of such Person for the immediately preceding period of twelve consecutive calendar months (ii) the Capitalization Rate; (c) the GAAP book value, as of the date of acquisition, of Properties acquired during the twelve consecutive calendar months most recently ended; (d) the GAAP book value of all Development Properties; (e) the GAAP book value of Unimproved Land.Notwithstanding the foregoing, for the first twelve consecutive calendar months after a Property has ceased to be a Development Property, EBITDA attributable to that Property shall be determined on the basis of its income for the immediately preceding three calendar month period, annualized. Such Person's Ownership Share of assets held by Unconsolidated Affiliates (excluding assets of the type described in the immediately preceding clause (a)) will be included in the calculation of Total Asset Value consistent with the above described treatment for wholly-owned assets. EBITDA attributable to (x) Properties acquired or disposed of during the three calendar month period
Total Asset Value
plus
divided by
plus
plus
plus
 
ending immediately prior to any date of determination of Total Asset Value or (y) Properties that were Development Properties at the end of such three calendar month period, shall not be included in the calculation of Total Asset Value. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for purposes of determining Total Asset Value, to the extent the amount of Total Asset Value attributable to Properties leased under Ground Leases, which are Eligible Properties under clause (z) of the definition of "Eligible Property," would exceed 10.0% of the aggregate Total Asset Value at any time, such excess shall be excluded.
"" means, with respect to any Person, all Indebtedness of such Person and such Person's Ownership Share of all Indebtedness of all Subsidiaries of such Person.
Total Indebtedness
"" means, as of any date of determination, the yield on the Treasury Constant Maturity Series with a ten-year maturity, as reported on the Business Day immediately preceding such date in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15, Selected Interest Rates ("") of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, or any successor publication. If for any reason Release H.15 is no longer published, the Administrative Agent shall select a comparable publication to determine the Treasury Rate.
Treasury Rate
Release H.15
"" means a form substantially in the form of Exhibit I to be delivered to the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 6.1.(a), as the same may be amended, restated or modified from time to time with the prior written approval of the Administrative Agent.
Transfer Authorizer Designation Form
"" with respect to any Revolving Loan, refers to whether such Loan or portion thereof is a LIBOR Loan or a Base Rate Loan.
Type
"" means the Uniform Commercial Code as in effect in any applicable jurisdiction.
UCC
"" means, with respect to any Person, any other Person in whom such Person holds, either directly or indirectly through one or more Subsidiaries an Investment, which Investment is accounted for in the financial statements of such Person on an equity basis of accounting and whose financial results would not be consolidated under GAAP with the financial results of such Person on the consolidated financial statements of such Person.
Unconsolidated Affiliate
"" means (a) the Unencumbered NOI (excluding NOI attributable to Development Properties) for the immediately preceding period of twelve consecutive calendar months divided by the Capitalization Rate, (b) the GAAP book value of all Properties acquired during the twelve calendar month period most recently ended which Properties are not subject to any Lien (other than Permitted Liens) or any Negative Pledge. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for the first twelve consecutive calendar months after a Property has ceased to be a Development Property, Unencumbered NOI attributable to that Property shall be determined on the basis of its income for the immediately preceding three calendar month period, annualized. Unencumbered NOI attributable to Properties disposed of during the three calendar month period ending immediately prior to any date of determination of Unencumbered Asset Value shall not be included in the calculation of Unencumbered Asset Value.
Unencumbered Asset Value
plus
""means, for any period, NOI from all Eligible Properties.
Unencumbered NOI
"" means, with respect to any Person for any period, the aggregate amount of principal and interest payments in respect of all Unsecured Indebtedness of such Person that would be due and payable in respect thereof during such period, computed assuming a thirty (30) year amortization schedule and a interest rate equal to the greater of: (a) the Treasury Rate 2.50% and (b) 7.00%.
Unencumbered Pool Debt Service
per annum
plus
 
"" means land on which no development (other than improvements that are not material and are temporary in nature) has occurred and for which no development is scheduled in the following twelve (12) months.
Unimproved Land
"" means, with respect to a Person, Indebtedness of such Person that is not Secured Indebtedness; , , that any Indebtedness that is secured only by a pledge of Equity Interests shall be deemed to be Unsecured Indebtedness.
Unsecured Indebtedness
provided
however
"" means a rate equal to 0.25%.
Unused Fee Rate
per annum
means (a) 601 Pennsylvania and (b) each other Property which is designated as such by the Administrative Agent and the Borrower from time to time.
"Washington DC CBD Office Property"
"" means Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, and its successors and assigns.
Wells Fargo
"" means any Subsidiary of a Person in respect of which all of the Equity Interests (other than, in the case of a corporation, directors' qualifying shares) are at the time directly or indirectly owned or controlled by such Person or one or more other Subsidiaries of such Person or by such Person and one or more other Subsidiaries of such Person.
Wholly Owned Subsidiary
"" means any liability as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from a Multiemployer Plan as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
 
Unless otherwise indicated, all accounting terms, ratios and measurements shall be interpreted or determined in accordance with GAAP as in effect as of the Agreement Date. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, the calculation of liabilities shall not include any fair value adjustments to the carrying value of liabilities to record such liabilities at fair value pursuant to electing the fair value option election under FASB ASC 825-10-25 (formerly known as FAS 159, The Fair Value Option for Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities) or other FASB standards allowing entities to elect fair value option for financial liabilities. Accordingly, the amount of liabilities shall be the historical cost basis, which generally is the contractual amount owed adjusted for amortization or accretion of any premium or discount. References in this Agreement to "Sections," "Articles," "Exhibits" and "Schedules" are to sections, articles, exhibits and schedules herein and hereto unless otherwise indicated. References in this Agreement to any document, instrument or agreement (a) shall include all exhibits, schedules and other attachments thereto, (b) shall include all documents, instruments or agreements issued or executed in replacement thereof, to the extent permitted hereby and (c) shall mean such document, instrument or agreement, or replacement or predecessor thereto, as amended, supplemented, restated or otherwise modified from time to time to the extent not otherwise stated herein or prohibited hereby and in effect at any given time. Wherever from the context it appears appropriate, each term stated in either the singular or plural shall include the singular and plural, and pronouns stated in the masculine, feminine or neuter gender shall include the masculine, the feminine and the neuter. Whenever reference is made to Borrower's knowledge, or a similar qualification, knowledge means the actual current knowledge of Parent's Responsible Officers. Unless explicitly set forth to the contrary, a reference to "Subsidiary" means a Subsidiary of the Borrower or a Subsidiary of such Subsidiary and a reference to an "Affiliate" means a reference to an Affiliate of the Borrower, and a reference to an "Unconsolidated Affiliate" means a reference to an Unconsolidated Affiliate of the Borrower. Titles and captions of Articles, Sections, subsections and clauses in this Agreement are for convenience only, and neither limit nor amplify the provisions of this Agreement. Unless otherwise indicated, all references to time are references to Central time.
 
When determining the Applicable Margin and compliance by the Parent or the Borrower with any financial covenant contained in any of the Loan Documents (a) only the Ownership Share of the Parent or the Borrower, as applicable, of the financial attributes of a Subsidiary that is not a Wholly Owned Subsidiary shall be included and (b) the Parent's Ownership Share of the Borrower shall be deemed to be 100.0%.
 
All pro forma computations required to be made hereunder giving effect to any transaction (including any designation of a Subsidiary as an Excluded Subsidiary) shall be calculated giving pro forma effect thereto (and to any other such transaction consummated since the first day of the period for which such pro forma computation is being made and on or prior to the date of such computation) as if such transaction had occurred on the first day of the period of twelve consecutive calendar months ending with the most recent calendar month for which financial statements shall have been delivered pursuant to Section 9.1 or 9.2 (or, prior to the delivery of any such financial statements, ending on March 31, 2012), and, to the extent applicable, the historical earnings and cash flows associated with the assets subject to such transaction and any related incurrence or reduction of Indebtedness. If any Indebtedness bears a floating rate of interest and is being given pro forma effect, the interest on such Indebtedness shall be calculated as if the rate in effect on the date of determination had been the applicable rate for the entire period (taking into account any Derivatives Contract applicable to such Indebtedness).
 
(a) . Subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, including without limitation, Section 2.14., each Lender severally and not jointly agrees to make Revolving Loans to the Borrower during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the Revolving Termination Date, in an aggregate principal amount at any one time outstanding up to, but not exceeding, such Lender's Revolving Commitment. Each borrowing of Base Rate Loans shall be in an aggregate minimum amount of $1,000,000 and integral multiples of $100,000 in excess thereof. Each borrowing and Continuation under Section 2.8. of, and each Conversion under Section 2.9. of Base Rate Loans into, LIBOR Loans shall be in an aggregate minimum of $1,000,000 and integral multiples of $100,000 in excess of that amount. Notwithstanding the immediately preceding two sentences but subject to Section 2.14., a borrowing of Revolving Loans may be in the aggregate amount of the unused Revolving Commitments. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Borrower may borrow, repay and reborrow Revolving Loans.
Making of Revolving Loans
(b) . Not later than 11:00 a.m. Central time at least one (1) Business Day prior to a borrowing of Revolving Loans that are to be Base Rate Loans and not later than 11:00 a.m. Central time at least three (3) Business Days prior to a borrowing of Revolving Loans that are to be LIBOR Loans, the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent a Notice of Borrowing or telephone notice thereof. Each Notice of Borrowing shall specify the aggregate principal amount of the Revolving Loans to be borrowed, the date such Revolving Loans are to be borrowed (which must be a Business Day), the use of the proceeds of such Revolving Loans, the Type of the requested Revolving Loans, and if such Revolving Loans are to be LIBOR Loans, the initial Interest Period for such Revolving Loans. Any telephone notice shall include all information to be specified in a written notice of Borrowing and shall be promptly confirmed in writing by the Borrower pursuant to a Notice of Borrowing sent to the Agent by email on the same day as the giving of such telephonic notice. Each Notice of Borrowing shall
Requests for Revolving Loans
 
be irrevocable once given and binding on the Borrower. Prior to delivering a Notice of Borrowing, the Borrower may (without specifying whether a Revolving Loan will be a Base Rate Loan or a LIBOR Loan) request that the Administrative Agent provide the Borrower with the most recent LIBOR available to the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent shall provide such quoted rate to the Borrower on the date of such request or as soon as possible thereafter.
(c) . Promptly after receipt of a Notice of Borrowing under the immediately preceding subsection (b), the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the proposed borrowing. Each Lender shall deposit an amount equal to the Revolving Loan to be made by such Lender to the Borrower with the Administrative Agent at the Principal Office, in immediately available funds not later than 11:00 a.m. Central time on the date of such proposed Revolving Loans. Subject to fulfillment of all applicable conditions set forth herein, the Administrative Agent shall make available to the Borrower in the account specified in the Transfer Authorizer Designation Form, not later than 2:00 p.m. Central time on the date of the requested borrowing of Revolving Loans, the proceeds of such amounts received by the Administrative Agent.
Funding of Revolving Loans
(d) . With respect to Revolving Loans to be made after the Effective Date, unless the Administrative Agent shall have been notified by any Lender that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent a Revolving Loan to be made by such Lender in connection with any borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender will make the proceeds of such Revolving Loan available to the Administrative Agent in accordance with this Section, and the Administrative Agent may (but shall not be obligated to), in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the Borrower the amount of such Revolving Loan to be provided by such Lender. In such event, if such Lender does not make available to the Administrative Agent the proceeds of such Revolving Loan, then such Lender and the Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent on demand the amount of such Revolving Loan with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such Revolving Loan is made available to the Borrower but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of a payment to be made by such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation and (ii) in the case of a payment to be made by the Borrower, the interest rate applicable to Base Rate Loans. If the Borrower and such Lender shall pay the amount of such interest to the Administrative Agent for the same or overlapping period, the Administrative Agent shall promptly remit to the Borrower the amount of such interest paid by the Borrower for such period. If such Lender pays to the Administrative Agent the amount of such Revolving Loan, the amount so paid shall constitute such Lender's Revolving Loan included in the borrowing. Any payment by the Borrower shall be without prejudice to any claim the Borrower may have against a Lender that shall have failed to make available the proceeds of a Revolving Loan to be made by such Lender.
Assumptions Regarding Funding by Lenders
 
(a) . Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, including without limitation, Section 2.14., each Issuing Bank, on behalf of the Lenders, agrees to issue for the account of the Borrower during the period from and including the Effective Date to, but excluding, the date thirty (30) days prior to the Revolving Termination Date, one or more standby letters of credit (each a "") up to a maximum aggregate Stated Amount at any one time outstanding not to exceed $15,000,000 as such amount may be reduced from time to time in accordance with the terms hereof (the "").
Letters of Credit
Letter of Credit
L/C Commitment Amount
(b) . At the time of issuance, the amount, form, terms and conditions of each Letter of Credit, and of any drafts or acceptances thereunder, shall be subject to
Terms of Letters of Credit
 
approval by the applicable Issuing Bank and the Borrower, which approval, in the case of each of such Issuing Bank and the Borrower shall not unreasonably be withheld, conditioned or delayed. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event may (i) the expiration date of any Letter of Credit extend beyond the date that is thirty (30) days prior to the Revolving Termination Date, or (ii) any Letter of Credit have an initial duration in excess of one year; provided, however, a Letter of Credit may contain a provision providing for the automatic extension of the expiration date in the absence of a notice of non-renewal from the applicable Issuing Bank but in no event shall any such provision permit the extension of the expiration date of such Letter of Credit beyond the date that is thirty (30) days prior to the Revolving Termination Date. The initial Stated Amount of each Letter of Credit shall be at least $1,000,000 (or such lesser amount as may be acceptable to the applicable Issuing Bank, the Administrative Agent and the Borrower).
(c) . The Borrower shall give the applicable Issuing Bank and the Administrative Agent written notice (or telephonic notice promptly confirmed in writing) at least five (5) Business Days prior to the requested date of issuance of a Letter of Credit, such notice to describe in reasonable detail the proposed terms of such Letter of Credit and the nature of the transactions or obligations proposed to be supported by such Letter of Credit, and in any event shall set forth with respect to such Letter of Credit the proposed (i) initial Stated Amount, (ii) beneficiary, and (iii) expiration date. The Borrower shall also execute and deliver such customary applications and agreements for standby letters of credit, and other forms as requested from time to time by the applicable Issuing Bank. Provided the Borrower has given the notice prescribed by the first sentence of this subsection and delivered such applications and agreements referred to in the preceding sentence, subject to the other terms and conditions of this Agreement, including the satisfaction of any applicable conditions precedent set forth in Article 6.2., the applicable Issuing Bank shall issue the requested Letter of Credit on the requested date of issuance for the benefit of the stipulated beneficiary but in no event prior to the date five (5) Business Days following the date after which such Issuing Bank has received all of the items required to be delivered to it under this subsection. No Issuing Bank shall at any time be obligated to issue any Letter of Credit if such issuance would conflict with, or cause such Issuing Bank or any Lender to exceed any limits imposed by, any Applicable Law. References herein to "issue" and derivations thereof with respect to Letters of Credit shall also include extensions or modifications of any outstanding Letters of Credit, which modifications increase the obligations of the applicable Issuing Bank in respect of such Letters of Credit, unless the context otherwise requires. Upon the written request of the Borrower, the applicable Issuing Bank shall deliver to the Borrower a copy of each issued Letter of Credit within a reasonable time after the date of issuance thereof. To the extent any term of a Letter of Credit Document is inconsistent with a term of any Loan Document, the term of such Loan Document shall control.
Requests for Issuance of Letters of Credit
(d) . Upon receipt by the applicable Issuing Bank from the beneficiary of a Letter of Credit of any demand for payment under such Letter of Credit, such Issuing Bank shall promptly notify the Borrower and the Administrative Agent of the amount to be paid by such Issuing Bank as a result of such demand and the date on which payment is to be made by such Issuing Bank to such beneficiary in respect of such demand; provided, however, that an Issuing Bank's failure to give, or delay in giving, such notice shall not discharge the Borrower in any respect from the applicable Reimbursement Obligation. The Borrower agrees to reimburse the applicable Issuing Bank on or prior to each date on which such Issuing Bank notifies the Borrower that a draw has been paid under a Letter of Credit in an amount equal to the amount of such draw paid. The Borrower's Reimbursement Obligations shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable and irrespective of any setoff, counterclaim or defense to payment the Borrower may have at any time against any Issuing Bank, the Administrative Agent or any Lender, any beneficiary of a Letter of Credit or any other Person. Upon receipt by the applicable Issuing Bank of any payment in respect of any Reimbursement Obligation, such Issuing Bank shall promptly pay to each Lender that has acquired a participation therein under the second sentence of the immediately following subsection (i) such Lender's Revolving Commitment Percentage of such payment.
Reimbursement Obligations
 
(e) . Upon its receipt of a notice referred to in the immediately preceding subsection (d), the Borrower shall advise the Administrative Agent and the applicable Issuing Bank whether or not the Borrower intends to borrow hereunder to finance its obligation to reimburse such Issuing Bank for the amount of the related demand for payment and, if it does, the Borrower shall submit a timely request for such borrowing as provided in the applicable provisions of this Agreement. If the Borrower fails to so advise the Administrative Agent and the applicable Issuing Bank, or if the Borrower fails to reimburse such Issuing Bank for a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit by the date of such payment, the failure of which such Issuing Bank shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent, then (i) if the applicable conditions contained in Article VI. would permit the making of Revolving Loans, the Borrower shall be deemed to have requested a borrowing of Revolving Loans (which shall be Base Rate Loans) in an amount equal to the unpaid Reimbursement Obligation and the Administrative Agent shall give each Revolving Lender prompt notice of the amount of the Revolving Loan to be made available to the Administrative Agent not later than 12:00 noon Central time and (ii) if such conditions would not permit the making of Revolving Loans, the provisions of subsection (j) of this Section shall apply. The limitations set forth in the second sentence of Section 2.1.(a) shall not apply to any borrowing of Base Rate Loans under this subsection.
Manner of Reimbursement
(f) . Upon the issuance by the applicable Issuing Bank of any Letter of Credit and until such Letter of Credit shall have expired or been cancelled, the Revolving Commitment of each Lender shall be deemed to be utilized for all purposes of this Agreement in an amount equal to the product of (i) such Lender's Revolving Commitment Percentage and (ii) the sum of (A) the Stated Amount of such Letter of Credit (B) any related Reimbursement Obligations then outstanding.
Effect of Letters of Credit on Revolving Commitments
plus
(g) . In examining documents presented in connection with drawings under Letters of Credit and making payments under such Letters of Credit against such documents, the applicable Issuing Bank shall only be required to use the same standard of care as it uses in connection with examining documents presented in connection with drawings under letters of credit in which it has not sold participations and making payments under such letters of credit. The Borrower assumes all risks of the acts and omissions of, or misuse of the Letters of Credit by, the respective beneficiaries of such Letters of Credit. In furtherance and not in limitation of the foregoing, none of the Administrative Agent, any of the Issuing Banks or any of the Lenders shall be responsible for, and the Borrower's obligations in respect of Letters of Credit shall not be affected in any manner by, (i) the form, validity, sufficiency, accuracy, genuineness or legal effects of any document submitted by any party in connection with the application for and issuance of or any drawing honored under any Letter of Credit even if such document should in fact prove to be in any or all respects invalid, insufficient, inaccurate, fraudulent or forged; (ii) the validity or sufficiency of any instrument transferring or assigning or purporting to transfer or assign any Letter of Credit, or the rights or benefits thereunder or proceeds thereof, in whole or in part, which may prove to be invalid or ineffective for any reason; (iii) failure of the beneficiary of any Letter of Credit to comply fully with conditions required in order to draw upon such Letter of Credit; (iv) errors, omissions, interruptions or delays in transmission or delivery of any messages, by mail, cable, facsimile, electronic mail, telecopy or otherwise, whether or not they be in cipher; (v) errors in interpretation of technical terms; (vi) any loss or delay in the transmission or otherwise of any document required in order to make a drawing under any Letter of Credit, or of the proceeds thereof; (vii) the misapplication by the beneficiary of any Letter of Credit, or of the proceeds of any drawing under any Letter of Credit; or (viii) any consequences arising from causes beyond the control of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks or the Lenders. None of the above shall affect, impair or prevent the vesting of any of the Issuing
Issuing Bank's Duties Regarding Letters of Credit; Unconditional Nature of Reimbursement Obligations
 
Banks' or Administrative Agent's rights or powers hereunder. Any action taken or omitted to be taken by an Issuing Bank under or in connection with any Letter of Credit, if taken or omitted in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct (as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in a final, non-appealable judgment), shall not create against such Issuing Bank any liability to the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, any other Issuing Bank or any Lender. The obligation of the Borrower to reimburse the applicable Issuing Bank for any drawing made under any Letter of Credit, and to repay any Revolving Loan made pursuant to the second sentence of the immediately preceding subsection (e), shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable and shall be paid strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement and any other applicable Letter of Credit Document under all circumstances whatsoever, including without limitation, the following circumstances: (A) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit Document or any term or provisions therein; (B) any amendment or waiver of or any consent to departure from all or any of the Letter of Credit Documents; (C) the existence of any claim, setoff, defense or other right which the Borrower may have at any time against any Issuing Bank, the Administrative Agent or any Lender, any beneficiary of a Letter of Credit or any other Person, whether in connection with this Agreement, the transactions contemplated hereby or in the Letter of Credit Documents or any unrelated transaction; (D) any breach of contract or dispute between the Borrower, any Issuing Bank, the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any other Person; (E) any demand, statement or any other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent, invalid or insufficient in any respect or any statement therein or made in connection therewith being untrue or inaccurate in any respect whatsoever; (F) any non-application or misapplication by the beneficiary of a Letter of Credit or of the proceeds of any drawing under such Letter of Credit; (G) payment by the applicable Issuing Bank under any Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or certificate which does not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit; and (H) any other act, omission to act, delay or circumstance whatsoever that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable defense to or discharge of the Borrower's Reimbursement Obligations. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Section or Section 13.10., but not in limitation of the Borrower's unconditional obligation to reimburse the applicable Issuing Bank for any drawing made under a Letter of Credit as provided in this Section and to repay any Revolving Loan made pursuant to the second sentence of the immediately preceding subsection (e), the Borrower shall have no obligation to indemnify the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender in respect of any liability incurred by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or such Lender arising solely out of the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender in respect of a Letter of Credit as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in a final, non-appealable judgment. Except as otherwise provided in this Section, nothing in this Section shall affect any rights the Borrower may have with respect to the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender with respect to any Letter of Credit.
(h) . The issuance by the applicable Issuing Bank of any amendment, supplement or other modification to any Letter of Credit shall be subject to the same conditions applicable under this Agreement to the issuance of new Letters of Credit (including, without limitation, that the request therefor be made through such Issuing Bank), and no such amendment, supplement or other modification shall be issued unless either (i) the respective Letter of Credit affected thereby would have complied with such conditions had it originally been issued hereunder in such amended, supplemented or modified form or (ii) the Administrative Agent and Requisite Lenders (or all of the Lenders if required by Section 13.7.) shall have consented thereto. In connection with any such amendment, supplement or other modification, the Borrower shall pay the fees, if any, payable under the last sentence of Section 3.5.(c).
Amendments, Etc
(i) . Immediately upon the issuance by the applicable Issuing Bank of any Letter of Credit each Lender shall be deemed to have absolutely, irrevocably and unconditionally purchased and received from such Issuing Bank, without recourse or
Lenders' Participation in Letters of Credit
 
warranty, an undivided interest and participation to the extent of such Lender's Revolving Commitment Percentage of the liability of such Issuing Bank with respect to such Letter of Credit and each Lender thereby shall absolutely, unconditionally and irrevocably assume, as primary obligor and not as surety, and shall be unconditionally obligated to such Issuing Bank to pay and discharge when due, such Lender's Revolving Commitment Percentage of such Issuing Bank's liability under such Letter of Credit. In addition, upon the making of each payment by a Lender to the Administrative Agent for the account of the applicable Issuing Bank in respect of any Letter of Credit pursuant to the immediately following subsection (j), such Lender shall, automatically and without any further action on the part of such Issuing Bank, Administrative Agent or such Lender, acquire (i) a participation in an amount equal to such payment in the Reimbursement Obligation owing to such Issuing Bank by the Borrower in respect of such Letter of Credit and (ii) a participation in a percentage equal to such Lender's Revolving Commitment Percentage in any interest or other amounts payable by the Borrower in respect of such Reimbursement Obligation (other than the Fees payable to such Issuing Bank pursuant to the second and the last sentences of Section 3.5.(c)).
(j) . Each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of such Issuing Bank, on demand in immediately available funds in Dollars the amount of such Lender's Revolving Commitment Percentage of each drawing paid by the applicable Issuing Bank under each Letter of Credit to the extent such amount is not reimbursed by the Borrower pursuant to the immediately preceding subsection (d); provided, however, that in respect of any drawing under any Letter of Credit, the maximum amount that any Lender shall be required to fund, whether as a Revolving Loan or as a participation, shall not exceed such Lender's Revolving Commitment Percentage of such drawing. If the notice referenced in the second sentence of Section 2.2.(e) is received by a Lender not later than 11:00 a.m. Central time, then such Lender shall make such payment available to the Administrative Agent not later than 2:00 p.m. Central time on the date of demand therefor; otherwise, such payment shall be made available to the Administrative Agent not later than 1:00 p.m. Central time on the next succeeding Business Day. Each Lender's obligation to make such payments to the Administrative Agent under this subsection, and the Administrative Agent's right to receive the same for the account of any Issuing Bank, shall be absolute, irrevocable and unconditional and shall not be affected in any way by any circumstance whatsoever, including without limitation, (i) the failure of any other Lender to make its payment under this subsection, (ii) the financial condition of the Borrower or any other Loan Party, (iii) the existence of any Default or Event of Default, including any Event of Default described in Section 11.1.(e) or (f) or (iv) the termination of the Revolving Commitments. Each such payment to the Administrative Agent for the account of any Issuing Bank shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or deduction whatsoever.
Payment Obligation of Lenders
(k) . Promptly following any change in Letters of Credit outstanding, the applicable Issuing Bank shall deliver to the Administrative Agent, who shall promptly deliver the same to each Lender and the Borrower, a notice describing the aggregate amount of all Letters of Credit outstanding at such time. Upon the request of any Lender from time to time, the applicable Issuing Bank shall deliver any other information reasonably requested by such Lender with respect to each Letter of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank then outstanding. Other than as set forth in this subsection, no Issuing Bank shall have any duty to notify the Lenders regarding the issuance or other matters regarding Letters of Credit issued hereunder. The failure of any Issuing Bank to perform its requirements under this subsection shall not relieve any Lender from its obligations under the immediately preceding subsection (j).
Information to Lenders
 
(a) . Subject to the terms and conditions hereof, including without limitation Section 2.14., the Swingline Lender agrees to make Swingline Loans to the Borrower, during
Swingline Loans
 
the period from the Effective Date to but excluding the Swingline Maturity Date, in an aggregate principal amount at any one time outstanding up to, but not exceeding, $30,000,000, as such amount may be reduced from time to time in accordance with the terms hereof. If at any time the aggregate principal amount of the Swingline Loans outstanding at such time exceeds the Swingline Commitment in effect at such time, the Borrower shall immediately pay the Administrative Agent for the account of the Swingline Lender the amount of such excess. Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Borrower may borrow, repay and reborrow Swingline Loans hereunder. The borrowing of a Swingline Loan shall not constitute usage of any Lender's Revolving Commitment for purposes of calculation of the fee payable under Section 3.5.(b).
(b) . The Borrower shall give the Administrative Agent and the Swingline Lender notice pursuant to a Notice of Swingline Borrowing or telephonic notice of each borrowing of a Swingline Loan. Each Notice of Swingline Borrowing shall be delivered to the Swingline Lender no later than 11:00 a.m. Central time on the proposed date of such borrowing. Any telephonic notice shall include all information to be specified in a written Notice of Swingline Borrowing and shall be promptly confirmed in writing by the Borrower pursuant to a Notice of Swingline Borrowing sent to the Swingline Lender by telecopy on the same day of the giving of such telephonic notice. Not later than 1:00 p.m. Central time on the date of the requested Swingline Loan and subject to satisfaction of the applicable conditions set forth in Article 6.2. for such borrowing, the Swingline Lender will make the proceeds of such Swingline Loan available to the Borrower in Dollars, in immediately available funds, at the account specified by the Borrower in the Notice of Swingline Borrowing.
Procedure for Borrowing Swingline Loans
(c) . Swingline Loans shall bear interest at a per annum rate equal to the Base Rate as in effect from time to time the Applicable Margin or at such other rate or rates as the Borrower and the Swingline Lender may agree from time to time in writing. Interest on Swingline Loans is solely for the account of the Swingline Lender (except to the extent a Revolving Lender acquires a participating interest in a Swingline Loan pursuant to the immediately following subsection (e)). All accrued and unpaid interest on Swingline Loans shall be payable on the dates and in the manner provided in Section 2.2. with respect to interest on Base Rate Loans (except as the Swingline Lender and the Borrower may otherwise agree in writing in connection with any particular Swingline Loan).
Interest
plus
(d) . Each Swingline Loan shall be in the minimum amount of $1,000,000 and integral multiples of $100,000 in excess thereof, or such other minimum amounts agreed to by the Swingline Lender and the Borrower. Any voluntary prepayment of a Swingline Loan must be in integral multiples of $100,000 or the aggregate principal amount of all outstanding Swingline Loans (or such other minimum amounts upon which the Swingline Lender and the Borrower may agree) and in connection with any such prepayment, the Borrower must give the Swingline Lender and the Administrative Agent prior written notice thereof no later than 12:00 noon Central time on the day prior to the date of such prepayment. The Swingline Loans shall, in addition to this Agreement, be evidenced by the Swingline Note.
Swingline Loan Amounts, Etc
(e) . The Borrower agrees to repay each Swingline Loan within one Business Day of demand therefor by the Swingline Lender and, in any event, within five (5) Business Days after the date such Swingline Loan was made; provided, that the proceeds of a Swingline Loan may not be used to pay a Swingline Loan. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Borrower shall repay the entire outstanding principal amount of, and all accrued but unpaid interest on, the Swingline Loans on the Swingline Maturity Date (or such earlier date as the Swingline Lender and the Borrower may agree in writing). In lieu of demanding repayment of any outstanding Swingline Loan from the Borrower, the Swingline Lender may, on behalf of the Borrower (which hereby irrevocably directs the Swingline Lender to act on its behalf), request a borrowing of Revolving Loans that are Base Rate Loans from the Lenders in an amount equal to the principal balance of such Swingline Loan. The
Repayment and Participations of Swingline Loans
 
amount limitations contained in the second sentence of Section 2.1.(a) shall not apply to any borrowing of such Revolving Loans made pursuant to this subsection. The Swingline Lender shall give notice to the Administrative Agent of any such borrowing of Revolving Loans not later than 11:00 a.m. Central time at least one Business Day prior to the proposed date of such borrowing. Promptly after receipt of such notice of borrowing of Revolving Loans from the Swingline Lender under the immediately preceding sentence, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the proposed borrowing. Not later than 11:00 a.m. Central time on the proposed date of such borrowing, each Lender will make available to the Administrative Agent at the Principal Office for the account of the Swingline Lender, in immediately available funds, the proceeds of the Revolving Loan to be made by such Lender. The Administrative Agent shall pay the proceeds of such Revolving Loans to the Swingline Lender, which shall apply such proceeds to repay such Swingline Loan. If the Revolving Lenders are prohibited from making Revolving Loans required to be made under this subsection for any reason whatsoever, including without limitation, the occurrence of any of the Defaults or Events of Default described in Sections 11.1.(e) or (f)), each Revolving Lender shall purchase from the Swingline Lender, without recourse or warranty, an undivided interest and participation to the extent of such Lender's Revolving Commitment Percentage of such Swingline Loan, by directly purchasing a participation in such Swingline Loan in such amount and paying the proceeds thereof to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Swingline Lender in Dollars and in immediately available funds. A Lender's obligation to purchase such a participation in a Swingline Loan shall be absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including without limitation, (i) any claim of setoff, counterclaim, recoupment, defense or other right which such Lender or any other Person may have or claim against the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender or any other Person whatsoever, (ii) the occurrence or continuation of a Default or Event of Default (including without limitation, any of the Defaults or Events of Default described in Sections 11.1. (e) or (f)), or the termination of any Lender's Revolving Commitment, (iii) the existence (or alleged existence) of an event or condition which has had or could have a Material Adverse Effect, (iv) any breach of any Loan Document by the Administrative Agent, any Lender, the Borrower or any other Loan Party, or (v) any other circumstance, happening or event whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing. If such amount is not in fact made available to the Swingline Lender by any Lender, the Swingline Lender shall be entitled to recover such amount on demand from such Lender, together with accrued interest thereon for each day from the date of demand thereof, at the Federal Funds Rate. If such Lender does not pay such amount forthwith upon the Swingline Lender's demand therefor, and until such time as such Lender makes the required payment, the Swingline Lender shall be deemed to continue to have outstanding Swingline Loans in the amount of such unpaid participation obligation for all purposes of the Loan Documents (other than those provisions requiring the other Lenders to purchase a participation therein). Further, such Lender shall be deemed to have assigned any and all payments made of principal and interest on its Revolving Loans, and any other amounts due it hereunder, to the Swingline Lender to fund Swingline Loans in the amount of the participation in Swingline Loans that such Lender failed to purchase pursuant to this Section until such amount has been purchased (as a result of such assignment or otherwise).
 
(a) . The Borrower promises to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender interest on the unpaid principal amount of each Loan made by such Lender for the period from and including the date of the making of such Loan to but excluding the date such Loan shall be paid in full, at the following per annum rates:
Rates
(i) during such periods as such Loan is a Base Rate Loan, at the Base Rate (as in effect from time to time), the Applicable Margin; and
plus
 
(ii) during such periods as such Loan is a LIBOR Loan, at LIBOR for such Loan for the Interest Period therefor, the Applicable Margin.
plus
Notwithstanding the foregoing, while an Event of Default exists, the Borrower shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender and each Issuing Bank, as the case may be, interest at the Post-Default Rate on the outstanding principal amount of any Loan made by such Lender, on all Reimbursement Obligations and on any other amount payable by the Borrower hereunder or under the Notes held by such Lender to or for the account of such Lender (including without limitation, accrued but unpaid interest to the extent permitted under Applicable Law).
(b) . All accrued and unpaid interest on the outstanding principal amount of each Loan shall be payable (i) monthly in arrears on the first day of each month, commencing with the first full calendar month occurring after the Effective Date and (ii) on any date on which the principal balance of such Loan is due and payable in full (whether at maturity, due to acceleration or otherwise). Interest payable at the Post-Default Rate shall be payable from time to time on demand. All determinations by the Administrative Agent of an interest rate hereunder shall be conclusive and binding on the Lenders and the Borrower for all purposes, absent manifest error.
Payment of Interest
(c) . The parties understand that the applicable interest rate for the Obligations and certain fees set forth herein may be determined and/or adjusted from time to time based upon certain financial ratios and/or other information to be provided or certified to the Lenders by the Borrower or the Parent on behalf of the Borrower (the ""). If it is subsequently determined that any such Borrower Information was incorrect (for whatever reason, including without limitation because of a subsequent restatement of earnings by the Borrower) at the time it was delivered to the Administrative Agent, and if the applicable interest rate or fees calculated for any period were lower than they should have been had the correct information been timely provided, then, such interest rate and such fees for such period shall be automatically recalculated using correct Borrower Information. The Administrative Agent shall promptly notify the Borrower in writing of any additional interest and fees due because of such recalculation, and the Borrower shall pay such additional interest or fees due to the Administrative Agent, for the account of each Lender, within five (5) Business Days of receipt of such written notice. Any recalculation of interest or fees required by this provision shall survive the termination of this Agreement, and this provision shall not in any way limit any of the Administrative Agent's, any Issuing Bank's, or any Lender's other rights under this Agreement.
Borrower Information Used to Determine Applicable Interest Rates
Borrower Information
 
There may be no more than five (5) different Interest Periods for LIBOR Loans outstanding at the same time.
 
The Borrower shall repay the entire outstanding principal amount of, and all accrued but unpaid interest on, the Revolving Loans on the Revolving Termination Date.
 
(a) . Subject to Section 5.4., the Borrower may prepay any Loan at any time without premium or penalty. The Borrower shall give the Administrative Agent at least two (2) Business Day prior written notice of the prepayment of any Loan. Each voluntary prepayment of Loans shall be in an aggregate minimum amount of $1,000,000 and integral multiples of $100,000 in excess thereof or, if less, the aggregate principal amount of Revolving Loans outstanding.
Optional
 
(b) Mandatory.
(i) . If at any time the aggregate principal amount of all outstanding Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans, together with the aggregate amount of all Letter of Credit Liabilities, exceeds the aggregate amount of the Revolving Commitments, the Borrower shall immediately upon demand pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders then holding Revolving Commitments (or if the Revolving Commitments have been terminated, then holding outstanding Revolving Loans, Swingline Loans and/or Letter of Credit Liabilities), the amount of such excess.
Revolving Commitment Overadvance
(ii) . Amounts paid under the preceding subsection (b)(i) shall be applied to pay all amounts of principal outstanding on the Loans and any Reimbursement Obligations pro rata in accordance with Section 3.2. and if any Letters of Credit are outstanding at such time, the remainder, if any, shall be deposited into the Letter of Credit Collateral Account for application to any Reimbursement Obligations. If the Borrower is required to pay any outstanding LIBOR Loans by reason of this Section prior to the end of the applicable Interest Period therefor, the Borrower shall pay all amounts due under Section 5.4.
Application of Mandatory Prepayments
 
So long as no Default or Event of Default exists, the Borrower may on any Business Day, with respect to any LIBOR Loan, elect to maintain such LIBOR Loan or any portion thereof as a LIBOR Loan by selecting a new Interest Period for such LIBOR Loan. Each Continuation of a LIBOR Loan shall be in an aggregate minimum amount of $1,000,000 and integral multiples of $100,000 in excess of that amount, and each new Interest Period selected under this Section shall commence on the last day of the immediately preceding Interest Period. Each selection of a new Interest Period shall be made by the Borrower giving to the Administrative Agent a Notice of Continuation not later than 11:00 a.m. Central time on the third Business Day prior to the date of any such Continuation. Such notice by the Borrower of a Continuation shall be by telephone, promptly confirmed in writing, or by telecopy, electronic mail or other similar form of communication in the form of a Notice of Continuation, specifying (a) the proposed date of such Continuation, (b) the LIBOR Loans and portions thereof subject to such Continuation and (c) the duration of the selected Interest Period, all of which shall be specified in such manner as is necessary to comply with all limitations on Loans outstanding hereunder. Each Notice of Continuation shall be irrevocable by and binding on the Borrower once given. Promptly after receipt of a Notice of Continuation, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the proposed Continuation. If the Borrower shall fail to select in a timely manner a new Interest Period for any LIBOR Loan in accordance with this Section, such Loan will automatically, on the last day of the current Interest Period therefor, continue as a LIBOR Loan with an Interest Period of one month; provided, however that if a Default or Event of Default exists, such Loan will automatically, on the last day of the current Interest Period therefor, Convert into a Base Rate Loan notwithstanding the first sentence of Section 2.9. or the Borrower's failure to comply with any of the terms of such Section.
 
The Borrower may on any Business Day, upon the Borrower's giving of a Notice of Conversion to the Administrative Agent by telecopy, electronic mail or other similar form of communication, Convert all or a portion of a Loan of one Type into a Loan of another Type; provided, however, a Base Rate Loan
 
may not be Converted into a LIBOR Loan if a Default or Event of Default exists. Each Conversion of Base Rate Loans into LIBOR Loans shall be in an aggregate minimum amount of $1,000,000 and integral multiples of $100,000 in excess of that amount. Each such Notice of Conversion shall be given not later than 11:00 a.m. Central time three (3) Business Days prior to the date of any proposed Conversion. Promptly after receipt of a Notice of Conversion, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the proposed Conversion. Subject to the restrictions specified above, each Notice of Conversion shall be by telephone promptly confirmed in writing, or by telecopy, electronic mail or other similar form of communication in the form of a Notice of Conversion specifying (a) the requested date of such Conversion, (b) the Type of Loan to be Converted, (c) the portion of such Type of Loan to be Converted, (d) the Type of Loan such Loan is to be Converted into and (e) if such Conversion is into a LIBOR Loan, the requested duration of the Interest Period of such Loan. Each Notice of Conversion shall be irrevocable by and binding on the Borrower once given.
 
(a) . The Revolving Loans made by each Revolving Lender shall, in addition to this Agreement, also be evidenced by a Revolving Note, payable to the order of such Revolving Lender in a principal amount equal to the amount of its Revolving Commitment as originally in effect and otherwise duly completed. The Swingline Loans made by the Swingline Lender to the Borrower shall, in addition to this Agreement, also be evidenced by a Swingline Note payable to the order of the Swingline Lender.
Notes
(b) . The date, amount, interest rate, Type and duration of Interest Periods (if applicable) of each Loan made by each Lender to the Borrower, and each payment made on account of the principal thereof, shall be recorded by such Lender on its books and such entries shall be binding on the Borrower absent manifest error; provided, however, that (i) the failure of a Lender to make any such record shall not affect the obligations of the Borrower under any of the Loan Documents and (ii) if there is a discrepancy between such records of a Lender and the statements of accounts maintained by the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 3.8., in the absence of manifest error, the statements of account maintained by the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 3.8. shall be controlling.
Records
(c) . Upon receipt by the Borrower of (i) written notice from a Lender that a Note of such Lender has been lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated, and (ii)(A) in the case of loss, theft or destruction, an unsecured agreement of indemnity from such Lender in form reasonably satisfactory to the Borrower, or (B) in the case of mutilation, upon surrender and cancellation of such Note, the Borrower shall at its own expense execute and deliver to such Lender a new Note dated the date of such lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated Note.
Lost, Stolen, Destroyed or Mutilated Notes
 
The Borrower shall have the right to terminate or reduce the aggregate unused amount of the Revolving Commitments (for which purpose use of the Revolving Commitments shall be deemed to include the aggregate amount of all Letter of Credit Liabilities and the aggregate principal amount of all outstanding Swingline Loans) at any time and from time to time without penalty or premium upon not less than five (5) Business Days prior written notice to the Administrative Agent of each such termination or reduction, which notice shall specify the effective date thereof and the amount of any such reduction (which in the case of any partial reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall not be less than $10,000,000 and integral multiples of $5,000,000 in excess of that amount in the aggregate) and shall be irrevocable once given and effective only upon receipt by the Administrative Agent (""); provided, however, the Borrower may not reduce the aggregate amount of the Revolving Commitments below $50,000,000 unless the Borrower is terminating the Revolving Commitments in full. Promptly after receipt of a Commitment Reduction Notice the Administrative
Commitment Reduction Notice
 
Agent shall notify each Lender of the proposed termination or Revolving Commitment reduction. The Revolving Commitments, once reduced or terminated pursuant to this Section, may not be increased or reinstated. Upon the effective date of such reduction or termination, the Borrower shall pay all interest and fees on the Revolving Loans accrued to the date of such reduction or termination of the Revolving Commitments to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Revolving Lenders, including but not limited to any applicable compensation due to each Revolving Lender in accordance with Section 5.4.
 
The Borrower shall have the right, exercisable one time, to extend the Revolving Termination Date by one year. The Borrower may exercise such right only by executing and delivering to the Administrative Agent at least thirty (30) days but not more than one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the current Revolving Termination Date, a written request for such extension (an ""). The Administrative Agent shall notify the Revolving Lenders if it receives an Extension Request promptly upon receipt thereof. Subject to satisfaction of the following conditions, the Revolving Termination Date shall be extended for one year effective upon receipt by the Administrative Agent of the Extension Request and payment of the fee referred to in the following clause (y): (x) immediately prior to such extension and immediately after giving effect thereto, (A) no Default or Event of Default shall exist and (B) the representations and warranties made or deemed made by the Borrower and each other Loan Party in the Loan Documents to which any of them is a party, shall be true and correct in all material respects on and as of the date of such extension with the same force and effect as if made on and as of such date except to the extent that such representations and warranties expressly relate solely to an earlier date (in which case such representations and warranties shall have been true and correct in all material respects on and as of such earlier date) and except for changes in factual circumstances not expressly prohibited under the Loan Documents and (y) the Borrower shall have paid the Fees payable under Section 3.5.(d). At any time prior to the effectiveness of any such extension, upon the Administrative Agent's request, the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent a certificate from the chief executive officer or chief financial officer certifying the matters referred to in the immediately preceding clauses (x)(A) and (x)(B).
Extension Request
 
If on the date the Revolving Commitments are terminated or reduced to zero (whether voluntarily, by reason of the occurrence of an Event of Default or otherwise), there are any Letters of Credit outstanding hereunder, the Borrower shall, on such date, pay to the Administrative Agent, for its benefit and the benefit of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, an amount of money sufficient to cause the balance of available funds on deposit in the Letter of Credit Collateral Account to equal the aggregate Stated Amount of such Letters of Credit for deposit into the Letter of Credit Collateral Account.
 
Notwithstanding any other term of this Agreement or any other Loan Document, no Lender shall be required to make a Loan, no Issuing Bank shall not be required to issue a Letter of Credit and no reduction of the Revolving Commitments pursuant to Section 2.11. shall take effect, if (a) immediately after the making of such Loan, the issuance of such Letter of Credit or such reduction in the Revolving Commitments, or (b) the aggregate principal amount of all outstanding Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans, together with the aggregate amount of all Letter of Credit Liabilities, would exceed the aggregate amount of the Revolving Commitments at such time.
 
(a) . The Borrower hereby authorizes the Administrative Agent to disburse the proceeds of any Loan made by the Lenders or any of their Affiliates pursuant to the Loan Documents as requested by an authorized representative of the Borrower to any of the accounts designated in the Transfer Authorizer Designation Form. The Borrower agrees to be bound by any transfer request: (i) authorized or transmitted by the Borrower; or (ii) made in the Borrower's name and accepted by the Administrative Agent in good faith and in compliance with these transfer instructions, even if not properly authorized by the Borrower. The Borrower further agrees and acknowledges that the Administrative Agent may rely solely on any bank routing number or identifying bank account number or name provided by the Borrower to effect a wire or funds transfer even if the information provided by the Borrower identifies a different bank or account holder than named by the Borrower. The Administrative Agent is not obligated or required in any way to take any actions to detect errors in information provided by the Borrower. If the Administrative Agent takes any actions in an attempt to detect errors in the transmission or content of transfer requests or takes any actions in an attempt to detect unauthorized funds transfer requests, the Borrower agrees that no matter how many times the Administrative Agent takes these actions the Administrative Agent will not in any situation be liable for failing to take or correctly perform these actions in the future and such actions shall not become any part of the transfer disbursement procedures authorized under this provision, the Loan Documents, or any agreement between the Administrative Agent and the Borrower. The Borrower agrees to notify the Administrative Agent of any errors in the transfer of any funds or of any unauthorized or improperly authorized transfer requests within fourteen (14) days after the Administrative Agent's confirmation to the Borrower of such transfer.
Generally
(b) . The Administrative Agent will, in its sole discretion, determine the funds transfer system and the means by which each transfer will be made. The Administrative Agent may delay or refuse to accept a funds transfer request if the transfer would: (i) violate the terms of this authorization, (ii) require use of a bank unacceptable to the Administrative Agent or any Lender or prohibited by any Governmental Authority, (iii) cause the Administrative Agent or any Lender to violate any Federal Reserve or other regulatory risk control program or guideline or (iv) otherwise cause the Administrative Agent or any Lender to violate any Applicable Law or regulation.
Funds Transfer
(c) . None of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender shall be liable to the Borrower or any other parties for (i) errors, acts or failures to act of others, including other entities, banks, communications carriers or clearinghouses, through which the Borrower's transfers may be made or information received or transmitted, and no such entity shall be deemed an agent of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, (ii) any loss, liability or delay caused by fires, earthquakes, wars, civil disturbances, power surges or failures, acts of government, labor disputes, failures in communications networks, legal constraints or other events beyond the Administrative Agent's, any Issuing Bank's or any Lender's control, or (iii) any special, consequential, indirect or punitive damages, whether or not (x) any claim for these damages is based on tort or contract or (y) the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender or the Borrower knew or should have known the likelihood of these damages in any situation. Neither the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank nor any Lender makes any representations or warranties other than those expressly made in this Agreement.
Limitation of Liability
 
(a) . Except to the extent otherwise provided herein, all payments of principal, interest, Fees and other amounts to be made by the Borrower under this Agreement, the Notes
Payments by Borrower
 
or any other Loan Document shall be made in Dollars, in immediately available funds, without setoff, deduction or counterclaim, to the Administrative Agent at the Principal Office, not later than 1:00 p.m. Central time on the date on which such payment shall become due (each such payment made after such time on such due date to be deemed to have been made on the next succeeding Business Day). Subject to Section 11.5., the Borrower shall, at the time of making each payment under this Agreement or any other Loan Document, specify to the Administrative Agent the amounts payable by the Borrower hereunder to which such payment is to be applied. Each payment received by the Administrative Agent for the account of a Lender under this Agreement or any Note shall be paid to such Lender by wire transfer of immediately available funds in accordance with the wiring instructions provided by such Lender to the Administrative Agent from time to time, for the account of such Lender at the applicable Lending Office of such Lender. Each payment received by the Administrative Agent for the account of any Issuing Bank under this Agreement shall be paid to such Issuing Bank by wire transfer of immediately available funds in accordance with the wiring instructions provided by such Issuing Bank to the Administrative Agent from time to time, for the account of such Issuing Bank. In the event the Administrative Agent fails to pay such amounts to such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, within one Business Day of receipt of such amounts, the Administrative Agent shall pay interest on such amount until paid at a rate per annum equal to the Federal Funds Rate from time to time in effect. If the due date of any payment under this Agreement or any other Loan Document would otherwise fall on a day which is not a Business Day such date shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day and interest shall continue to accrue at the rate, if any, applicable to such payment for the period of such extension.
(b) . Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders or any Issuing Bank hereunder that the Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may (but shall not be obligated to), in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders or any such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount due. In such event, if the Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders or each such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent on demand that amount so distributed to such Lender or such Issuing Bank, with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
Presumptions Regarding Payments by Borrower
 
Except to the extent otherwise provided herein: (a) each borrowing from the Revolving Lenders under Sections 2.1.(a), 2.2.(e) and 2.3.(e) shall be made from the Revolving Lenders, each payment of the fees under Sections 3.5.(a), 3.5.(b), the first sentence of 3.5.(c), and 3.5.(d) shall be made for the account of the Revolving Lenders, and each termination or reduction of the amount of the Revolving Commitments under Section 2.11. shall be applied to the respective Revolving Commitments of the Revolving Lenders, pro rata according to the amounts of their respective Revolving Commitments; (b) each payment or prepayment of principal of Revolving Loans shall be made for the account of the Revolving Lenders pro rata in accordance with the respective unpaid principal amounts of the Revolving Loans held by them, provided that, subject to Section 3.9., if immediately prior to giving effect to any such payment in respect of any Revolving Loans the outstanding principal amount of the Revolving Loans shall not be held by the Revolving Lenders pro rata in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitments in effect at the time such Revolving Loans were made, then such payment shall be applied to the Revolving Loans in such manner as shall result, as nearly as is practicable, in the outstanding principal amount of the Revolving Loans being held by the Revolving Lenders pro rata in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitments; (c) each payment of interest on Revolving Loans shall be
 
made for the account of the Revolving Lenders pro rata in accordance with the amounts of interest on such Revolving Loans then due and payable to the respective Lenders; (d) the making, Conversion and Continuation of Revolving Loans of a particular Type (other than Conversions provided for by Sections 5.1.(c) and 5.5.) shall be made pro rata among the Revolving Lenders according to the amounts of their respective Revolving Loans and the then current Interest Period for each Lender's portion of each such Loan of such Type shall be coterminous; (e) the Revolving Lenders' participation in, and payment obligations in respect of, Swingline Loans under Section 2.3., shall be in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitment Percentages; and (f) the Revolving Lenders' participation in, and payment obligations in respect of, Letters of Credit under Section 2.2., shall be in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitment Percentages. All payments of principal, interest, fees and other amounts in respect of the Swingline Loans shall be for the account of the Swingline Lender only (except to the extent any Lender shall have acquired a participating interest in any such Swingline Loan pursuant to Section 2.3.(e), in which case such payments shall be pro rata in accordance with such participating interests).
 
If a Lender shall obtain payment of any principal of, or interest on, any Loan made by it to the Borrower under this Agreement or shall obtain payment on any other Obligation owing by the Borrower or any other Loan Party through the exercise of any right of set-off, banker's lien, counterclaim or similar right or otherwise or through voluntary prepayments directly to a Lender or other payments made by or on behalf the Borrower or any other Loan Party to a Lender (other than any payment in respect of Specified Derivatives Obligations) not in accordance with the terms of this Agreement and such payment should be distributed to the Lenders in accordance with Section 3.2. or Section 11.5., as applicable, such Lender shall promptly purchase from the other Lenders participations in (or, if and to the extent specified by such Lender, direct interests in) the Loans made by the other Lenders or other Obligations owed to such other Lenders in such amounts, and make such other adjustments from time to time as shall be equitable, to the end that all the Lenders shall share the benefit of such payment (net of any reasonable expenses which may actually be incurred by such Lender in obtaining or preserving such benefit) in accordance with the requirements of Section 3.2. or Section 11.5., as applicable. To such end, all the Lenders shall make appropriate adjustments among themselves (by the resale of participations sold or otherwise) if such payment is rescinded or must otherwise be restored. The Borrower agrees that any Lender so purchasing a participation (or direct interest) in the Loans or other Obligations owed to such other Lenders may exercise all rights of set-off, banker's lien, counterclaim or similar rights with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct holder of Loans in the amount of such participation. Nothing contained herein shall require any Lender to exercise any such right or shall affect the right of any Lender to exercise and retain the benefits of exercising, any such right with respect to any other indebtedness or obligation of the Borrower.
 
No Lender shall be responsible for the failure of any other Lender to make a Loan or to perform any other obligation to be made or performed by such other Lender hereunder, and the failure of any Lender to make a Loan or to perform any other obligation to be made or performed by it hereunder shall not relieve the obligation of any other Lender to make any Loan or to perform any other obligation to be made or performed by such other Lender.
 
(a) . On the Effective Date, the Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent and each Lender all loan fees as have been agreed to in writing by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent.
Closing Fee
(b) . During the period from the Effective Date to but excluding the Revolving Termination Date, the Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Revolving Lenders an unused facility fee equal to the sum of the daily amount by which the aggregate amount of the Revolving Commitments exceeds the aggregate outstanding principal balance of Revolving Loans and Letter of Credit Liabilities multiplied by the Unused Fee Rate. Such fee shall be computed on a daily basis and payable quarterly in arrears on the first day of each January, April, July and October during the term of this Agreement and on the Revolving Termination Date or any earlier date of termination of the Revolving Commitments or reduction of the Revolving Commitments to zero. For the avoidance of doubt, for purposes of calculating an unused facility fee, the outstanding principal balance of Swingline Loans shall not be factored into the computation.
Unused Fees
(c) . The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Revolving Lender a letter of credit fee at a rate per annum equal to the Applicable Margin for LIBOR Loans times the daily average Stated Amount of each Letter of Credit for the period from and including the date of issuance of such Letter of Credit (x) to and including the date such Letter of Credit expires or is cancelled or (y) to but excluding the date such Letter of Credit is drawn in full. In addition to such fees, the Borrower shall pay to the applicable Issuing Bank solely for its own account, a fronting fee in respect of each Letter of Credit equal to one-eighth of one percent (0.125%) of the initial Stated Amount of such Letter of Credit; , , in no event shall the aggregate amount of such fee in respect of any Letter of Credit be less than $1,000. The fees provided for in this subsection shall be nonrefundable and payable, in the case of the fee provided for in the first sentence, in arrears (i) quarterly on the first day of January, April, July and October, (ii) on the Revolving Termination Date, (iii) on the date the Revolving Commitments are terminated or reduced to zero and (iv) thereafter from time to time on demand of the Administrative Agent and in the case of the fee provided for in the second sentence, at the time of issuance of such Letter of Credit. The Borrower shall pay directly to the applicable Issuing Bank from time to time on demand all commissions, charges, costs and expenses in the amounts customarily charged or incurred by such Issuing Bank from time to time in like circumstances with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any other transaction relating thereto.
Letter of Credit Fees
provided
however
(d) . If the Borrower exercises its right to extend the Revolving Termination Date in accordance with Section 2.12., the Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Revolving Lender a fee equal to two-tenths of one percent (0.20%) of the amount of such Revolving Lender's Revolving Commitment (whether or not utilized). Such fee shall be due and payable in full on the date the Administrative Agent receives the Extension Request pursuant to such Section.
Revolving Credit Extension Fee
(e) . The Borrower agrees to pay the administrative and other fees of the Administrative Agent as may be agreed to in writing from time to time by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent.
Administrative and Other Fees
 
Unless otherwise expressly set forth herein, any accrued interest on any Loan, any Fees or any other Obligations due hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and the actual number of days elapsed.
 
In no event shall the amount of interest due or payable on the Loans or other Obligations exceed the maximum rate of interest allowed by Applicable Law and, if any such payment is paid by the Borrower or any other Loan Party or received by any Lender, then such excess sum shall be credited as a payment of principal, unless the Borrower shall notify the respective Lender in writing that the Borrower elects to have such excess sum returned to it forthwith. It is the express intent of the parties hereto that the Borrower not pay and the Lenders not receive, directly or indirectly, in any manner whatsoever, interest in excess of that which may be lawfully paid by the Borrower under Applicable Law. The parties hereto hereby agree and stipulate that the only charge imposed upon the Borrower for the use of money in connection with this Agreement is and shall be the interest specifically described in Section 2.4.(a)(i) through (iv) and, with respect to Swingline Loans, in Section 2.3.(c). Notwithstanding the foregoing, the parties hereto further agree and stipulate that all agency fees, syndication fees, facility fees, closing fees, letter of credit fees, underwriting fees, default charges, late charges, funding or "breakage" charges, increased cost charges, attorneys' fees and reimbursement for costs and expenses paid by the Administrative Agent or any Lender to third parties or for damages incurred by the Administrative Agent or any Lender, in each case, in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, are charges made to compensate the Administrative Agent or any such Lender for underwriting or administrative services and costs or losses performed or incurred, and to be performed or incurred, by the Administrative Agent and the Lenders in connection with this Agreement and shall under no circumstances be deemed to be charges for the use of money. All charges other than charges for the use of money shall be fully earned and nonrefundable when due.
 
The Administrative Agent will account to the Borrower monthly with a statement of Loans, accrued interest and Fees, charges and payments made pursuant to this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, and such account rendered by the Administrative Agent shall be deemed conclusive upon the Borrower absent manifest error. The failure of the Administrative Agent to deliver such a statement of accounts shall not relieve or discharge the Borrower from any of its obligations hereunder.
 
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, if any Revolving Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then, until such time as such Revolving Lender is no longer a Defaulting Lender, to the extent permitted by Applicable Law:
(a) . Such Defaulting Lender's right to approve or disapprove any amendment, waiver or consent with respect to this Agreement shall be restricted as set forth in the definition of Requisite Lenders. The rights and remedies of the Borrower against a Defaulting Lender under this Section are in addition to any other rights and remedies Borrower may have against such Defaulting Lender under this Agreement, any of the Loan Documents, Applicable Law or otherwise.
Waivers and Amendments
(b) . Any payment of principal, interest, Fees or other amounts received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Defaulting Lender (whether voluntary or
Defaulting Lender Waterfall
 
mandatory, at maturity, pursuant to Article XI. or otherwise) or received by the Administrative Agent from a Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 3.3. shall be applied at such time or times as may be determined by the Administrative Agent as follows: , to the payment of any amounts owing by such Defaulting Lender to the Administrative Agent hereunder; , to the payment on a pro rata basis of any amounts owing by such Defaulting Lender to the Issuing Banks or the Swingline Lender hereunder; , to Cash Collateralize each Issuing Bank's Fronting Exposure with respect to such Defaulting Lender in accordance with subsection (e) below; , as the Borrower may request (so long as no Default or Event of Default exists), to the funding of any Loan in respect of which such Defaulting Lender has failed to fund its portion thereof as required by this Agreement, as determined by the Administrative Agent; , if so determined by the Administrative Agent and the Borrower, to be held in a deposit account and released pro rata in order to (x) satisfy such Defaulting Lender's potential future funding obligations with respect to Loans under this Agreement and (y) Cash Collateralize each Issuing Bank's future Fronting Exposure with respect to such Defaulting Lender with respect to future Letters of Credit issued under this Agreement, in accordance with subsection (e) below; , to the payment of any amounts owing to the Lenders, the Issuing Banks or the Swingline Lender as a result of any judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction obtained by any Lender, any Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender against such Defaulting Lender as a result of such Defaulting Lender's breach of its obligations under this Agreement; , so long as no Default or Event of Default exists, to the payment of any amounts owing to the Borrower as a result of any judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction obtained by the Borrower against such Defaulting Lender as a result of such Defaulting Lender's breach of its obligations under this Agreement; and , to such Defaulting Lender or as otherwise directed by a court of competent jurisdiction; that if (x) such payment is a payment of the principal amount of any Loans or amounts owing by such Defaulting Lender under Section 2.2.(j) in respect of Letters of Credit (such amounts ""), in respect of which such Defaulting Lender has not fully funded its appropriate share, and (y) such Loans were made or the related Letters of Credit were issued at a time when the conditions set forth in Article VI. were satisfied or waived, such payment shall be applied solely to pay the Loans of, and L/C Disbursements owed to, all Non-Defaulting Lenders on a pro rata basis prior to being applied to the payment of any Loans of, or L/C Disbursements owed to, such Defaulting Lender until such time as all Loans and funded and unfunded participations in Letter of Credit Liabilities and Swingline Loans are held by the Revolving Lenders pro rata in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitment Percentages (determined without giving effect to the immediately following subsection (d)). Any payments, prepayments or other amounts paid or payable to a Defaulting Lender that are applied (or held) to pay amounts owed by a Defaulting Lender or to post Cash Collateral pursuant to this subsection shall be deemed paid to and redirected by such Defaulting Lender, and each Lender irrevocably consents hereto.
first
second
third
fourth
fifth
sixth
seventh
eighth
provided
L/C Disbursements
(c) .
Certain Fees
(i) No Defaulting Lender shall be entitled to receive any Fee payable under Section 3.5.(b) for any period during which that Lender is a Defaulting Lender (and the Borrower shall not be required to pay any such fee that otherwise would have been required to have been paid to that Defaulting Lender).
(ii) Each Defaulting Lender shall be entitled to receive letter of credit fees payable under Section 3.5.(c) for any period during which that Lender is a Defaulting Lender only to the extent allocable to its Revolving Commitment Percentage of the stated amount of Letters of Credit for which it has provided Cash Collateral pursuant to the immediately following subsection (e).
(iii) With respect to any Fee that would have been required to be paid to any Defaulting Lender but for the immediately preceding clauses (i) or (ii), the Borrower shall
 
(x) pay to each Non-Defaulting Lender that portion of any such Fee otherwise payable to such Defaulting Lender with respect to such Defaulting Lender's participation in Letter of Credit Liabilities or Swingline Loans that has been reallocated to such Non-Defaulting Lender pursuant to the immediately following subsection (d), (y) pay to each Issuing Bank and Swingline Lender, as applicable, the amount of any such Fee otherwise payable to such Defaulting Lender to the extent allocable to such Issuing Bank's or Swingline Lender's Fronting Exposure to such Defaulting Lender, and (z) not be required to pay the remaining amount of any such Fee.
(d) . All or any part of such Defaulting Lender's participation in Letter of Credit Liabilities and Swingline Loans shall be reallocated among the Non-Defaulting Lenders in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitment Percentages (determined without regard to such Defaulting Lender's Revolving Commitment) but only to the extent that (x) the conditions set forth in Article VI. are satisfied at the time of such reallocation (and, unless the Borrower shall have otherwise notified the Administrative Agent at such time, the Borrower shall be deemed to have represented and warranted that such conditions are satisfied at such time), and (y) such reallocation does not cause the aggregate Revolving Credit Exposure of any Non-Defaulting Lender to exceed such Non-Defaulting Lender's Revolving Commitment. No reallocation hereunder shall constitute a waiver or release of any claim of any party hereunder against a Defaulting Lender arising from that Revolving Lender having become a Defaulting Lender, including any claim of a Non-Defaulting Lender as a result of such Non-Defaulting Lender's increased exposure following such reallocation.
Reallocation of Participations to Reduce Fronting Exposure
(e) .
Cash Collateral, Repayment of Swingline Loans
(i) If the reallocation described in the immediately preceding subsection (d) above cannot, or can only partially, be effected, the Borrower shall, without prejudice to any right or remedy available to it hereunder or under law, (x) first, prepay Swingline Loans in an amount equal to the Swingline Lender's Fronting Exposure and (y) second, Cash Collateralize each Issuing Bank's Fronting Exposure in accordance with the procedures set forth in this subsection.
(ii) At any time that there shall exist a Defaulting Lender, within one (1) Business Day following the written request of the Administrative Agent or the applicable Issuing Bank (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), the Borrower shall Cash Collateralize such Issuing Bank's Fronting Exposure with respect to such Defaulting Lender (determined after giving effect to the immediately preceding subsection (d) and any Cash Collateral provided by such Defaulting Lender) in an amount not less than the aggregate Fronting Exposure of such Issuing Bank with respect to Letters of Credit issued and outstanding at such time. Such cash collateralization may be provided by a borrowing of Revolving Loans if the conditions precedent thereto are met.
(iii) The Borrower, and to the extent provided by any Defaulting Lender, such Defaulting Lender, hereby grant to the Administrative Agent, for the benefit of all Issuing Banks, and agree to maintain, a first priority security interest in all such Cash Collateral as security for the Defaulting Lenders' obligation to fund participations in respect of Letter of Credit Liabilities, to be applied pursuant to the immediately following clause (iv). If at any time the Administrative Agent determines that Cash Collateral is subject to any right or claim of any Person other than the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks as herein provided, or that the total amount of such Cash Collateral is less than the aggregate Fronting Exposure of the Issuing Banks with respect to Letters of Credit issued and outstanding at such time, the
 
Borrower will, promptly upon demand by the Administrative Agent, pay or provide to the Administrative Agent additional Cash Collateral in an amount sufficient to eliminate such deficiency (after giving effect to any Cash Collateral provided by the Defaulting Lender).
(iv) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Agreement, Cash Collateral provided under this Section in respect of Letters of Credit shall be applied to the satisfaction of the Defaulting Lender's obligation to fund participations in respect of Letter of Credit Liabilities (including, as to Cash Collateral provided by a Defaulting Lender, any interest accrued on such obligation) for which the Cash Collateral was so provided, prior to any other application of such property as may otherwise be provided for herein.
(v) Cash Collateral (or the appropriate portion thereof) provided to reduce any Issuing Bank's Fronting Exposure shall no longer be required to be held as Cash Collateral pursuant to this subsection following (x) the elimination of the applicable Fronting Exposure (including by the termination of Defaulting Lender status of the applicable Revolving Lender), or (y) the determination by the Administrative Agent and such Issuing Bank that there exists excess Cash Collateral; , subject to the immediately preceding subsection (b), the Person providing Cash Collateral and such Issuing Bank may agree that Cash Collateral shall be held to support future anticipated Fronting Exposure or other obligation.
provided that
(f) . If the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender and the Issuing Banks agree in writing that a Revolving Lender is no longer a Defaulting Lender, the Administrative Agent will so notify the parties hereto, whereupon as of the effective date specified in such notice and subject to any conditions set forth therein (which may include arrangements with respect to any Cash Collateral), that Revolving Lender will, to the extent applicable, purchase at par that portion of outstanding Loans of the other Lenders or take such other actions as the Administrative Agent may determine to be necessary to cause the Loans and funded and unfunded participations in Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans to be held pro rata by the Revolving Lenders in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitment Percentages (determined without giving effect to the immediately preceding subsection (d)), whereupon such Revolving Lender will cease to be a Defaulting Lender; that no adjustments will be made retroactively with respect to Fees accrued or payments made by or on behalf of the Borrower while that Revolving Lender was a Defaulting Lender; and , , that except to the extent otherwise expressly agreed by the affected parties, no change hereunder from Defaulting Lender to Revolving Lender will constitute a waiver or release of any claim of any party hereunder arising from that Revolving Lender's having been a Defaulting Lender.
Defaulting Lender Cure
provided
provided
further
(g) . So long as any Revolving Lender is a Defaulting Lender, (i) the Swingline Lender shall not be required to fund any Swingline Loans unless it is satisfied that it will have no Fronting Exposure after giving effect to such Swingline Loan and (ii) no Issuing Bank shall be required to issue, extend, renew or increase any Letter of Credit unless it is satisfied that it will have no Fronting Exposure after giving effect thereto.
New Swingline Loans/Letters of Credit
 
(a) . All payments by the Borrower of principal of, and interest on, the Loans and all other Obligations shall be made free and clear of and without deduction for any present or future excise, stamp or other taxes, fees, duties, levies, imposts, charges, deductions, withholdings or other charges of any nature whatsoever imposed by any taxing authority, but excluding (i) franchise taxes, (ii) any taxes (other than withholding taxes) that would not be imposed but for a connection between the Administrative Agent, an Issuing Bank or a Lender and the jurisdiction imposing such taxes (other than a connection arising solely by virtue of the activities of the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or
Taxes Generally
 
such Lender pursuant to or in respect of this Agreement or any other Loan Document), (iii) any taxes imposed on or measured by any Issuing Bank's or any Lender's net income or branch profits, (iv) any taxes arising after the Agreement Date solely as a result of or attributable to a Lender changing its designated Lending Office after the date such Lender becomes a party hereto, and (v) any taxes imposed by Sections 1471 through Section 1474 of the Internal Revenue Code (including any official interpretations thereof, collectively "") on any "withholdable payment" payable to such recipient as a result of the failure of such recipient to satisfy the applicable requirements as set forth in FATCA after December 31, 2012 (such non-excluded items being collectively called ""). If any withholding or deduction from any payment to be made by the Borrower hereunder is required in respect of any Taxes pursuant to any Applicable Law, then the Borrower will:
FATCA
Taxes
(i) pay directly to the relevant Governmental Authority the full amount required to be so withheld or deducted;
(ii) promptly forward to the Administrative Agent an official receipt or other documentation satisfactory to the Administrative Agent evidencing such payment to such Governmental Authority; and
(iii) pay to the Administrative Agent for its account or the account of the applicable Lender or the applicable Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as is necessary to ensure that the net amount actually received by the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender will equal the full amount that the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender would have received had no such withholding or deduction been required.
(b) . If the Borrower fails to pay any Taxes when due to the appropriate Governmental Authority or fails to remit to the Administrative Agent, for its account or the account of respective Issuing Bank or respective Lender, as the case may be, the required receipts or other required documentary evidence, the Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders for any incremental Taxes, interest or penalties that may become payable by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender as a result of any such failure. For purposes of this Section, a distribution hereunder by the Administrative Agent or any Lender to or for the account of any Lender shall be deemed a payment by the Borrower.
Tax Indemnification
(c) . Prior to the date that any Lender or Participant organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is a resident for tax purposes becomes a party hereto, such Person shall deliver to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent such certificates, documents or other evidence, as required by the Internal Revenue Code or Treasury Regulations issued pursuant thereto (including Internal Revenue Service Forms W-8ECI and W-8BEN, as applicable, or appropriate successor forms), properly completed, currently effective and duly executed by such Lender or Participant establishing that payments to it hereunder and under the Notes are (i) not subject to United States Federal backup withholding tax and (ii) not subject to United States Federal withholding tax under the Internal Revenue Code. Each such Lender or Participant shall, to the extent it may lawfully do so, (x) deliver further copies of such forms or other appropriate certifications on or before the date that any such forms expire or become obsolete and after the occurrence of any event requiring a change in the most recent form delivered to the Borrower or the Administrative Agent and (y) obtain such extensions of the time for filing, and renew such forms and certifications thereof, as may be reasonably requested by the Borrower or the Administrative Agent. The Borrower shall not be required to pay any amount pursuant to the last sentence of subsection (a) above to any Lender or Participant that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is a resident for tax purposes or the Administrative Agent, if it is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is a resident
Tax Forms
 
for tax purposes, if such Lender, such Participant or the Administrative Agent, as applicable, fails to comply with the requirements of this subsection. If any such Lender or Participant, to the extent it may lawfully do so, fails to deliver the above forms or other documentation, then the Administrative Agent may withhold from such payment to such Lender such amounts as are required by the Internal Revenue Code. If any Governmental Authority asserts that the Administrative Agent did not properly withhold or backup withhold, as the case may be, any tax or other amount from payments made to or for the account of any Lender, such Lender shall indemnify the Administrative Agent therefor (but only to the extent that the Borrower or any Loan Party has not already indemnified the Administrative Agent for such taxes and without limiting the obligation of the Borrower or the Loan Parties to do so), including all penalties and interest, any taxes imposed by any jurisdiction on the amounts payable to the Administrative Agent under this Section, and reasonable costs and expenses (including all reasonable fees and disbursements of any law firm or other external counsel and the allocated cost of internal legal services and all disbursements of internal counsel) of the Administrative Agent. The obligation of the Lenders under this Section shall survive the termination of the Commitments, repayment of all Obligations and the resignation or replacement of the Administrative Agent.
(d) . In order for the Administrative Agent to comply with the USA Patriot Act of 2001 (Public Law 107-56), prior to any Lender or Participant that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction outside of the United States of America becoming a party hereto, the Administrative Agent may request, and such Lender or Participant shall provide to the Administrative Agent, its name, address, tax identification number and/or such other identification information as shall be necessary for the Administrative Agent to comply with federal law.
USA Patriot Act Notice; Compliance
(e) . If any party determines, in its sole discretion exercised in good faith, that it has received a refund of any Taxes as to which it has been indemnified pursuant to this Section 3.10. (including by the payment of additional amounts pursuant to this Section 3.10.), it shall pay to the indemnifying party an amount equal to such refund (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made under this Section 3.10. with respect to the Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses (including Taxes) of such indemnified party and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund). Such indemnifying party, upon the request of such indemnified party, shall repay to such indemnified party the amount paid over pursuant to this paragraph (e) (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) in the event that such indemnified party is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this paragraph (e) in no event will the indemnified party be required to pay any amount to an indemnifying party pursuant to this paragraph (e) the payment of which would place the indemnified party in a less favorable net after-Tax position than the indemnified party would have been in if the indemnification payments or additional amounts giving rise to such refund had never been paid. This paragraph shall not be construed to require any indemnified party to make available its Tax returns (or any other information relating to its Taxes that it deems confidential) to the indemnifying party or any other Person.
Treatment of Certain Refunds
 
(a) . If any Lender or any Participant determines that compliance with any law or regulation or with any guideline or request from any central bank or other Governmental Authority (whether or not having the force of law) affects or would affect the amount of capital required or expected
Capital Adequacy
 
to be maintained by such Lender or such Participant, or any corporation controlling such Lender or such Participant, as a consequence of, or with reference to, such Lender's Commitments or its making or maintaining Loans or participating in Letters of Credit below the rate which such Lender or such Participant or such corporation controlling such Lender or such Participant could have achieved but for such compliance (taking into account the policies of such Lender or such Participant or such corporation with regard to capital), then the Borrower shall, from time to time, within thirty (30) days after written demand by such Lender or such Participant, pay to such Lender or such Participant additional amounts sufficient to compensate such Lender or such Participant or such corporation controlling such Lender or such Participant to the extent that such Lender or such Participant determines such increase in capital is allocable to such Lender's or such Participant's obligations hereunder.
(b) In addition to, and not in limitation of the immediately preceding subsection, the Borrower shall promptly pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of a Lender from time to time such amounts as such Lender may determine to be necessary to compensate such Lender for any costs incurred by such Lender that it determines are attributable to its making or maintaining of any LIBOR Loans or its obligation to make any LIBOR Loans hereunder, any reduction in any amount receivable by such Lender under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents in respect of any of such LIBOR Loans or such obligation or the maintenance by such Lender of capital or liquidity in respect of its LIBOR Loans or its Commitments (such increases in costs and reductions in amounts receivable being herein called ""), resulting from any Regulatory Change that: (i) changes the basis of taxation of any amounts payable to such Lender under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents in respect of any of such LIBOR Loans or its Commitments (other than taxes imposed on or measured by the overall net income of such Lender or of its Lending Office for any of such LIBOR Loans by the jurisdiction in which such Lender has its principal office or such Lending Office), or (ii) imposes or modifies any reserve, special deposit or similar requirements (other than Regulation D of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System or other similar reserve requirement applicable to any other category of liabilities or category of extensions of credit or other assets by reference to which the interest rate on LIBOR Loans is determined to the extent utilized when determining LIBOR for such Loans) relating to any extensions of credit or other assets of, or any deposits with or other liabilities of, or other credit extended by, or any other acquisition of funds by such Lender (or its parent corporation), or any commitment of such Lender (including, without limitation, the Commitments of such Lender hereunder) or (iii) has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on capital of such Lender to a level below that which such Lender could have achieved but for such Regulatory Change (taking into consideration such Lender's policies with respect to capital adequacy and liquidity).
Additional Costs.
Additional Costs
(c) . Without limiting the effect of the provisions of the immediately preceding subsections (a) and (b), if by reason of any Regulatory Change, any Lender either (i) incurs Additional Costs based on or measured by the excess above a specified level of the amount of a category of deposits or other liabilities of such Lender that includes deposits by reference to which the interest rate on LIBOR Loans is determined as provided in this Agreement or a category of extensions of credit or other assets of such Lender that includes LIBOR Loans or (ii) becomes subject to restrictions on the amount of such a category of liabilities or assets that it may hold, then, if such Lender so elects by notice to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), the obligation of such Lender to make or Continue, or to Convert Base Rate Loans into, LIBOR Loans shall be suspended until such Regulatory Change ceases to be in effect (in which case the provisions of Section 5.5. shall apply).
Lender's Suspension of LIBOR Loans
(d) . Without limiting the obligations of the Borrower under the preceding subsections of this Section (but without duplication), if as a result of any Regulatory Change or any risk-based capital guideline or other requirement hereafter issued by any Governmental Authority there shall be imposed, modified or deemed applicable after the Agreement Date, any tax, reserve, special deposit, capital adequacy or similar requirement against or with respect to
Additional Costs in Respect of Letters of Credit
 
or measured by reference to Letters of Credit and the result shall be to increase the cost to the applicable Issuing Bank of issuing (or any Lender of purchasing participations in) or maintaining its obligation hereunder to issue (or purchase participations in) any Letter of Credit or reduce any amount receivable by any Issuing Bank or any Lender hereunder in respect of any Letter of Credit, then, upon demand by such Issuing Bank or such Lender, the Borrower shall pay promptly to such Issuing Bank or, in the case of such Lender, to the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender, from time to time as specified by such Issuing Bank or such Lender, such additional amounts as shall be sufficient to compensate such Issuing Bank or such Lender for such increased costs or reductions in amount.
(e) . Each of the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank, each Lender, and each Participant, as the case may be, agrees to notify the Borrower of any event occurring after the Agreement Date entitling the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank, such Lender or such Participant to compensation under any of the preceding subsections of this Section as promptly as practicable; provided, however, that the failure of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender or any Participant to give such notice shall not release the Borrower from any of its obligations hereunder (and in the case of a Lender, to the Administrative Agent). The Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank, each Lender and each Participant, as the case may be, agrees to furnish to the Borrower (and in the case of an Issuing Bank, a Lender or a Participant to the Administrative Agent as well) a certificate setting forth the basis and amount of each request for compensation under this Section. Determinations by the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank, such Lender, or such Participant, as the case may be, of the effect of any Regulatory Change shall be conclusive and binding for all purposes, absent manifest error and provided that such determinations are made on a reasonable basis and in good faith. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in the preceding subsections of this Section 5.1., the Borrower shall not be required to compensate any Lender or any Participant for any such increased costs or reduced return incurred by such Lender or Participant more than one hundred eighty (180) days prior to such Lender's or Participant's written request to the Borrower for such compensation (except that if the event giving rise to the increased costs or reduced return is retroactive, then the one hundred eighty (180) day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof).
Notification and Determination of Additional Costs
 
Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, if, on or prior to the determination of LIBOR for any Interest Period:
(a) the Administrative Agent reasonably determines (which determination shall be conclusive) that quotations of interest rates for the relevant deposits referred to in the definition of LIBOR are not being provided in the relevant amounts or for the relevant maturities for purposes of determining rates of interest for LIBOR Loans as provided herein or is otherwise unable to determine LIBOR; or
(b) the Administrative Agent reasonably determines (which determination shall be conclusive) that the relevant rates of interest referred to in the definition of LIBOR upon the basis of which the rate of interest for LIBOR Loans for such Interest Period is to be determined are not likely to adequately cover the cost to any Lender of making or maintaining LIBOR Loans for such Interest Period;
then the Administrative Agent shall give the Borrower and each Lender prompt notice thereof and, so long as such condition remains in effect, the Lenders shall be under no obligation to, and shall not, make additional LIBOR Loans, Continue LIBOR Loans or Convert Loans into LIBOR Loans and the Borrower shall, on the last day of each current Interest Period for each outstanding LIBOR Loan, either prepay such Loan or Convert such Loan into a Base Rate Loan.
 
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, if any Lender shall determine (which determination shall be conclusive and binding) that it is unlawful for such Lender to honor its obligation to make or maintain LIBOR Loans hereunder, then such Lender shall promptly notify the Borrower thereof (with a copy of such notice to the Administrative Agent) and such Lender's obligation to make or Continue, or to Convert Loans of any other Type into, LIBOR Loans shall be suspended until such time as such Lender may again make and maintain LIBOR Loans (in which case the provisions of Section 5.5. shall be applicable).
 
The Borrower shall pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender, upon the request of the Administrative Agent, such amount or amounts as the Administrative Agent shall determine in its sole discretion shall be sufficient to compensate such Lender for any loss, cost or expense attributable to:
(a) any payment or prepayment (whether mandatory or optional) of a LIBOR Loan, or Conversion of a LIBOR Loan, made by such Lender for any reason (including, without limitation, acceleration) on a date other than the last day of the Interest Period for such Loan; or
(b) any failure by the Borrower for any reason (including, without limitation, the failure of any of the applicable conditions precedent specified in Article 6.2. to be satisfied) to borrow a LIBOR Loan from such Lender on the date for such borrowing, or to Convert a Base Rate Loan into a LIBOR Loan or Continue a LIBOR Loan on the requested date of such Conversion or Continuation.
Upon the Borrower's request, the Administrative Agent shall provide the Borrower with a statement setting forth the basis for requesting such compensation and the method for determining the amount thereof. Any such statement shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
 
If the obligation of any Lender to make LIBOR Loans or to Continue, or to Convert Base Rate Loans into, LIBOR Loans shall be suspended pursuant to Section 5.1.(c), Section 5.2. or Section 5.3. then such Lender's LIBOR Loans shall be automatically Converted into Base Rate Loans on the last day(s) of the then current Interest Period(s) for LIBOR Loans (or, in the case of a Conversion required by Section 5.1.(c), Section 5.2., or Section 5.3. on such earlier date as such Lender may specify to the Borrower with a copy to the Administrative Agent) and, unless and until such Lender gives notice as provided below that the circumstances specified in Section 5.1., Section 5.2. or Section 5.3. that gave rise to such Conversion no longer exist:
(a) to the extent that such Lender's LIBOR Loans have been so Converted, all payments and prepayments of principal that would otherwise be applied to such Lender's LIBOR Loans shall be applied instead to its Base Rate Loans; and
 
(b) all Loans that would otherwise be made or Continued by such Lender as LIBOR Loans shall be made or Continued instead as Base Rate Loans, and all Base Rate Loans of such Lender that would otherwise be Converted into LIBOR Loans shall remain as Base Rate Loans.
If such Lender gives notice to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent) that the circumstances specified in Section 5.1.(c) or 5.3. that gave rise to the Conversion of such Lender's LIBOR Loans pursuant to this Section no longer exist (which such Lender agrees to do promptly upon such circumstances ceasing to exist) at a time when LIBOR Loans made by other Lenders are outstanding, then such Lender's Base Rate Loans shall be automatically Converted, on the first day(s) of the next succeeding Interest Period(s) for such outstanding LIBOR Loans, to the extent necessary so that, after giving effect thereto, all Loans held by the Lenders holding LIBOR Loans and by such Lender are held pro rata (as to principal amounts, Types and Interest Periods) in accordance with their respective Commitments.
 
If (a) a Lender requests compensation pursuant to Section 3.10. or 5.1., and the Requisite Lenders are not also doing the same, or (b) the obligation of any Lender to make LIBOR Loans or to Continue, or to Convert Base Rate Loans into, LIBOR Loans shall be suspended pursuant to Section 5.1.(b) or 5.3. but the obligation of the Requisite Lenders shall not have been suspended under such Sections, or (c) a Lender does not vote in favor of any amendment, modification or waiver to this Agreement or any other Loan Document, which, pursuant to Section 13.7, requires the vote of such Lender, and the Requisite Lenders shall have voted in favor of such amendment, modification or waiver, then, so long as there does not then exist any Default or Event of Default, the Borrower may demand that such Lender (the ""), and upon such demand the Affected Lender shall promptly, assign its Commitment to an Eligible Assignee subject to and in accordance with the provisions of Section 13.6.(b) for a purchase price equal to (x) the aggregate principal balance of all Loans then owing to the Affected Lender, (y) the aggregate amount of payments previously made by the Affected Lender under Section 2.2.(j) that have not been repaid, (z) any accrued but unpaid interest thereon and accrued but unpaid fees owing to the Affected Lender, or any other amount as may be mutually agreed upon by such Affected Lender and Eligible Assignee. Each of the Administrative Agent and the Affected Lender shall reasonably cooperate in effectuating the replacement of such Affected Lender under this Section, but at no time shall the Administrative Agent, such Affected Lender nor any other Lender nor any Titled Agent be obligated in any way whatsoever to initiate any such replacement or to assist in finding an Eligible Assignee. The exercise by the Borrower of its rights under this Section shall be at the Borrower's sole cost and expense and at no cost or expense to the Administrative Agent, the Affected Lender or any of the other Lenders. The terms of this Section shall not in any way limit the Borrower's obligation to pay to any Affected Lender compensation owing to such Affected Lender pursuant to this Agreement (including, without limitation, pursuant to Sections 3.10., 5.1. or 5.4.) with respect to any period up to the date of replacement.
Affected Lender
plus
plus
 
Each Lender agrees that it will use reasonable efforts (consistent with its internal policy and legal and regulatory restrictions) to designate an alternate Lending Office with respect to any of its Loans affected by the matters or circumstances described in Sections 3.10., 5.1. or 5.3. to reduce the liability of the Borrower or avoid the results provided thereunder, so long as such designation is not disadvantageous to such Lender as determined by such Lender in its sole discretion, except that such Lender shall have no obligation to designate a Lending Office located in the United States of America.
 
Calculation of all amounts payable to a Lender under this Article shall be made as though such Lender had actually funded LIBOR Loans through the purchase of deposits in the relevant market bearing interest at the rate applicable to such LIBOR Loans in an amount equal to the amount of the LIBOR Loans and having a maturity comparable to the relevant Interest Period; provided, however, that each Lender may fund each of its LIBOR Loans in any manner it sees fit and the foregoing assumption shall be used only for calculation of amounts payable under this Article.
 
The obligation of the Lenders to effect or permit the occurrence of the first Credit Event hereunder, whether as the making of a Loan or the issuance of a Letter of Credit, is subject to the satisfaction or waiver of the following conditions precedent:
(a) The Administrative Agent shall have received each of the following, in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent:
(i) counterparts of this Agreement executed by each of the parties hereto;
(ii) Revolving Notes executed by the Borrower, payable to each applicable Lender and complying with the terms of Section 2.10.(a) and the Swingline Note executed by the Borrower;
(iii) the Guaranty executed by each of the Guarantors initially to be a party thereto;
(iv) an opinion of Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP, counsel to the Parent, the Borrower and the other Loan Parties, addressed to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and in a form acceptable to the Administrative Agent;
(v) the certificate or articles of incorporation or formation, articles of organization, certificate of limited partnership, declaration of trust or other comparable organizational instrument (if any) of each Loan Party certified as of a recent date by the Secretary of State of the state of formation of such Loan Party;
(vi) a certificate of good standing (or certificate of similar meaning) with respect to each Loan Party issued as of a recent date by the Secretary of State of the state of formation of each such Loan Party and certificates of qualification to transact business or other comparable certificates issued as of a recent date by each Secretary of State (and any state department of taxation, as applicable) of each state in which such Loan Party is required to be so qualified and where failure to be so qualified could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect;
(vii) a certificate of incumbency signed by the Secretary or Assistant Secretary (or other individual performing similar functions) of each Loan Party with respect to each of the officers of such Loan Party authorized to execute and deliver the Loan Documents to which such Loan Party is a party, and in the case of the Borrower, authorized to execute and deliver on behalf of the Borrower Notices of Borrowing, Notices of Swingline Borrowing, requests for Letters of Credit, Notices of Conversion and Notices of Continuation;
 
(viii) copies certified by the Secretary or Assistant Secretary (or other individual performing similar functions) of each Loan Party of (A) the by-laws of such Loan Party, if a corporation, the operating agreement, if a limited liability company, the partnership agreement, if a limited or general partnership, or other comparable document in the case of any other form of legal entity and (B) all corporate, partnership, member or other necessary action taken by such Loan Party to authorize the execution, delivery and performance of the Loan Documents to which it is a party;
(ix) a Compliance Certificate calculated on a pro forma basis for the Borrower's fiscal year ending December 31, 2011;
(x) a Transfer Authorizer Designation Form effective as of the Agreement Date;
(xi) evidence that all indebtedness, liabilities or obligations owing by the Loan Parties under the Existing Credit Agreement shall have been paid in full and all Liens securing such indebtedness, liabilities or other obligations have been released;
(xii) evidence that the Fees, if any, then due and payable under Section 3.5., together with all other fees, expenses and reimbursement amounts due and payable to the Administrative Agent and any of the Lenders, including without limitation, the fees and expenses of counsel to the Administrative Agent, have been paid;
(xiii) insurance certificates, or other evidence, providing that the insurance coverage required under Section 8.5. (including, without limitation, both property and liability insurance) is in full force and effect;
(xiv) the duly executed Officer's Certificate; and
(xv) such other documents, agreements and instruments as the Administrative Agent, or any Lender through the Administrative Agent, may reasonably request.
(b) In the good faith judgment of the Administrative Agent:
(i) there shall not have occurred or become known to the Administrative Agent or any of the Lenders any event, condition, situation or status since the date of the information contained in the financial and business projections, budgets, pro forma data and forecasts concerning the Borrower and its Subsidiaries delivered to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders prior to the Agreement Date that has had or could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
(ii) no litigation, action, suit, investigation or other arbitral, administrative or judicial proceeding shall be pending or threatened which could reasonably be expected to (A) result in a Material Adverse Effect or (B) restrain or enjoin, impose materially burdensome conditions on, or otherwise materially and adversely affect, the ability of the Borrower or any other Loan Party to fulfill its obligations under the Loan Documents to which it is a party;
(iii) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries shall have received all approvals, consents and waivers, and shall have made or given all necessary filings and notices as shall be required to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby without the occurrence of any default under, conflict with or violation of (A) any Applicable Law or (B) any agreement, document or instrument to which any Loan Party is a party or by which any of them or their respective
 
properties is bound, except for such approvals, consents, waivers, filings and notices the receipt, making or giving of which could not reasonably be likely to (A) have a Material Adverse Effect, or (B) restrain or impose materially burdensome conditions on, or otherwise materially and adversely effect the ability of the Borrower or any Loan Party to fulfill its obligations under the Loan Documents to which it is a Party;
(iv) the Borrower and each other Loan Party shall have provided all information requested by the Administrative Agent and each Lender in order to comply with the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)); and
(v) there shall not have occurred or exist any other material disruption of financial or capital markets that could reasonably be expected to materially and adversely affect the transactions contemplated by the Loan Documents.
 
The obligations of (i) the Lenders to make any Loans and (ii) the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit are each subject to the further conditions precedent that: (a) no Default or Event of Default shall exist as of the date of the making of such Loan or date of issuance of such Letter of Credit or would exist immediately after giving effect thereto, and no violation of the limits described in Section 2.14. would occur after giving effect thereto; (b) the representations and warranties made or deemed made by the Borrower and each other Loan Party in the Loan Documents to which any of them is a party, shall be true and correct in all material respects (except in the case of a representation or warranty qualified by materiality, in which case such representation or warranty shall be true and correct in all respects) on and as of the date of the making of such Loan or date of issuance of such Letter of Credit with the same force and effect as if made on and as of such date except to the extent that such representations and warranties expressly relate solely to an earlier date (in which case such representations and warranties shall have been true and correct in all material respects (except in the case of a representation or warranty qualified by materiality, in which case such representation or warranty shall be true and correct in all respects) on and as of such earlier date) and except for changes in factual circumstances not expressly prohibited hereunder and (c) in the case of the borrowing of Revolving Loans, the Administrative Agent shall have received a timely Notice of Borrowing, or in the case of a Swingline Loan, the Swingline Lender shall have received a timely Notice of Swingline Borrowing. Each Credit Event shall constitute a certification by the Borrower to the effect set forth in the preceding sentence (both as of the date of the giving of notice relating to such Credit Event and, unless the Borrower otherwise notifies the Administrative Agent prior to the date of such Credit Event, as of the date of the occurrence of such Credit Event). In addition, the Borrower shall be deemed to have represented to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders at the time any Loan is made or any Letter of Credit is issued that all conditions to the making of such Loan or issuing of such Letter of Credit contained in this Article VI. have been satisfied. Unless set forth in writing to the contrary, the making of its initial Loan by a Lender shall constitute a certification by such Lender to the Administrative Agent and the other Lenders that the conditions precedent for initial Loans set forth in Sections 6.1. and 6.2. that have not previously been waived by the Lenders in accordance with the terms of this Agreement have been satisfied.
 
In order to induce the Administrative Agent and each Lender to enter into this Agreement and to make Loans and, in the case of each Issuing Bank, to issue Letters of Credit, the Borrower represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank and each Lender as follows:
(a) . Each of the Parent and the Borrower, the other Loan Parties and the other Subsidiaries of the Borrower is a corporation, partnership or other legal entity, duly organized or formed, validly existing and in good standing under the jurisdiction of its incorporation or formation, has the power and authority to own or lease its respective properties and to carry on its respective business as now being and hereafter proposed to be conducted and is duly qualified and is in good standing as a foreign corporation, partnership or other legal entity, and authorized to do business, in each jurisdiction in which the character of its properties or the nature of its business requires such qualification or authorization and where the failure to be so qualified or authorized could reasonably be expected to have, in each instance, a Material Adverse Effect.
Organization; Power; Qualification
 
(b) . Part I of Schedule 7.1.(b) is, as of the Agreement Date, a complete and correct list of all Subsidiaries of the Parent setting forth for each such Subsidiary, (i) the jurisdiction of organization of such Subsidiary, (ii) each Person holding any Equity Interest in such Subsidiary, (iii) the nature of the Equity Interests held by each such Person and (iv) the percentage of ownership of such Subsidiary represented by such Equity Interests. As of the Agreement Date, except as disclosed in such Schedule (A), each of the Parent, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries of the Borrower owns, free and clear of all Liens (except Permitted Liens under clauses (c) through (f) of the definition thereof), and has the unencumbered right to vote, all outstanding Equity Interests in each Person shown to be held by it on such Schedule, (B) all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each such Person organized as a corporation is validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable and (C) there are no outstanding subscriptions, options, warrants, commitments, preemptive rights or agreements of any kind (including, without limitation, any stockholders' or voting trust agreements) for the issuance, sale, registration or voting of, or outstanding securities convertible into, any additional shares of capital stock of any class, or partnership or other ownership interests of any type in, any such Person. As of the Agreement Date, Part II of Schedule 7.1.(b) correctly sets forth all Unconsolidated Affiliates of the Parent, including the correct legal name of such Person, the type of legal entity which each such Person is, and all Equity Interests in such Person held directly or indirectly by the Parent.
Ownership Structure
(c) . The Borrower has the right and power, and has taken all necessary action to authorize it, to borrow and obtain other extensions of credit hereunder. Each of the Parent and the Borrower and each other Loan Party has the right and power, and has taken all necessary action to authorize it, to execute, deliver and perform each of the Loan Documents to which it is a party in accordance with their respective terms and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby. The Loan Documents to which the Parent, the Borrower or any other Loan Party is a party have been duly executed and delivered by the duly authorized officers of such Person and each is a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Person enforceable against such Person in accordance with its respective terms, except as the same may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, and other similar laws affecting the rights of creditors generally and the availability of equitable remedies for the enforcement of certain obligations (other than the payment of principal) contained herein or therein and as may be limited by equitable principles generally.
Authorization of Loan Documents and Borrowings
(d) . The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement, the other Loan Documents to which any Loan Party is a party in accordance with their respective terms and the borrowings and other extensions of credit hereunder do not and will not, by the passage of time, the giving of notice, or both: (i) require any Governmental Approval or violate any Applicable Law (including all Environmental Laws) relating to the Parent, the Borrower or any other Loan Party; (ii) conflict with, result in a breach of or constitute a default under the organizational documents of any Loan Party, or any indenture, agreement or other instrument to which the Parent, the Borrower or any other Loan Party is a party or by which it or any of its respective properties may be bound; or (iii) result in or require the creation or imposition of any Lien upon or with respect to any property now owned or to be hereafter acquired by any Loan Party other than the set off rights described herein in favor of the Administrative Agent for its benefit and the benefit of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks.
Compliance of Loan Documents with Laws
 
(e) . Each of the Parent, the Borrower, the other Loan Parties and the other Subsidiaries of the Borrower is in compliance with each Governmental Approval and all other Applicable Laws relating to it except for noncompliances which, and Governmental Approvals the failure to possess which, could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to cause a Default or Event of Default or have a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Law; Governmental Approvals
(f) . Schedule 7.1.(f) is, as of the Agreement Date, a complete and correct listing of all real estate assets of the Borrower, each other Loan Party and each other Subsidiary of the Borrower, setting forth, for each such Property, the current occupancy status of such Property and whether such Property is a Development Property and, if such Property is a Development Property, the status of completion of such Property. Each of the Borrower and each Subsidiary of the Borrower has good, marketable and legal title to, or a valid leasehold interest in, its respective assets.
Title to Properties; Liens
(g) . Part I of Schedule 7.1.(g) is, as of the Agreement Date, a complete and correct listing of all Indebtedness (including all Guarantees other than guarantees of customary nonrecourse carveouts) of each of the Borrower, and the Subsidiaries of the Borrower, and if such Indebtedness is secured by any Lien, a description of all of the property subject to such Lien. As of the Agreement Date, each of the Borrower, the other Loan Parties and the other Subsidiaries of the Borrower have performed and are in compliance with all of the terms of such Indebtedness and all instruments and agreements relating thereto in all material respects, and no material default or event of default, or event or condition which with the giving of notice, the lapse of time, or both, would constitute a material default or event of default, exists with respect to any such Indebtedness. Part II of Schedule 7.1.(g) is, as of the Agreement Date, a complete and correct listing of all Total Indebtedness of the Borrower, the other Loan Parties and the other Subsidiaries of the Parent (excluding any Indebtedness set forth on Part I of such Schedule).
Existing Indebtedness; Total Indebtedness
(h) . Schedule 7.1.(h) is, as of the Agreement Date, a true, correct and complete listing of all Material Contracts (other than Tenant Leases). Each of the Borrower, the other Loan Parties and the other Subsidiaries of the Borrower that is party to any Material Contract has performed and is in compliance in all material respects with all of the terms of such Material Contract, and no default or event of default, or event or condition which with the giving of notice, the lapse of time, or both, would constitute such a default or event of default, exists with respect to any such Material Contract to the extent any such default or event of default could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Material Contracts
(i) . Except as set forth on Schedule 7.1.(i), there are no actions, suits or proceedings pending (nor, to the knowledge of any Loan Party, are there any actions, suits or proceedings threatened, nor is there any basis therefor) against or in any other way relating adversely to or affecting the Parent, the Borrower, any other Loan Party, any other Subsidiary of the Parent or any of their respective property in any court or before any arbitrator of any kind or before or by any other Governmental Authority which, (i) could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect or (ii) in any manner draws into question the validity or enforceability of any Loan Document. As of the Agreement Date, there are no strikes, slow downs, work stoppages or walkouts or other labor disputes in progress or threatened relating to, the Parent, the Borrower, any Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Parent.
Litigation
(j) . All federal, state and other tax returns of each of the Parent, the Borrower, each other Loan Party and each other Subsidiary of the Borrower required by Applicable Law to be filed have
Taxes
 
been duly filed, and all federal, state and other taxes, assessments and other governmental charges or levies upon, each of the Parent, the Borrower, each Loan Party, each other Subsidiary of the Parent and their respective properties, income, profits and assets which are due and payable have been paid, except any such nonpayment or non-filing which is at the time permitted under Section 8.6. As of the Agreement Date, none of the United States income tax returns of the Parent, the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Parent is under audit. All charges, accruals and reserves on the books of the Parent, the Borrower, the other Loan Parties and the other Subsidiaries of the Parent in respect of any taxes or other governmental charges are in accordance with GAAP.
(k) . The Borrower has furnished to the Administrative Agent copies of (i) (x) the audited consolidated balance sheet of the Parent and its consolidated Subsidiaries for the fiscal years ended December 31, 2010 and December 31, 2011 and (y) the unaudited consolidated balance sheet of the Parent and its consolidated Subsidiaries for the fiscal quarter and the portion of the fiscal year ended March 31, 2012, and (ii) the related audited or unaudited, as applicable, consolidated statements of operations, shareholders' equity and cash flow for the fiscal years and fiscal quarter ended on such dates, with, in the case of such annual financial statements, the opinion thereon of Ernst & Young LLP. Such financial statements (including in each case related schedules and notes) are complete and correct in all material respects and present fairly, in accordance with GAAP consistently applied throughout the periods involved, the consolidated financial position of the Parent and its consolidated Subsidiaries as at their respective dates and the results of operations and the cash flow for such periods (subject, as to interim statements, to changes resulting from normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes in the case of the statements referred to in clause (i)(y) above). None of the Parent, the Borrower or any of their respective Subsidiaries has on the Agreement Date any material contingent liabilities, liabilities for taxes, unusual or long-term commitments or unrealized or forward anticipated losses from any unfavorable commitments that would be required to be set forth in its financial statements or notes thereto pursuant to GAAP, except as referred to or reflected or provided for in said financial statements.
Financial Statements
(l) . Since December 31, 2011, there has been no event, change, circumstance or occurrence that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Each of the Parent, the Borrower, the other Loan Parties and the other Subsidiaries of the Borrower is Solvent.
No Material Adverse Change
(m) .
ERISA
(i) Except as could not reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate to have a Material Adverse Effect, each Benefit Arrangement is in compliance with the applicable provisions of ERISA, the Internal Revenue Code and other Applicable Laws. Except with respect to Multiemployer Plans, each Qualified Plan (A) has received a favorable determination from the Internal Revenue Service applicable to such Qualified Plan's current remedial amendment cycle (as defined in Revenue Procedure 2007-44 or "2007-44" for short), (B) has timely filed for a favorable determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service during its staggered remedial amendment cycle (as defined in 2007-44) and such application is currently being processed by the Internal Revenue Service, (C) had filed for a determination letter prior to its "GUST remedial amendment period" (as defined in 2007-44) and received such determination letter and the staggered remedial amendment cycle first following the GUST remedial amendment period for such Qualified Plan has not yet expired, or (D) is maintained under a preapproved plan and may rely upon a favorable opinion letter issued by the Internal Revenue Service with respect to such preapproved plan. To the best knowledge of the Borrower, as of the Agreement Date, nothing has occurred which would cause the loss of its reliance on each Qualified Plan's favorable determination letter or opinion letter.
 
(ii) With respect to any Benefit Arrangement that is a retiree welfare benefit arrangement, all amounts have been accrued on the applicable ERISA Group's financial statements in accordance with FASB ASC 715. The "benefit obligation" of all Plans does not exceed the "fair market value of plan assets" for such Plans by more than $10,000,000 all as determined by and with such terms defined in accordance with FASB ASC 715.
(iii) Except as could not reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to have a Material Adverse Effect: (i) no ERISA Event has occurred or is expected to occur; (ii) there are no pending, or to the best knowledge of the Borrower, threatened, claims, actions or lawsuits or other action by any Governmental Authority, plan participant or beneficiary with respect to a Benefit Arrangement; (iii) there are no violations of the fiduciary responsibility rules with respect to any Benefit Arrangement; and (iv) no member of the ERISA Group has engaged in a non-exempt "prohibited transaction," as defined in Section 406 of ERISA and Section 4975 of the Internal Revenue Code, in connection with any Plan, that would subject any member of the ERISA Group to a tax on prohibited transactions imposed by Section 502(i) of ERISA or Section 4975 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(n) . None of the Loan Parties or any of the other Subsidiaries of Borrower is in default under its certificate or articles of incorporation or formation, bylaws, partnership agreement or other similar organizational documents, and no event has occurred, which has not been remedied, cured or waived: (i) which constitutes a Default or an Event of Default; or (ii) which constitutes, or which with the passage of time, the giving of notice, or both, would constitute, a default or event of default by, any Loan Party or any other Subsidiary under any agreement (other than this Agreement) or judgment, decree or order to which any such Person is a party or by which any such Person or any of its respective properties may be bound where such default or event of default could, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Absence of Default
(o) . Each of the Borrower, each other Loan Party and each other Subsidiary of the Borrower: (i) is in compliance with all Environmental Laws applicable to its business, operations and the Properties owned or operated by it, (ii) has obtained all Governmental Approvals which are required under Environmental Laws, and each such Governmental Approval is in full force and effect, and (iii) is in compliance with all terms and conditions of such Governmental Approvals, where with respect to each of the immediately preceding clauses (i) through (iii) the failure to obtain or to comply with the same could (either individually or in the aggregate) reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. Except for any of the following matters that could not (either individually or in the aggregate) reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, the Borrower does not have knowledge of, and has not received notice of, any past, present, or pending releases, events, conditions, circumstances, activities, practices, incidents, facts, occurrences, actions, or plans that, with respect to the Borrower, any Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower, their respective businesses, operations or with respect to the Properties, may: (x) cause or contribute to an actual or alleged violation of or noncompliance with Environmental Laws, (y) cause or contribute to any other potential common-law or legal claim or other liability, or (z) cause any of the Properties to become subject to any restrictions on ownership, occupancy, use or transferability under any Environmental Law adversely affecting use or value or require the filing or recording of any notice, approval or disclosure document under any Environmental Law and, with respect to the immediately preceding clauses (x) through (z) is based on or related to the on-site or off-site manufacture, generation, processing, distribution, use, treatment, storage, disposal, transport, removal, clean up or handling, or the emission, discharge, release or threatened release of any wastes or Hazardous Material, or any other requirement under Environmental Law. As of the Agreement Date, there is no civil, criminal, or administrative action, suit, demand, claim, hearing, notice, or demand letter, mandate, order, lien, request, investigation, or proceeding pending or, to the Borrower's knowledge, threatened, against the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the
Environmental Laws
 
Borrower with respect to any alleged violation of or liability under Environmental Laws which reasonably could be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. None of the Properties is listed on or proposed for listing on the National Priority List promulgated pursuant to the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980 and its implementing regulations, or any state or local priority list promulgated pursuant to any analogous state or local law, to the extent any such listing could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
(p) . None of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower is (i) an "investment company" or a company "controlled" by an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, or (ii) subject to any other Applicable Law which purports to regulate or restrict its ability to borrow money or obtain other extensions of credit or to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or to perform its obligations under any Loan Document to which it is a party.
Investment Company
(q) . None of the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Borrower is engaged principally, or as one of its important activities, in the business of extending credit for the purpose, whether immediate, incidental or ultimate, of buying or carrying "margin stock" within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.
Margin Stock
(r) . Except as permitted by Section 10.9. or as otherwise set forth on Schedule 7.1.(r), none of the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Borrower is a party to or bound by any agreement or arrangement with any Affiliate.
Affiliate Transactions
(s) . Each of the Borrower and each Subsidiary of the Borrower owns or has the right to use, under valid license agreements or otherwise, all patents, licenses, franchises, trademarks, trademark rights, service marks, service mark rights, trade names, trade name rights, trade secrets and copyrights (collectively, "") necessary to the conduct of its businesses, without conflict known to Borrower with any patent, license, franchise, trademark, trademark right, service mark, service mark right, trade secret, trade name, copyright, or other proprietary right of any other Person which conflict could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. To Borrower's knowledge, all such Intellectual Property is fully protected and/or duly and properly registered, filed or issued in the appropriate office and jurisdictions for such registrations, filing or issuances. As of the Agreement date, no material claim has been asserted by any Person against Borrower or any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of Borrower with respect to the use of any such Intellectual Property by the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower, or challenging or questioning the validity or effectiveness of any such Intellectual Property. To Borrower's knowledge, the use of such Intellectual Property by the Borrower, the other Loan Parties and the other Subsidiaries of the Borrower does not infringe on the rights of any Person, subject to such claims and infringements as do not, in the aggregate, give rise to any liabilities on the part of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property
(t) . As of the Agreement Date, the Borrower, the other Loan Parties and the other Subsidiaries of the Borrower are engaged in the business of directly or indirectly owning, leasing, managing, and operating real property, together with other business activities incidental thereto.
Business
(u) . To Borrower's knowledge, no broker's or finder's fee, commission or similar compensation will be payable with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby. No other similar fees or commissions will be payable by the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower for any other services rendered to the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Parent ancillary to the transactions contemplated hereby.
Broker's Fees
 
(v) . All written information, reports and other papers and data (other than financial projections and other forward looking statements), taken as a whole as of the date of delivery thereof, furnished to the Administrative Agent or any Lender by, on behalf of, or at the direction of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower were, at the time the same were so furnished, complete and correct in all material respects, and, in the case of financial statements, present fairly, in accordance with GAAP consistently applied throughout the periods involved, the financial position of the Persons involved as at the date thereof and the results of operations for such periods (subject, as to interim statements, to changes resulting from normal year end audit adjustments and absence of full footnote disclosure). All financial projections and other forward looking statements prepared by or on behalf of the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Borrower that have been or may hereafter be made available to the Administrative Agent or any Lender were or will be prepared in good faith based on reasonable assumptions. No fact is known to the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Borrower which has had, or may in the future have (so far as any Loan Party can reasonably foresee), a Material Adverse Effect which has not been set forth in the financial statements referred to in Section 7.1.(k) or in such information, reports or other papers or data or otherwise disclosed in writing to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders. No document furnished or written statement made to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in connection with the negotiation, preparation or execution of, or pursuant to, this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents, taken as a whole as of the date of delivery thereof, contained or will contain any untrue statement of a material fact, or omits or will omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements contained therein, in light of the circumstances in which they were made, not misleading.
Accuracy and Completeness of Information
(w) . None of the assets of the Parent, the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Parent constitutes "plan assets" within the meaning of ERISA, the Internal Revenue Code and the respective regulations promulgated thereunder. Assuming that no Lender funds any amount payable by it hereunder with "plan assets," as that term is defined in 29 C.F.R. 2510.3-101, the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, and the extensions of credit and repayment of amounts hereunder, do not and will not constitute "prohibited transactions" under ERISA or the Internal Revenue Code.
Not Plan Assets; No Prohibited Transactions
(x) . None of the Parent, the Borrower, any of the other Loan Parties, any of the other Subsidiaries, or, to the Parent's or the Borrower's knowledge, any other Affiliate of the Parent: (i) is a person named on the list of Specially Designated Nationals or Blocked Persons maintained by the U.S. Department of the Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control ("") available at or as otherwise published from time to time; (ii) is (A) an agency of the government of a country, (B) an organization controlled by a country, or (C) a person resident in a country that is subject to a sanctions program identified on the list maintained by OFAC and available at , or as otherwise published from time to time, as such program may be applicable to such agency, organization or person; or (iii) derives any of its assets or operating income from investments in or transactions with any such country, agency, organization or person; and none of the proceeds from any Loan, and to the Borrower's knowledge, no Letter of Credit, will be used to finance any operations, investments or activities in, or make any payments to, any such country, agency, organization, or person.
OFAC
OFAC
http://www.treas.gov/offices/enforcement/ofac/index.shtml
http://www.treas.gov/offices/enforcement/ofac/index.shtml
(y) . The Parent qualifies as, and has elected to be treated as, a REIT and is in compliance with all requirements and conditions imposed under the Internal Revenue Code to allow the Parent to maintain its status as a REIT.
REIT Status
(z) . Each Property included in calculations of the Unencumbered Asset Value satisfies all of the requirements (including those in the definition of "Eligible Property") contained in this Agreement for the same to be included therein.
Unencumbered Properties
 
All statements contained in any certificate, financial statement or other instrument delivered by or on behalf of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower to the Administrative Agent or any Lender pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents (including, but not limited to, any such statement made in or in connection with any amendment thereto or any statement contained in any certificate, financial statement or other instrument delivered by or on behalf of any Loan Party prior to the Agreement Date and delivered to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in connection with the underwriting or closing the transactions contemplated hereby) shall constitute representations and warranties made by the Borrower under this Agreement. All representations and warranties made under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents shall be deemed to be made at and as of the Agreement Date, the Effective Date, the date on which any extension of the Revolving Termination Date is effectuated pursuant to Section 2.12. and at and as of the date of the occurrence of each Credit Event, except to the extent that such representations and warranties expressly relate solely to an earlier date (in which case such representations and warranties shall have been true and correct in all material respects (except in the case of a representation or warranty qualified by materiality, in which case such representation or warranty shall be true and correct in all respects) on and as of such earlier date) and except for changes in factual circumstances not expressly prohibited hereunder. All such representations and warranties shall survive the effectiveness of this Agreement, the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents and the making of the Loans and the issuance of the Letters of Credit.
For so long as this Agreement is in effect, unless the Requisite Lenders (or, if required pursuant to Section 13.7., all of the Lenders) shall otherwise consent in the manner provided for in Section 13.7., the Parent and the Borrower shall comply with the following covenants:
 
Except as otherwise permitted under Section 10.4., each of the Parent and the Borrower shall, and shall cause each other Loan Party and each other Subsidiary to, preserve and maintain its respective existence, rights, franchises, licenses and privileges in the jurisdiction of its incorporation or formation and qualify and remain qualified and authorized to do business in each jurisdiction in which the character of its properties or the nature of its business requires such qualification and authorization and where the failure to be so authorized and qualified could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
 
The Borrower shall, and shall cause each other Loan Party and each other Subsidiary of the Borrower to, comply with all Applicable Law, including the obtaining of all Governmental Approvals, the failure to comply with which could, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
 
In addition to the requirements of any of the other Loan Documents, the Borrower shall, and shall cause each other Loan Party and each other Subsidiary of the Borrower to, (a) protect and preserve all of its respective material properties, including, but not limited to, all Intellectual Property necessary to the conduct of its respective business, and maintain in good repair, working order and condition all tangible properties, ordinary wear and tear excepted, and (b) from time to time make or cause to be made all
 
material needed and appropriate repairs, renewals, replacements and additions to such properties, so that the business carried on in connection therewith may be properly conducted at all times; provided that, to the extent not otherwise prohibited under this Agreement and so long as (i) immediately before and after such transfer or conveyance, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing and (ii) immediately after giving effect to such transfer or conveyance, the Borrower shall be in compliance with the covenants set forth in Section 10.1. on a pro forma basis in accordance with Section 1.4. (and upon the reasonable request of the Administrative Agent the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent a certificate setting forth in reasonable detail the calculations demonstrating such compliance), the Borrower and each of its Subsidiaries may transfer and convey their respective Properties in their sole discretion, which Properties shall, if not conveyed to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower (other than an Excluded Subsidiary), be removed, as of the date of such transfer or conveyance, from the calculation of Unencumbered Asset Value.
 
The Borrower shall, and shall cause each other Loan Party and each other Subsidiary of the Borrower to, carry on its respective businesses as described in Section 7.1.(t) and in substantially the same fashion as currently in effect (including acquiring Properties of the same quality as Properties currently owned by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries and operating and maintaining Properties in substantially the same manner and with the same standard of care and quality as is currently employed by the Borrower and the other Loan Parties and the Subsidiaries of the Borrower and not enter into any line of business that would adversely affect the REIT status of Parent; provided that, to the extent not otherwise prohibited under this Agreement and so long as (i) immediately before and after such transfer or conveyance, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing and (ii) immediately after giving effect to such transfer or conveyance, the Borrower shall be in compliance with the covenants set forth in Section 10.1. on a pro forma basis in accordance with Section 1.4. (and upon the reasonable request of the Administrative Agent the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent a certificate setting forth in reasonable detail the calculations demonstrating such compliance), the Borrower and each of its Subsidiaries may transfer and convey their respective Properties in their sole discretion, which Properties shall, if not conveyed to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower (other than an Excluded Subsidiary), be removed, as of the date of such transfer or conveyance, from the calculation of Unencumbered Asset Value.
 
In addition to the requirements of any of the other Loan Documents, the Borrower shall, and shall cause each other Loan Party and each other Subsidiary of the Borrower to, maintain insurance (on a replacement cost basis) with financially sound and reputable insurance companies against such risks and in such amounts as is customarily maintained by Persons engaged in similar businesses or as may be required by Applicable Law. The Borrower shall from time to time deliver to the Administrative Agent upon request a detailed list, together with copies of all policies of the insurance then in effect, stating the names of the insurance companies, the amounts and rates of the insurance, the dates of the expiration thereof and the properties and risks covered thereby.
 
The Borrower shall, and shall cause each other Loan Party and each other Subsidiary of the Borrower to, pay and discharge when due (a) all taxes, assessments and governmental charges or levies imposed upon it or upon its income or profits or upon any properties belonging to it, and (b) all lawful claims of materialmen, mechanics, carriers, warehousemen and landlords for labor, materials, supplies and rentals which, if unpaid, might become a Lien on any properties of such Person that are included in
 
the calculation of the Unencumbered Asset Value; provided, however, that this Section shall not require the payment or discharge of any such tax, assessment, charge, levy or claim which is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings which operate to suspend the collection thereof and for which adequate reserves have been established on the books of such Person in accordance with GAAP.
 
The Borrower shall, and shall cause each other Loan Party and each other Subsidiary of the Borrower to, keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries shall be made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities. The Borrower shall, and shall cause each other Loan Party and each other Subsidiary of the Borrower to, permit representatives of the Administrative Agent or any Lender to visit and inspect any of their respective properties, to examine and make abstracts from any of their respective books and records and to discuss their respective affairs, finances and accounts with their respective officers, employees and independent public accountants (in the presence of an officer of the Parent if an Event of Default does not then exist), all at such reasonable times during business hours and as often as may reasonably be requested and so long as no Event of Default exists, with reasonable prior notice ; provided that (a) no Loan Party shall be required to pay the expense of any such visit, except to the extent such visit is made by the Administrative Agent or is made during the continuance of an Event of Default and (b) unless an Event of Default exists, only one (1) such visit shall be permitted at the Loan Parties' expense during any fiscal year. The Borrower shall be obligated to reimburse the Administrative Agent and the Lenders for their costs and expenses incurred in connection with the exercise of their rights under this Section only if such exercise occurs while a Default or Event of Default exists. If requested by the Administrative Agent, the Borrower shall cause the Parent to execute an authorization letter addressed to its accountants authorizing the Administrative Agent or any Lender to discuss the financial affairs of the Parent, the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower with the Parent's accountants.
 
The Borrower will use the proceeds of Loans only (a) for the payment of pre-development and development costs incurred in connection with Properties owned by the Borrower or any Subsidiary; (b) to finance acquisitions otherwise permitted under this Agreement; (c) to finance capital expenditures and the repayment of Indebtedness of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries; (d) to finance acquisitions of Equity Interests permitted under this Agreement; and (e) to provide for the general working capital needs of the Parent, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries of the Parent and for other general corporate purposes of the Parent, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries of the Parent. The Borrower shall only use Letters of Credit for the same purposes for which it may use the proceeds of Loans. The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary to, use any part of such proceeds to purchase or carry, or to reduce or retire or refinance any credit incurred to purchase or carry, any margin stock (within the meaning of Regulation U or Regulation X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System) or to extend credit to others for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any such margin stock.
 
The Borrower shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary of the Borrower to, comply with all Environmental Laws the failure to comply with which could, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The Borrower shall comply, and shall cause each Subsidiary of the Borrower to comply, and the Borrower shall use, and shall cause each other Loan Party and each other Subsidiary of the Borrower to use, commercially reasonable efforts to cause all other Persons occupying the Properties to comply, with all Environmental Laws to the extent the failure to so comply could reasonably be expected to cause a Material Adverse Effect. The Borrower shall, and shall
 
cause each Subsidiary of the Borrower to, promptly take all actions and pay or arrange for the payment of all costs necessary for it and for its Properties to comply in all material respects with all Environmental Laws and all Governmental Approvals, including actions to remove and dispose of all Hazardous Materials and to clean up the Properties as and to the extent required under Environmental Laws, to the extent the failure to do so could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The Borrower shall, and shall cause each Subsidiary of the Borrower to, promptly take all actions necessary to prevent the imposition of any Liens on any of their respective properties arising out of or related to any Environmental Laws to the extent any such lien could, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to cause a Material Adverse Effect. Nothing in this Section shall impose any obligation or liability whatsoever on the Administrative Agent or any Lender.
 
At the Borrower's cost and expense and upon request of the Administrative Agent, the Borrower shall, and shall cause each other Loan Party and each other Subsidiary of the Borrower to, duly execute and deliver or cause to be duly executed and delivered, to the Administrative Agent such further instruments, documents and certificates, and do and cause to be done such further acts that may be reasonably necessary or advisable in the reasonable opinion of the Administrative Agent to carry out more effectively the provisions and purposes of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
 
The Borrower shall, and shall cause each other Loan Party and each other Subsidiary of the Borrower to, duly and punctually perform and comply in all material respects with any and all representations, warranties, covenants and agreements expressed as binding upon any such Person under any Material Contract. The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower to, do or knowingly permit to be done anything to impair materially the value of any of the Material Contracts.
 
(a) Within twenty (20) Business Days of any Person becoming a Material Subsidiary (other than an Excluded Subsidiary) after the Agreement Date, the Parent and the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent each of the following in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent: (i) an Accession Agreement executed by such Subsidiary and (ii) the items that would have been delivered under subsections (iv) through (viii), and (xiv) of Section 6.1.(a) if such Subsidiary had been a Material Subsidiary on the Agreement Date; , , promptly (and in any event within twenty (20) Business Days) upon any Excluded Subsidiary ceasing to be an Excluded Subsidiary, such Subsidiary shall comply with the provisions of this Section.
provided
however
(b) The Borrower may request in writing that the Administrative Agent release, and upon receipt of such request the Administrative Agent shall release, a Guarantor (other than the Parent) from the Guaranty so long as: (i) such Guarantor is not otherwise required to be a party to the Guaranty under the immediately preceding subsection (a); (ii) no Default or Event of Default shall then be in existence or would occur as a result of such release, including without limitation, a Default or Event of Default resulting from a violation of any of the covenants contained in Section 10.1.; (iii) the representations and warranties made or deemed made by the Borrower and each other Loan Party in the Loan Documents to which any of them is a party, shall be true and correct on and as of the date of such release with the same force and effect as if made on and as of such date except to the extent that such representations and warranties expressly relate solely to an earlier date (in which case such representations and warranties shall have been true and correct on and as of such earlier date) and except for changes in factual
 
circumstances not expressly prohibited under the Loan Documents; and (iv) the Administrative Agent shall have received such written request at least ten (10) Business Days (or such shorter period as may be acceptable to the Administrative Agent) prior to the requested date of release. Delivery by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent of any such request shall constitute a representation by the Borrower that the matters set forth in the preceding sentence (both as of the date of the giving of such request and as of the date of the effectiveness of such request) are true and correct with respect to such request.
For so long as this Agreement is in effect, unless the Requisite Lenders (or, if required pursuant to Section 13.7., all of the Lenders) shall otherwise consent in the manner set forth in Section 13.7., the Parent and the Borrower shall furnish to the Administrative Agent for distribution to each of the Lenders:
 
As soon as available and in any event within five (5) Business Days after the same is required to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (but in no event later than forty-five (45) days after the end of each of the first, second and third fiscal quarters of the Parent), the unaudited consolidated balance sheet of the Parent and its Subsidiaries as at the end of such period and the related unaudited consolidated income statement and statement of cash flows of the Parent and its Subsidiaries for such period, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures as of the end of and for the corresponding periods of the previous fiscal year, all of which shall be certified by the chief executive officer or chief financial officer of the Parent, in his or her opinion, to present fairly, in accordance with GAAP and in all material respects, the consolidated financial position of the Parent and its Subsidiaries as at the date thereof and the results of operations for such period (subject to normal year-end audit adjustments).
 
As soon as available and in any event within five (5) Business Days after the same is required to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (but in no event later than ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year of the Parent), the audited consolidated balance sheet of the Parent and its Subsidiaries as at the end of such fiscal year and the related audited consolidated income statement and statement of cash flows and statement of stockholders' equity of the Parent and its Subsidiaries for such fiscal year, setting forth in comparative form the figures as at the end of and for the previous fiscal year, all of which shall be (a) certified by the chief executive officer or chief financial officer of the Parent, in his or her opinion, to present fairly, in accordance with GAAP and in all material respects, the financial position of the Parent and its Subsidiaries as at the date thereof and the result of operations for such period and (b) accompanied by the report thereon of independent certified public accountants of recognized national standing reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent, whose report shall be unqualified and in scope and substance satisfactory to the Requisite Lenders and who shall have authorized the Parent to deliver such financial statements and report thereon to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders pursuant to this Agreement.
 
At the time the financial statements are furnished pursuant to Sections 9.1. and 9.2., a certificate substantially in the form of Exhibit K (a "") executed on behalf of the Borrower by the chief financial officer of the Parent (a) setting forth in reasonable detail as of the end of such quarterly accounting period or fiscal year, as the case may be, the calculations required to establish whether the Borrower was in compliance with the covenants contained in Section 10.1.; (b) stating that no
Compliance Certificate
 
Default or Event of Default exists, or, if such is not the case, specifying such Default or Event of Default and its nature, when it occurred and the steps being taken by the Loan Parties with respect to such event, condition or failure; (c) a statement of Funds From Operations for such quarterly accounting period or fiscal year, as the case may be; and (d) a report of newly acquired Properties of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries of the Borrower, including, with respect to each Property, the Net Operating Income, purchase price and Mortgage debt, if any.
 
(a) Promptly upon receipt thereof, copies of all reports, if any, submitted to the Parent's Board of Directors by its independent public accountants including, without limitation, any management report;
(b) Within five (5) Business Days of the filing thereof, copies of all registration statements (excluding the exhibits thereto (unless requested by the Administrative Agent) and any registration statements on Form S-8 or its equivalent), reports on Forms 10-K, 10-Q and 8-K (or their equivalents) and all other periodic reports which any Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower shall file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (or any Governmental Authority substituted therefor) or any national securities exchange;
(c) Promptly upon the mailing thereof to the shareholders of the Parent generally, copies of all financial statements, reports and proxy statements so mailed and promptly upon the issuance thereof copies of all press releases issued by the Parent, the Borrower, any Subsidiary of the Borrower or any other Loan Party;
(d) No later than thirty (30) days before the end of each fiscal year of the Parent ending prior to the Revolving Termination Date, projected balance sheets, operating statements, profit and loss projections and cash flow budgets of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis for each quarter of the next succeeding fiscal year, all itemized in reasonable detail;
(e) If any ERISA Event shall occur that individually, or together with any other ERISA Event that has occurred, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, a certificate of the chief executive officer or chief financial officer of the Parent setting forth details as to such occurrence and the action, if any, which the Parent or applicable member of the ERISA Group is required or proposes to take;
(f) To the extent the Borrower has knowledge of the same, prompt notice of the commencement of any proceeding or investigation by or before any Governmental Authority and any action or proceeding in any court or other tribunal or before any arbitrator against or in any other way relating to, or affecting, the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any Subsidiary of the Borrower or any of their respective properties, assets or businesses which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, and prompt notice of the receipt of notice that any United States income tax returns of the Parent, the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower are being audited;
(g) A copy of any amendment to the certificate or articles of incorporation or formation, bylaws, partnership agreement or other similar organizational documents of the Parent, the Borrower, any other Loan Party within twenty (20) Business Days after the approval thereof by the General Partner or Manager thereof, or if later, the effectiveness thereof;
(h) Prompt notice of (i) any change in the executive senior management of the Parent (ii) any material change in the overall business, assets, liabilities, financial condition, results of operations or
 
business prospects of the Parent, the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Parent or (iii) the occurrence of any other event which, in the case of any of the immediately preceding clauses (i) through (iii), has had, or could reasonably be expected to have, a Material Adverse Effect;
(i) Promptly after a Responsible Officer of Borrower has knowledge thereof, notice of the occurrence of any Default or Event of Default or any event which constitutes or which with the passage of time, the giving of notice, or otherwise, would constitute a material default or event of default by the Parent, the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Parent under any Material Contract to which any such Person is a party or by which any such Person or any of its respective properties may be bound;
(j) [RESERVED];
(k) Prompt notice of any order, judgment or decree in excess of $10,000,000 having been entered against the Parent, the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower or any of their respective properties or assets;
(l) Within thirty (30) days after a Responsible Officer has knowledge thereof, any written notification of a material violation of any Applicable Law shall have been received by the Borrower or any other Loan Party from any Governmental Authority which violation, if proven, could reasonably be expected to cause a Material Adverse Effect;
(m) Prompt notice of the acquisition, incorporation or other creation of any Material Subsidiary of the Borrower, the purpose for such Subsidiary, the nature of the assets and liabilities thereof and whether such Subsidiary is a Wholly Owned Subsidiary of the Borrower;
(n) Promptly upon the request of the Administrative Agent, evidence of the Borrower's calculation of the Ownership Share with respect to a Subsidiary or an Unconsolidated Affiliate, such evidence to be in form and detail reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent;
(o) Promptly, upon any change in the Borrower's Credit Rating, a certificate stating that the Borrower's Credit Rating has changed and the new Credit Rating that is in effect;
(p) Promptly, upon each request, such information identifying the Parent, the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Parent as a Lender may reasonably request in order to comply with the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001));
(q) Promptly, and in any event within ten (10) Business Days after a Responsible Officer of the Borrower obtains knowledge thereof, written notice of the occurrence of any of the following: (i) the Borrower or any other Loan Party shall receive written notice that any violation of or noncompliance with any Environmental Law has or may have been committed or is threatened; (ii) the Borrower or any other Loan Party shall receive written notice that any administrative or judicial complaint, order or petition has been filed or other proceeding has been initiated, or is about to be filed or initiated against any such Person alleging any violation of, noncompliance with or liability under any Environmental Law or requiring any such Person to take any action in connection with the release or threatened release of Hazardous Materials; (iii) the Parent, the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Parent shall receive any notice from a Governmental Authority alleging that any such Person may be liable or responsible for any costs associated with a response to, or remediation or cleanup of, a release or threatened release of Hazardous Materials or any damages caused thereby; and the matters covered by notices referred to in any of the immediately preceding clauses (i) through (iii), whether individually or in the aggregate, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; and
 
(r) From time to time and promptly upon each request, such data, certificates, reports, statements, documents or further information regarding any Property or the business, assets, liabilities, financial condition, results of operations or business prospects of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request.
 
(a) Documents required to be delivered pursuant to the Loan Documents shall be delivered by electronic communication and delivery, including, the Internet, e-mail or intranet websites to which the Administrative Agent and each Lender have access (including a commercial, third-party website such as <> or a website sponsored or hosted by the Administrative Agent, the Parent or the Borrower) provided that the foregoing shall not apply to (i) notices to any Lender (or any Issuing Bank) pursuant to Article II. and (ii) any Lender that has notified the Administrative Agent, the Parent and the Borrower that it cannot or does not want to receive electronic communications, (iii) notices of Default or Event of Default. The Administrative Agent, the Parent or the Borrower may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic delivery pursuant to procedures approved by it for all or particular notices or communications. Documents or notices delivered electronically shall be deemed to have been delivered twenty-four (24) hours after the date and time on which the Administrative Agent, the Parent or the Borrower posts such documents or the documents become available on a commercial website and the Administrative Agent, the Parent or Borrower notifies each Lender of said posting and provides a link thereto provided if such notice or other communication is not sent or posted during the normal business hours of the recipient, said posting date and time shall be deemed to have commenced as of 11:00 a.m. Central time on the opening of business on the next business day for the recipient. Notwithstanding anything contained herein, in every instance the Parent or the Borrower shall be required to provide paper copies of the certificate required by Section 9.3. to the Administrative Agent and shall deliver paper copies of any documents to the Administrative Agent until a written request to cease delivering paper copies is given by the Administrative Agent. Except for the certificates required by Section 9.3., the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to request the delivery of or to maintain paper copies of the documents delivered electronically, and in any event shall have no responsibility to monitor compliance by the Borrower with any such request for delivery. Each Lender shall be solely responsible for requesting delivery to it of paper copies and maintaining its paper or electronic documents.
www.sec.gov
http://www.sec.gov
(b) Documents required to be delivered pursuant to Article II. may be delivered electronically to a website provided for such purpose by the Administrative Agent pursuant to the procedures provided to the Parent and the Borrower by the Administrative Agent.
 
The Borrower shall cooperate with the Administrative Agent in connection with the publication of certain materials and/or information provided by or on behalf of the Borrower. Any information or materials delivered pursuant to the Loan Documents will be considered Public Information if they are filed by the Parent with the SEC and are publicly available or are posted on the Parent's website. All other such information and materials will be considered Private Information unless otherwise indicated in writing by Borrower.
 
The USA Patriot Act of 2001 (Public Law 107-56) and federal regulations issued with respect thereto require all financial institutions to obtain, verify and record certain information that identifies individuals or business entities which open an "account" with such financial institution. Consequently, a
 
Lender (for itself and/or as Administrative Agent for all Lenders hereunder) may from time to time request, and the Borrower shall, and shall cause the other Loan Parties to, provide to such Lender, such Loan Party's name, address, tax identification number and/or such other identification information as shall be necessary for such Lender to comply with federal law. An "account" for this purpose may include, without limitation, a deposit account, cash management service, a transaction or asset account, a credit account, a loan or other extension of credit, and/or other financial services product.
For so long as this Agreement is in effect, unless the Requisite Lenders (or, if required pursuant to Section 13.7., all of the Lenders) shall otherwise consent in the manner set forth in Section 13.7., the Parent and the Borrower shall comply with the following covenants:
 
(a) . The Borrower shall not permit the ratio of (i) Total Indebtedness of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries to (ii) Total Asset Value of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries to exceed 0.60 to 1.00 at any time.
Maximum Leverage Ratio
(b) . The Borrower shall not permit the ratio of (i) Adjusted EBITDA of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters most recently ending to (ii) Interest Expense of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for such period, to be less than 2.00 to 1.00 as of the last day of such period.
Minimum Interest Coverage Ratio
(c) . The Borrower shall not permit the ratio of (i) Adjusted EBITDA of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for any period of four consecutive fiscal quarters most recently ending to (ii) Fixed Charges of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for such period, to be less than 1.30 to 1.00 as of the last day of such period.
Ratio of Adjusted EBITDA to Fixed Charges
(d) . The Borrower shall not permit the ratio of (i) Unsecured Indebtedness of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries to (ii) the Unencumbered Asset Value to exceed 0.60 to 1.00 at any time.
Ratio of Unsecured Indebtedness to Unencumbered Asset Value
(e) . The Borrower shall not permit the ratio of (i) Unencumbered NOI of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries for any period of four consecutive fiscal quarters most recently ended to (ii) Unencumbered Pool Debt Service of the Borrower and Subsidiaries for such period to be less than 1.50 as of the last day of such period.
Unencumbered Pool Debt Service Coverage
(f) . The Borrower shall not permit Tangible Net Worth of the Parent and its Subsidiaries at any time to be less than (i) $503,291,000 (ii) 80% of the Net Proceeds of all Equity Issuances effected at any time after March 31, 2012 by the Parent or any of its Subsidiaries to any Person other than the Parent, the Borrower, or any of the Parent's Wholly Owned Subsidiaries.
Minimum Tangible Net Worth
plus
(g) . The Borrower shall not permit:
Unencumbered Asset Value
(i) the weighted average aggregate Occupancy Rate (weighted on the basis of aggregate square footage) of all Properties included in the Unencumbered Asset Value to be less than 80% at any time; , the Borrower may, at any time, designate (by written notice to the Administrative Agent) any Property to be excluded from the group of Properties included in the calculation of the Unencumbered Asset Value (i) so long as (x) immediately
provided that
 
before and after giving effect to such designation, the Borrower shall be in compliance with subclauses (ii), (iii) and (iv) of this clause (g) immediately after giving effect thereto and no Default or Event of Default (other than a Default or Event of Default related solely to this clause (i)) shall have occurred and be continuing and (ii) immediately after giving effect to such designation, the Borrower shall be in compliance with the covenants set forth in Section 10.1. on a pro forma basis in accordance with Section 1.4. (and upon the reasonable request of the Administrative Agent the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent a certificate setting forth in reasonable detail the calculations demonstrating such compliance);
(ii) the Unencumbered Asset Value attributable to any single Property to exceed 35% of the aggregate Unencumbered Asset Value at any time; , , that any such excess shall be excluded from the calculation of Unencumbered Asset Value but existence of such excess shall not otherwise constitute a breach under this Section 10.1.(g)(ii);
provided
however
(iii) there to be less than twelve (12) Properties included in the Unencumbered Asset Value at any time; or
(iv) the Unencumbered Asset Value to be less than $200,000,000 at any time.
Subject to the requirements set forth in the preceding provisions of this subsection (g), the Borrower may, at any time, designate (by written notice to the Administrative Agent) any Eligible Property to be included in or excluded from the group of Eligible Properties included in the calculation of Unencumbered Asset Value so long as (i) immediately before and after giving effect to such designation, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing and (ii) immediately after giving effect to such designation, the Borrower shall be in compliance with the covenants set forth in Section 10.1. on a pro forma basis in accordance with Section 1.4. (and upon the reasonable request of the Administrative Agent the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent a certificate setting forth in reasonable detail the calculations demonstrating such compliance).
(h) . The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary of the Borrower to, incur, assume or suffer to exist Indebtedness which is not both (x) Indebtedness other than Floating Rate Indebtedness and (y) Indebtedness with an original term to maturity in excess of five (5) years, in an aggregate outstanding principal amount in excess of 40% of Total Indebtedness at any time.
Fixed Rate Indebtedness
(i) . The Borrower shall not permit the aggregate Adjusted Total Asset Value attributable to assets directly or indirectly owned by the Borrower and the Guarantors to be less than 90% of the Adjusted Total Asset Value at any time.
Adjusted Total Asset Value
(j) . If a Default or Event of Default specified in Section 11.1.(a), Section 11.1.(f) or Section 11.1.(g) shall exist, or if as a result of the occurrence of any other Event of Default any of the Obligations have been accelerated pursuant to Section 11.2.(a), the Borrower shall not make any Restricted Payments and shall not permit any Subsidiary of the Borrower to make any Restricted Payments to any Person other than to the Borrower.
Restricted Payments after Certain Defaults, Acceleration
 
(a) The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary of the Borrower (other than an Excluded Subsidiary) to, create, assume, or incur any Lien (other than Permitted Liens, the Permitted Ground Lease Encumbrance and Liens securing Indebtedness not prohibited under the Loan Documents) upon any of its material properties, assets, income or profits of any character whether now owned or
 
hereafter acquired if immediately prior to the creation, assumption or incurring of such Lien, or immediately thereafter, a Default or Event of Default is or would be in existence, including without limitation, a Default or Event of Default resulting from a violation of any of the covenants contained in Section 10.1.
(b) The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary of the Borrower (other than an Excluded Subsidiary) to, enter into, assume or otherwise be bound by any Negative Pledge except for a Negative Pledge contained in (i) an agreement (x) evidencing Indebtedness which the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Borrower is not prohibited from creating, incurring, assuming, or permitting or suffering to exist under this Agreement, (y) which Indebtedness is secured by a Lien not prohibited under the Loan Documents, and (z) which prohibits the creation of any other Lien on only the property securing such Indebtedness as of the date such agreement was entered into; or (ii) an agreement relating to the sale of a Subsidiary or assets pending such sale, provided that in any such case the Negative Pledge applies only to the Subsidiary or the assets that are the subject of such sale.
 
The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary of the Borrower (other than an Excluded Subsidiary) to, create or otherwise cause or suffer to exist or become effective any consensual encumbrance or restriction of any kind on the ability of any Subsidiary to: (a) pay dividends or make any other distribution on any of such Subsidiary's capital stock or other equity interests owned by the Parent, the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Borrower; (b) pay any Indebtedness owed to the Parent, the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Borrower; (c) make loans or advances to the Parent, the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Parent; or (d) transfer any of its property or assets to the Parent, the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Parent; other than (i) with respect to clauses (a) through (d) those encumbrances or restrictions contained in any Loan Document or, (ii) with respect to clause (d), customary provisions restricting assignment of any agreement entered into by the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Borrower in the ordinary course of business.
 
The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary of the Borrower (other than an Excluded Subsidiary) to, (a) enter into any transaction of merger or consolidation; (b) liquidate, windup or dissolve itself (or suffer any liquidation or dissolution); (c) convey, sell, lease, sublease, transfer or otherwise dispose of, in one transaction or a series of transactions, all or any substantial part of its business or assets, or the capital stock of or other Equity Interests in any of its Subsidiaries, whether now owned or hereafter acquired; or (d) acquire a Substantial Amount of the assets of, or make an Investment of a Substantial Amount in, any other Person; provided, however, that:
(i) any Subsidiary of the Parent may merge with a Loan Party so long as such Loan Party is the survivor;
(ii) any Subsidiary of the Parent may sell, transfer or dispose of its assets to a Loan Party;
(iii) any Subsidiary of the Parent (other than the Borrower) may convey, sell, transfer or otherwise dispose of, in one transaction or a series of transactions, all or any substantial part of its business or assets, or the capital stock of or other Equity Interests in any of its Subsidiaries, and may thereafter liquidate, provided that immediately prior to any such conveyance, sale, transfer, disposition or liquidation and immediately thereafter and after giving effect thereto, no Default or Event of Default is or would be in existence;
 
(iv) any Loan Party and any other Subsidiary may, directly or indirectly, (A) acquire (whether by purchase, acquisition of Equity Interests of a Person, or as a result of a merger or consolidation) a Substantial Amount of the assets of, or make an Investment of a Substantial Amount in, any other Person and (B) sell, lease or otherwise transfer, whether by one or a series of transactions, a Substantial Amount of assets (including capital stock or other securities of Subsidiaries) to any other Person, so long as, in each case, (1) the Borrower shall have given the Administrative Agent and the Lenders at least thirty (30) days prior written notice of such consolidation, merger, acquisition, Investment, sale, lease or other transfer; (2) immediately prior thereto, and immediately thereafter and after giving effect thereto, no Default or Event of Default is or would be in existence, including, without limitation, a Default or Event of Default resulting from a breach of Section 10.1.; (3) in the case of a consolidation or merger involving the Parent or the Borrower, the Parent or the Borrower, as applicable, shall be the survivor thereof and (4) at the time the Borrower gives notice pursuant to clause (1) of this subsection, the Borrower shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent for distribution to each of the Lenders a Compliance Certificate, calculated on a pro forma basis, evidencing the continued compliance by the Borrower or the Parent, as applicable, with the financial covenants contained in Section 10.1., after giving effect to such consolidation, merger, acquisition, Investment, sale, lease or other transfer; and
(v) the Borrower, the other Loan Parties and the other Subsidiaries of the Borrower may lease and sublease their respective assets, as lessor or sublessor (as the case may be), in the ordinary course of their business.
 
The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower to, permit any of its respective assets to become or be deemed to be "plan assets" within the meaning of ERISA, the Internal Revenue Code and the respective regulations promulgated thereunder.
 
The Parent and the Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any other Loan Party or other Subsidiary of the Borrower to, change its fiscal year from that in effect as of the Agreement Date.
 
The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower to, amend, supplement, restate or otherwise modify its certificate or articles of incorporation or formation, by-laws, operating agreement, declaration of trust, partnership agreement or other applicable organizational document if such amendment, supplement, restatement or other modification (a) is materially adverse to the interest of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks or the Lenders, in each case in their role as such, or (b) could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. The Borrower shall not enter into, and shall not permit any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower to enter into, any amendment or modification to any Material Contract which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect or default in the performance of any obligations of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower in any Material Contract or permit any Material Contract to be canceled or terminated prior to its stated maturity if such default or cancellation could reasonably be expected to cause a Material Adverse Effect.
 
Except as provided in Sections 10.1.(j) and 11.1.(q), the Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary of the Borrower to, prepay any principal of, or accrued interest on, any Subordinated Debt or otherwise make any voluntary or optional payment with respect to any principal of, or accrued interest on, any Subordinated Debt prior to the originally scheduled due date thereof or otherwise redeem or acquire for value any Subordinated Debt. Further, the Parent and the Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any other Loan Party or other Subsidiary of the Parent to, amend or modify, or permit the amendment or modification of, any agreement or instrument evidencing any Subordinated Debt where such amendment or modification provides for the following or which has any of the following effects:
(a) increases the rate of interest accruing on such Subordinated Debt;
(b) increases the amount of any scheduled installment of principal or interest, or shortens the date on which any such installment or principal or interest becomes due;
(c) shortens the final maturity date of such Subordinated Debt;
(d) increases the principal amount of such Subordinated Debt;
(e) amends any financial or other covenant contained in any document or instrument evidencing any Subordinated Debt in a manner which is more onerous to the Borrower or such Subsidiary or which requires the Borrower or such Subsidiary to improve its financial performance;
(f) provides for the payment of additional material fees or the increase in existing fees; and/or
(g) otherwise could reasonably be expected to be materially adverse to the interests of the Administrative Agent or the Lenders.
 
The Borrower shall not permit to exist or enter into, and shall not permit any Subsidiary of the Borrower to permit to exist or enter into, any transaction (including the purchase, sale, lease or exchange of any property or the rendering of any service) with any Affiliate, other than the Borrower or a Wholly Owned Subsidiary of the Borrower, except (a) as set forth on Schedule 7.1.(r), (b) compensation, bonus and benefit arrangements with employees and officers, directors and trustees as permitted by Applicable Law, and (c) transactions in the ordinary course of and pursuant to the reasonable requirements of the business of the Borrower, or such Subsidiary of the Borrower and upon fair and reasonable terms which are no less favorable to the Borrower, or such Subsidiary of the Borrower than would be obtained in a comparable arm's length transaction with a Person that is not an Affiliate. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no payments may be made with respect to any items set forth on such Schedule 7.1.(r) if a Default or Event of Default exists or would result therefrom.
 
The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary of the Borrower to, use, generate, discharge, emit, manufacture, handle, process, store, release, transport, remove, dispose of or clean up any Hazardous Materials on, under or from the Properties in material violation of any Environmental Law or in a manner that could reasonably be expected to lead to a Material Adverse Effect. Nothing in this Section shall impose any obligation or liability whatsoever on the Administrative Agent or any Lender.
 
The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary of the Borrower to, enter into or become obligated in respect of Derivatives Contracts other than Derivatives Contracts entered into by the Borrower or any such Subsidiary of the Borrower in the ordinary course of business and which establish a hedge that hedges interest rate risk in respect of specific Indebtedness of the Borrower or such Subsidiary of the Borrower, as applicable.
 
Each of the following shall constitute an Event of Default, whatever the reason for such event and whether it shall be voluntary or involuntary or be effected by operation of Applicable Law or pursuant to any judgment or order of any Governmental Authority:
(a) . The Borrower shall fail to pay when due under this Agreement or any other Loan Document (whether upon demand, at maturity, by reason of acceleration or otherwise) the principal of, or any interest on, any of the Loans or any Reimbursement Obligation, or shall fail to pay any of the other payment Obligations owing by the Borrower under this Agreement or any other Loan Document, or any other Loan Party shall fail to pay when due any payment obligation owing by such Loan Party, as applicable, under any Loan Document to which it is a party and, in the case of interest or any payment Obligation other than principal of any Loan prior to the Revolving Termination Date only, such failure shall continue for a period of five (5) days after the due date thereof.
Default in Payment
(b) .
Default in Performance
(i) Any Loan Party shall fail to perform or observe any term, covenant, condition or agreement on its part to be performed or observed and contained in Section 10.1. and such failure shall continue for a period of ten (10) days; or
(ii) Any Loan Party shall fail to perform or observe any term, covenant, condition or agreement contained in this Agreement or any other Loan Document to which it is a party and not otherwise mentioned in this Section, and in the case of this subsection (b)(ii) only, such failure shall continue for a period of thirty (30) days after the earlier of (x) the date upon which a Responsible Officer of the Parent or the Borrower obtains knowledge of such failure or (y) the date upon which the Borrower has received written notice of such failure from the Administrative Agent; or
(iii) Any Loan Party shall fail to perform or observe any term, covenant, condition or agreement set forth in Section 8.9. or 10.10. of this Agreement and in the case of this subsection (b)(iii) only, such failure shall continue for a period of sixty (60) days after the date upon which the Borrower has received written notice of such failure from the Administrative Agent; provided, that in the event such failure is susceptible of cure but is not cured within said sixty (60) days, so long as the Borrower or Subsidiary of Borrower is diligently and continuously pursuing such cure, as evidenced to Administrative Agent's reasonable satisfaction, such cure period shall be extended for an additional one hundred twenty (120) days.
(c) . Any written statement, representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of any Loan Party under this Agreement or under any other Loan Document, or any
Misrepresentations
 
amendment hereto or thereto, or in any other document, certificate or financial statement at any time furnished by, or at the direction of, any Loan Party to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender in connection with the Loan Documents, shall at any time prove to have been incorrect or misleading, in light of the circumstances in which made or deemed made, in any material respect when furnished or made or deemed made.
(d) .
Indebtedness Cross-Default
(i) The Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower shall default, after any applicable notice and cure period, in the payment of principal or interest in respect of any Indebtedness (other than (x) the Loans and Reimbursement Obligations and (y) Nonrecourse Indebtedness) having an aggregate outstanding principal amount (or, in the case of any Derivatives Contract, having, without regard to the effect of any close-out netting provision, a Derivatives Termination Value), in each case individually or in the aggregate with all other Indebtedness as to which such a default exists, of $10,000,000 or more (""); or
Material Indebtedness
(ii) (x) The maturity of any Material Indebtedness shall have been accelerated in accordance with the provisions of any indenture, contract or instrument evidencing, providing for the creation of or otherwise concerning such Material Indebtedness or (y) any Material Indebtedness shall have been required to be prepaid or repurchased prior to the stated maturity thereof, in either case, as a result of an event of default other than one described in subsection (i) of this Section 11.1.(d); or
(iii) There occurs an "Event of Default" under and as defined in any Specified Derivatives Contract as to which the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Borrower is a "Defaulting Party" (as defined therein), as a result of which there occurs an "Early Termination Date" (as defined therein) in respect of any Specified Derivatives Contract as a result of a "Termination Event" (as defined therein) as to which the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries is an "Affected Party" (as defined therein), in each case individually or in the aggregate with all other Specified Derivative Contracts as to which such Events of Default have occurred and are continuing, equals $10,000,000 or more; or
(iv) The Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower shall default, after any applicable notice and cure period, in the payment of principal or interest in respect of any Nonrecourse Indebtedness having an aggregate outstanding principal amount (or, in the case of any Derivatives Contract, having, without regard to the effect of any close-out netting provision, a Derivatives Termination Value), in each case individually or in the aggregate with all other Indebtedness as to which such a default exists, of $50,000,000 or more.
(e) . (x) The Borrower, any other Loan Party or any Material Subsidiary of the Borrower shall: (i) commence a voluntary case under the Bankruptcy Code or other federal bankruptcy laws (as now or hereafter in effect); (ii) file a petition seeking to take advantage of any other Applicable Laws, domestic or foreign, relating to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, winding-up, or composition or adjustment of debts; (iii) consent to, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any petition filed against it in an involuntary case under such bankruptcy laws or other Applicable Laws or consent to any proceeding or action described in the immediately following subsection (f); (iv) apply for or consent to, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, the appointment of, or the taking of possession by, a receiver, custodian, trustee, or liquidator of itself or of a substantial part of its property, domestic or foreign; (v) admit in writing its inability to pay its debts as
Voluntary Bankruptcy Proceeding
 
they become due; or (vi) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors; or (y) the board of directors (or similar governing body) of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any Material Subsidiary of the Borrower or any committee thereof shall adopt any resolution or otherwise authorize any action to approve any of the actions referred to in this clause (e).
(f) . A case or other proceeding shall be commenced against the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any Material Subsidiary of the Borrower in any court of competent jurisdiction seeking: (i) relief under the Bankruptcy Code or other federal bankruptcy laws (as now or hereafter in effect) or under any other Applicable Laws, domestic or foreign, relating to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, winding-up, or composition or adjustment of debts; or (ii) the appointment of a trustee, receiver, custodian, liquidator or the like of such Person, or of all or any substantial part of the assets, domestic or foreign, of such Person, and in the case of either clause (i) or (ii) such case or proceeding shall continue undismissed or unstayed for a period of 60 consecutive days, or an order granting the remedy or other relief requested in such case or proceeding (including, but not limited to, an order for relief under such Bankruptcy Code or such other federal bankruptcy laws) shall be entered.
Involuntary Bankruptcy Proceeding
(g) . Any Loan Party shall (or shall attempt in writing to) disavow, revoke or terminate any Loan Document to which it is a party or shall otherwise challenge or contest in any action, suit or proceeding in any court or before any Governmental Authority the validity or enforceability of any Loan Document or any Loan Document shall cease to be in full force and effect (except as a result of the express terms thereof).
Revocation of Loan Documents
(h) . A judgment or order for the payment of money or for an injunction or other non-monetary relief shall be entered against the Borrower, any other Loan Party, or any other Material Subsidiary of the Borrower by any court or other tribunal and (i) such judgment or order shall continue for a period of thirty (30) days without being paid, stayed or dismissed through appropriate appellate or other judicial proceedings and (ii) either (A) the amount of such judgment or order for which insurance has not been acknowledged in writing by the applicable insurance carrier (or the amount as to which the insurer has denied liability) exceeds, individually or together with all other such judgments or orders entered against the Loan Parties and the Material Subsidiaries of the Borrower, $10,000,000 or (B) in the case of an injunction or other non-monetary relief, such injunction or judgment or order could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Judgment
(i) . A non-appealable warrant, writ of attachment, execution or similar process shall be issued by a court of competent jurisdiction against any property of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Material Subsidiary of the Borrower, which exceeds, individually or together with all other such warrants, writs, executions and processes, $10,000,000 in amount and such warrant, writ, execution or process shall not be paid, discharged, vacated, stayed or bonded for a period of thirty (30) days.
Attachment
(j) .
ERISA
(i) Any ERISA Event shall have occurred that results or could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
(ii) The "benefit obligation" of all Plans, to the extent the Borrower is liable therefor, exceeds the "fair market value of plan assets" for such Plans by an amount, which if paid out by the Borrower, could reasonably be expected to cause a Material Adverse Effect.
 
(k) . There shall occur a Material Adverse Effect with respect to any Loan Party, as determined by the Administrative Agent in its sole discretion exercised in good faith.
Material Adverse Effect
(l) .
Change of Control/Change in Management
(i) Any "person" or "group" (as such terms are used in Sections 13(d) and 14(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "")), other than members of the Saul Family, is or becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rules 13d-3 and 13d-5 under the Exchange Act, except that a Person will be deemed to have "beneficial ownership" of all securities that such Person has the right to acquire, whether such right is exercisable immediately or only after the passage of time), directly or indirectly, of more than 25.0% of the total voting power of the then outstanding voting stock of the Parent;
Exchange Act
(ii) During any period of twelve (12) consecutive months ending after the Agreement Date, individuals who at the beginning of any such 12-month period constituted the Board of Directors of the Parent (together with any new directors whose election by such Board or whose nomination for election by the shareholders of the Parent was approved by a vote of a majority of the directors then still in office who were either directors at the beginning of such period or whose election or nomination for election was previously so approved but excluding any director whose initial nomination for, or assumption of office as, a director occurs as a result of an actual or threatened solicitation of proxies or consents for the election or removal of one or more directors by any person or group other than a solicitation for the election of one or more directors by or on behalf of the Board of Directors) cease for any reason other than the death or incapacity of a director to constitute a majority of the Board of Directors of the Parent then in office;
(iii) The Parent shall cease to own and control, directly or indirectly, at least 51% of the outstanding Equity Interests of the Borrower; or
(iv) The Parent or a Wholly Owned Subsidiary of the Parent shall cease to be the sole general partner of the Borrower or shall cease to have the sole and exclusive power to exercise all management and control over the Borrower.
(m) . The Borrower, any Loan Party or any Subsidiary of the Borrower shall grant, consent to or permit a Lien (other than a Permitted Lien) in respect of, or otherwise encumber, or shall sell, convey or otherwise transfer any Property included in the calculation of Unencumbered Asset Value or any portion thereof (except with respect to any such sale, conveyance or other transfer permitted pursuant to the terms of Sections 8.3., 8.4. or 10.4.) without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent.
Unencumbered Properties
(n) . The Parent shall fail to maintain its status as, and election to be treated as, a REIT under the Internal Revenue Code.
REIT Status
(o) . The Parent shall fail to maintain at least one class of common shares of the Parent having trading privileges on the New York Stock Exchange or the American Stock Exchange or which is subject to price quotations on The NASDAQ Stock Market's National Market System.
Listing of Shares
(p) . The Parent, the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Borrower shall make an Investment in or otherwise own the following items and the effect thereof is to cause the aggregate value of such holdings of such Person in such assets to exceed such percentages set forth below of Total Asset Value of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, at any time (and such condition continues for a period of ten (10) days):
Investments
(i) Investments in Unconsolidated Affiliates, such that the aggregate value of all such Investments (such value to be equal to the lesser of (I) the purchase price paid for such Investment and (II) the Fair Market Value of such Investment) in Unconsolidated Affiliates exceeds 5.0% of Total Asset Value of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries;
 
(ii) Mortgage Receivables in favor of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any Subsidiary of the Borrower, such that the aggregate book value of any such Mortgage Receivable exceeds 5.0% of Total Asset Value of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries;
(iii) Development Properties, such that the value of any such Development Property (such value to be equal to the aggregate amount of all costs incurred and paid by the Borrower or the applicable Subsidiary of the Borrower in connection therewith to date) exceeds 20.0% of Total Asset Value of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries;
(iv) Unimproved Land (which shall not include (x) any Development Property or (y) Unimproved Land acquired within the prior twelve (12) months that will become a Development Property within twelve (12) months of its acquisition) such that the aggregate book value of all such Unimproved Land (such value to be equal to the lesser of (I) the purchase price paid for such acquisition and (II) the Fair Market Value of such real estate) exceeds 10.0% of Total Asset Value of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries; or
(v) Investments of the type subject to limitation under the foregoing clauses (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) in excess of 25% of Total Asset Value of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries.
(q) . The Parent, the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Borrower shall declare or make any Restricted Payment, other than any of the following Restricted Payments so long as no Default or Event of Default would result therefrom (and such declaration or payment of the Restricted Payment has not been rescinded, returned, unwound or otherwise cancelled for a period of ten (10) days):
Dividends and Other Restricted Payments
(i) the Borrower may pay cash dividends or distributions to the Parent and other holders of partnership interests in the Borrower with respect to any fiscal year ending during the term of this Agreement to the extent necessary for the Parent to distribute, and the Parent may so distribute, cash dividends to its shareholders in an aggregate amount not to exceed the greater of (a) the amount required to be distributed for the Parent to remain qualified as a REIT for federal income tax purposes, or (b) 90% of Funds From Operations;
(ii) the Borrower may pay cash dividends or distributions to the Parent and other holders of partnership interests in the Borrower with respect to any fiscal year ending during the term of this Agreement to the extent necessary for the Parent to distribute, and the Parent may so distribute cash distributions to its shareholders of capital gains resulting from gains from certain asset sales to the extent necessary to avoid payment of taxes on such asset sales imposed under Sections 857(b)(3) and 4981 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(iii) a Subsidiary that is not a Wholly Owned Subsidiary may make cash distributions (ratably in accordance with the percentage of Equity Interests held) to holders of Equity Interests issued by such Subsidiary; and
 
(iv) Subsidiaries may pay Restricted Payments to the Borrower or any other Loan Party;
provided, however, and subject to the provisions of Section 10.1.(j), if a Default or Event of Default exists, the Borrower may only declare and make cash distributions to the Parent and other holders of partnership interests in the Borrower with respect to any fiscal year to the extent necessary for the Parent to distribute, and the Parent may so distribute, an aggregate amount not to exceed the minimum amount necessary for the Parent to remain qualified as a REIT for federal income tax purposes).
 
Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default the following provisions shall apply:
(a) .
Acceleration; Termination of Facilities
(i) . Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default specified in Sections 11.1.(e) or 11.1.(f), (1)(A) the principal of, and all accrued interest on, the Loans and the Notes at the time outstanding, (B) an amount equal to the Stated Amount of all Letters of Credit outstanding as of the date of the occurrence of such Event of Default for deposit into the Letter of Credit Collateral Account and (C) all of the other Obligations, including, but not limited to, the other amounts owed to the Lenders and the Administrative Agent under this Agreement, the Notes or any of the other Loan Documents shall become immediately and automatically due and payable without presentment, demand, protest, or other notice of any kind, all of which are expressly waived by the Parent and the Borrower, each on behalf of itself and the other Loan Parties, and (2) the Commitments and the Swingline Commitment and the obligation of the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit hereunder, shall all immediately and automatically terminate.
Automatic
(ii) . If any other Event of Default shall exist, the Administrative Agent may, and at the direction of the Requisite Lenders shall: (1) declare (A) the principal of, and accrued interest on, the Loans and the Notes at the time outstanding, (B) an amount equal to the Stated Amount of all Letters of Credit outstanding as of the date of the occurrence of such Event of Default for deposit into the Letter of Credit Collateral Account and (C) all of the other Obligations, including, but not limited to, the other amounts owed to the Lenders and the Administrative Agent under this Agreement, the Notes or any of the other Loan Documents to be forthwith due and payable, whereupon the same shall immediately become due and payable without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are expressly waived by the Parent and the Borrower, each on behalf of itself and the other Loan Parties, and (2) terminate the Commitments and the Swingline Commitment and the obligation of the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit hereunder.
Optional
(b) . The Requisite Lenders may direct the Administrative Agent to, and the Administrative Agent if so directed shall, exercise any and all of its rights under any and all of the other Loan Documents.
Loan Documents
(c) . The Requisite Lenders may direct the Administrative Agent to, and the Administrative Agent if so directed shall, exercise all other rights and remedies it may have under any Applicable Law.
Applicable Law
(d) . Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement or other Loan Document, each Specified Derivatives Provider shall have the right, with
Specified Derivatives Contract Remedies
 
prompt notice to the Administrative Agent, but without the approval or consent of or other action by the Administrative Agent or the Lenders, and without limitation of other remedies available to such Specified Derivatives Provider under contract or Applicable Law, to undertake any of the following: (a) to declare an event of default, termination event or other similar event under any Specified Derivatives Contract and to create an "Early Termination Date" (as defined therein) in respect thereof, (b) to determine net termination amounts in respect of any and all Specified Derivatives Contracts in accordance with the terms thereof, and to set off amounts among such contracts, (c) to set off or proceed against deposit account balances, securities account balances and other property and amounts held by such Specified Derivatives Provider pursuant to any Derivatives Support Document, including any "Posted Collateral" (as defined in any credit support annex included in any such Derivatives Support Document to which such Specified Derivatives Provider may be a party), and (d) to prosecute any legal action against the Borrower, any Loan Party or other Subsidiary to enforce or collect net amounts owing to such Specified Derivatives Provider pursuant to any Specified Derivatives Contract. For the avoidance of doubt, none of the events or remedies described above shall by itself constitute a Default or Event of Default hereunder.
 
Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default specified in Section 11.1.(f), the Commitments shall immediately and automatically terminate.
 
None of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender or any Specified Derivatives Provider shall be under any obligation to marshal any assets in favor of any Loan Party or any other party or against or in payment of any or all of the Obligations or the Specified Derivatives Obligations. To the extent that any Loan Party makes a payment or payments to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender or any Specified Derivatives Provider, or the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender or any Specified Derivatives Provider enforce their security interests or exercise their rights of setoff, and such payment or payments or the proceeds of such enforcement or setoff or any part thereof are subsequently invalidated, declared to be fraudulent or preferential, set aside and/or required to be repaid to a trustee, receiver or any other party under any bankruptcy law, state or federal law, common law or equitable cause, then to the extent of such recovery, the Obligations or Specified Derivatives Obligations, or part thereof originally intended to be satisfied, and all Liens, rights and remedies therefor, shall be revived and continued in full force and effect as if such payment had not been made or such enforcement or setoff had not occurred.
 
If an Event of Default exists, all payments received by the Administrative Agent under any of the Loan Documents, in respect of any principal of or interest on the Obligations or any other amounts payable by the Borrower hereunder or thereunder, shall be applied in the following order and priority:
(a) amounts due to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders in respect of expenses due under Section 13.2. until paid in full, and then Fees;
(b) payments of interest on Swingline Loans;
(c) payments of interest on all other Loans and Reimbursement Obligations to be applied for the ratable benefit of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks;
(d) payments of principal of Swingline Loans;
 
(e) payments of principal of all other Loans, Reimbursement Obligations and other Letter of Credit Liabilities, to be applied for the ratable benefit of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, in such order and priority as the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, may determine in their sole discretion; provided, however, to the extent that any amounts available for distribution pursuant to this subsection are attributable to the issued but undrawn amount of an outstanding Letter of Credit, such amounts shall be paid to the Administrative Agent for deposit into the Letter of Credit Collateral Account;
(f) amounts due to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders pursuant to Sections 12.6. and 13.10.;
(g) payments of all other Obligations and other amounts due under any of the Loan Documents, if any, to be applied for the ratable benefit of the Lenders; and
(h) any amount remaining after application as provided above, shall be paid to the Borrower or whomever else may be legally entitled thereto.
 
(a) As collateral security for the prompt payment in full when due of all Letter of Credit Liabilities and the other Obligations, the Borrower hereby pledges and grants to the Administrative Agent, for the ratable benefit of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders as provided herein, a security interest in all of its right, title and interest in and to the Letter of Credit Collateral Account and the balances from time to time in the Letter of Credit Collateral Account (including the investments and reinvestments therein provided for below). The balances from time to time in the Letter of Credit Collateral Account shall not constitute payment of any Letter of Credit Liabilities until applied by the applicable Issuing Bank as provided herein. Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, funds held in the Letter of Credit Collateral Account shall be subject to withdrawal only as provided in this Section.
(b) Amounts on deposit in the Letter of Credit Collateral Account shall be invested and reinvested by the Administrative Agent in such Cash Equivalents as the Administrative Agent shall determine in its sole discretion. All such investments and reinvestments shall be held in the name of and be under the sole dominion and control of the Administrative Agent for the ratable benefit of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders; , that all earnings on such investments will be credited to and retained in the Letter of Credit Collateral Account. The Administrative Agent shall exercise reasonable care in the custody and preservation of any funds held in the Letter of Credit Collateral Account and shall be deemed to have exercised such care if such funds are accorded treatment substantially equivalent to that which the Administrative Agent accords other funds deposited with the Administrative Agent, it being understood that the Administrative Agent shall not have any responsibility for taking any necessary steps to preserve rights against any parties with respect to any funds held in the Letter of Credit Collateral Account.
provided
(c) If a drawing pursuant to any Letter of Credit occurs on or prior to the expiration date of such Letter of Credit, the Borrower and the Lenders authorize the Administrative Agent to use the monies deposited in the Letter of Credit Collateral Account to reimburse the applicable Issuing Bank for the payment made by such Issuing Bank to the beneficiary with respect to such drawing or the payee with respect to such presentment.
(d) If an Event of Default exists, the Administrative Agent may (and, if instructed by the Requisite Lenders shall, in its further discretion), at any time and from time to time elect to liquidate any such investments and reinvestments and apply the proceeds thereof to the Obligations in accordance with Section 11.5.
 
(e) So long as no Default or Event of Default exists, and to the extent amounts on deposit in or credited to the Letter of Credit Collateral Account exceed the aggregate amount of the Letter of Credit Liabilities then due and owing, the Administrative Agent shall, from time to time, at the request of the Borrower, deliver to the Borrower within ten (10) Business Days after the Administrative Agent's receipt of such request from the Borrower, against receipt but without any recourse, warranty or representation whatsoever, such of amount of the credit balances in the Letter of Credit Collateral Account as exceeds the aggregate amount of Letter of Credit Liabilities at such time. When all of the Obligations shall have been indefeasibly paid in full and no Letters of Credit remain outstanding, the Administrative Agent shall deliver to the Borrower, against receipt but without any recourse, warranty or representation whatsoever, the balances remaining in the Letter of Credit Collateral Account.
(f) The Borrower shall pay to the Administrative Agent from time to time such fees as the Administrative Agent normally charges for similar services in connection with the Administrative Agent's administration of the Letter of Credit Collateral Account and investments and reinvestments of funds therein.
 
If at any time after acceleration of the maturity of the Loans and the other Obligations, the Borrower shall pay all arrears of interest and all payments on account of principal of the Obligations which shall have become due otherwise than by acceleration (with interest on principal and, to the extent permitted by Applicable Law, on overdue interest, at the rates specified in this Agreement) and all Events of Default and Defaults (other than nonpayment of principal of and accrued interest on the Obligations due and payable solely by virtue of acceleration) shall become remedied or waived to the satisfaction of the Requisite Lenders, then by written notice to the Borrower, the Requisite Lenders may elect, in the sole discretion of such Requisite Lenders, to rescind and annul the acceleration and its consequences. The provisions of the preceding sentence are intended merely to bind all of the Lenders to a decision which may be made at the election of the Requisite Lenders, and are not intended to benefit the Borrower and do not give the Borrower the right to require the Lenders to rescind or annul any acceleration hereunder, even if the conditions set forth herein are satisfied.
 
The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks, the Lenders and the Specified Derivatives Providers under this Agreement, each of the other Loan Documents and Specified Derivatives Contracts shall be cumulative and not exclusive of any rights or remedies which any of them may otherwise have under Applicable Law. In exercising their respective rights and remedies the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks, the Lenders and the Specified Derivatives Providers may be selective and no failure or delay by the Administrative Agent, any of the Issuing Banks, any of the Lenders or any of the Specified Derivatives Providers in exercising any right shall operate as a waiver of it, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any power or right preclude its other or further exercise or the exercise of any other power or right.
 
 
Each Lender hereby irrevocably appoints and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such action as contractual representative on such Lender's behalf and to exercise such powers under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents as are specifically delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms hereof and thereof, together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. Not in limitation of the foregoing, each Lender authorizes and directs the Administrative Agent to enter into the Loan Documents for the benefit of the Lenders. Each Lender hereby agrees that, except as otherwise set forth herein, any action taken by the Requisite Lenders in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement or the Loan Documents, and the exercise by the Requisite Lenders of the powers set forth herein or therein, together with such other powers as are reasonably incidental thereto, shall be authorized and binding upon all of the Lenders. Nothing herein shall be construed to deem the Administrative Agent a trustee or fiduciary for any Lender or to impose on the Administrative Agent duties or obligations other than those expressly provided for herein. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the use of the terms "Agent," "Administrative Agent," "agent" and similar terms in the Loan Documents with reference to the Administrative Agent is not intended to connote any fiduciary or other implied (or express) obligations arising under agency doctrine of any Applicable Law. Instead, use of such terms is merely a matter of market custom, and is intended to create or reflect only an administrative relationship between independent contracting parties. The Administrative Agent shall deliver to each Lender, promptly upon receipt thereof by the Administrative Agent, copies of each of the financial statements, certificates, notices and other documents delivered to the Administrative Agent pursuant to Article IX. that the Borrower is not otherwise required to deliver directly to the Lenders. The Administrative Agent will furnish to any Lender, upon the request of such Lender, a copy (or, where appropriate, an original) of any document, instrument, agreement, certificate or notice furnished to the Administrative Agent by the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Affiliate of the Borrower, pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document not already delivered to such Lender pursuant to the terms of this Agreement or any such other Loan Document. As to any matters not expressly provided for by the Loan Documents (including, without limitation, enforcement or collection of any of the Obligations), the Administrative Agent shall not be required to exercise any discretion or take any action, but shall be required to act or to refrain from acting (and shall be fully protected in so acting or refraining from acting) upon the instructions of the Requisite Lenders (or all of the Lenders if explicitly required under any other provision of this Agreement), and such instructions shall be binding upon all Lenders and all holders of any of the Obligations; provided, however, that, notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, the Administrative Agent shall not be required to take any action which exposes the Administrative Agent to personal liability or which is contrary to this Agreement or any other Loan Document or Applicable Law. Not in limitation of the foregoing, the Administrative Agent may exercise any right or remedy it or the Lenders may have under any Loan Document upon the occurrence of a Default or an Event of Default unless the Requisite Lenders have directed the Administrative Agent otherwise. Without limiting the foregoing, no Lender shall have any right of action whatsoever against the Administrative Agent as a result of the Administrative Agent acting or refraining from acting under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents in accordance with the instructions of the Requisite Lenders, or where applicable, all the Lenders.
 
Wells Fargo, as a Lender or as a Specified Derivatives Provider, as the case may be, shall have the same rights and powers under this Agreement and any other Loan Document and under any Specified Derivatives Contract, as the case may be, as any other Lender or Specified Derivatives Provider and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent; and the term "Lender" or "Lenders" shall, unless otherwise expressly indicated, include Wells Fargo in each case in its individual capacity. Wells Fargo and its Affiliates may each accept deposits from, maintain deposits or credit balances for,
 
invest in, lend money to, act as trustee under indentures of, serve as financial advisor to, and generally engage in any kind of business with the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Affiliate thereof as if it were any other bank and without any duty to account therefor to any other Issuing Banks, other Lenders, or any other Specified Derivatives Providers. Further, the Administrative Agent and any Affiliate may accept fees and other consideration from the Borrower for services in connection with this Agreement or any Specified Derivatives Contract, or otherwise without having to account for the same to the other Issuing Banks, the other Lenders or any other Specified Derivatives Providers. The Issuing Banks and the Lenders acknowledge that, pursuant to such activities, Wells Fargo or its Affiliates may receive information regarding the Borrower, other Loan Parties, other Subsidiaries and other Affiliates (including information that may be subject to confidentiality obligations in favor of such Person) and acknowledge that the Administrative Agent shall be under no obligation to provide such information to them.
 
All communications from the Administrative Agent to any Lender requesting such Lender's determination, consent, approval or disapproval (a) shall be given in the form of a written notice to such Lender, (b) shall be accompanied by a description of the matter or issue as to which such determination, approval, consent or disapproval is requested, or shall advise such Lender where information, if any, regarding such matter or issue may be inspected, or shall otherwise describe the matter or issue to be resolved, (c) shall include, if reasonably requested by such Lender and to the extent not previously provided to such Lender, written materials and, as appropriate, a brief summary of all oral information provided to the Administrative Agent by the Borrower in respect of the matter or issue to be resolved, and (d) shall include the Administrative Agent's recommended course of action or determination in respect thereof. Unless a Lender shall give written notice to the Administrative Agent that it specifically objects to the recommendation or determination of the Administrative Agent within ten (10) Business Days (or such lesser or greater period as may be specifically required under the express terms of the Loan Documents) of receipt of such communication, such Lender shall be deemed to have conclusively approved of or consented to such recommendation or determination.
 
The Administrative Agent shall not be deemed to have knowledge or notice of the occurrence of a Default or Event of Default unless the Administrative Agent has received notice from a Lender or the Borrower referring to this Agreement, describing with reasonable specificity such Default or Event of Default and stating that such notice is a "notice of default." If any Lender (excluding the Lender which is also serving as the Administrative Agent) becomes aware of any Default or Event of Default, it shall promptly send to the Administrative Agent such a "notice of default." Further, if the Administrative Agent receives such a "notice of default," the Administrative Agent shall give prompt notice thereof to the Lenders.
 
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Agreement or any other Loan Documents, neither the Administrative Agent nor any of its directors, officers, agents, employees or counsel shall be liable for any action taken or not taken by it under or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document, except for its or their own gross negligence or willful misconduct in connection with its duties expressly set forth herein or therein as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in a final non-appealable judgment. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (including its own counsel or counsel for the Borrower or any other Loan Party), independent public accountants and other experts selected by it and shall not be liable for any
 
action taken or omitted to be taken in good faith by it in accordance with the advice of such counsel, accountants or experts. Neither the Administrative Agent nor any of its directors, officers, agents, employees or counsel: (a) makes any warranty or representation to any Lender, any Issuing Bank or any other Person, or shall be responsible to any Lender, any Issuing Bank or any other Person for any statement, warranty or representation made or deemed made by the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person in or in connection with this Agreement or any other Loan Document; (b) shall have any duty to ascertain or to inquire as to the performance or observance of any of the terms, covenants or conditions of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or the satisfaction of any conditions precedent under this Agreement or any Loan Document on the part of the Borrower or other Persons, or to inspect the property, books or records of the Borrower or any other Person; (c) shall be responsible to any Lender or any Issuing Bank for the due execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of this Agreement or any other Loan Document, any other instrument or document furnished pursuant thereto or any collateral covered thereby or the perfection or priority of any Lien in favor of the Administrative Agent on behalf of the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the Specified Derivatives Providers in any such collateral; (d) shall have any liability in respect of any recitals, statements, certifications, representations or warranties contained in any of the Loan Documents or any other document, instrument, agreement, certificate or statement delivered in connection therewith; and (e) shall incur any liability under or in respect of this Agreement or any other Loan Document by acting upon any notice, consent, certificate or other instrument or writing (which may be by telephone, telecopy or electronic mail) believed by it to be genuine and signed, sent or given by the proper party or parties. The Administrative Agent may execute any of its duties under the Loan Documents by or through agents, employees or attorneys-in-fact and shall not be responsible for the negligence or misconduct of any agent or attorney-in-fact that it selects in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in a final non-appealable judgment.
 
Each Lender agrees to indemnify the Administrative Agent (to the extent not reimbursed by the Borrower and without limiting the obligation of the Borrower to do so) pro rata in accordance with such Lender's respective Pro Rata Share, from and against any and all liabilities, obligations, losses, damages, penalties, actions, judgments, suits, reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses of any kind or nature whatsoever which may at any time be imposed on, incurred by, or asserted against the Administrative Agent (in its capacity as Administrative Agent but not as a Lender) in any way relating to or arising out of the Loan Documents, any transaction contemplated hereby or thereby or any action taken or omitted by the Administrative Agent under the Loan Documents (collectively, ""); provided, however, that no Lender shall be liable for any portion of such Indemnifiable Amounts to the extent resulting from the Administrative Agent's gross negligence or willful misconduct as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in a final, non-appealable judgment; , , that no action taken in accordance with the directions of the Requisite Lenders (or all of the Lenders, if expressly required hereunder) shall be deemed to constitute gross negligence or willful misconduct for purposes of this Section. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, each Lender agrees to reimburse the Administrative Agent (to the extent not reimbursed by the Borrower and without limiting the obligation of the Borrower to do so) promptly upon demand for its ratable share of any out-of-pocket expenses (including the reasonable fees and expenses of the counsel to the Administrative Agent) incurred by the Administrative Agent in connection with the preparation, negotiation, execution, administration, or enforcement (whether through negotiations, legal proceedings, or otherwise) of, or legal advice with respect to the rights or responsibilities of the parties under, the Loan Documents, any suit or action brought by the Administrative Agent to enforce the terms of the Loan Documents and/or collect any Obligations, any "lender liability" suit or claim brought against the Administrative Agent and/or the Lenders, and any claim or suit brought against the Administrative Agent and/or the Lenders arising under any Environmental Laws. Such out-of-pocket expenses (including counsel fees) shall be advanced by the
Indemnifiable Amounts
provided
however
 
Lenders on the request of the Administrative Agent notwithstanding any claim or assertion that the Administrative Agent is not entitled to indemnification hereunder upon receipt of an undertaking by the Administrative Agent that the Administrative Agent will reimburse the Lenders if it is actually and finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction that the Administrative Agent is not so entitled to indemnification. The agreements in this Section shall survive the payment of the Loans and all other amounts payable hereunder or under the other Loan Documents and the termination of this Agreement. If the Borrower shall reimburse the Administrative Agent for any Indemnifiable Amount following payment by any Lender to the Administrative Agent in respect of such Indemnifiable Amount pursuant to this Section, the Administrative Agent shall share such reimbursement on a ratable basis with each Lender making any such payment.
 
Each of the Lenders and each of the Issuing Banks expressly acknowledges and agrees that neither the Administrative Agent nor any of its officers, directors, employees, agents, counsel, attorneys-in-fact or other Affiliates has made any representations or warranties to such Issuing Bank or such Lender and that no act by the Administrative Agent hereafter taken, including any review of the affairs of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary or Affiliate, shall be deemed to constitute any such representation or warranty by the Administrative Agent to any Issuing Bank or any Lender. Each of the Lenders and each of the Issuing Banks acknowledges that it has made its own credit and legal analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent, any other Issuing Bank, any other Lender or counsel to the Administrative Agent, or any of their respective officers, directors, employees, agents or counsel, and based on the financial statements of the Borrower, the other Loan Parties, the other Subsidiaries and other Affiliates, and inquiries of such Persons, its independent due diligence of the business and affairs of the Borrower, the other Loan Parties, the other Subsidiaries and other Persons, its review of the Loan Documents, the legal opinions required to be delivered to it hereunder, the advice of its own counsel and such other documents and information as it has deemed appropriate. Each of the Lenders and each of the Issuing Banks also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent, any other Lender, any other Issuing Bank, or counsel to the Administrative Agent or any of their respective officers, directors, employees and agents, and based on such review, advice, documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under the Loan Documents. The Administrative Agent shall not be required to keep itself informed as to the performance or observance by the Borrower or any other Loan Party of the Loan Documents or any other document referred to or provided for therein or to inspect the properties or books of, or make any other investigation of, the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary. Except for notices, reports and other documents and information expressly required to be furnished to the Lenders and the Issuing Banks by the Administrative Agent under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents, the Administrative Agent shall have no duty or responsibility to provide any Lender or any Issuing Bank with any credit or other information concerning the business, operations, property, financial and other condition or creditworthiness of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Affiliate thereof which may come into possession of the Administrative Agent or any of its officers, directors, employees, agents, attorneys-in-fact or other Affiliates. Each of the Lenders and each of the Issuing Banks acknowledges that the Administrative Agent's legal counsel in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement is only acting as counsel to the Administrative Agent and is not acting as counsel to any Lender or any Issuing Bank.
 
The Administrative Agent may resign at any time as Administrative Agent under the Loan Documents by giving written notice thereof to the Lenders and the Borrower. Upon any such resignation,
 
the Requisite Lenders shall have the right to appoint a successor Administrative Agent which appointment shall, provided no Default or Event of Default exists, be subject to the Borrower's approval, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed (except that the Borrower shall, in all events, be deemed to have approved each Lender as a successor Administrative Agent). If no successor Administrative Agent shall have been so appointed in accordance with the immediately preceding sentence, and shall have accepted such appointment, within thirty (30) days after the current Administrative Agent's giving of notice of resignation, then the current Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, appoint a successor Administrative Agent, which shall be a Lender, if any Lender shall be willing to serve, and otherwise shall be an Eligible Assignee. Upon the acceptance of any appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor Administrative Agent, such successor Administrative Agent shall thereupon succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the current Administrative Agent, and the current Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations under the Loan Documents. Such successor Administrative Agent shall issue letters of credit in substitution for the Letters of Credit, if any, outstanding at the time of such succession or shall make other arrangements satisfactory to the current Administrative Agent, in either case, to assume effectively the obligations of the current Administrative Agent with respect to such Letters of Credit. After any Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder as Administrative Agent, the provisions of this Article XII. shall continue to inure to its benefit as to any actions taken or omitted to be taken by it while it was Administrative Agent under the Loan Documents. Notwithstanding anything contained herein to the contrary, the Administrative Agent may assign its rights and duties under the Loan Documents to any of its Affiliates by giving the Borrower and each Lender prior written notice thereof.
 
Each of the Arranger and the Syndication Agent (each a "") in each such respective capacity, assumes no responsibility or obligation hereunder, including, without limitation, for servicing, enforcement or collection of any of the Loans, nor any duties as an agent hereunder for the Lenders. The titles given to the Titled Agents are solely honorific and imply no fiduciary responsibility on the part of the Titled Agents to the Administrative Agent, any Lender, the Issuing Bank, the Borrower or any other Loan Party and the use of such titles does not impose on the Titled Agents any duties or obligations greater than those of any other Lender or entitle the Titled Agents to any rights other than those to which any other Lender is entitled.
Titled Agent
 
Unless otherwise provided herein (including without limitation as provided in Section 9.5.), communications provided for hereunder shall be in writing and shall be mailed, telecopied, or delivered as follows:
If to the Borrower:
 
 
If to the Administrative Agent:
 
If to the Administrative Agent under Article II.:
 
 
If to Wells Fargo Bank, National Association as Issuing Bank:
 
If to any other Lender or Issuing Bank:
To such Lender's or Issuing Bank's address or telecopy number or email address as set forth in the applicable Administrative Questionnaire
or, as to each party at such other address as shall be designated by such party in a written notice to the other parties delivered in compliance with this Section; provided, a Lender or an Issuing Bank shall only be required to give notice of any such other address to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower. All such notices and other communications shall be effective (i) if mailed, upon the first to occur of receipt or the expiration of three (3) Business Days after the deposit in the United States Postal Service certified mail, postage prepaid and addressed to the address of the Borrower or the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders at the addresses specified; (ii) if telecopied, when transmitted (with confirmation); (iii) if hand delivered or sent by overnight courier, when delivered; or (iv) if delivered in accordance with Section 9.5. to the extent applicable; provided, however, that, in the case of the immediately preceding clauses (i), (ii) and (iii), non-receipt of any communication as of the result of any change of address of which the sending party was not notified or as the result of a refusal to accept delivery shall be deemed receipt of such communication. Notwithstanding the immediately preceding sentence, all notices or communications to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender under Article II. shall be effective only when actually received. None of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender shall incur any liability to any Loan Party (nor shall the Administrative Agent incur any liability to the Issuing Banks or the Lenders) for acting upon any telephonic notice referred to in this Agreement which the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender, as the case may be, believes in good faith to have been given by a Person authorized to deliver such notice or for otherwise acting in good faith hereunder. Failure of a Person designated to get a copy of a notice to receive such copy shall not affect the validity of notice properly given to another Person.
 
The Borrower agrees (a) to pay or reimburse the Administrative Agent for all of its reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses incurred in connection with the preparation, negotiation and execution of, and any amendment, supplement or modification to, any of the Loan Documents (including due diligence expense and reasonable travel expenses related to closing), and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel to the Administrative Agent and all costs and expenses of the Administrative Agent in connection with the use of IntraLinks, SyndTrak or other similar information transmission systems in connection with the Loan Documents, (b) to pay or reimburse the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders
 
for all their reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with the enforcement or preservation of any rights under the Loan Documents, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of their respective counsel (including the allocated fees and expenses of in-house counsel, to the extent in substitution for, and not in duplication of, outside counsel) and any payments in indemnification or otherwise payable by the Lenders to the Administrative Agent pursuant to the Loan Documents; provided, however, that the Borrower shall not be required to pay the expenses of more than one counsel to the Administrative Agent and one separate counsel for the Lenders (in addition to the expenses for any local or special counsel) in connection with such enforcement or preservation unless the Lenders reasonably determine that joint representation is not appropriate under the circumstances, (c) to pay, and indemnify and hold harmless the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders from, any and all recording and filing fees and any and all liabilities with respect to, or resulting from any failure to pay or delay in paying, documentary, stamp, excise and other similar taxes, if any, which may be payable or determined to be payable in connection with the execution and delivery of any of the Loan Documents, or consummation of any amendment, supplement or modification of, or any waiver or consent under or in respect of, any Loan Document and (d) to the extent not already covered by any of the preceding subsections, to pay or reimburse the fees and disbursements of counsel to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank and any Lender incurred in connection with the representation of the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender in any matter relating to or arising out of any bankruptcy or other proceeding of the type described in Sections 11.1.(e) or 11.1.(f), including, without limitation (i) any motion for relief from any stay or similar order, (ii) the negotiation, preparation, execution and delivery of any document relating to the Obligations and (iii) the negotiation and preparation of any debtor-in-possession financing or any plan of reorganization of the Borrower or any other Loan Party, whether proposed by the Borrower, such Loan Party, the Lenders or any other Person, and whether such fees and expenses are incurred prior to, during or after the commencement of such proceeding or the confirmation or conclusion of any such proceeding; provided, however, that the Borrower shall not be required to pay the expenses of more than one counsel to the Administrative Agent and one separate counsel for the Lenders (in addition to the expenses for any local or special counsel) in connection with such enforcement or preservation unless the Lenders reasonably determine that joint representation is not appropriate under the circumstances. If the Borrower shall fail to pay any amounts required to be paid by it pursuant to this Section, the Administrative Agent and/or the Lenders may pay such amounts on behalf of the Borrower and such amounts shall be deemed to be Obligations owing hereunder.
 
The Borrower will pay any and all stamp, excise, intangible, registration, recordation and similar taxes, fees or charges and shall indemnify the Administrative Agent and each Lender against any and all liabilities with respect to or resulting from any delay in the payment or omission to pay any such taxes, fees or charges, which may be payable or determined to be payable in connection with the execution, delivery, recording, performance or enforcement of this Agreement, the Notes and any of the other Loan Documents, the amendment, supplement, modification or waiver of or consent under this Agreement, the Notes or any of the other Loan Documents or the perfection of any rights or Liens under this Agreement, the Notes or any of the other Loan Documents.
 
Subject to Section 3.3. and in addition to any rights now or hereafter granted under Applicable Law and not by way of limitation of any such rights, the Borrower hereby authorizes the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank, each Lender, each Affiliate of the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank or any Lender, at any time or from time to time while an Event of Default is continuing, without prior notice to the Borrower or to any other Person, any such notice being hereby expressly waived, but in the case of an Issuing Bank, a Lender, an Affiliate of an Issuing Bank or a Lender, subject to receipt of the prior
 
written consent of the Requisite Lenders exercised in their sole discretion, to set off and to appropriate and to apply any and all deposits (general or special, including, but not limited to, indebtedness evidenced by certificates of deposit, whether matured or unmatured) and any other indebtedness at any time held or owing by the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank, such Lender, any Affiliate of the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender, to or for the credit or the account of the Borrower against and on account of any of the Obligations, irrespective of whether or not any or all of the Loans and all other Obligations have been declared to be, or have otherwise become, due and payable as permitted by Section 11.2., and although such Obligations shall be contingent or unmatured.
 
(a) EACH PARTY HERETO ACKNOWLEDGES THAT ANY DISPUTE OR CONTROVERSY BETWEEN OR AMONG THE BORROWER, THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT, ANY OF THE ISSUING BANKS OR ANY OF THE LENDERS WOULD BE BASED ON DIFFICULT AND COMPLEX ISSUES OF LAW AND FACT AND WOULD RESULT IN DELAY AND EXPENSE TO THE PARTIES. ACCORDINGLY, TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, EACH OF THE LENDERS, THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT, THE ISSUING BANKS AND THE BORROWER HEREBY WAIVES ITS RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING OF ANY KIND OR NATURE IN ANY COURT OR TRIBUNAL IN WHICH AN ACTION MAY BE COMMENCED BY OR AGAINST ANY PARTY HERETO ARISING OUT OF THIS AGREEMENT, ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR BY REASON OF ANY OTHER SUIT, CAUSE OF ACTION OR DISPUTE WHATSOEVER BETWEEN OR AMONG THE BORROWER, THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT, ANY OF THE ISSUING BANKS OR ANY OF THE LENDERS OF ANY KIND OR NATURE RELATING TO ANY OF THE LOAN DOCUMENTS.
(b) THE BORROWER AND EACH OTHER LOAN PARTY IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY AGREES THAT IT WILL NOT COMMENCE ANY ACTION, LITIGATION OR PROCEEDING OF ANY KIND OR DESCRIPTION, WHETHER IN LAW OR EQUITY, WHETHER IN CONTRACT OR IN TORT OR OTHERWISE, AGAINST THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT, ANY LENDER, ANY ISSUING BANK, OR ANY RELATED PARTY OF THE FOREGOING IN ANY WAY RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS RELATING HERETO OR THERETO, IN ANY FORUM OTHER THAN THE COURTS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK SITTING IN NEW YORK COUNTY, AND OF THE UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT OF THE SOUTHERN DISTRICT OF NEW YORK, AND ANY APPELLATE COURT FROM ANY THEREOF, AND EACH OF THE PARTIES HERETO IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY SUBMITS TO THE JURISDICTION OF SUCH COURTS AND AGREES THAT ALL CLAIMS IN RESPECT OF ANY SUCH ACTION, LITIGATION OR PROCEEDING MAY BE HEARD AND DETERMINED IN SUCH NEW YORK STATE COURT OR, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, IN SUCH FEDERAL COURT. EACH OF THE PARTIES HERETO AGREES THAT A FINAL, NON-APPEALABLE JUDGMENT IN ANY SUCH ACTION, LITIGATION OR PROCEEDING SHALL BE CONCLUSIVE AND MAY BE ENFORCED IN OTHER JURISDICTIONS BY SUIT ON THE JUDGMENT OR IN ANY OTHER MANNER PROVIDED BY LAW. NOTHING IN THIS AGREEMENT OR IN ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT SHALL AFFECT ANY RIGHT THAT THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT, ANY LENDER OR ANY ISSUING BANK MAY OTHERWISE HAVE TO BRING ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT AGAINST THE BORROWER OR ANY OTHER LOAN PARTY OR ITS PROPERTIES IN THE COURTS OF ANY APPROPRIATE JURISDICTION. EACH PARTY FURTHER WAIVES ANY OBJECTION THAT IT MAY NOW OR HEREAFTER HAVE TO THE VENUE OF ANY ACTION BROUGHT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FIRST SENTENCE OF THIS SUBSECTION (b) OR PROCEEDING IN ANY SUCH COURT OR THAT SUCH ACTION OR
 
PROCEEDING WAS BROUGHT IN AN INCONVENIENT FORUM AND EACH AGREES NOT TO PLEAD OR CLAIM THE SAME. THE CHOICE OF FORUM SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION SHALL NOT BE DEEMED TO PRECLUDE THE BRINGING OF ANY ACTION BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT, ANY ISSUING BANK OR ANY LENDER OR THE ENFORCEMENT BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT, ANY ISSUING BANK OR ANY LENDER OF ANY JUDGMENT OBTAINED IN SUCH FORUM IN ANY OTHER APPROPRIATE JURISDICTION.
(c) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION HAVE BEEN CONSIDERED BY EACH PARTY WITH THE ADVICE OF COUNSEL AND WITH A FULL UNDERSTANDING OF THE LEGAL CONSEQUENCES THEREOF, AND SHALL SURVIVE THE PAYMENT OF THE LOANS AND ALL OTHER AMOUNTS PAYABLE HEREUNDER OR UNDER THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS, THE TERMINATION OR EXPIRATION OF ALL LETTERS OF CREDIT AND THE TERMINATION OF THIS AGREEMENT.
 
(a) . The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, except that neither the Borrower nor any other Loan Party may assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent and each Lender and no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder except (i) to an Eligible Assignee in accordance with the provisions of the immediately following subsection (b), (ii) by way of participation in accordance with the provisions of the immediately following subsection (d) or (iii) by way of pledge or assignment of a security interest subject to the restrictions of the immediately following subsection (f) (and, subject to the last sentence of the immediately following subsection (b), any other attempted assignment or transfer by any party hereto shall be null and void). Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, Participants to the extent provided in the immediately following subsection (d) and, to the extent expressly set forth herein, the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
Successors and Assigns Generally
(b) . Any Lender may at any time assign to one or more Eligible Assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it); any such assignment shall be subject to the following conditions:
Assignments by Lenders
provided
that
(i) .
Minimum Amounts
(A) in the case of an assignment of the entire remaining amount of an assigning Revolving Lender's Revolving Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it or in the case of an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund, no minimum amount need be assigned; and
(B) in any case not described in the immediately preceding subsection (A), the aggregate amount of the Revolving Commitment (which for this purpose includes Loans outstanding thereunder) or, if the applicable Revolving Commitment is not then in effect, the principal outstanding balance of the Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (in each case, determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent or, if "Trade Date" is specified in the Assignment and Assumption, as of the Trade Date)
 
shall not be less than $15,000,000 in the case of any assignment of a Revolving Commitment, unless each of the Administrative Agent and, so long as no Default or Event of Default shall exist, the Borrower otherwise consents (each such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed); provided, however, that if, after giving effect to such assignment, the amount of the Commitment held by such assigning Lender or the outstanding principal balance of the Loans of such assigning Lender, as applicable, would be less than $10,000,000 in the case of a Commitment or Revolving Loans, then such assigning Lender shall assign the entire amount of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it.
(ii) . Each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement with respect to the Loan or the Revolving Commitment assigned.
Proportionate Amounts
(iii) . No consent shall be required for any assignment except to the extent required by clause (i)(B) of this subsection (b) and, in addition:
Required Consents
(A) the consent of the Borrower (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) shall be required unless (x) a Default or Event of Default shall exist at the time of such assignment or (y) such assignment is to a Lender; provided that the Borrower shall be deemed to have consented to any such assignment unless it shall object thereto by written notice to the Administrative Agent within five (5) Business Days after having received notice, by delivery of a paper copy, or by facsimile or email, thereof;
(B) the consent of the Administrative Agent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) shall be required for assignments in respect of a Revolving Commitment if such assignment is to a Person that is not already a Lender with a Commitment, an Affiliate of such a Lender or an Approved Fund with respect to such a Lender; and
(C) the consent of the Swingline Lender and the Issuing Banks (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) shall be required for any assignment in respect of a Revolving Commitment.
(iv) . The parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Acceptance, together with a processing and recordation fee (which, other than in connection with an assignment pursuant to Section 5.6., shall not be borne by the Borrower) of $4,500 for each assignment (or $7,500 if the assignor is a Defaulting Lender), and the assignee, if it is not a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire. If requested by the transferor Lender or the Assignee, upon the consummation of any assignment, the transferor Lender, the Administrative Agent and the Borrower shall make appropriate arrangements so that new Notes are issued to the Assignee and such transferor Lender, as appropriate.
Assignment and Acceptance; Notes
(v) . No such assignment shall be made to the Borrower or any of the Borrower's Affiliates or Subsidiaries.
No Assignment to Borrower
(vi) . No such assignment shall be made to a natural person.
No Assignment to Natural Persons
 
(vii) . If the assigning Lender (or its Affiliate) is a Specified Derivatives Provider and if after giving effect to such assignment such Lender will hold no further Loans or Revolving Commitments under this Agreement, such Lender shall undertake such assignment only contemporaneously with an assignment by such Lender (or its Affiliate, as the case may be) of all of its Specified Derivatives Contracts to the Assignee or another Lender (or Affiliate thereof).
Assignments by Specified Derivatives Provider
Subject to acceptance and recording thereof by the Administrative Agent pursuant to the immediately following subsection (c), from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Acceptance, the assignee thereunder shall be a party to this Agreement and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto) but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 5.4., 13.2. and 13.10. and the other provisions of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents as provided in Section 13.11. with respect to facts and circumstances occurring prior to the effective date of such assignment. Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this paragraph shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with the immediately following subsection (d).
(c) . The Administrative Agent, acting solely for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, shall maintain at the Principal Office a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitments of, and principal amounts of the Loans owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ""). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrower and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice. Each Lender that sells a participation as described in Section 13.6.(d) shall, acting solely for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, maintain a register on which it enters the name and address of each Participant and the principal amounts (and stated interest) of each Participant's interest in the Loans or other obligations under this Agreement (the ""); provided that no Lender shall have any obligation to disclose all or any portion of the Participant Register to any Person (including the identity of any Participant or any information relating to a Participant's interest in any Commitments, Loans, or its other obligations under this Agreement) except to the extent that such disclosure is necessary to establish that such Commitment, Loan, or other obligation is in registered form under Section 5f.103-1(c) of the Treasury Regulations. The entries in the Participant Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and such Lender shall treat each person whose name is recorded in the Participant Register as the owner of such participation for all purposes of this Agreement notwithstanding any notice to the contrary.
Register
Register
Participant Register
(d) . Any Lender may at any time, without the consent of, or notice to, the Borrower or the Administrative Agent, sell participations to any Person (other than a natural person or the Borrower or any of the Borrower's Affiliates or Subsidiaries) (each, a "") in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and/or obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and/or the Loans owing to it); provided that (i) such Lender's obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (ii) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (iii) the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's
Participations
Participant
 
rights and obligations under this Agreement. Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; provided that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to (w) increase such Lender's Commitment, (x) extend the date fixed for the payment of principal on the Loans or portions thereof owing to such Lender, (y) reduce the rate at which interest is payable thereon or (z) release any Guarantor from its Obligations under the Guaranty, except pursuant to the terms of this Agreement. Subject to the immediately following subsection (e), the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of Sections 3.10., 5.1., 5.4. to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section. To the extent permitted by Applicable Law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of Section 13.4. as though it were a Lender, provided such Participant agrees to be subject to Section 3.3. as though it were a Lender.
(e) . A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Sections 3.10. and 5.1. than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrower's prior written consent. A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of Section 3.10. unless the Borrower is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrower and the Administrative Agent, to comply with Section 3.10.(c) as though it were a Lender.
Limitations upon Participant Rights
(f) . Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank; provided that no such pledge or assignment shall release such Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto or entitled to the rights of an assignee hereunder.
Certain Pledges
(g) . Each Lender agrees that, without the prior written consent of the Borrower and the Administrative Agent, it will not make any assignment hereunder in any manner or under any circumstances that would require registration or qualification of, or filings in respect of, any Loan or Note under the Securities Act or any other securities laws of the United States of America or of any other jurisdiction.
No Registration
 
(a) . Except as otherwise expressly provided in this Agreement, (i) any consent or approval required or permitted by this Agreement or any other Loan Document to be given by the Lenders may be given, (ii) any term of this Agreement or of any other Loan Document may be amended, (iii) the performance or observance by the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of any terms of this Agreement or such other Loan Document may be waived, and (iv) the continuance of any Default or Event of Default may be waived (either generally or in a particular instance and either retroactively or prospectively) with, but only with, the written consent of the Requisite Lenders (or the Administrative Agent at the written direction of the Requisite Lenders), and, in the case of an amendment to any Loan Document, the written consent of each Loan Party which is party thereto. Subject to the immediately following subsections (c) and (d), any term of this Agreement or of any other Loan Document relating to the rights or obligations of the Revolving Lenders, and not any other Lenders, may be amended, and the performance or observance by the Borrower or any other Loan Party or any Subsidiary of any such terms may be waived (either generally or in a particular instance and either retroactively or prospectively) with, and only with, the written consent of the Requisite Lenders (and, in the case of an amendment to any Loan Document, the written consent of each Loan Party a party thereto).
Generally
 
(b) . In addition to the foregoing requirements, no amendment, waiver or consent shall, unless in writing, and signed by each of the Lenders directly and adversely affected thereby (or the Administrative Agent at the written direction of such Lenders), do any of the following:
Consent of Lenders Directly Affected
(i) increase the Commitments of the Lenders (excluding any increase as a result of an assignment of Commitments permitted under Section 13.6.) or subject the Lenders to any additional obligations to lend money or issue or participate in letters of credit;
(ii) reduce the principal of, or interest that has accrued or the rates of interest that will be charged on the outstanding principal amount of, any Loans or other Obligations;
(iii) reduce the amount of any Fees payable to the Lenders hereunder;
(iv) modify the definition of "Revolving Termination Date" (except in accordance with Section 2.12.), otherwise postpone any date fixed for any payment of principal of, or interest on, any Loans or for the payment of Fees or any other Obligations, or extend the expiration date of any Letter of Credit beyond the Revolving Termination Date;
(v) modify the definitions of "Revolving Commitment Percentage" or "Pro Rata Share" or amend or otherwise modify the provisions of Section 3.2.;
(vi) amend this Section or amend the definitions of the terms used in this Agreement or the other Loan Documents insofar as such definitions affect the substance of this Section;
(vii) modify the definition of the term "Requisite Lenders" or modify in any other manner the number or percentage of the Lenders required to make any determinations or waive any rights hereunder or to modify any provision hereof;
(viii) release any Guarantor from its obligations under the Guaranty except as contemplated by Section 8.12.(b);
(ix) waive a Default or Event of Default under Section 11.1.(a), except as provided in Section 11.7.; or
(x) amend, or waive the Borrower's compliance with, Section 2.14.
(c) . The Administrative Agent may, subject to the terms of subsection (b) above, (i) approve any amendment to this Agreement that is administrative in nature or is otherwise determined by the Administrative Agent in good faith not to be material, and (ii) waive any obligation or waive or confirm as cured any default of any Loan Party hereunder or under any of the Loan Documents, to the extent such waiver is determined by the Administrative Agent to be administrative in nature or such obligation or default is not material.
Amendment or Waiver by Administrative Agent
(d) . No amendment, waiver or consent unless in writing and signed by the Administrative Agent, in addition to the Lenders required hereinabove to take such action (but without duplication), shall affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents. Any amendment, waiver or consent relating to Section 2.3. or the obligations of the Swingline Lender under this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall, in addition to the Lenders required hereinabove to take such action (but without duplication), require the written consent of the Swingline Lender. Any amendment, waiver or consent
Amendment of Administrative Agent's Duties, Etc
 
relating to Section 2.2. or the obligations of the Issuing Banks under this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall, in addition to the Lenders required hereinabove to take such action (but without duplication), require the written consent of the Issuing Banks. Any amendment, waiver or consent with respect to any Loan Document that (i) diminishes the rights of a Specified Derivatives Provider in a manner or to an extent dissimilar to that affecting the Lenders or (ii) increases the liabilities or obligations of a Specified Derivatives Provider shall, in addition to the Lenders required hereinabove to take such action, require the consent of the Lender that is (or having an Affiliate that is) such Specified Derivatives Provider. No waiver shall extend to or affect any obligation not expressly waived or impair any right consequent thereon and any amendment, waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the specific purpose set forth therein. No course of dealing or delay or omission on the part of the Administrative Agent or any Lender in exercising any right shall operate as a waiver thereof or otherwise be prejudicial thereto. Any Event of Default occurring hereunder shall continue to exist until such time as such Event of Default is waived in writing in accordance with the terms of this Section, notwithstanding any attempted cure or other action by the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person subsequent to the occurrence of such Event of Default. Within fifteen (15) Business Days following written request therefor from the Borrower (together with such additional information as the Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall reasonably request in respect thereof), the Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall use commercially reasonable efforts to respond to any request for a waiver, amendment or other modification of the Loan Documentation in respect of any Default or Event of Default, provided that the failure of the Administrative Agent or any Lender to so respond shall not constitute a waiver, amendment or other modification, or release of any claim under any Loan Document, in respect of any such Default or Event of Default. Except as otherwise explicitly provided for herein or in any other Loan Document, no notice to or demand upon the Borrower shall entitle the Borrower to other or further notice or demand in similar or other circumstances.
 
The relationship between the Borrower, on the one hand, and the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the Administrative Agent, on the other hand, shall be solely that of borrower and lender. None of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender shall have any fiduciary responsibilities to the Borrower and no provision in this Agreement or in any of the other Loan Documents, and no course of dealing between or among any of the parties hereto, shall be deemed to create any fiduciary duty owing by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender to any Lender, the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any other Loan Party. None of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender undertakes any responsibility to the Borrower to review or inform the Borrower of any matter in connection with any phase of the Borrower's business or operations.
 
Except as otherwise provided by Applicable Law, the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank and each Lender shall maintain the confidentiality of all Information (as defined below) in accordance with its customary procedure for handling confidential information of this nature and in accordance with safe and sound banking practices but in any event may make disclosure: (a) to its Affiliates and to its and its Affiliates' respective partners, directors, officers, employees, agents, advisors and other representatives that have a need to know in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the other Loan Documents (provided that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made shall be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential); (b) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this Section, to (i) any actual or proposed Assignee, Participant or other transferee in connection with a potential transfer of any Commitment or participation therein as permitted hereunder, or (ii) any actual or prospective counterparty (or its advisors) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Borrower and its obligations; (c) as
 
required or requested by any Governmental Authority or representative thereof or pursuant to legal process or in connection with any legal proceedings, or as otherwise required by Applicable Law; (d) to the Administrative Agent's, such Issuing Bank's or such Lender's independent auditors and other professional advisors (provided they shall be notified of the confidential nature of the information); (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies under any Loan Document (or any Specified Derivatives Contract) or any action or proceeding relating to any Loan Document (or any such Specified Derivatives Contract) or the enforcement of rights hereunder or thereunder; (f) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section by the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank, any Lender or any Affiliate of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis from a source other than the Borrower or any Affiliate of the Borrower which source is not actually known by the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender, as applicable, to be subject to a confidentiality obligation in respect thereof; (g) to the extent requested by, or required to be disclosed to, any nationally recognized rating agency or regulatory or similar authority (including any self-regulatory authority, such as the National Association of Insurance Commissioners) having or purporting to have jurisdiction over it; (h) to bank trade publications, such information to consist of deal terms and other information customarily found in such publications; (i) to any other party hereto; and (j) with the consent of the Borrower. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank and each Lender may disclose any such confidential information, to Governmental Authorities in connection with any regulatory examination of the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender or in accordance with the generally applicable regulatory compliance policy of the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender. As used in this Section, the term "Information" means all information received from the Borrower, any other Loan Party, any other Subsidiary or Affiliate relating to any Loan Party or any of their respective businesses, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Issuing Bank on a nonconfidential basis prior to disclosure by the Borrower, any other Loan Party, any other Subsidiary or any Affiliate. Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information.
 
(a) The Borrower shall and hereby agrees to indemnify, defend and hold harmless the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks, the Lenders, all of the Affiliates of each of the Administrative Agent, any of the Issuing Banks or any of the Lenders, and their respective directors, officers, shareholders, agents, employees and counsel (each referred to herein as an "") from and against any and all of the following (collectively, the ""): losses, costs, claims, penalties, damages, liabilities, deficiencies, judgments or reasonable expenses of every kind and nature (including, without limitation, amounts paid in settlement, court costs and the fees and disbursements of counsel incurred in connection with any litigation, investigation, claim or proceeding or any advice rendered in connection therewith, but excluding Indemnified Costs indemnification in respect of which is specifically covered by Section 3.10. or 5.1. or expressly excluded from the coverage of such Sections) incurred by an Indemnified Party in connection with, arising out of, or by reason of, any suit, cause of action, claim, arbitration, investigation or settlement, consent decree or other proceeding (the foregoing referred to herein as an "") which is in any way related directly or indirectly to: (i) this Agreement or any other Loan Document or the transactions contemplated thereby; (ii) the making of any Loans or issuance of Letters of Credit hereunder; (iii) any actual or proposed use by the Borrower of the proceeds of the Loans or Letters of Credit; (iv) the Administrative Agent's, any Issuing Bank's or any Lender's entering into this Agreement; (v) the fact that the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders have established the credit facility evidenced hereby in favor of the Borrower pursuant to
Indemnified Party
Indemnified Costs
Indemnity Proceeding
 
the Loan Documents; (vi) the fact that the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders are creditors of the Borrower and have or are alleged to have information regarding the financial condition, strategic plans or business operations of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries pursuant to the Loan Documents; (vii) the fact that the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders are material creditors of the Borrower and are alleged to influence directly or indirectly the business decisions or affairs of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries or their financial condition; (viii) the exercise of any right or remedy the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks or the Lenders may have under this Agreement or the other Loan Documents; (ix) any civil penalty or fine assessed by the OFAC against, and all costs and expenses (including reasonable counsel fees and disbursements) incurred in connection with defense thereof by, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender as a result of conduct of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary that violates a sanction administered or enforced by the OFAC; or (x) any violation or non-compliance by the Borrower or any Subsidiary of any Applicable Law (including any Environmental Law) including, but not limited to, any Indemnity Proceeding commenced by (A) the Internal Revenue Service or state taxing authority or (B) any Governmental Authority or other Person under any Environmental Law, including any Indemnity Proceeding commenced by a Governmental Authority or other Person seeking remedial or other action to cause the Borrower or its Subsidiaries (or its respective properties) (or the Administrative Agent and/or the Lenders and/or the Issuing Banks as successors to the Borrower) to be in compliance with such Environmental Laws; provided, however, that the Borrower shall not be obligated to indemnify any Indemnified Party for any acts or omissions of such Indemnified Party in connection with matters described in this subsection to the extent arising from (x) the gross negligence or willful misconduct of any Indemnified Party, as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction in a final, non-appealable judgment or (y) any dispute solely among the Indemnified Parties (other than claims against an Indemnified Party in its capacity as the Administrative Agent) and not arising out of any act or omission of the Parent, the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary of the Parent or any of their respective Affiliates.
(b) The Borrower's indemnification obligations under this Section shall apply to all Indemnity Proceedings arising out of, or related to, the foregoing whether or not an Indemnified Party is a named party in such Indemnity Proceeding. In this connection, this indemnification shall cover all Indemnified Costs of any Indemnified Party in connection with any deposition of any Indemnified Party or compliance with any subpoena (including any subpoena requesting the production of documents). This indemnification shall, among other things, apply to any Indemnity Proceeding commenced by other creditors of the Borrower or any Subsidiary, any shareholder of the Borrower or any Subsidiary (whether such shareholder(s) are prosecuting such Indemnity Proceeding in their individual capacity or derivatively on behalf of the Borrower), any account debtor of the Borrower or any Subsidiary or by any Governmental Authority. If indemnification is to be sought hereunder by an Indemnified Party, then such Indemnified Party shall promptly notify the Borrower of the commencement of any Indemnity Proceeding; provided, however, that the failure to so notify the Borrower shall not otherwise relieve the Borrower from any liability that it may have to such Indemnified Party pursuant to this Section 13.10.
(c) This indemnification shall apply to any Indemnity Proceeding arising during the pendency of any bankruptcy proceeding filed by or against the Borrower and/or any Subsidiary.
(d) All out-of-pocket fees and expenses of, and all amounts paid to third persons by, an Indemnified Party shall be advanced by the Borrower at the request of such Indemnified Party notwithstanding any claim or assertion by the Borrower that such Indemnified Party is not entitled to indemnification hereunder upon receipt of an undertaking by such Indemnified Party that such Indemnified Party will reimburse the Borrower if it is actually and finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction that such Indemnified Party is not so entitled to indemnification hereunder.
 
(e) An Indemnified Party may conduct its own investigation and defense of, and may formulate its own strategy with respect to, any Indemnity Proceeding covered by this Section and, as provided above, all Indemnified Costs incurred by such Indemnified Party shall be reimbursed by the Borrower. No action taken by legal counsel chosen by an Indemnified Party in investigating or defending against any such Indemnity Proceeding shall vitiate or in any way impair the obligations and duties of the Borrower hereunder to indemnify and hold harmless each such Indemnified Party; provided, however, that if (i) the Borrower is required to indemnify an Indemnified Party pursuant hereto and (ii) the Borrower has provided evidence reasonably satisfactory to such Indemnified Party that the Borrower has the financial wherewithal to reimburse such Indemnified Party for any amount paid by such Indemnified Party with respect to such Indemnity Proceeding, such Indemnified Party shall not settle or compromise any such Indemnity Proceeding without the prior written consent of the Borrower (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed). Notwithstanding the foregoing, an Indemnified Party may settle or compromise any such Indemnity Proceeding without the prior written consent of the Borrower where (x) no monetary relief is sought against such Indemnified Party in such Indemnity Proceeding or (y) there is an allegation of a violation of law by such Indemnified Party.
(f) If and to the extent that the obligations of the Borrower under this Section are unenforceable for any reason, the Borrower hereby agrees to make the maximum contribution to the payment and satisfaction of such obligations which is permissible under Applicable Law.
(g) The Borrower's obligations under this Section shall survive any termination of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents and the payment in full in cash of the Obligations, and are in addition to, and not in substitution of, any of the other obligations set forth in this Agreement or any other Loan Document to which it is a party.
References in this Section 13.10. to "Lender" or "Lenders" shall be deemed to include such Persons (and their Affiliates) in their capacity as Specified Derivatives Providers.
 
This Agreement shall terminate at such time as (a) all of the Commitments have been terminated, (b) all Letters of Credit have terminated or expired or been canceled, (c) none of the Lenders is obligated any longer under this Agreement to make any Loans and none of the Issuing Banks is obligated any longer under this Agreement to issue Letters of Credit and (d) all Obligations (other than obligations which survive as provided in the following sentence) have been paid and satisfied in full. The indemnities to which the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders are entitled under the provisions of Sections 3.10., 5.1., 5.4., 12.6., 13.2. and 13.10. and any other provision of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, and the provisions of Section 13.5., shall continue in full force and effect and shall protect the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders (i) notwithstanding any termination of this Agreement, or of the other Loan Documents, against events arising after such termination as well as before and (ii) at all times after any such party ceases to be a party to this Agreement with respect to all matters and events existing on or prior to the date such party ceased to be a party to this Agreement.
 
If any provision of this Agreement or the other Loan Documents shall be determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid or unenforceable, that provision shall be deemed severed from the Loan Documents, and the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall remain in full force as though the invalid, illegal, or unenforceable provision had never been part of the Loan Documents.
 
THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK APPLICABLE TO CONTRACTS EXECUTED, AND TO BE FULLY PERFORMED, IN SUCH STATE.
 
To facilitate execution, this Agreement and any amendments, waivers, consents or supplements may be executed in any number of counterparts as may be convenient or required (which may be effectively delivered by facsimile, in portable document format ("PDF") or other similar electronic means). It shall not be necessary that the signature of, or on behalf of, each party, or that the signature of all persons required to bind any party, appear on each counterpart. All counterparts shall collectively constitute a single document. It shall not be necessary in making proof of this document to produce or account for more than a single counterpart containing the respective signatures of, or on behalf of, each of the parties hereto.
 
The obligations of the Borrower to direct or prohibit the taking of certain actions by the other Loan Parties as specified herein shall be absolute and not subject to any defense the Borrower may have that the Borrower does not control such Loan Parties.
 
All covenants hereunder shall be given in any jurisdiction independent effect so that if a particular action or condition is prohibited by any of such covenants, the fact that it would be permitted by an exception to, or be otherwise within the limitations of, another covenant shall not avoid the occurrence of a Default or an Event of Default if such action is taken or condition exists contrary to such prohibition.
 
None of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, or any Affiliate, officer, director, employee, attorney, or agent of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender shall have any liability with respect to, and the Borrower hereby waives, releases, and agrees not to sue any of them upon, any claim for any special, indirect, incidental, consequential or punitive damages suffered or incurred by the Borrower in connection with, arising out of, or in any way related to, this Agreement, any of the other Loan Documents, or any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents. The Borrower shall not have any liability with respect to any claim for any special, indirect, incidental, consequential or punitive damages suffered or incurred by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender or any of the Administrative Agent's, any Issuing Bank's or any Lender's Affiliates, officers, directors, employees, attorneys, or agents for punitive damages in respect of any claim in connection with, arising out of, or in any way related to, this Agreement, any of the other Loan Documents, or any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or financed hereby (other than punitive damages of a third party awarded against the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender for which the Borrower may be responsible to the extent covered by Section 13.10.).
 
This Agreement, the Notes, the other Loan Documents embody the final, entire agreement among the parties hereto and supersede any and all prior commitments, agreements, representations, and understandings, whether written or oral, relating to the subject matter hereof and thereof and may not be contradicted or varied by evidence of prior, contemporaneous, or subsequent oral agreements or discussions of the parties hereto. There are no oral agreements among the parties hereto.
 
The Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank, the Borrower and each Lender acknowledge that each of them has had the benefit of legal counsel of its own choice and has been afforded an opportunity to review this Agreement and the other Loan Documents with its legal counsel and that this Agreement and the other Loan Documents shall be construed as if jointly drafted by the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank, the Borrower and each Lender.
 
The paragraph and section headings in this Agreement are provided for convenience of reference only and shall not affect its construction or interpretation.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS AGREEMENT AND THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS, THE AGENT AND THE LENDERS SHALL LOOK SOLELY TO THE BORROWER AND THE OTHER LOAN PARTIES FOR THE ENFORCEMENT OF ANY CLAIM AGAINST THE BORROWER AND SUCH LOAN PARTY UNDER OR IN RESPECT OF ANY OF THE LOAN DOCUMENTS AND ACCORDINGLY NEITHER THE DIRECTORS, OFFICERS, EMPLOYEES, NOR SHAREHOLDERS OF THE BORROWER OR ANY OTHER LOAN PARTY SHALL HAVE ANY PERSONAL LIABILITY FOR OBLIGATIONS ENTERED INTO BY OR ON BEHALF OF THE BORROWER OR ANY OTHER LOAN PARTY.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Credit Agreement to be executed by their authorized officers all as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Schedule 7.1 (b)
Saul Centers, Inc Ownership as of: May 15, 2012 05/15/2012
Ownership Structure
The Saul Organization
B F Saul REIT (MD) 52-6053341 9.64%
Dearborn, L.L.C. (DE) 52-6053341 6.83%
Avenel Exec. Park Phase II, L.L.C. (MD) 52-6053341 0.04%
SHLP Unit Acquisition Corp (MD) 45-3363029 5.65%
B. F. Saul Property Company (MD) 52-1006075 0.85%
Westminster Investing Corp. (NY) 52-0785483 0.91%
Van Ness Square Corp. (MD) 52-1794658 2.16%
Saul Centers, Inc
Cusip # 804395 10 1
52-1833074 (MD)
26.07%(a)
73.93%
Limited Partner General Partner
Interest Interest
6,914,229 units 19,607,217 shares 100% Subsidiary
Saul Holdings, L.P. Avenel VI, Inc.
(37 Properties/multiple loans)(nominee holder- portion of property)
52-1833076 (MD) 52-2269067 (MD)
100% members 100% member
Ashburn Village Center LLC (DE) 11503 Rockville Pike LLC (DE)
Briggs Chaney Plaza, LLC (MD) Kentlands Lot 1, LLC (MD)
Leesburg Pike Center LLC (DE) Westview Village Center LLC (DE)
Metro Pike Center LLC (DE) Kentlands Square LLC (DE)
Ravenwood Shopping Center LLC (DE) Severna Park Marketplace LLC (DE)
Smallwood Village Center LLC (DE) Cranberry Square LLC (DE)
Thruway Shopping Center LLC (DE)
Clarendon Center LLC (DE)
Seven Comers Center LLC (DE)
( 1 Property/1 loan, each)( 1 Property/0 loan, each)
52-1833076 52-1833076
100% member
Avenel Business Park LLC (DE)
100% member Kentlands Square Subsidiary LLC (DE) Saul Monocacy LLC (MD)
100% member Severna Park Marketplace Subsidiary LLC (DE)
100% member Cranberry Square Subsidiary LLC (DE)
(single member LLCs, 1 loan/0 property, ea)( 1 loan/0 property, each)
52-1833076 52-1833076
1.0% General 99.0% Limited 99.0% Limited 1.0% General
Partner Interest Partner Interest Partner Interest Partner Interest
Saul Subsidiary II L.P. Saul Subsidiary I L.P.
( 3 Properties/1 loan )(6 Properties)
52-1833079 (MD) 52-1833078 (MD)
100% member
White Oak Subsidiary LLC
( 0 Property/1 loan)
52-1833078 (DE)
(a) Saul Centers holds 100% of 40,000 8% Series A and 31,731.15 9% Series B preferred units issued by Saul Holdings, L.P. (liquidation preference of $179,327,875)
(b) Saul Centers has no unconsolidated subsidiaries.
Schedule 7.1(b), Part II
There are no Unconsolidated Affiliates
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Saul Centers, Inc Indebtedness & Guaranties
Schedule 7.1(g)
Total Indebtedness
( dollars in thousands )
Lender Initial
Loan
Amount 04/30/2012
Balance
Outstanding Security
Mortgage Debt
Northwestern Mutual $38,500 $24,196 601 Pennsylvania Avenue
Deutsche Banc Mortgage 11,334 10,188 Smallwood Village Center
Compass Bank 15,200 15,066 Northrock
PNC Bank 16,169 15,963 Metro Pike Center
Teachers (TIAA) 8,825 7,138 Cruse Marketplace
Allstate 16,579 14,222 Seabreeze Plaza
Allstate 21,800 17,266 Shops at Fairfax, Boulevard
Metropolitan Life 42,500 35,175 Washington Square
AEGON USA 48,000 39,422 Broadlands, Glen, Kentlands Sq I
AEGON USA 15,500 12,752 Olde Forte Village
Allstate 21,350 17,606 Countryside
Metropolitan Life 21,000 17,483 Briggs Chaney Plaza
Teachers (TIAA) 18,750 15,581 Shops at Monocacy
Teachers (TIAA) 13,000 11,609 Boca Valley Plaza
Metropolitan Life 12,500 10,551 Palm Springs Center
Wells Fargo 45,600 44,111 Thruway
Metropolitan Life 10,500 9,138 Jamestown Place
Teachers (TIAA) 7,000 6,448 Hunt Club Corners
Teachers (TIAA) 40,000 37,211 Lansdowne Town Center
Nationwide 12,000 11,271 Orchard Park
Allstate 12,750 12,127 BJs Warehouse
Thrivent 18,756 16,709 Great Falls
Aviva 18,500 17,713 Leesburg Pike
Thrivent 16,000 15,344 Village Center
John Hancock 27,500 26,934 White Oak
Aviva 33,500 32,142 Avenel Business Park
Met Life 33,000 31,909 Ashburn Village
Principal Group 17,000 16,655 Ravenwood
Prudential Life 125,000 122,747 Clarendon Center
Principal Group 38,000 37,644 Severna Park Marketplace
Prudential Life 43,000 42,689 Kentlands Square II
AEGON 20,000 19,894 Cranberry Square
Prudential Life 73,000 73,000 Seven Corners
Total mortgage debt $837,904
Guarantees (other than non-recourse carve-outs):
Great Falls Center mortgage $3,900
Metro Pike Center mortgage (25%) 3,991
Clarendon Center mortgage 27,600
Northrock term loan (50%) 7,533
$43,024
Saul Holdings also has a $177 letter of credit outstanding with US Bank pertaining to the development of Ashland Square.
Page 1 of 1
 
None
 
 
 
 
THIS ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION AGREEMENT dated as of                     , 20     (the "Agreement") by and among                                                               (the "Assignor"),                                                               (the "Assignee"), SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP (the "Borrower"), and WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent").
WHEREAS, the Assignor is a Lender under that certain Credit Agreement dated as of                     , 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"), by and among the Borrower, the Lenders from time to time parties thereto, the Issuing Banks from time to time parties thereto, the Administrative Agent, and the other parties thereto;
WHEREAS, the Assignor desires to assign to the Assignee all or a portion of the Assignor's Revolving Commitment under the Credit Agreement, all on the terms and conditions set forth herein and therein; and
WHEREAS, the [Borrower and the] Administrative Agent consent[s] to such assignment on the terms and conditions set forth herein.
NOW, THEREFORE, for good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which hereby are acknowledged by the parties hereto, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
Section 1. .
Assignment
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and in consideration of the payment to be made by the Assignee to the Assignor pursuant to Section 2 of this Agreement, effective as of                     , 20     (the "Assignment Date") the Assignor hereby irrevocably sells, transfers and assigns to the Assignee, without recourse, a $         interest (such interest being the "Assigned Commitment") in and to the Assignor's Revolving Commitment, and all of the other rights and obligations of the Assignor under the Credit Agreement, such Assignor's Revolving Note, and the other Loan Documents, representing     % in respect of the aggregate amount of all Lenders' Revolving Commitments, including without limitation, a principal amount of outstanding Revolving Loans equal to $        , all voting rights of the Assignor associated with the Assigned Commitment, all rights to receive interest on such amount of Loans and all Fees with respect to the Assigned Commitment and other rights of the Assignor under the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents with respect to the Assigned Commitment, all as if the Assignee were an original Lender under and signatory to the Credit Agreement having a Revolving Commitment equal to the amount of the Assigned Commitment. The Assignee, subject to the terms and conditions hereof, hereby assumes all obligations of the Assignor with respect to the Assigned Commitment as if the Assignee were an original Lender under and signatory to the Credit Agreement having a Revolving Commitment equal to the Assigned Commitment, which obligations shall include, but shall not be limited to, the obligation of the Assignor to make Revolving Loans to the Borrower with respect to the Assigned Commitment and the obligation to indemnify the Administrative Agent as provided in the Credit Agreement (the foregoing obligations, together with all other similar obligations more particularly set forth in the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents, shall be referred to hereinafter, collectively, as the "Assigned Obligations"). The Assignor shall have no further duties or obligations with respect to, and shall have no further interest in, the Assigned Obligations or the Assigned Commitment from and after the Assignment Date.
(b) The assignment by the Assignor to the Assignee hereunder is without recourse to the Assignor. The Assignee makes and confirms to the Administrative Agent, the Assignor, and the other Lenders all of the representations, warranties and covenants of a Lender under Article XII of the Credit Agreement. Not in limitation of the foregoing, the Assignee acknowledges and agrees that, except as set forth in Section 4. below, the Assignor is making no representations or warranties with respect to, and the Assignee hereby releases and discharges the Assignor for any responsibility or liability for: (i) the present or future solvency or financial condition of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary, (ii) any representations, warranties, statements or information made or furnished by the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary in connection with the Credit Agreement or otherwise, (iii) the validity, efficacy, sufficiency, or enforceability of the Credit Agreement, any Loan Document or any other document or instrument executed in connection therewith, or the collectibility of the Assigned Obligations, (iv) the perfection, priority or validity of any Lien with respect to any collateral at any time securing the Obligations or the Assigned Obligations under the Notes or the Credit Agreement and (v) the performance or failure to perform by the Borrower or any other Loan Party of any obligation under the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document. Further, the Assignee acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent, any other Lender or counsel to the Administrative Agent or any of their respective officers, directors, employees and agents and based on the financial statements supplied by the Borrower and such other documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to become a Lender under the Credit Agreement. The Assignee also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under the Credit Agreement or any Note or pursuant to any other obligation. The Administrative Agent shall have no duty or responsibility whatsoever, either initially or on a continuing basis, to provide the Assignee with any credit or other information with respect to the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Subsidiary or to notify the undersigned of any Default or Event of Default except as expressly provided in the Credit Agreement. The Assignee has not relied on the Administrative Agent as to any legal or factual matter in connection therewith or in connection with the transactions contemplated thereunder.
Section 2. . In consideration of the assignment made pursuant to Section 1. of this Agreement, the Assignee agrees to pay to the Assignor on the Assignment Date, an amount equal to $         representing the aggregate principal amount outstanding of the Revolving Loans owing to the Assignor under the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents being assigned hereby.
Payment by Assignee
Section 3. . The Assignor agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent on the Assignment Date the administrative fee payable under Section 13.6.(b)(iv) of the Credit Agreement.
Payments by Assignor
Section 4. . The Assignor hereby represents and warrants to the Assignee that (a) as of the Assignment Date (i) the Assignor is a Lender under the Credit Agreement having a Revolving Commitment under the Credit Agreement immediately prior to the Assignment Date, equal to $         and that the Assignor is not in default of its obligations under the Credit Agreement; and (ii) the outstanding balance of Revolving Loans owing to the Assignor (without reduction by any assignments thereof which have not yet become effective) is $        ; and (b) it is the legal and beneficial owner of the Assigned Commitment which is free and clear of any adverse claim created by the Assignor.
Representations and Warranties of Assignor
 
Section 5. . The Assignee (a) represents and warrants that it is (i) legally authorized to enter into this Agreement; (ii) an "accredited investor" (as such term is used in Regulation D of the Securities Act) and (iii) an Eligible Assignee; (b) confirms that it has received a copy of the Credit Agreement, together with copies of the most recent financial statements delivered pursuant thereto and such other documents and information (including without limitation the Loan Documents) as it has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement; (c) appoints and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such action as contractual representative on its behalf and to exercise such powers under the Loan Documents as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms thereof together with such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto; (d) agrees that it will become a party to and shall be bound by the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents to which the other Lenders are a party on the Assignment Date and will perform in accordance therewith all of the obligations which are required to be performed by it as a Lender; and (e) is either (i) not organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is a resident for tax purposes or (ii) has delivered to the Administrative Agent (with an additional copy for the Borrower) such items required under Section 3.10. of the Credit Agreement.
Representations, Warranties and Agreements of Assignee
Section 6. . Following the execution of this Agreement, the Assignor will deliver to the Administrative Agent (a) a duly executed copy of this Agreement for acknowledgment and recording by the Administrative Agent and (b) the Assignor's Revolving Note. Upon such acknowledgment and recording, from and after the Assignment Date, the Administrative Agent shall make all payments in respect of the interest assigned hereby (including payments of principal, interest, fees and other amounts) to the Assignee. The Assignor and Assignee shall make all appropriate adjustments in payments under the Credit Agreement for periods prior to the Assignment Date directly between themselves.
Recording and Acknowledgment by the Administrative Agent
Section 7. . The Assignee specifies as its address for notices and its Lending Office for all Loans, the offices set forth below:
Addresses
 
Section 8. . All payments to be made to the Assignee under this Agreement by the Assignor, and all payments to be made to the Assignee under the Credit Agreement, shall be made as provided in the Credit Agreement in accordance with the following instructions:
Payment Instructions
 
Section 9. . This Agreement, and the assignment and assumption contemplated herein, shall not be effective until (a) this Agreement is executed and delivered by each of the Assignor, the Assignee, the Administrative Agent and if required, the Borrower, and (b) the payment to the Assignor of the amounts owing by the Assignee pursuant to Section 2. hereof and (c) the payment to the Administrative Agent of the amounts owing by the Assignor pursuant to Section 3. hereof. Upon recording and acknowledgment of this Agreement by the Administrative Agent, from and after the Assignment Date, (i) the Assignee shall be a party to the Credit Agreement and, to the extent provided in
Effectiveness of Assignment
 
this Agreement, have the rights and obligations of a Lender thereunder and (ii) the Assignor shall, to the extent provided in this Agreement, relinquish its rights (except as otherwise provided in Section 13.11 of the Credit Agreement) and be released from its obligations under the Credit Agreement; , , that if the Assignor does not assign its entire interest under the Loan Documents, it shall remain a Lender entitled to all of the benefits and subject to all of the obligations thereunder with respect to its Commitment.
provided
however
Section 10. . THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK APPLICABLE TO CONTRACTS EXECUTED, AND TO BE FULLY PERFORMED, IN SUCH STATE.
Governing Law
Section 11. . This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts each of which, when taken together, shall constitute one and the same agreement.
Counterparts
Section 12. . Section headings have been inserted herein for convenience only and shall not be construed to be a part hereof.
Headings
Section 13. . This Agreement may not be amended, changed, waived or modified except by a writing executed by the Assignee and the Assignor.
Amendments; Waivers
Section 14. . This Agreement embodies the entire agreement between the Assignor and the Assignee with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes all other prior arrangements and understandings relating to the subject matter hereof.
Entire Agreement
Section 15. . This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and permitted assigns.
Binding Effect
Section 16. . Terms not otherwise defined herein are used herein with the respective meanings given them in the Credit Agreement.
Definitions
Section 17. . The Borrower hereby agrees that the Assignee shall be a Lender under the Credit Agreement having a Revolving Commitment equal to the Assigned Commitment. The Borrower agrees that the Assignee shall have all of the rights and remedies of a Lender under the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents as if the Assignee were an original Lender under and signatory to the Credit Agreement, including, but not limited to, the right of a Lender to receive payments of principal and of interest accruing after the effectiveness of this Assignment with respect to the Assigned Obligations, if any, and to the Revolving Loans made by the Lenders after the date hereof and to receive the Fees accruing after the effectiveness of this Assignment payable to the Lenders as provided in the Credit Agreement. Further, the Assignee shall be entitled to the benefit of the indemnification provisions from the Borrower in favor of the Lenders as provided in the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents. The Borrower further agrees, upon the execution and delivery of this Agreement and surrender to the Administrative Agent of the original Revolving Note by the Assignor and cancellation thereof by the Administrative Agent or other provision in respect thereof in accordance with Section 2.10. of the Credit Agreement, to execute in favor of the Assignee a Revolving Note in an initial amount equal to the Assigned Commitment. Further, the Borrower agrees that, upon the execution and delivery of this Agreement, the Borrower shall owe the Assigned Obligations to the Assignee as if the Assignee were the Lender originally making such Loans and entering into such other obligations.
[Include this Section only if the Borrower's consent is required under Section 13.6.(b) of the Credit Agreement]
Agreements of the Borrower
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed this Assignment and Assumption Agreement as of the date and year first written above.
 
 
Accepted as of the date first written above.
ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT:
WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as Administrative Agent
 
 
THIS GUARANTY dated as of                      , 2012 executed and delivered by each of the undersigned and the other Persons from time to time party hereto pursuant to the execution and delivery of an Accession Agreement in the form of Annex I hereto (all of the undersigned, together with such other Persons each a "Guarantor" and collectively, the "Guarantors") in favor of WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, in its capacity as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent") for the Lenders under that certain Credit Agreement dated as of May 21, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"), by and among Saul Holdings Limited Partnership (the "Borrower"), the Lenders from time to time parties thereto (the "Lenders"), the Issuing Banks from time to time parties thereto (the "Issuing Banks"), the Administrative Agent, and the other parties thereto, for its benefit and the benefit of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks (the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, each individually a "Guarantied Party" and collectively, the "Guarantied Parties").
WHEREAS, pursuant to the Credit Agreement, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders have agreed to make available to the Borrower certain financial accommodations on the terms and conditions set forth in the Credit Agreement;
WHEREAS, each Guarantor is owned or controlled by the Borrower, or is otherwise an Affiliate of the Borrower;
WHEREAS, the Borrower, each Guarantor and the other Subsidiaries of the Borrower, though separate legal entities, are mutually dependent on each other in the conduct of their respective businesses as an integrated operation and have determined it to be in their mutual best interests to obtain financing from the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks through their collective efforts;
WHEREAS, each Guarantor acknowledges that it will receive direct and indirect benefits from the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks making such financial accommodations available to the Borrower under the Credit Agreement and, accordingly, each Guarantor is willing to guarantee the Borrower's obligations to the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks on the terms and conditions contained herein; and
WHEREAS, each Guarantor's execution and delivery of this Guaranty is a condition to the Administrative Agent and the other Guarantied Parties' making, and continuing to make, such financial accommodations to the Borrower.
NOW, THEREFORE, for good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged by each Guarantor, each Guarantor agrees as follows:
Section 1. . Each Guarantor hereby absolutely, irrevocably and unconditionally guaranties the due and punctual payment and performance when due, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, of all of the following (collectively referred to as the "Guarantied Obligations"): (a) all indebtedness and obligations owing by the Borrower or any other Loan Party to any Lender or the Administrative Agent under or in connection with the Credit Agreement and any other Loan Document to which the Borrower or such other Loan Party is a party, including without limitation, the repayment of all principal of the Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans, all Letter of Credit Liabilities, and the payment of all interest, fees, charges, reasonable attorneys' fees and other amounts payable to any Lender, the Issuing Banks or the Administrative Agent thereunder; (b) any and all
Guaranty
 
extensions, renewals, modifications, amendments or substitutions of the foregoing; (c) all expenses, including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys' fees and disbursements, that are incurred by the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party in the enforcement of any of the foregoing or any obligation of such Guarantor hereunder; and (d) all other Obligations.
Section 2. . This Guaranty is a guaranty of payment, and not of collection, and a debt of each Guarantor for its own account. Accordingly, the Guarantied Parties shall not be obligated or required before enforcing this Guaranty against any Guarantor: (a) to pursue any right or remedy the Guarantied Parties may have against the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person or commence any suit or other proceeding against the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person in any court or other tribunal; (b) to make any claim in a liquidation or bankruptcy of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person; (c) to make demand of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person; or (d) to enforce or seek to enforce or realize upon any collateral security held by the Guarantied Parties which may secure any of the Guarantied Obligations.
Guaranty of Payment and Not of Collection
Section 3. . Each Guarantor guarantees that the Guarantied Obligations will be paid strictly in accordance with the terms of the documents evidencing the same, regardless of any Applicable Law now or hereafter in effect in any jurisdiction affecting any of such terms or the rights of the Guarantied Parties with respect thereto. The liability of each Guarantor under this Guaranty shall be absolute, irrevocable and unconditional in accordance with its terms and shall remain in full force and effect without regard to, and shall not be released, suspended, discharged, terminated or otherwise affected by, any circumstance or occurrence whatsoever, including without limitation, the following (whether or not such Guarantor consents thereto or has notice thereof):
Guaranty Absolute
(a) (i) any change in the amount, interest rate or due date or other term of any of the Guarantied Obligations, (ii) any change in the time, place or manner of payment of all or any portion of the Guarantied Obligations, (iii) any amendment or waiver of, or consent to the departure from or other indulgence with respect to, the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or any other document or instrument evidencing or relating to any Guarantied Obligations, or (iv) any waiver, renewal, extension, addition, or supplement to, or deletion from, or any other action or inaction under or in respect of, the Credit Agreement, any of the other Loan Documents, or any other documents, instruments or agreements relating to the Guarantied Obligations or any other instrument or agreement referred to therein or evidencing any Guarantied Obligations or any assignment or transfer of any of the foregoing;
(b) any lack of validity or enforceability of the Credit Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents (the "Credit Documents") or any other document, instrument or agreement referred to therein or evidencing any Guarantied Obligations or any assignment or transfer of any of the foregoing;
(c) any furnishing to the Guarantied Parties of any security for the Guarantied Obligations, or any sale, exchange, release or surrender of, or realization on, any collateral securing any of the Guarantied Obligations;
(d) any settlement or compromise by the Borrower or any other Loan Party of any of the Guarantied Obligations, any security therefor, or any liability of any other party with respect to the Guarantied Obligations, or any subordination of the payment of the Guarantied Obligations to the payment of any other liability of the Borrower or any other Loan Party;
(e) any bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, composition, adjustment, dissolution, liquidation or other like proceeding relating to such Guarantor, the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person, or any action taken with respect to this Guaranty by any trustee or receiver, or by any court, in any such proceeding;
 
(f) any act or failure to act by the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person which may adversely affect such Guarantor's subrogation rights, if any, against the Borrower or any other Loan Party to recover payments made under this Guaranty;
(g) any nonperfection or impairment of any security interest or other Lien on any collateral, if any, securing in any way any of the Guarantied Obligations;
(h) any application of sums paid by the Borrower, any Guarantor or any other Person with respect to the liabilities of the Borrower to the Guarantied Parties, regardless of what liabilities of the Borrower remain unpaid;
(i) any defect, limitation or insufficiency in the borrowing powers of the Borrower or in the exercise thereof; or
(j) any other circumstance which might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, a Guarantor hereunder (other than indefeasible payment in full in cash or release or termination of the obligations of any Guarantor hereunder by the Guarantied Parties pursuant to the terms of the Credit Agreement).
Section 4. . The Guarantied Parties may, at any time and from time to time, without the consent of, or notice to, any Guarantor, and without discharging any Guarantor from its obligations hereunder, take any and all actions described in Section 3. and may otherwise: (a) amend, modify, alter or supplement the terms of any of the Guarantied Obligations, including, but not limited to, extending or shortening the time of payment of any of the Guarantied Obligations or changing the interest rate that may accrue on any of the Guarantied Obligations; (b) amend, modify, alter or supplement the Credit Agreement or any other Credit Document; (c) sell, exchange, release or otherwise deal with all, or any part, of any collateral securing any of the Guarantied Obligations; (d) release any Loan Party or other Person liable in any manner for the payment or collection of the Guarantied Obligations; (e) exercise, or refrain from exercising, any rights against the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person; and (f) apply any sum, by whomsoever paid or however realized, to the Guarantied Obligations in such order as the Guarantied Parties shall elect, in the case of each of the foregoing clauses (a) through (e) above, pursuant to the terms of the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
Action with Respect to Guarantied Obligations
Section 5. . Each Guarantor hereby makes to the Administrative Agent and the other Guarantied Parties all of the representations and warranties made by the Borrower with respect to such Guarantor in the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents, as if the same were set forth herein in full .
Representations and Warranties
mutatis mutandis
Section 6. . Each Guarantor will comply with all covenants with which the Borrower is to cause such Guarantor to comply under the terms of the Credit Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents.
Covenants
Section 7. . Each Guarantor, to the fullest extent permitted by Applicable Law, hereby waives notice of acceptance hereof or any presentment, demand, protest or notice of any kind, other than demand for payment hereunder, and any other act or thing, or omission or delay to do any other act or thing, which in any manner or to any extent might vary the risk of such Guarantor or which otherwise might operate to discharge such Guarantor from its obligations hereunder.
Waiver
 
Section 8. . If the Guarantied Parties or any of them are prevented under Applicable Law or otherwise from demanding or accelerating payment of any of the Guarantied Obligations by reason of any automatic stay or otherwise, the Administrative Agent and/or the other Guarantied Parties shall be entitled to receive from each Guarantor, upon demand therefor, the sums which otherwise would have been due had such demand or acceleration occurred.
Inability to Accelerate Loan
Section 9. . If claim is ever made on the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party for repayment or recovery of any amount or amounts received in payment or on account of any of the Guarantied Obligations, and the Administrative Agent or such other Guarantied Party repays all or part of said amount by reason of (a) any judgment, decree or order of any court or administrative body of competent jurisdiction, or (b) any settlement or compromise of any such claim effected by the Administrative Agent or such other Guarantied Party with any such claimant (including the Borrower or a trustee in bankruptcy for the Borrower), then and in such event each Guarantor agrees that any such judgment, decree, order, settlement or compromise shall be binding on it, notwithstanding any revocation hereof or the cancellation of the Credit Agreement, any of the other Loan Documents, or any other instrument evidencing any liability of the Borrower, and such Guarantor shall be and remain liable to the Administrative Agent or such other Guarantied Party for the amounts so repaid or recovered to the same extent as if such amount had never originally been paid to the Administrative Agent or such other Guarantied Party, except to the extent such amount is determined, in a final, non-appealable judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction, to have been collected by the Administrative Agent or such other Guarantied Party in violation of the Credit Agreement or other Loan Document.
Reinstatement of Guarantied Obligations
Section 10. . Upon the making by any Guarantor of any payment hereunder for the account of the Borrower, such Guarantor shall be subrogated to the rights of the payee against the Borrower; , , that such Guarantor shall not enforce any right or receive any payment by way of subrogation or otherwise take any action in respect of any other claim or cause of action such Guarantor may have against the Borrower arising by reason of any payment or performance by such Guarantor pursuant to this Guaranty, unless and until all of the Guarantied Obligations have been indefeasibly paid and performed in full. If any amount shall be paid to such Guarantor on account of or in respect of such subrogation rights or other claims or causes of action, such Guarantor shall hold such amount in trust for the benefit of the Guarantied Parties and shall forthwith pay such amount to the Administrative Agent to be credited and applied against the Guarantied Obligations, whether matured or unmatured, in accordance with the terms of the Credit Agreement or to be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral security for any Guarantied Obligations existing.
Subrogation
provided
however
Section 11. . All sums payable by each Guarantor hereunder, whether of principal, interest, fees, expenses, premiums or otherwise, shall be paid in full, without set-off or counterclaim or any deduction or withholding whatsoever (including any Taxes, subject to Section 3.10. of the Credit Agreement), and if such Guarantor is required by Applicable Law or by any Governmental Authority to make any such deduction or withholding such Guarantor shall pay to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders such additional amount as will result in the receipt by the Administrative Agent and the Lenders of the full amount payable hereunder had such deduction or withholding not occurred or been required.
Payments Free and Clear
Section 12. . In addition to any rights now or hereafter granted under any of the other Loan Documents or Applicable Law and not by way of limitation of any such rights, each Guarantor hereby authorizes each Guarantied Party, at any time while an Event of Default exists, without any prior
Set-off
 
notice to such Guarantor or to any other Person, any such notice being hereby expressly waived, but in the case of a Lender or an Issuing Bank subject to receipt of the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent and Requisite Lenders, exercised in their sole discretion, to set-off and to appropriate and to apply any and all deposits (general or special, including, but not limited to, indebtedness evidenced by certificates of deposit, whether matured or unmatured) and any other indebtedness at any time held or owing by the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender or any affiliate of the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank, or such Lender to or for the credit or the account of the Borrower against and on account of any of the Guarantied Obligations, although such obligations shall be contingent or unmatured.
Section 13. . Each Guarantor hereby expressly covenants and agrees for the benefit of the Guarantied Parties that all obligations and liabilities of the Borrower to such Guarantor of whatever description, including without limitation, all intercompany receivables of such Guarantor from the Borrower (collectively, the "Junior Claims") shall be subordinate and junior in right of payment to all Guarantied Obligations. If an Event of Default shall exist, then no Guarantor shall accept any direct or indirect payment (in cash, property or securities, by setoff or otherwise) from the Borrower on account of or in any manner in respect of any Junior Claim until all of the Guarantied Obligations have been indefeasibly paid in full.
Subordination
Section 14. . It is the intent of each Guarantor, the Administrative Agent and the other Guarantied Parties that in any Proceeding, such Guarantor's maximum obligation hereunder shall equal, but not exceed, the maximum amount which would not otherwise cause the obligations of such Guarantor hereunder (or any other obligations of such Guarantor to the Guarantied Parties) to be avoidable or unenforceable against such Guarantor in such Proceeding as a result of Applicable Law, including without limitation, (a) Section 548 of the Bankruptcy Code of 1978, as amended (the "Bankruptcy Code") and (b) any state fraudulent transfer or fraudulent conveyance act or statute applied in such Proceeding, whether by virtue of Section 544 of the Bankruptcy Code or otherwise. The Applicable Laws under which the possible avoidance or unenforceability of the obligations of such Guarantor hereunder (or any other obligations of such Guarantor to the Guarantied Parties) shall be determined in any such Proceeding are referred to as the "Avoidance Provisions". Accordingly, to the extent that the obligations of any Guarantor hereunder would otherwise be subject to avoidance under the Avoidance Provisions, the maximum Guarantied Obligations for which such Guarantor shall be liable hereunder shall be reduced to that amount which, as of the time any of the Guarantied Obligations are deemed to have been incurred under the Avoidance Provisions, would not cause the obligations of any Guarantor hereunder (or any other obligations of such Guarantor to the Guarantied Parties), to be subject to avoidance under the Avoidance Provisions. This Section is intended solely to preserve the rights of the Administrative Agent and the other Guarantied Parties hereunder to the maximum extent that would not cause the obligations of any Guarantor hereunder to be subject to avoidance under the Avoidance Provisions, and no Guarantor or any other Person shall have any right or claim under this Section as against the Guarantied Parties that would not otherwise be available to such Person under the Avoidance Provisions.
Avoidance Provisions
Section 15. . Each Guarantor assumes all responsibility for being and keeping itself informed of the financial condition of the Borrower and the other Loan Parties, and of all other circumstances bearing upon the risk of nonpayment of any of the Guarantied Obligations and the nature, scope and extent of the risks that such Guarantor assumes and incurs hereunder, and agrees that neither of the Administrative Agent nor any other Guarantied Party shall have any duty whatsoever to advise any Guarantor of information regarding such circumstances or risks.
Information
 
Section 16. . THIS GUARANTY SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK APPLICABLE TO CONTRACTS EXECUTED, AND TO BE FULLY PERFORMED, IN SUCH STATE.
Governing Law
SECTION 17. .
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
(a) EACH GUARANTOR, AND EACH OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND THE OTHER GUARANTIED PARTIES BY ACCEPTING THE BENEFITS HEREOF, ACKNOWLEDGES THAT ANY DISPUTE OR CONTROVERSY BETWEEN SUCH GUARANTOR, THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT OR ANY OF THE OTHER GUARANTIED PARTES WOULD BE BASED ON DIFFICULT AND COMPLEX ISSUES OF LAW AND FACT AND WOULD RESULT IN DELAY AND EXPENSE TO THE PARTIES. ACCORDINGLY, TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, EACH OF THE GUARANTORS, THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND THE OTHER GUARANTIED PARTIES HEREBY WAIVES ITS RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING OF ANY KIND OR NATURE IN ANY COURT OR TRIBUNAL IN WHICH AN ACTION MAY BE COMMENCED BY OR AGAINST ANY PARTY HERETO ARISING OUT OF THIS GUARANTY.
(b) EACH GUARANTOR IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY AGREES THAT IT WILL NOT COMMENCE ANY ACTION, LITIGATION OR PROCEEDING OF ANY KIND OR DESCRIPTION, WHETHER IN LAW OR EQUITY, WHETHER IN CONTRACT OR IN TORT OR OTHERWISE, AGAINST THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT, ANY LENDER, ANY ISSUING BANK, OR ANY RELATED PARTY OF THE FOREGOING IN ANY WAY RELATING TO THIS GUARANTY OR ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS RELATING HERETO OR THERETO, IN ANY FORUM OTHER THAN THE COURTS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK SITTING IN NEW YORK COUNTY, AND OF THE UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT OF THE SOUTHERN DISTRICT OF NEW YORK, AND ANY APPELLATE COURT FROM ANY THEREOF, AND EACH OF THE PARTIES HERETO, AND EACH OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND THE OTHER GUARANTIED PARTIES BY ACCEPTING THE BENEFITS HEREOF, IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY SUBMITS TO THE JURISDICTION OF SUCH COURTS AND AGREES THAT ALL CLAIMS IN RESPECT OF ANY SUCH ACTION, LITIGATION OR PROCEEDING MAY BE HEARD AND DETERMINED IN SUCH NEW YORK STATE COURT OR, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, IN SUCH FEDERAL COURT. EACH PARTY FURTHER WAIVES ANY OBJECTION THAT IT MAY NOW OR HEREAFTER HAVE TO THE VENUE OF ANY SUCH ACTION OR PROCEEDING IN ANY SUCH COURT OR THAT SUCH ACTION OR PROCEEDING WAS BROUGHT IN AN INCONVENIENT FORUM AND EACH AGREES NOT TO PLEAD OR CLAIM THE SAME. THE CHOICE OF FORUM SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION SHALL NOT BE DEEMED TO PRECLUDE THE BRINGING OF ANY ACTION BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT OR ANY OTHER GUARANTIED PARTY OR THE ENFORCEMENT BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT OR ANY OTHER GUARANTIED PARTY OF ANY JUDGMENT OBTAINED IN SUCH FORUM IN ANY OTHER APPROPRIATE JURISDICTION.
(c) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION HAVE BEEN CONSIDERED BY EACH PARTY WITH THE ADVICE OF COUNSEL AND WITH A FULL UNDERSTANDING OF THE LEGAL CONSEQUENCES THEREOF, AND SHALL SURVIVE THE PAYMENT OF THE LOANS AND ALL OTHER AMOUNTS PAYABLE HEREUNDER OR UNDER THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS, THE TERMINATION OR EXPIRATION OF ALL LETTERS OF CREDIT AND THE TERMINATION OF THIS GUARANTY.
 
Section 18. . The Administrative Agent and each Lender may maintain books and accounts setting forth the amounts of principal, interest and other sums paid and payable with respect to the Guarantied Obligations arising under or in connection with the Credit Agreement, and in the case of any dispute relating to any of the outstanding amount, payment or receipt of any of the Guarantied Obligations or otherwise, the entries in such books and accounts shall constitute prima facie evidence of amounts and other matters set forth therein. The failure of the Administrative Agent or any Lender to maintain such books and accounts shall not in any way relieve or discharge any Guarantor of any of its obligations hereunder.
Loan Accounts
Section 19. . No delay or failure on the part of the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party in the exercise of any right or remedy it may have against any Guarantor hereunder or otherwise shall operate as a waiver thereof, and no single or partial exercise by the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party of any such right or remedy shall preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other such right or remedy.
Waiver of Remedies
Section 20. . This Guaranty shall remain in full force and effect with respect to each Guarantor until payment in full in cash of the Guarantied Obligations and the other Obligations and the termination or cancellation of the Credit Agreement in accordance with its terms.
Termination
Section 21. . Each reference herein to the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party shall be deemed to include such Person's respective successors and assigns (including, but not limited to, any holder of the Guarantied Obligations) in whose favor the provisions of this Guaranty also shall inure, and each reference herein to each Guarantor shall be deemed to include such Guarantor's successors and assigns, upon whom this Guaranty also shall be binding. The Guarantied Parties may, in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Credit Agreement, assign, transfer or sell any Guarantied Obligation, or grant or sell participations in any Guarantied Obligations, to any Person without the consent of, or notice to, any Guarantor and without releasing, discharging or modifying any Guarantor's obligations hereunder. Subject to Section 13.9. of the Credit Agreement, each Guarantor hereby consents to the delivery by the Administrative Agent and any other Guarantied Party to any Eligible Assignee or Participant (or any prospective Eligible Assignee or Participant) of any financial or other information regarding the Borrower or any Guarantor. No Guarantor may assign or transfer its obligations hereunder to any Person without the prior written consent of all Lenders and any such assignment or other transfer to which all of the Lenders have not so consented shall be null and void.
Successors and Assigns
Section 22. . THE OBLIGATIONS OF THE GUARANTORS HEREUNDER SHALL BE JOINT AND SEVERAL, AND ACCORDINGLY, EACH GUARANTOR CONFIRMS THAT IT IS LIABLE FOR THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE "GUARANTIED OBLIGATIONS" AND ALL OF THE OBLIGATIONS AND LIABILITIES OF EACH OF THE OTHER GUARANTORS HEREUNDER.
JOINT AND SEVERAL OBLIGATIONS
Section 23. . This Guaranty may not be amended except in writing signed by the Administrative Agent and each Guarantor, subject to Section 13.7 of the Credit Agreement.
Amendments
Section 24. . All payments to be made by any Guarantor pursuant to this Guaranty shall be made in Dollars, in immediately available funds to the Administrative Agent at its Principal Office, not later than 1:00 p.m. Central time, on the date one Business Day after demand therefor.
Payments
Section 25. . All notices, requests and other communications hereunder shall be in writing (including facsimile transmission or similar writing) and shall be given (a) to each Guarantor at its
Notices
 
address set forth below its signature hereto, (b) to the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party at its address for notices provided for in the Credit Agreement, or (c) as to each such party at such other address as such party shall designate in a written notice to the other parties. Each such notice, request or other communication shall be effective (i) if mailed, when received; (ii) if telecopied, when transmitted (with confirmation); or (iii) if hand delivered, when delivered; , , that any notice of a change of address for notices shall not be effective until received.
provided
however
Section 26. . In case any provision of this Guaranty shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
Severability
Section 27. . Section headings used in this Guaranty are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction of this Guaranty.
Headings
Section 28. . Neither the Administrative Agent nor any other Guarantied Party, nor any affiliate, officer, director, employee, attorney, or agent of the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party, shall have any liability with respect to, and each Guarantor hereby waives, releases, and agrees not to sue any of them upon, any claim for any special, indirect, incidental, or consequential damages suffered or incurred by a Guarantor in connection with, arising out of, or in any way related to, this Guaranty or any of the other Credit Documents, or any of the transactions contemplated by this Guaranty, the Credit Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents. Each Guarantor hereby waives, releases, and agrees not to sue the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party or any of the Administrative Agent's or any other Guarantied Party's affiliates, officers, directors, employees, attorneys, or agents for punitive damages in respect of any claim in connection with, arising out of, or in any way related to, this Guaranty, the Credit Agreement or any of the other Credit Documents, or any of the transactions contemplated by thereby.
Limitation of Liability
Section 29. . Each Guarantor acknowledges and agrees that information regarding the Guarantor may be delivered electronically pursuant to Section 9.5 of the Credit Agreement.
Electronic Delivery of Certain Information
Section 30. . (a) For the purposes of this Guaranty:
Definitions
"" means any of the following: (x) any Guarantor shall: (i) commence a voluntary case under the Bankruptcy Code or other federal bankruptcy laws (as now or hereafter in effect); (ii) file a petition seeking to take advantage of any other Applicable Laws, domestic or foreign, relating to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, winding-up, or composition or adjustment of debts; (iii) consent to, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any petition filed against it in an involuntary case under such bankruptcy laws or other Applicable Laws or consent to any proceeding or action described in the immediately following subsection (z); (iv) apply for or consent to, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, the appointment of, or the taking of possession by, a receiver, custodian, trustee, or liquidator of itself or of a substantial part of its property, domestic or foreign; (v) admit in writing its inability to pay its debts as they become due; or (vi) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors; (y) the board of directors (or similar governing body) of any Guarantor or any committee thereof shall adopt any resolution or otherwise authorize any action to approve any of the actions referred to in this definition of "Proceeding"; or (z) a case or other proceeding shall be commenced against any Guarantor in any court of competent jurisdiction seeking: (i) relief under the Bankruptcy Code or other federal bankruptcy laws (as now or hereafter in effect) or under any other Applicable Laws, domestic or foreign, relating to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, winding-up, or composition or adjustment of debts; or (ii) the appointment of a trustee, receiver, custodian, liquidator or the like of such Person, or of
Proceeding
 
all or any substantial part of the assets, domestic or foreign, of such Person, and in the case of either clause (i) or (ii) such case or proceeding shall continue undismissed or unstayed for a period of 60 consecutive days, or an order granting the remedy or other relief requested in such case or proceeding (including, but not limited to, an order for relief under such Bankruptcy Code or such other federal bankruptcy laws) shall be entered.
(b) Terms not otherwise defined herein are used herein with the respective meanings given them in the Credit Agreement.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each Guarantor has duly executed and delivered this Guaranty as of the date and year first written above.
 
 
THIS ACCESSION AGREEMENT dated as of             ,         , executed and delivered by                             , a                      (the "New Guarantor") in favor of WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, in its capacity as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent") for the Lenders under that certain Credit Agreement dated as of May 21, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"), by and among Saul Holdings Limited Partnership (the "Borrower"), the Lenders from time to time parties thereto (the "Lenders"), the Issuing Banks from time to time parties thereto (the "Issuing Banks"), Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent"), and the other parties thereto, for its benefit and the benefit of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks (the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, each individually a "Guarantied Party" and collectively, the "Guarantied Parties").
WHEREAS, pursuant to the Credit Agreement, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders have agreed to make available to the Borrower certain financial accommodations on the terms and conditions set forth in the Credit Agreement;
WHEREAS, New Guarantor is owned or controlled by the Borrower, or is otherwise an Affiliate of the Borrower;
WHEREAS, the Borrower, the New Guarantor and the other Subsidiaries of the Borrower, though separate legal entities, are mutually dependent on each other in the conduct of their respective businesses as an integrated operation and have determined it to be in their mutual best interests to obtain financing from the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks through their collective efforts;
WHEREAS, New Guarantor acknowledges that it will receive direct and indirect benefits from the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks making such financial accommodations available to the Borrower under the Credit Agreement and, accordingly, New Guarantor is willing to guarantee the Borrower's obligations to the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks on the terms and conditions contained herein; and
WHEREAS, the New Guarantor's execution and delivery of this Agreement is a condition to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders continuing to make such financial accommodations to the Borrower.
NOW, THEREFORE, for good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged by the New Guarantor, the New Guarantor agrees as follows:
Section 1. . The New Guarantor hereby agrees that it is a "Guarantor" under that certain Guaranty dated as of May 21, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Guaranty") made by each of the Guarantors party thereto in favor of the Administrative Agent and the other Guarantied Parties and assumes all obligations of a "Guarantor" thereunder, all as if the New Guarantor had been an original signatory to the Guaranty. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the New Guarantor hereby:
Accession to Guaranty
(a) irrevocably and unconditionally guarantees the due and punctual payment and performance when due, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, of all Guarantied Obligations (as defined in the Guaranty);
 
(b) makes to the Administrative Agent and the other Guarantied Parties as of the date hereof each of the representations and warranties contained in Section 5 of the Guaranty as to itself as a Guarantor and agrees to be bound by each of the covenants contained in Section 6 of the Guaranty; and
(c) consents and agrees to each provision set forth in the Guaranty.
SECTION 2. . THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK APPLICABLE TO CONTRACTS EXECUTED, AND TO BE FULLY PERFORMED, IN SUCH STATE.
GOVERNING LAW
Section 3. . Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have their respective defined meanings given them in the Credit Agreement.
Definitions
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the New Guarantor has caused this Accession Agreement to be duly executed and delivered under seal by its duly authorized officers as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
 
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association
Minneapolis Loan Center
733 Marquette Avenue, 10
th
Floor
Minneapolis, MN 55402
Attention:                                         
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Reference is made to that certain Credit Agreement dated as of May 21, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"), by and among Saul Holdings Limited Partnership (the "Borrower"), the Lenders from time to time parties thereto (the "Lenders"), the Issuing Banks from time to time parties thereto, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent"), and the other parties thereto. Capitalized terms used herein, and not otherwise defined herein, have their respective meanings given them in the Credit Agreement.
 
 
 
[Check one box only]
 
[Check one box only]
 
The Borrower hereby certifies to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders that as of the date hereof, as of the date of the making of the requested Revolving Loans, and after making such Revolving Loans, (a) no Default or Event of Default exists or would exist, and none of the limits specified in Section 2.14. would be violated; and (b) the representations and warranties made or deemed made by the Borrower and each other Loan Party in the Loan Documents to which any of them is a party, are and shall be true and correct in all material respects (except in the case of any representation or warranty qualified by materiality, in which case such representation and warranty shall be true and correct in all respects)
 
with the same force and effect as if made on and as of such date except to the extent that such representations and warranties expressly relate solely to an earlier date (in which case such representations and warranties shall have been true and correct in all material respects (except in the case of any representation or warranty qualified by materiality, in which case such representation and warranty shall be true and correct in all respects) on and as of such earlier date) and except for changes in factual circumstances not expressly prohibited under the Loan Documents. In addition, the Borrower certifies to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders that all conditions to the making of the requested Revolving Loans contained in Article VI. of the Credit Agreement will have been satisfied (or waived in accordance with the terms of the Credit Agreement) at the time such Revolving Loans are made.
 
 
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association
Minneapolis Loan Center
733 Marquette Avenue, 10
th
Floor
Minneapolis, MN 55402
Attention:                                         
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Reference is made to that certain Credit Agreement dated as of May 21, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"), by and among Saul Holdings Limited Partnership (the "Borrower"), the Lenders from time to time parties thereto (the "Lenders"), the Issuing Banks from time to time parties thereto, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent"), and the other parties thereto. Capitalized terms used herein, and not otherwise defined herein, have their respective meanings given them in the Credit Agreement.
Pursuant to Section 2.8. of the Credit Agreement, the Borrower hereby requests a Continuation of Loans under the Credit Agreement, and in that connection sets forth below the information relating to such Continuation as required by such Section of the Credit Agreement:
 
 
 
 
[Check one box only]
 
 
The Borrower hereby certifies to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders that as of the date hereof, as of the proposed date of the requested Continuation, and after giving effect to such Continuation, no Default or Event of Default exists or will exist.
If notice of the requested Continuation was given previously by telephone, this notice shall be considered the written confirmation of such telephone notice required under Section 2.8. of the Credit Agreement.
 
 
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association
Minneapolis Loan Center
733 Marquette Avenue, 10
th
Floor
Minneapolis, MN 55402
Attention:                                         
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Reference is made to that certain Credit Agreement dated as of May 21, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"), by and among Saul Holdings Limited Partnership (the "Borrower"), the Lenders from time to time parties thereto (the "Lenders"), the Issuing Banks from time to time parties thereto, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent"), and the other parties thereto. Capitalized terms used herein, and not otherwise defined herein, have their respective meanings given them in the Credit Agreement.
Pursuant to Section 2.9. of the Credit Agreement, the Borrower hereby requests a Conversion of Loans of one Type into Loans of another Type under the Credit Agreement, and in that connection sets forth below the information relating to such Conversion as required by such Section of the Credit Agreement:
 
 
[Check one box only]
 
 
 
[Check one box only]
 
 
[Check one box only]
 
The Borrower hereby certifies to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders that as of the date hereof, as of the proposed date of the requested Conversion, and after giving effect to such Conversion, no Default or Event of Default exists or will exist.
If notice of the requested Conversion was given previously by telephone, this notice shall be considered the written confirmation of such telephone notice required under Section 2.9. of the Credit Agreement.
 
 
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association
Minneapolis Loan Center
733 Marquette Avenue, 10
th
Floor
Minneapolis, MN 55402
Attention:                                         
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Reference is made to that certain Credit Agreement dated as of May 21, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"), by and among Saul Holdings Limited Partnership (the "Borrower"), the Lenders from time to time parties thereto (the "Lenders"), the Issuing Banks from time to time parties thereto, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent"), and the other parties thereto. Capitalized terms used herein, and not otherwise defined herein, have their respective meanings given them in the Credit Agreement.
 
 
 
The Borrower hereby certifies to the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender and the other Lenders that as of the date hereof, as of the date of the making of the requested Swingline Loan, and after the making of such Swingline Loan, (a) no Default or Event of Default exists or would exist, and none of the limits specified in Section 2.14. of the Credit Agreement would be violated; and (b) the representations and warranties made or deemed made by the Borrower and each other Loan Party in the Loan Documents to which any of them is a party, are and shall be true and correct in all material respects (except in the case of any representation or warranty qualified by materiality, in which case such representation and warranty shall be true and correct in all respects) with the same force and effect as if made on and as of such date except to the extent that such representations and warranties expressly relate solely to an earlier date (in which case such representations and warranties shall have been true and correct in all material respects (except in the case of any representation or warranty qualified by materiality, in which case such representation and warranty shall be true and correct in all respects) on and as of such earlier date) and except for changes in factual circumstances not expressly prohibited under the Loan Documents. In addition, the Borrower certifies to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders that all conditions to the making of the requested Swingline Loan contained in Article VI. of the Credit Agreement will have been satisfied (or waived in accordance with the terms of the Credit Agreement) at the time such Swingline Loan is made.
 
 
If notice of the requested borrowing of this Swingline Loan was previously given by telephone, this notice is to be considered the written confirmation of such telephone notice required by Section 2.3(b) of the Credit Agreement.
 
 
 
FOR VALUE RECEIVED, the undersigned, SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP (the "Borrower") hereby unconditionally promises to pay to the order of                                                               (the "Lender"), in care of Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent"), to its address at Minneapolis Loan Center of Administrative Agent, 733 Marquette Avenue, 10
th
Floor, Minneapolis, MN 55402, or at such other address as may be specified by the Administrative Agent to the Borrower, the principal sum of                                                               AND     /100 DOLLARS ($        ), or such lesser amount as may be the then outstanding and unpaid balance of all Revolving Loans made by the Lender to the Borrower pursuant to, and in accordance with the terms of, the Credit Agreement.
The Borrower further agrees to pay interest at said office, in Dollars, on the unpaid principal amount owing hereunder from time to time on the dates and at the rates and at the times specified in the Credit Agreement.
This Revolving Note is one of the "Revolving Notes" referred to in that certain Credit Agreement dated as of May 21, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"), by and among the Borrower, the Lenders from time to time parties thereto (the "Lenders"), the Issuing Banks from time to time parties thereto, the Administrative Agent, and the other parties thereto, and is subject to, and entitled to, all provisions and benefits thereof. Capitalized terms used herein and not defined herein shall have the respective meanings given to such terms in the Credit Agreement. The Credit Agreement, among other things, (a) provides for the making of Revolving Loans by the Lender to the Borrower from time to time in an aggregate amount not to exceed at any time outstanding the Dollar amount first above mentioned, (b) permits the prepayment of the Loans by the Borrower subject to certain terms and conditions and (c) provides for the acceleration of the Revolving Loans upon the occurrence of certain specified events.
The Borrower hereby waives presentment, demand, protest and notice of any kind. No failure to exercise, and no delay in exercising any rights hereunder on the part of the holder hereof shall operate as a waiver of such rights.
Time is of the essence for this Note.
[This Note is given in replacement of the Revolving Note dated                      , 20    , in the original principal amount of $         previously delivered to the Lender under the Credit Agreement. THIS NOTE IS NOT INTENDED TO BE, AND SHALL NOT BE CONSTRUED TO BE, A NOVATION OF ANY OF THE OBLIGATIONS OWING UNDER OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE OTHER NOTE.]
1
THIS NOTE SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK APPLICABLE TO CONTRACTS EXECUTED, AND TO BE FULLY PERFORMED, IN SUCH STATE.
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has executed and delivered this Revolving Note under seal as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
FOR VALUE RECEIVED, the undersigned, SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP (the "Borrower"), hereby promises to pay to the order of WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION (the "Swingline Lender") to its address at Minneapolis Loan Center of Administrative Agent, 733 Marquette Avenue, 10
th
Floor, Minneapolis, MN 55402or at such other address as may be specified by the Swingline Lender to the Borrower, the principal sum of                                                               AND NO/100 DOLLARS ($        ) (or such lesser amount as shall equal the aggregate unpaid principal amount of Swingline Loans made by the Swingline Lender to the Borrower under the Credit Agreement), on the dates and in the principal amounts provided in the Credit Agreement, and to pay interest on the unpaid principal amount owing hereunder, at the rates and on the dates provided in the Credit Agreement.
,
The date, amount of each Swingline Loan, and each payment made on account of the principal thereof, shall be recorded by the Swingline Lender on its books and, prior to any transfer of this Swingline Note (this "Note"), endorsed by the Swingline Lender on the schedule attached hereto or any continuation thereof, that the failure of the Swingline Lender to make any such recordation or endorsement shall not affect the obligations of the Borrower to make a payment when due of any amount owing under the Credit Agreement or hereunder in respect of the Swingline Loans.
provided
This Note is the "Swingline Note" referred to in that certain Credit Agreement dated as of May 21, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"), by and among the Borrower, the Lenders from time to time parties thereto (the "Lenders"), the Issuing Banks from time to time parties thereto, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, and the other parties thereto, and evidences Swingline Loans made to the Borrower thereunder. Terms used but not otherwise defined in this Note have the respective meanings assigned to them in the Credit Agreement.
The Credit Agreement provides for the acceleration of the maturity of this Note upon the occurrence of certain events and for prepayments of Swingline Loans upon the terms and conditions specified therein.
THIS NOTE SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK APPLICABLE TO CONTRACTS EXECUTED, AND TO BE FULLY PERFORMED, IN SUCH STATE.
The Borrower hereby waives presentment for payment, demand, notice of demand, notice of non-payment, protest, notice of protest and all other similar notices.
Time is of the essence for this Note.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has executed and delivered this Swingline Note under seal as of the date first written above.
 
 
This Note evidences Swingline Loans made under the within-described Credit Agreement to the Borrower, on the dates and in the principal amounts set forth below, subject to the payments and prepayments of principal set forth below:
 
 
Loan No. 1005595
 
The following representatives of SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP ("Borrower") are authorized to request the disbursement of Loan Proceeds and initiate funds transfers for Loan Number 1005595 assigned to the unsecured revolving credit facility evidenced by that certain Credit Agreement dated as of May 21, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"), by and among the Borrower, the Lenders from time to time parties thereto (the "Lenders"), the Issuing Banks from time to time parties thereto, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent"), and the other parties thereto. The Administrative Agent is authorized to rely on this Transfer Authorizer Designation until it has received a new Transfer Authorizer Designation signed by Borrower, even in the event that any or all of the foregoing information may have changed.
 
 
Loan No. 1005595
 
1.
 
2.
 
3.
 
 
 
Loan No. 1005595
 
Date:                     , 20    
 
 
 
Reference is made to that certain Credit Agreement dated as of                      , 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"), by and among Saul Holdings Limited Partnership (the "Borrower"), the Lenders from time to time parties thereto (the "Lenders"), Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent"), and the other parties thereto. Capitalized terms used herein, and not otherwise defined herein, have their respective meanings given to them in the Credit Agreement.
Pursuant to Section 9.3 of the Credit Agreement, the undersigned hereby certifies to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders that:
1. (a) The undersigned has reviewed the terms of the Credit Agreement and has made a review of the transactions, financial condition and other affairs of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries as of, and during the [quarterly][annual] accounting period ending on                     , 20     and (b) such review has not disclosed the existence during such accounting period, and the undersigned does not have knowledge of the existence, as of the date hereof, of any condition or event constituting a Default or Event of Default [except as set forth on Attachment A hereto, which accurately describes the nature of the conditions(s) or event(s) that constitute (a) Default(s) or (an) Event(s) of Default and the actions which the Borrower (is taking)(is planning to take) with respect to such condition(s) or event(s)].
2. Schedule 1 attached hereto accurately and completely sets forth the calculations required to establish compliance with Section 10.1 of the Credit Agreement on the date of the financial statements for the accounting period set forth above.
3. Borrower's Funds from Operations for such [quarterly][annual] accounting period ending on                     , 20     were $         (subject to correction arising in the course of audit).
4. The representations and warranties of the Borrower and the other Loan Parties contained in the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents are true and correct in all material respects (except in the case of any representation or warranty qualified by materiality, in which case such representation and warranty shall be true and correct in all respects), except to the extent such representations or warranties expressly relate solely to an earlier date (in which case such representations and warranties shall have been true and correct in all material respects (except in the case of any representation or warranty qualified by materiality, in which case such representation and warranty shall be true and correct in all respects) on and as of such earlier date) and except for changes in factual circumstances not expressly prohibited under the Credit Agreement or the other Loan Documents.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has signed this Compliance Certificate on and as of                     , 20    .
 
 

Exhibit 10.2
Execution Version
THIS GUARANTY dated as of May 21, 2012 executed and delivered by each of the undersigned and the other Persons from time to time party hereto pursuant to the execution and delivery of an Accession Agreement in the form of Annex I hereto (all of the undersigned, together with such other Persons each a "Guarantor" and collectively, the "Guarantors") in favor of WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, in its capacity as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent") for the Lenders under that certain Credit Agreement dated as of May 21, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"), by and among Saul Holdings Limited Partnership (the "Borrower"), the Lenders from time to time parties thereto (the "Lenders"), the Issuing Banks from time to time parties thereto (the "Issuing Banks"), the Administrative Agent, and the other parties thereto, for its benefit and the benefit of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks (the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, each individually a "Guarantied Party" and collectively, the "Guarantied Parties").
WHEREAS, pursuant to the Credit Agreement, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders have agreed to make available to the Borrower certain financial accommodations on the terms and conditions set forth in the Credit Agreement;
WHEREAS, each Guarantor is owned or controlled by the Borrower, or is otherwise an Affiliate of the Borrower;
WHEREAS, the Borrower, each Guarantor and the other Subsidiaries of the Borrower, though separate legal entities, are mutually dependent on each other in the conduct of their respective businesses as an integrated operation and have determined it to be in their mutual best interests to obtain financing from the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks through their collective efforts;
WHEREAS, each Guarantor acknowledges that it will receive direct and indirect benefits from the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks making such financial accommodations available to the Borrower under the Credit Agreement and, accordingly, each Guarantor is willing to guarantee the Borrower's obligations to the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks on the terms and conditions contained herein; and
WHEREAS, each Guarantor's execution and delivery of this Guaranty is a condition to the Administrative Agent and the other Guarantied Parties' making, and continuing to make, such financial accommodations to the Borrower.
NOW, THEREFORE, for good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged by each Guarantor, each Guarantor agrees as follows:
Section 1. . Each Guarantor hereby absolutely, irrevocably and unconditionally guaranties the due and punctual payment and performance when due, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, of all of the following (collectively referred to as the "Guarantied Obligations"): (a) all indebtedness and obligations owing by the Borrower or any other Loan Party to any Lender or the Administrative Agent under or in connection with the Credit Agreement and any other Loan Document to which the Borrower or such other Loan Party is a party, including without limitation, the repayment of all principal of the Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans, all Letter of Credit Liabilities, and the payment of all interest, fees, charges, reasonable attorneys' fees and other amounts payable to any Lender, the Issuing Banks or the Administrative Agent thereunder; (b) any and all extensions, renewals, modifications, amendments or substitutions of the foregoing; (c) all expenses, including, without
Guaranty
limitation, reasonable attorneys' fees and disbursements, that are incurred by the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party in the enforcement of any of the foregoing or any obligation of such Guarantor hereunder; and (d) all other Obligations.
Section 2. . This Guaranty is a guaranty of payment, and not of collection, and a debt of each Guarantor for its own account. Accordingly, the Guarantied Parties shall not be obligated or required before enforcing this Guaranty against any Guarantor: (a) to pursue any right or remedy the Guarantied Parties may have against the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person or commence any suit or other proceeding against the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person in any court or other tribunal; (b) to make any claim in a liquidation or bankruptcy of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person; (c) to make demand of the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person; or (d) to enforce or seek to enforce or realize upon any collateral security held by the Guarantied Parties which may secure any of the Guarantied Obligations.
Guaranty of Payment and Not of Collection
Section 3. . Each Guarantor guarantees that the Guarantied Obligations will be paid strictly in accordance with the terms of the documents evidencing the same, regardless of any Applicable Law now or hereafter in effect in any jurisdiction affecting any of such terms or the rights of the Guarantied Parties with respect thereto. The liability of each Guarantor under this Guaranty shall be absolute, irrevocable and unconditional in accordance with its terms and shall remain in full force and effect without regard to, and shall not be released, suspended, discharged, terminated or otherwise affected by, any circumstance or occurrence whatsoever, including without limitation, the following (whether or not such Guarantor consents thereto or has notice thereof):
Guaranty Absolute
(a) (i) any change in the amount, interest rate or due date or other term of any of the Guarantied Obligations, (ii) any change in the time, place or manner of payment of all or any portion of the Guarantied Obligations, (iii) any amendment or waiver of, or consent to the departure from or other indulgence with respect to, the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or any other document or instrument evidencing or relating to any Guarantied Obligations, or (iv) any waiver, renewal, extension, addition, or supplement to, or deletion from, or any other action or inaction under or in respect of, the Credit Agreement, any of the other Loan Documents, or any other documents, instruments or agreements relating to the Guarantied Obligations or any other instrument or agreement referred to therein or evidencing any Guarantied Obligations or any assignment or transfer of any of the foregoing;
(b) any lack of validity or enforceability of the Credit Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents (the "Credit Documents") or any other document, instrument or agreement referred to therein or evidencing any Guarantied Obligations or any assignment or transfer of any of the foregoing;
(c) any furnishing to the Guarantied Parties of any security for the Guarantied Obligations, or any sale, exchange, release or surrender of, or realization on, any collateral securing any of the Guarantied Obligations;
(d) any settlement or compromise by the Borrower or any other Loan Party of any of the Guarantied Obligations, any security therefor, or any liability of any other party with respect to the Guarantied Obligations, or any subordination of the payment of the Guarantied Obligations to the payment of any other liability of the Borrower or any other Loan Party;
(e) any bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, composition, adjustment, dissolution, liquidation or other like proceeding relating to such Guarantor, the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person, or any action taken with respect to this Guaranty by any trustee or receiver, or by any court, in any such proceeding;
 
(f) any act or failure to act by the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person which may adversely affect such Guarantor's subrogation rights, if any, against the Borrower or any other Loan Party to recover payments made under this Guaranty;
(g) any nonperfection or impairment of any security interest or other Lien on any collateral, if any, securing in any way any of the Guarantied Obligations;
(h) any application of sums paid by the Borrower, any Guarantor or any other Person with respect to the liabilities of the Borrower to the Guarantied Parties, regardless of what liabilities of the Borrower remain unpaid;
(i) any defect, limitation or insufficiency in the borrowing powers of the Borrower or in the exercise thereof; or
(j) any other circumstance which might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, a Guarantor hereunder (other than indefeasible payment in full in cash or release or termination of the obligations of any Guarantor hereunder by the Guarantied Parties pursuant to the terms of the Credit Agreement).
Section 4. . The Guarantied Parties may, at any time and from time to time, without the consent of, or notice to, any Guarantor, and without discharging any Guarantor from its obligations hereunder, take any and all actions described in Section 3. and may otherwise: (a) amend, modify, alter or supplement the terms of any of the Guarantied Obligations, including, but not limited to, extending or shortening the time of payment of any of the Guarantied Obligations or changing the interest rate that may accrue on any of the Guarantied Obligations; (b) amend, modify, alter or supplement the Credit Agreement or any other Credit Document; (c) sell, exchange, release or otherwise deal with all, or any part, of any collateral securing any of the Guarantied Obligations; (d) release any Loan Party or other Person liable in any manner for the payment or collection of the Guarantied Obligations; (e) exercise, or refrain from exercising, any rights against the Borrower, any other Loan Party or any other Person; and (f) apply any sum, by whomsoever paid or however realized, to the Guarantied Obligations in such order as the Guarantied Parties shall elect, in the case of each of the foregoing clauses (a) through (e) above, pursuant to the terms of the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
Action with Respect to Guarantied Obligations
Section 5. . Each Guarantor hereby makes to the Administrative Agent and the other Guarantied Parties all of the representations and warranties made by the Borrower with respect to such Guarantor in the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents, as if the same were set forth herein in full
Representations and Warranties
mutatis mutandis.
Section 6. . Each Guarantor will comply with all covenants with which the Borrower is to cause such Guarantor to comply under the terms of the Credit Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents.
Covenants
Section 7. . Each Guarantor, to the fullest extent permitted by Applicable Law, hereby waives notice of acceptance hereof or any presentment, demand, protest or notice of any kind, other than demand for payment hereunder, and any other act or thing, or omission or delay to do any other act or thing, which in any manner or to any extent might vary the risk of such Guarantor or which otherwise might operate to discharge such Guarantor from its obligations hereunder.
Waiver
Section 8. . If the Guarantied Parties or any of them are prevented under Applicable Law or otherwise from demanding or accelerating payment of any of the Guarantied
Inability to Accelerate Loan
 
Obligations by reason of any automatic stay or otherwise, the Administrative Agent and/or the other Guarantied Parties shall be entitled to receive from each Guarantor, upon demand therefor, the sums which otherwise would have been due had such demand or acceleration occurred.
Section 9. . If claim is ever made on the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party for repayment or recovery of any amount or amounts received in payment or on account of any of the Guarantied Obligations, and the Administrative Agent or such other Guarantied Party repays all or part of said amount by reason of (a) any judgment, decree or order of any court or administrative body of competent jurisdiction, or (b) any settlement or compromise of any such claim effected by the Administrative Agent or such other Guarantied Party with any such claimant (including the Borrower or a trustee in bankruptcy for the Borrower), then and in such event each Guarantor agrees that any such judgment, decree, order, settlement or compromise shall be binding on it, notwithstanding any revocation hereof or the cancellation of the Credit Agreement, any of the other Loan Documents, or any other instrument evidencing any liability of the Borrower, and such Guarantor shall be and remain liable to the Administrative Agent or such other Guarantied Party for the amounts so repaid or recovered to the same extent as if such amount had never originally been paid to the Administrative Agent or such other Guarantied Party, except to the extent such amount is determined, in a final, non-appealable judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction, to have been collected by the Administrative Agent or such other Guarantied Party in violation of the Credit Agreement or other Loan Document.
Reinstatement of Guarantied Obligations
Section 10. . Upon the making by any Guarantor of any payment hereunder for the account of the Borrower, such Guarantor shall be subrogated to the rights of the payee against the Borrower; , , that such Guarantor shall not enforce any right or receive any payment by way of subrogation or otherwise take any action in respect of any other claim or cause of action such Guarantor may have against the Borrower arising by reason of any payment or performance by such Guarantor pursuant to this Guaranty, unless and until all of the Guarantied Obligations have been indefeasibly paid and performed in full. If any amount shall be paid to such Guarantor on account of or in respect of such subrogation rights or other claims or causes of action, such Guarantor shall hold such amount in trust for the benefit of the Guarantied Parties and shall forthwith pay such amount to the Administrative Agent to be credited and applied against the Guarantied Obligations, whether matured or unmatured, in accordance with the terms of the Credit Agreement or to be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral security for any Guarantied Obligations existing.
Subrogation
provided
however
Section 11. . All sums payable by each Guarantor hereunder, whether of principal, interest, fees, expenses, premiums or otherwise, shall be paid in full, without set-off or counterclaim or any deduction or withholding whatsoever (including any Taxes, subject to Section 3.10. of the Credit Agreement), and if such Guarantor is required by Applicable Law or by any Governmental Authority to make any such deduction or withholding such Guarantor shall pay to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders such additional amount as will result in the receipt by the Administrative Agent and the Lenders of the full amount payable hereunder had such deduction or withholding not occurred or been required.
Payments Free and Clear
Section 12. . In addition to any rights now or hereafter granted under any of the other Loan Documents or Applicable Law and not by way of limitation of any such rights, each Guarantor hereby authorizes each Guarantied Party, at any time while an Event of Default exists, without any prior notice to such Guarantor or to any other Person, any such notice being hereby expressly waived, but in the case of a Lender or an Issuing Bank subject to receipt of the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent and Requisite Lenders, exercised in their sole discretion, to set-off and to appropriate and to apply any and all deposits (general or special, including, but not limited to, indebtedness evidenced by certificates of deposit, whether matured or unmatured) and any other indebtedness at any time held or owing by the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender or any affiliate of the
Set-off
 
Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank, or such Lender to or for the credit or the account of the Borrower against and on account of any of the Guarantied Obligations, although such obligations shall be contingent or unmatured.
Section 13. . Each Guarantor hereby expressly covenants and agrees for the benefit of the Guarantied Parties that all obligations and liabilities of the Borrower to such Guarantor of whatever description, including without limitation, all intercompany receivables of such Guarantor from the Borrower (collectively, the "Junior Claims") shall be subordinate and junior in right of payment to all Guarantied Obligations. If an Event of Default shall exist, then no Guarantor shall accept any direct or indirect payment (in cash, property or securities, by setoff or otherwise) from the Borrower on account of or in any manner in respect of any Junior Claim until all of the Guarantied Obligations have been indefeasibly paid in full.
Subordination
Section 14. . It is the intent of each Guarantor, the Administrative Agent and the other Guarantied Parties that in any Proceeding, such Guarantor's maximum obligation hereunder shall equal, but not exceed, the maximum amount which would not otherwise cause the obligations of such Guarantor hereunder (or any other obligations of such Guarantor to the Guarantied Parties) to be avoidable or unenforceable against such Guarantor in such Proceeding as a result of Applicable Law, including without limitation, (a) Section 548 of the Bankruptcy Code of 1978, as amended (the "Bankruptcy Code") and (b) any state fraudulent transfer or fraudulent conveyance act or statute applied in such Proceeding, whether by virtue of Section 544 of the Bankruptcy Code or otherwise. The Applicable Laws under which the possible avoidance or unenforceability of the obligations of such Guarantor hereunder (or any other obligations of such Guarantor to the Guarantied Parties) shall be determined in any such Proceeding are referred to as the "Avoidance Provisions". Accordingly, to the extent that the obligations of any Guarantor hereunder would otherwise be subject to avoidance under the Avoidance Provisions, the maximum Guarantied Obligations for which such Guarantor shall be liable hereunder shall be reduced to that amount which, as of the time any of the Guarantied Obligations are deemed to have been incurred under the Avoidance Provisions, would not cause the obligations of any Guarantor hereunder (or any other obligations of such Guarantor to the Guarantied Parties), to be subject to avoidance under the Avoidance Provisions. This Section is intended solely to preserve the rights of the Administrative Agent and the other Guarantied Parties hereunder to the maximum extent that would not cause the obligations of any Guarantor hereunder to be subject to avoidance under the Avoidance Provisions, and no Guarantor or any other Person shall have any right or claim under this Section as against the Guarantied Parties that would not otherwise be available to such Person under the Avoidance Provisions.
Avoidance Provisions
Section 15. . Each Guarantor assumes all responsibility for being and keeping itself informed of the financial condition of the Borrower and the other Loan Parties, and of all other circumstances bearing upon the risk of nonpayment of any of the Guarantied Obligations and the nature, scope and extent of the risks that such Guarantor assumes and incurs hereunder, and agrees that neither of the Administrative Agent nor any other Guarantied Party shall have any duty whatsoever to advise any Guarantor of information regarding such circumstances or risks.
Information
Section 16. . THIS GUARANTY SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK APPLICABLE TO CONTRACTS EXECUTED, AND TO BE FULLY PERFORMED, IN SUCH STATE.
Governing Law
 
SECTION 17. .
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
(a) EACH GUARANTOR, AND EACH OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND THE OTHER GUARANTIED PARTIES BY ACCEPTING THE BENEFITS HEREOF, ACKNOWLEDGES THAT ANY DISPUTE OR CONTROVERSY BETWEEN SUCH GUARANTOR, THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT OR ANY OF THE OTHER GUARANTIED PARTES WOULD BE BASED ON DIFFICULT AND COMPLEX ISSUES OF LAW AND FACT AND WOULD RESULT IN DELAY AND EXPENSE TO THE PARTIES. ACCORDINGLY, TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, EACH OF THE GUARANTORS, THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND THE OTHER GUARANTIED PARTIES HEREBY WAIVES ITS RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING OF ANY KIND OR NATURE IN ANY COURT OR TRIBUNAL IN WHICH AN ACTION MAY BE COMMENCED BY OR AGAINST ANY PARTY HERETO ARISING OUT OF THIS GUARANTY.
(b) EACH GUARANTOR IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY AGREES THAT IT WILL NOT COMMENCE ANY ACTION, LITIGATION OR PROCEEDING OF ANY KIND OR DESCRIPTION, WHETHER IN LAW OR EQUITY, WHETHER IN CONTRACT OR IN TORT OR OTHERWISE, AGAINST THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT, ANY LENDER, ANY ISSUING BANK, OR ANY RELATED PARTY OF THE FOREGOING IN ANY WAY RELATING TO THIS GUARANTY OR ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS RELATING HERETO OR THERETO, IN ANY FORUM OTHER THAN THE COURTS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK SITTING IN NEW YORK COUNTY, AND OF THE UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT OF THE SOUTHERN DISTRICT OF NEW YORK, AND ANY APPELLATE COURT FROM ANY THEREOF, AND EACH OF THE PARTIES HERETO, AND EACH OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND THE OTHER GUARANTIED PARTIES BY ACCEPTING THE BENEFITS HEREOF, IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY SUBMITS TO THE JURISDICTION OF SUCH COURTS AND AGREES THAT ALL CLAIMS IN RESPECT OF ANY SUCH ACTION, LITIGATION OR PROCEEDING MAY BE HEARD AND DETERMINED IN SUCH NEW YORK STATE COURT OR, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, IN SUCH FEDERAL COURT. EACH PARTY FURTHER WAIVES ANY OBJECTION THAT IT MAY NOW OR HEREAFTER HAVE TO THE VENUE OF ANY SUCH ACTION OR PROCEEDING IN ANY SUCH COURT OR THAT SUCH ACTION OR PROCEEDING WAS BROUGHT IN AN INCONVENIENT FORUM AND EACH AGREES NOT TO PLEAD OR CLAIM THE SAME. THE CHOICE OF FORUM SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION SHALL NOT BE DEEMED TO PRECLUDE THE BRINGING OF ANY ACTION BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT OR ANY OTHER GUARANTIED PARTY OR THE ENFORCEMENT BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT OR ANY OTHER GUARANTIED PARTY OF ANY JUDGMENT OBTAINED IN SUCH FORUM IN ANY OTHER APPROPRIATE JURISDICTION.
(c) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION HAVE BEEN CONSIDERED BY EACH PARTY WITH THE ADVICE OF COUNSEL AND WITH A FULL UNDERSTANDING OF THE LEGAL CONSEQUENCES THEREOF, AND SHALL SURVIVE THE PAYMENT OF THE LOANS AND ALL OTHER AMOUNTS PAYABLE HEREUNDER OR UNDER THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS, THE TERMINATION OR EXPIRATION OF ALL LETTERS OF CREDIT AND THE TERMINATION OF THIS GUARANTY.
Section 18. . The Administrative Agent and each Lender may maintain books and accounts setting forth the amounts of principal, interest and other sums paid and payable with respect to the Guarantied Obligations arising under or in connection with the Credit Agreement, and in the case of any dispute relating to any of the outstanding amount, payment or receipt of any of the Guarantied Obligations or otherwise, the entries in such books and accounts shall constitute prima facie evidence of
Loan Accounts
 
amounts and other matters set forth therein. The failure of the Administrative Agent or any Lender to maintain such books and accounts shall not in any way relieve or discharge any Guarantor of any of its obligations hereunder.
Section 19. . No delay or failure on the part of the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party in the exercise of any right or remedy it may have against any Guarantor hereunder or otherwise shall operate as a waiver thereof, and no single or partial exercise by the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party of any such right or remedy shall preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other such right or remedy.
Waiver of Remedies
Section 20. . This Guaranty shall remain in full force and effect with respect to each Guarantor until payment in full in cash of the Guarantied Obligations and the other Obligations and the termination or cancellation of the Credit Agreement in accordance with its terms.
Termination
Section 21. . Each reference herein to the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party shall be deemed to include such Person's respective successors and assigns (including, but not limited to, any holder of the Guarantied Obligations) in whose favor the provisions of this Guaranty also shall inure, and each reference herein to each Guarantor shall be deemed to include such Guarantor's successors and assigns, upon whom this Guaranty also shall be binding. The Guarantied Parties may, in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Credit Agreement, assign, transfer or sell any Guarantied Obligation, or grant or sell participations in any Guarantied Obligations, to any Person without the consent of, or notice to, any Guarantor and without releasing, discharging or modifying any Guarantor's obligations hereunder. Subject to Section 13.9. of the Credit Agreement, each Guarantor hereby consents to the delivery by the Administrative Agent and any other Guarantied Party to any Eligible Assignee or Participant (or any prospective Eligible Assignee or Participant) of any financial or other information regarding the Borrower or any Guarantor. No Guarantor may assign or transfer its obligations hereunder to any Person without the prior written consent of all Lenders and any such assignment or other transfer to which all of the Lenders have not so consented shall be null and void.
Successors and Assigns
Section 22. . THE OBLIGATIONS OF THE GUARANTORS HEREUNDER SHALL BE JOINT AND SEVERAL, AND ACCORDINGLY, EACH GUARANTOR CONFIRMS THAT IT IS LIABLE FOR THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE "GUARANTIED OBLIGATIONS" AND ALL OF THE OBLIGATIONS AND LIABILITIES OF EACH OF THE OTHER GUARANTORS HEREUNDER.
JOINT AND SEVERAL OBLIGATIONS
Section 23. . This Guaranty may not be amended except in writing signed by the Administrative Agent and each Guarantor, subject to Section 13.7 of the Credit Agreement.
Amendments
Section 24. . All payments to be made by any Guarantor pursuant to this Guaranty shall be made in Dollars, in immediately available funds to the Administrative Agent at its Principal Office, not later than 1:00 p.m. Central time, on the date one Business Day after demand therefor.
Payments
Section 25. . All notices, requests and other communications hereunder shall be in writing (including facsimile transmission or similar writing) and shall be given (a) to each Guarantor at its address set forth below its signature hereto, (b) to the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party at its address for notices provided for in the Credit Agreement, or (c) as to each such party at such other address as such party shall designate in a written notice to the other parties. Each such notice, request or other communication shall be effective (i) if mailed, when received; (ii) if telecopied, when transmitted (with confirmation); or (iii) if hand delivered, when delivered; , , that any notice of a change of address for notices shall not be effective until received.
Notices
provided
however
 
Section 26. . In case any provision of this Guaranty shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby.
Severability
Section 27. . Section headings used in this Guaranty are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction of this Guaranty.
Headings
Section 28. . Neither the Administrative Agent nor any other Guarantied Party, nor any affiliate, officer, director, employee, attorney, or agent of the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party, shall have any liability with respect to, and each Guarantor hereby waives, releases, and agrees not to sue any of them upon, any claim for any special, indirect, incidental, or consequential damages suffered or incurred by a Guarantor in connection with, arising out of, or in any way related to, this Guaranty or any of the other Credit Documents, or any of the transactions contemplated by this Guaranty, the Credit Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents. Each Guarantor hereby waives, releases, and agrees not to sue the Administrative Agent or any other Guarantied Party or any of the Administrative Agent's or any other Guarantied Party's affiliates, officers, directors, employees, attorneys, or agents for punitive damages in respect of any claim in connection with, arising out of, or in any way related to, this Guaranty, the Credit Agreement or any of the other Credit Documents, or any of the transactions contemplated by thereby.
Limitation of Liability
Section 29. . Each Guarantor acknowledges and agrees that information regarding the Guarantor may be delivered electronically pursuant to Section 9.5 of the Credit Agreement.
Electronic Delivery of Certain Information
Section 30. .
Definitions
(a) For the purposes of this Guaranty:
"" means any of the following: (x) any Guarantor shall: (i) commence a voluntary case under the Bankruptcy Code or other federal bankruptcy laws (as now or hereafter in effect); (ii) file a petition seeking to take advantage of any other Applicable Laws, domestic or foreign, relating to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, winding-up, or composition or adjustment of debts; (iii) consent to, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any petition filed against it in an involuntary case under such bankruptcy laws or other Applicable Laws or consent to any proceeding or action described in the immediately following subsection (z); (iv) apply for or consent to, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, the appointment of, or the taking of possession by, a receiver, custodian, trustee, or liquidator of itself or of a substantial part of its property, domestic or foreign; (v) admit in writing its inability to pay its debts as they become due; or (vi) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors; (y) the board of directors (or similar governing body) of any Guarantor or any committee thereof shall adopt any resolution or otherwise authorize any action to approve any of the actions referred to in this definition of "Proceeding"; or (z) a case or other proceeding shall be commenced against any Guarantor in any court of competent jurisdiction seeking: (i) relief under the Bankruptcy Code or other federal bankruptcy laws (as now or hereafter in effect) or under any other Applicable Laws, domestic or foreign, relating to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, winding-up, or composition or adjustment of debts; or (ii) the appointment of a trustee, receiver, custodian, liquidator or the like of such Person, or of all or any substantial part of the assets, domestic or foreign, of such Person, and in the case of either clause (i) or (ii) such case or proceeding shall continue undismissed or unstayed for a period of 60 consecutive days, or an order granting the remedy or other relief requested in such case or proceeding (including, but not limited to, an order for relief under such Bankruptcy Code or such other federal bankruptcy laws) shall be entered.
Proceeding
 
(b) Terms not otherwise defined herein are used herein with the respective meanings given them in the Credit Agreement.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each Guarantor has duly executed and delivered this Guaranty as of the date and year first written above.
 
Signature Page to Guaranty
Saul Holdings Limited Partnership
Signature Page to Guaranty
Saul Holdings Limited Partnership
THIS ACCESSION AGREEMENT dated as of             ,         , executed and delivered by                             , a                      (the "New Guarantor") in favor of WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, in its capacity as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent") for the Lenders under that certain Credit Agreement dated as of May 21, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"), by and among Saul Holdings Limited Partnership (the "Borrower"), the Lenders from time to time parties thereto (the "Lenders"), the Issuing Banks from time to time parties thereto (the "Issuing Banks"), Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent"), and the other parties thereto, for its benefit and the benefit of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks (the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, each individually a "Guarantied Party" and collectively, the "Guarantied Parties").
WHEREAS, pursuant to the Credit Agreement, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders have agreed to make available to the Borrower certain financial accommodations on the terms and conditions set forth in the Credit Agreement;
WHEREAS, New Guarantor is owned or controlled by the Borrower, or is otherwise an Affiliate of the Borrower;
WHEREAS, the Borrower, the New Guarantor and the other Subsidiaries of the Borrower, though separate legal entities, are mutually dependent on each other in the conduct of their respective businesses as an integrated operation and have determined it to be in their mutual best interests to obtain financing from the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks through their collective efforts;
WHEREAS, New Guarantor acknowledges that it will receive direct and indirect benefits from the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks making such financial accommodations available to the Borrower under the Credit Agreement and, accordingly, New Guarantor is willing to guarantee the Borrower's obligations to the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Issuing Banks on the terms and conditions contained herein; and
WHEREAS, the New Guarantor's execution and delivery of this Agreement is a condition to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders continuing to make such financial accommodations to the Borrower.
NOW, THEREFORE, for good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged by the New Guarantor, the New Guarantor agrees as follows:
Section 1. . The New Guarantor hereby agrees that it is a "Guarantor" under that certain Guaranty dated as of May 21, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Guaranty") made by each of the Guarantors party thereto in favor of the Administrative Agent and the other Guarantied Parties and assumes all obligations of a "Guarantor" thereunder, all as if the New Guarantor had been an original signatory to the Guaranty. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the New Guarantor hereby:
Accession to Guaranty
(a) irrevocably and unconditionally guarantees the due and punctual payment and performance when due, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, of all Guarantied Obligations (as defined in the Guaranty);
(b) makes to the Administrative Agent and the other Guarantied Parties as of the date hereof each of the representations and warranties contained in Section 5 of the Guaranty as to itself as a Guarantor and agrees to be bound by each of the covenants contained in Section 6 of the Guaranty; and
(c) consents and agrees to each provision set forth in the Guaranty.
SECTION 2. . THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK APPLICABLE TO CONTRACTS EXECUTED, AND TO BE FULLY PERFORMED, IN SUCH STATE.
GOVERNING LAW
Section 3. . Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have their respective defined meanings given them in the Credit Agreement.
Definitions
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the New Guarantor has caused this Accession Agreement to be duly executed and delivered under seal by its duly authorized officers as of the date first written above.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20120802161503.txt.gz
TIME:20120802161503
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On August 2, 2012, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2012. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
99.1 Press Release, dated August 2, 2012, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: August 2, 2012
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
August 2, 2012, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended June 30, 2012 ("2012 Quarter"). Total revenue for the 2012 Quarter increased to $47.5 million from $42.8 million for the three months ended June 30, 2011 ("2011 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before income attributable to noncontrolling interests and preferred stock dividends, increased to $9.6 million for the 2012 Quarter from $8.2 million for the 2011 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $4.3 million, or $0.22 per diluted share, for the 2012 Quarter compared to $2.6 million, or $0.14 per diluted share, for the 2011 Quarter. The revenue increase was primarily caused by $3.4 million of rents received from shopping centers acquired in 2011 and $1.0 million of revenue generated by the Clarendon Center development. Operating income increased $0.9 million from the core properties and $0.5 million from the recently acquired shopping centers.
Same property revenue increased 0.9% for the 2012 Quarter compared to the 2011 Quarter, and same property operating income increased 1.2%. The same property comparisons exclude the operating results of properties not in operation for the entirety of the comparable reporting periods. Shopping center portfolio same property operating income increased 0.6% and, primarily due to improved leasing at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue and Washington Square, the mixed-use portfolio same property operating income increased 3.7%.
For the six months ended June 30, 2012 ("2012 Period") total revenue increased to $94.6 million from $84.5 million for the six months ended June 30, 2011 ("2011 Period"). Operating income increased to $18.9 million for the 2012 Period from $16.5 million for the 2011 Period. Net income available to common stockholders was $8.4 million, or $0.43 per diluted share, for the 2012 Period compared to $6.1 million, or $0.33 per diluted share, for the 2011 Period. The revenue increase was primarily caused by $6.7 million of rents received from shopping centers acquired in 2011 and $3.5 million of revenue generated by the Clarendon Center development. Operating income increased $1.5 million from the core properties and $1.0 million from the recently acquired shopping centers. Same property revenue decreased 0.1% for the 2012 Period
 
compared to the 2011 Period, but same property operating income increased 0.9%, primarily due to decreased credit losses. Shopping center portfolio same property operating income increased 0.1% and, primarily due to improved leasing at Washington Square, the mixed-use portfolio same property operating income increased 4.5%.
As of June 30, 2012, 91.1% of the commercial portfolio was leased (all properties except the apartments at Clarendon Center, which were 99.2% leased), compared to 89.8% at June 30, 2011. On a same property basis, 90.7% of the portfolio was leased compared to the prior year level of 90.2%. The 2012 leasing percentages were impacted by a net increase of approximately 38,000 square feet of space leased in the shopping center portfolio caused by the leasing of a portion of the space vacated by major tenants in 2011.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 33.9% to $15.6 million in the 2012 Quarter from $11.6 million in the 2011 Quarter. On a diluted per share basis, FFO available to common shareholders increased 22.9% to $0.59 per share for the 2012 Quarter from $0.48 per share for the 2011 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus real estate depreciation and amortization, and excluding gains and losses from property dispositions, impairment charges on depreciable real estate assets and extraordinary items. FFO increased in the 2012 Quarter primarily due to $1.7 million generated by the three recently acquired shopping center properties, a $1.2 million decline in the fair value of the Company's interest rate swaps during the 2011 Quarter and $0.7 million related to the operation of core properties and $0.2 million generated by the recently completed Clarendon Center.
FFO available to common shareholders for the 2012 Period increased 26.1% to $30.9 million from $24.5 million during the 2011 Period. Per share FFO available to common shareholders for the 2012 Period increased 15.8% to $1.17 per diluted share from $1.01 per diluted share for the 2011 Period. FFO increased in the 2012 Period primarily due to $3.3 million generated by the three recently acquired shopping center properties, a $1.1 million decline in the fair value of the Company's interest rate swaps during the 2011 Period, $1.0 million related to the operation of core properties and $0.7 million generated by the recently completed Clarendon Center.
On July 25, 2012, the Company sold for $2.0 million the 77,000 square foot West Park shopping center, located in Oklahoma City, Oklahoma. The center was 11.7% leased and had no associated debt. The Company expects to report a gain on sale of approximately $1.0 million during the third quarter of 2012.
 
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 57 community and neighborhood shopping center and mixed-use properties totaling approximately 9.5 million square feet of leasable area. Over 85% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20120904130131.txt.gz
TIME:20120904130131
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Effective as of September 4, 2012, B. Francis Saul III resigned from the office of President of Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") and from the Company's Board of Directors to pursue other interests. Mr. Saul III's resignation was not in connection with any disagreement with the Company about any matter.
As of the same date, the Company entered into a consulting agreement with Mr. Saul III whereby Mr. Saul III will provide certain consulting services to the Company as an independent contractor. Under the consulting agreement, Mr. Saul III will be paid at a rate of $60,000 per month. The consulting agreement also includes certain noncompete, nonsolicitation and nondisclosure covenants. The consulting agreement has a term of up to two years and is terminable by the Company at any time.
Also effective as of September 4, 2012, (i) Thomas H. McCormick was appointed to the offices of President and Chief Operating Officer and (ii) J. Page Lansdale was appointed to the office of Executive Vice President  Real Estate.
Mr. McCormick, age 61, has served as the Company's Senior Vice President  General Counsel since February 2005. He also served as the Executive Vice President of Chevy Chase Bank, F.S.B. from 2005 to 2009. Currently, he also serves as Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, General Counsel and a Director of the B. F. Saul Company; Vice President and General Counsel and Chief Financial Officer of the B. F. Saul Real Estate Investment Trust; and Director of Chevy Chase Trust Company and ASB Capital Management, LLC, each of which is affiliated with the Company.
Mr. Lansdale, age 54, has served as a Senior Vice President of the Company since 2009. Beginning in 1990, Mr. Lansdale held various positions with Chevy Chase Bank, F.S.B., including most recently Senior Vice President of Corporate Real Estate from 2004 to 2009.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: September 4, 2012


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20120925165424.txt.gz
TIME:20120925165424
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
As reported in the Current Report on Form 8-K filed by Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") on September 4, 2012, effective as of that day B. Francis Saul III resigned from the office of President of the Company and from the Company's Board of Directors (the "Board"). Effective as of September 20, 2012 and consistent with the Company's bylaws, (i) the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee of the Board recommended that Thomas H. McCormick be appointed to the Board seat vacated by Mr. Saul III to serve out the remainder of Mr. Saul III's term, and (ii) the Board voted in favor of such appointment. The Board vote was unanimous but for one director who did not attend the meeting. Mr. McCormick was not named to any committees of the Board.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: September 25, 2012


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20121101163036.txt.gz
TIME:20121101163036
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On November 1, 2012, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2012. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
99.1 Press Release, dated November 1, 2012, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: November 1, 2012
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
November 1, 2012, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended September 30, 2012 ("2012 Quarter"). Total revenue for the 2012 Quarter increased to $47.5 million from $42.9 million for the quarter ended September 30, 2011 ("2011 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before income attributable to noncontrolling interests and preferred stock dividends, decreased to $8.1 million for the 2012 Quarter from $8.7 million for the 2011 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $4.2 million ($0.21 per diluted share) for the 2012 Quarter compared to $1.7 million ($0.09 per diluted share) for the 2011 Quarter. Revenue increased primarily due to $3.0 million of rents generated by the shopping centers acquired in 2011 and $0.9 million of additional revenue generated by Clarendon Center. Operating income declined primarily due to $1.9 million of predevelopment expenses, which was partially offset by $1.3 million of additional operating income generated by the core portfolio and $0.2 million generated by the shopping centers acquired in 2011.
Same property revenue increased 1.9% for the 2012 Quarter compared to the 2011 Quarter, and same property operating income increased 3.3%. The same property comparisons exclude the results of properties not in operation for the entirety of the comparable reporting periods. Shopping center portfolio same property operating income increased 3.7%, primarily due to lower provision for credit losses, and the mixed-use portfolio same property operating income increased 2.0%.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2012 ("2012 Period"), total revenue increased to $142.2 million from $127.4 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2011 ("2011 Period"). Operating income increased to $27.0 million for the 2012 Period from $25.2 million for the 2011 Period. Net income available to common stockholders was $12.5 million ($0.64 per diluted share) for the 2012 Period compared to $7.9 million ($0.42 per diluted share) for the 2011 Period. The primary sources of the revenue increase were additional revenue from the shopping centers acquired in 2011 ($9.7 million) and Clarendon Center ($4.3 million). The primary sources of the increase in operating income were the core portfolio ($2.9 million) and the shopping centers acquired in 2011 ($1.3 million), partially offset by predevelopment
 
expenses ($1.9 million). Same property revenue increased 0.6% for the 2012 Period compared to the 2011 Period, and same property operating income increased 1.7%. Shopping center portfolio same property operating income increased 1.2% and the mixed-use portfolio same property operating income increased 3.6% due to improved operating performance at Washington Square.
As of September 30, 2012, 91.6% of the commercial portfolio was leased (all properties except the apartments at Clarendon Center, which were 100% leased), compared to 90.4% at September 30, 2011. On a same property basis, 91.1% of the portfolio was leased compared to the prior year level of 89.9%. The 2012 leasing percentages were impacted by a net increase of approximately 105,000 square feet of leased space, primarily caused by the leasing of a portion of the space vacated by major shopping center tenants in 2011.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) increased 36.2% to $14.6 million ($0.55 per diluted share) in the 2012 Quarter from $10.7 million ($0.44 per diluted share) in the 2011 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus real estate depreciation and amortization, and excluding gains and losses from property dispositions, impairment charges on depreciable real estate assets and extraordinary items. The primary sources of increased FFO in the 2012 Quarter were (a) acquisition costs incurred in 2011 ($2.4 million), (b) additional FFO generated by the shopping center properties acquired in 2011 ($1.5 million), the core portfolio ($1.5 million), and Clarendon Center ($0.1 million) and (c) the change in fair value recognized on the Company's interest rate swaps ($0.2 million), partially offset by predevelopment expenses ($1.9 million or $0.07 per diluted share).
FFO available to common shareholders for the 2012 Period increased 29.1% to $45.5 million ($1.72 per diluted share) from $35.2 million ($1.45 per diluted share) during the 2011 Period. The primary sources of increased FFO in the 2012 Period were (a) additional FFO generated by the shopping centers acquired in 2011 ($4.8 million), the core portfolio ($2.5 million), and Clarendon Center ($0.8 million), (b) acquisition costs incurred in the 2011 Period ($2.5 million), (c) a change in the fair value loss recognized on the Company's interest rate swaps ($1.4 million), partially offset by predevelopment expenses ($1.9 million).
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 57 community and neighborhood shopping center and mixed-use properties totaling approximately 9.5 million square feet of leasable area. Over 85% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
(301) 986-6220
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20121211165923.txt.gz
TIME:20121211165923
EVENTS:	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.01. Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
On December 10, 2012, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its December 6, 2012 acquisition of 53,000 square feet of retail space located at 1500 - 1570 Rockville Pike, Rockville Maryland, 20852, just north of the Twinbrook Metro Station, for $23.0 million, including acquisition costs. Also on December 6, 2012, the Company sold for $3.9 million (net of closing costs) the 55,000 square foot Belvedere Gardens shopping center, located in Baltimore, Maryland. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: December 11, 2012

Exhibit 99.1
December 10, 2012
For Immediate Release
BETHESDA, MARYLAND  Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS) announced the purchase on December 6, 2012, of approximately 53,000 square feet of retail space located on the east side of Rockville Pike (Route 355), near the Twinbrook Metro Station in Montgomery County, Maryland, for $23.0 million, including acquisition costs. The property, which is 91% leased to multiple tenants, is zoned for up to 700,000 square feet of rentable mixed use space. The Company does not anticipate redeveloping the property in the foreseeable future. The acquisition was funded with borrowings under the revolving credit facility.
Also on December 6, 2012, the Company sold for $3.9 million (net of closing costs) the 55,000 square foot Belvedere Gardens shopping center, located in Baltimore, Maryland. The center was 34% leased and there was no debt associated with the property. The Company expects to report a gain on sale of approximately $3.5 million during the fourth quarter of 2012.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 57 operating community and neighborhood shopping center and office/mixed-use properties totaling approximately 9.5 million square feet of leasable area. Over 85% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
More information about Saul Centers is available on the Company's website at .
www.saulcenters.com
CONTACT: Scott V. Schneider (301) 986-6220
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20130129102447.txt.gz
TIME:20130129102447
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On January 29, 2013, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") commenced an underwritten public offering of depositary shares, each representing a 1/100th fractional interest in a share of a newly designated series of preferred stock (the "Offering"). Attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 is a copy of the investor presentation slides the Company is using in connection with the intended Offering.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: January 29, 2013

Saul CentersCompanyProfileSeverna Park Marketplace, Severna Park, Maryland1
Forrwarrdllookiing SttatteemeenttssThis following presentation contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended(the "Securities Act"), and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"). When we refer to forward-lookingstatements or information, sometimes we use words such as "may," "will," "could," "should," "plans," "intends," "expects," "believes," "estimates,""project," "anticipates" and "continues"" and other similar words. Forward-looking statements include information about possible or assumed future resultsof our business and our financial condition, liquidity, results of operations, plans and objectives. They also include, among other things, statementsconcerning anticipated revenues, income or loss, capital expenditures, dividends, capital structure, or other financial terms, as well as statementsregarding subjects that are forward-looking by their nature, such as: our business and financing strategy; our ability to obtain future financingarrangements; our understanding of our competition and our ability to compete effectively; our projected operating results; market and industry trends;estimates relating to our future dividends; projected capital expenditures; and interest rates. The forward-looking statements are based on our beliefs,assumptions, and expectations of our future performance, taking into account the information currently available to us. These beliefs, assumptions, andexpectations may change as a result of many possible events or factors, not all of which are known to us. If a change occurs, our business, financialcondition, liquidity, and results of operations may vary materially from those expressed in our forward-looking statements. There are a number of factorsthat may cause actual results to vary from our forward-looking statements: challenging domestic and global credit markeetss and their effect ondiscretionary spending; the ability of our tenants to pay rent; our reliance on shopping center "anchor" tenants and other significant tenants; oursubstantial relationships with members of The Saul Organization; risks of financing, such as increases in interest rates, restrictions imposed by our debt,our ability to meet existing financial covenants and our ability to consummate planned and additional financings on acceptable terms; our developmentactivities; our acceess to additional capital; our ability to successfully complete additional acquisitions or redevelopments, or if they are consummated,whether such acquisitions or developments perform as expected; risks generally incident to the ownership of real property, including adverse changes ineconomic conditions, changes in the investment climate for real estate, changes in real estate taxes and other operating expenses, adverse changes ingovernmental rules and fiscal policies, the relative illiquidity of real estate and environmental risks; risks related to our status as a REIT for federal incometax purposes, such as the existence of complex regulations relating to our status as a REIT, the effect of future changes in REIT requirements as a result ofnew legislation and the adverse consequences of the failure to qualify as a REIT; and other risks described in Part I, Item 1A of our Annual Report on Form10-K for the year ended Decemberr 31, 2011. Given these uncerrtainties, readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-lookingstatements. We do not intend and disclaim any duty or obligation to update any of the forward-looking statements or to publicly release the results if werevise any of them, except as required under U.S. federal securities laws. You should review carefully the risks and the risk factors in the section captioned"Risk Factors" beginning on page 13 of our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, which is incorporated herein byreference.2Saul Centers
Company HiighlliighttssExperienced management team with local expertise and longhistory in the D. C. marketInsider ownership totaling over $650 million *Stable, high quality portfolioCompelling internal growth prospects from leasing vacant spaceConservative capital structure and solid coverage ratios* 8.6 million shares of common stock and 6.9 million operating partnershipunits @ 1/24/2013 price of $43.64/share3Saul Centers
Manageemeentt BiiogrraaphiieessB. Francis Saul IIChairman, Chief Executive Officer and Director since June 1993. Chairman of the Board of Directors and Chief Executive Officer of theB. F. Saul Company since 1969. Chairman of the Board of Trustees and Chief Executive Officer of the B. F. Saul Real Estate InvestmentTrust since 1969 and a Trustee since 1964. Chairman of the Board of Chevy Chase Trust Company and ASB Capital Management, LLC. Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer of Chevy Chase Bank, F.S.B. from 1969 to 2009. Thomas H. McCormick President. General Counsel since February 2005. Executive Vice President of Chevy Chase Bank, F.S.B. from 2005 to 2009. Currently, Senior Viice President, Chief Financial Officer, General Counsel and a Directorr of the B. F. Saul Company; Vice President and General Counsel and Chief Financial Officer of the B. F. Saul Real Estate Investment Trust; and Director of Chevy Chase Trust Company and ASB Capital Management, LLC.J. Page LansdaleExecutive Vice Prresident-Real Essttatte. Seenior Vice President of the Company since 2009. Beginning in 1990, Mr. Lansdale held various positions with Cheevy Chasee Bank,, F.S.B., including most recently Senior Vice President of Corporate Real Estate from 2004 to 2009.Scott V. Schneider Senior Vice PresidentChief Financial Officer, Treasurer and Secretary since 1998. Vice PresidentChief Financial Officer, Treasurer and Secretary of the Company from 1993 to 1998. Vice President of the B. F. Saul Company and B. F. Saul Property Company and Assistant Vice President of the B. F. Saul Real Estate Investment Trust from 1985 to 1993. John F. CollichSenior Vice PresidentAcquisitions and Development since 2011. Senior Vice PresidentRetail Development 2000-2011. Vice PresidentRetail Development of the Company from 1993 to 2000. Vice President of the B. F. Saul Company and B. F. Saul Property Company in 1993.4Saul Centers
Property Property Operating Income9 months ended 9/30/2012Shopping Centers75%Mixed-Use25%DC. / Baltimore85%Other15%Geeogrraphiicc Miix & Prropeerrtty TypeeHigh Quality, D. C. centric portfolio of 57 operating properties50 shopping centers7 mixed-use / office buildings5Saul Centers
Shoppiing Ceentteerrss((fforr tthee 9 montthss eendeed 9/30/2012))50 retail properties generated 75% of property operating income34 centers were grocery anchored & produced 82.5% of retail operating incomeSame property operating income increased 1.2% (over prior year period)180 retail leases signedApproximately 925,000 square feet leasedTenants reported sales averaging $343 per square footGrocers reported sales averaging $486 per square foot for 2011Thruway, Winston Salem, NC6Saul Centers
Favorrabllee Deemogrraphiiccss$50,000$60,000$70,000$80,000$90,000$100,000$110,000$120,000Saul Centers Avg $114,000National Avg $68,000Average household incomewithin three mile radius ofSaul Centers' retailproperties exceeds thenational averageSaul Centers Avg. Saul Centers Avg. National Avg. National Avg.Source: U.S. Census Bureau, Census 2010ESRI forecasts for 2012.7Saul Centers
Majjorr Reettaiill TeenanttssTenant Name Locations Retail SF % 9 Months 2012Total RevenueGiant Food 10 7.5% 5.0%Safeway 8 5.0% 2.7%Capital One Bank 19 0.9% 2.3%CVS 6 1.4% 1.6%Publix 5 3.1% 1.5%Lowe's Home Center 2 3.3% 1.4%Harris Teeter 3 1.8% 1.3%Home Depot 2 3.1% 1.2%Office Depot 5 1.5% 1.0%Staples 3 0.8% 0.9%Totals 63 28.4% 18.9%Top 10 retail tenantsprovided only 19% of theCompany's Total Revenue8Saul Centers
Offffiiccee/MiixeedUssee Prropeerrttiieess((fforr tthee 9 montthss eendeed 9/30/2012))1.4 million square feet (commercial)244 apartments25% of property operating incomeSame property operating income increased 3.6% (over prior year period)Clarendon Center, Arlington, VAWashington Square, Alexandria, VA 601 Pennsylvania Ave., Washington DC9Saul Centers
Majjorr Offffiiccee TeenanttssTenant Name Locations M-U SF % * 9 Months 2012Total RevenueAmerican Health Ins. Plans 1 3.9% 1.6%National Gallery of Art 1 2.5% 1.2%Credit Union Natl. Assn. 1 2.0% 1.1%HQ Global Workplace 1 1.4% 0.9%U. S. Government 2 2.2% 0.6%AECOM (former Earth Tech) 1 2.3% 0.6%BRLI Acquisition Corp. 1 3.2% 0.5%Southern Company 1 0.8% 0.5%Seracare Life Sciences 1 2.0% 0.5%Pharmaceutical Care 1 1.0% 0.5%Totals 11 21.3% 8.0%Top 10 office tenants providedonly 8% of the Company'sTotal Revenue* Mixed-use SF excludes Clarendon residential*10Saul Centers
AccquiissiittiionssRockville Pike, Montgomery County, MD4 development sites,(currently 1 & 2 story retail)in 2010-2012 withdevelopment potential ofover 1.5 MM SF1500 Rockville PikeTwinbrook Metro StationFlagship Pads (legacy ownership)White Flint Metro StationMetro Pike Center11503 Rockville Pike5541 Nicholson LaneMM11Saul Centers
94.1%93.3%94.0%94.7%96.8%95.8%94.9%91.9% 91.9%89.9%91.8%20022003200420052006200720082009201020113rd Q 2012Average Leasing Percentage Overall Portfolio Leasing Percentage Overall Portfolio Leasing Percentage((EExxcclludiing prropeerrttiieess undeerr deevveellooppmeenntt))10-year average = 93.7%Compelling internal growth prospects through lease-up of vacant space12Saul Centers
65% 64%70%64%68%71%63%2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 9 Mos 12Dividend PayoutDiiviideend ass a % off FFOConservativeFFO payoutratio: 63% of9 Months2012 FFOwas paid outin dividends.13Saul Centers
Deebtt SSummaarry
SSeepptteembbeerr 30,, 2012 ((aand fforr tthee tthrreeee montthss ttheen eendeed))
98% fixed rate, nonrecourse debt
Weighted average mortgage interest rate was 5.9%
Interest coverage = 2.7 times
Fixed charge (interest + preferred) coverage = 2.1 times
$175 million credit line, no outstanding balance
$33.5 million in cash balances
14
Saul Centers
2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 3Q '12 Year End$500$1,000$1,500$2,000MillionsCommon Equity Preferred Equity DebtMarrkeett Capiittalliizzattiion Hiighlliighttss$2,199$1,185$828$1869/30/2012 closing price= $44.40/sh$424$35253.9%37.7%8.5%15Saul Centers
$70 $13 $15 $28 $62 $61$11$37$9$67$20$135$422013201420152016201720182019 20202021202220232024202520262027(Excludes scheduled amortization)Year Debt Matures$0$50$100$150Millions Mortgage Debt Maturities Mortgage Debt Maturitiesaass off 9/30/2012Weighted average maturity ofmortgage debt 9.8 years* A total of $33 million of the 2013 maturities were paid off prior to 12/31/2012.*16Saul Centers
2013 Maturities$23 million outstanding, due 1/2013, secured by 601 Pennsylvania Ave$10 million outstanding, due 1/2013, secured by Smallwood Center$15 million outstanding, due 5/2013, secured by Northrock$16 million outstanding, due 6/2013, secured by Metro Pike$7 million outstanding, due 7/2013, secured by Cruse MarketPlace2014 Maturities$13 million outstanding, due 5/2014, secured by Seabreeze* Paid off prior to 12/31/2012Deebtt Matturriittiieessaass off 9/30/2012** In the process of refinancing******17Saul Centers
Company Hiighlliighttss Experienced management team with local expertise and long history in the D. C. market Insider ownership totaling over $650 million *Stable, high quality portfolio Compelling internal growth prospects from leasing vacant space Conservative capital structure and solid coverage ratios* 8.6 million shares of common stock and 6.9 million operating partnership units @ 1/24/2013 price of $43.64/share18Saul Centers
Saul Centers NYSE Symbol: B F SWestview Village, Frederick, Maryland 19 Saul Centers


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20130201152557.txt.gz
TIME:20130201152557
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On January 31, 2013, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") announced that it was calling for redemption 60% of the outstanding depositary shares (the "Depositary Shares") representing interests in its 8% Series A Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock (the "Series A Preferred Stock"). The Company will redeem 2,400,000 of the 4,000,000 total outstanding Depositary Shares representing interests in the Series A Preferred Stock. The Depositary Shares will be redeemed on March 2, 2013 at $25.00 per Depositary Share, plus all accumulated and unpaid distributions through the redemption date, for an aggregate redemption price of $25.3389 per Depositary Share. The Depositary Shares will be redeemed, as to registered holders, on a pro rata basis, as nearly as practicable. Dividends on the Depositary Shares to be redeemed will cease to accrue after the redemption date.
The redemptions will be made in accordance with The Depository Trust Company's procedures. The Depositary Shares shall be surrendered for payment of the redemption price to Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, the paying agent.
The Company's press release announcing the redemption of the Depositary Shares is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: February 1, 2013

Exhibit 99.1
For Immediate Release
BETHESDA, MARYLAND - Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS) (the "Company") today called for redemption of 60% of the outstanding shares of its 8% Series A Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock represented by 2,400,000 depositary shares, each representing 1/100
th
of a Series A Preferred Share (the "Depositary Shares", CUSIP: 804395200; NYSE: BFSPrA). The Depositary Shares will be redeemed on March 2, 2013 at $25.00 per share, plus all accumulated and unpaid distributions through the redemption date, for an aggregate redemption price of $25.3389 per share. The Depositary Shares will be redeemed, as to registered holders, on a pro rata basis, as nearly as practicable.
The redemptions will be made in accordance with The Depositary Trust Company's procedures. The Depositary Shares shall be surrendered for payment of the redemption price to Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, the redemption and paying agent. After the redemption date, dividends will cease to accrue on the Depositary Shares that were redeemed, regardless of whether they were surrendered for payment.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 59 community and neighborhood shopping center and mixed-use properties totaling approximately 9.5 million square feet of leasable area. Over 85% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore, MD area.
Contact: Scott V. Schneider
(301) 986-6220
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20130212170110.txt.gz
TIME:20130212170110
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The disclosures provided under Item 3.03 of this Current Report on Form 8-K are hereby incorporated by reference under this Item 1.01.
 
In connection with the previously announced sale by Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Registrant") of up to 5,600,000 depositary shares (the "Depositary Shares"), each representing 1/100
th
of a share of 6.875% Series C Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock of the Registrant, par value $0.01 per share (the "Series C Preferred Stock"), on February 12, 2013 the Registrant issued 56,000 shares of Series C Preferred Stock and 5,600,000 Depositary Shares. Following the issuance of Series C Preferred Stock, the ability of the Registrant to pay dividends on, make distributions with respect to, or redeem, purchase or acquire, or make a liquidation payment on any other stock of the Registrant ranking junior to or on a parity with the Series C Preferred Stock, will be subject to certain restrictions in the event that the Registrant does not declare dividends on the Series C Preferred Stock during any dividend period.
The terms of the Series C Preferred Stock are set forth in the Articles Supplementary filed as Exhibit 3.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference. A specimen stock certificate for the Series C Preferred Stock is filed as Exhibit 4.2 hereto and incorporated herein by reference. The terms of the Depositary Shares are set forth in the Deposit Agreement, dated February 6, 2013, by and among the Registrant, Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, as depositary, and the holders of the depositary receipts issued thereunder (the "Deposit Agreement"). The Deposit Agreement is filed as Exhibit 4.1 hereto. A specimen stock receipt representing the Depositary Shares is filed as Exhibit 4.3 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.
The Registrant has contributed the net proceeds of the sale of the Series C Preferred Stock to Saul Holdings Limited Partnership (the "Operating Partnership"), in exchange for preferred units of limited partnership interest, as set forth in the Twelfth Amendment to the First Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of the Operating Partnership filed herewith as Exhibit 10.1, which Twelfth Amendment is incorporated herein by reference.
The Registrant's press release announcing the issuance of the Series C Preferred Stock and the Depositary Shares is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
The disclosures provided under Item 3.03 of this Current Report on Form 8-K are hereby incorporated by reference under this Item 5.03.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: February 12, 2013

Exhibit 5.1
Saul Centers, Inc.
7501 Wisconsin Avenue
Suite 1500
Bethesda, MD 20814
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We are acting as counsel for Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation (the "Company"), in connection with the issuance and sale of 5,600,000 depositary shares (the "Depositary Shares"), each representing a 1/100th fractional interest in a share of the Company's 6.875% Series C Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock, par value $0.01 per share (the "Series C Preferred Stock"), all of which are authorized but heretofore unissued shares to be offered and sold by the Company, in accordance with the terms of the Underwriting Agreement dated January 29, 2013 (the "Underwriting Agreement") among the Company, Saul Holdings Limited Partnership, a Maryland limited partnership, and the several underwriters named therein, and of the Deposit Agreement dated February 6, 2013 (the "Deposit Agreement") by and among the Company, Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company and the holders from time to time of the depositary receipts issued thereunder. The Depositary Shares and Series C Preferred Stock will be offered and sold by the Company pursuant to the Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-185595) (the "Registration Statement"), filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") under the Securities Act of 1933 (the "Act"), and related prospectus, dated January 3, 2013, as supplemented by the prospectus supplement dated January 29, 2013 relating to the offer and sale of the Depositary Shares (as so supplemented, the "Prospectus").
We have reviewed and are familiar with such documents, corporate proceedings and other matters as we have considered relevant or necessary as a basis for the opinions in this letter. Based on the foregoing, we are of the opinion that the Series C Preferred Stock and the Depositary Shares, when issued and delivered by the Company in accordance with the terms of the Underwriting Agreement and the Deposit Agreement, upon receipt of consideration for the Depositary Shares in accordance with the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable.
The opinions set forth in this letter are limited to the laws of the State of Maryland as in effect on the date hereof, and we express no opinion as to the law of any other jurisdiction. We have no responsibility or obligation to update this letter or to take into account changes in law, facts or any other developments of which we may later become aware.
Saul Centers, Inc.
February 12, 2013
Page 2
 
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion letter as Exhibit 5.1 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed by the Company with the Commission on the date hereof and the incorporation thereof in the Registration Statement and to the use of our name under the caption "Legal Matters" in the Prospectus. In giving this consent, we do not thereby admit that we are within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Act or the rules and regulations of the Commission promulgated thereunder.
Very truly yours,
/s/ PILLSBURY WINTHROP SHAW PITTMAN

Exhibit 8.1
Saul Centers, Inc.
7501 Wisconsin Avenue, Suite 1500
Bethesda, Maryland 20814
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") has filed a registration statement on Form S-3, as amended (File No. 333-185595) (the "Registration Statement," which term includes the prospectus declared effective January 3, 2013, and all documents incorporated and deemed to be incorporated by reference therein) with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In connection with the filing of a prospectus supplement (the "Prospectus Supplement") dated January 29, 2013, you have asked us to render an opinion with respect to the qualification of the Company as a real estate investment trust ("REIT") under sections 856 through 860 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code").
In rendering the following opinions, we have examined such statutes, regulations, records, certificates and other documents as we have considered necessary or appropriate as a basis for such opinions, including the following: (1) the Registration Statement, (2) the Prospectus Supplement, (3) the Articles of Incorporation of the Company, as amended, restated or supplemented (the "Articles of Incorporation"), (4) certain written representations of the Company contained in a letter to us dated as of the date hereof, (5) representative copies of the leases entered into by the Company as of the date hereof, and (6) such other documents or information as we have deemed necessary to render the opinions set forth in this letter.
In our review, we have assumed, with your consent, that the documents listed above that we reviewed in proposed form will be executed in substantially the same form, all of the representations and statements set forth in such documents as to factual matters (but not legal conclusions) are true, correct and complete, and that all representations that speak in the future, or to the intention, or to the best of belief and knowledge of any person(s) or party(ies) are and will be true, correct and complete as if made without such qualification. Nothing has come to our attention which would cause us to believe that any of such representations are untrue, incorrect or incomplete. We have also assumed that all of the obligations imposed by any such documents on the parties thereto, including obligations imposed under the Articles of Incorporation have been or will be performed or satisfied in accordance with their terms. Further, we have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the proper execution of all documents, the authenticity of all documents submitted to us as originals, the conformity to originals of documents submitted to us as copies, and the authenticity of the originals from which any copies were made.
Saul Centers, Inc.
February 12, 2013
Page 2
 
Unless facts material to the opinions expressed herein are specifically stated to have been independently established or verified by us, we have relied as to such facts solely upon the representations made by the Company. To the extent that the representations of the Company are with respect to matters set forth in the Code or the regulations promulgated thereunder (the "Treasury Regulations"), we have reviewed with the individuals making such representations the relevant provisions of the Code, the applicable Treasury Regulations and published administrative interpretations thereof.
Based upon and subject to the foregoing and to the qualifications below, we are of the opinion that:
1. The Company was a REIT under the Code for each of its taxable years ending through December 31, 2012.
2. The Company is organized in conformity with the requirements for qualification and taxation as a REIT under the Code, and its current method of operation and ownership will enable it to meet the requirements for qualification and taxation as a REIT for the current taxable year and for future taxable years.
3. The statements in the Prospectus Supplement set forth under the caption "Material Federal Income Tax Considerations," to the extent that they discuss matters of law or legal conclusions or purport to describe or summarize certain provisions of the agreements, statutes or regulations referred to therein, are accurate descriptions or summaries in all material respects, and the discussion thereunder expresses the opinion of Pillsbury Winthrop Shaw Pittman LLP insofar as it relates to matters of United States federal income tax law and legal conclusions with regard to those matters.
The opinions set forth in this letter are based on existing law as contained in the Code, Treasury Regulations (including any Temporary and Proposed Regulations), and interpretations of the foregoing by the Internal Revenue Service ("IRS") and by the courts in effect (or, in case of certain Proposed Regulations, proposed) as of the date hereof, all of which are subject to change, both retroactively or prospectively, and to possibly different interpretations. Moreover, the Company's ability to achieve and maintain qualification as a REIT depends upon its ability to achieve and maintain certain diversity of stock ownership requirements and, through actual annual operating results, certain requirements under the Code regarding its income, assets and distribution levels. No assurance can be given as to whether, for any given taxable year, the actual ownership of the Company's stock and its actual operating results and distributions satisfy
Saul Centers, Inc.
February 12, 2013
Page 3
 
the tests necessary to achieve and maintain its status as a REIT. We assume no obligation to update the opinions set forth in this letter. We believe that the conclusions expressed herein, if challenged by the IRS, would be sustained in court. Because our positions are not binding upon the IRS or the courts, however, there can be no assurance that contrary positions may not be successfully asserted by the IRS.
The foregoing opinions are limited to the specific matters covered thereby and should not be interpreted to imply the undersigned has offered its opinion on any other matter.
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to the Registration Statement. The giving of this consent, however, does not constitute an admission that we are "experts" within the meaning of Section 11 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Act"), or within the category of persons whose consent is required by Section 7 of the Act.
 

Exhibit 10.1
THIS TWELFTH AMENDMENT TO THE FIRST AMENDED AND RESTATED AGREEMENT OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP OF SAUL HOLDINGS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP (this ""), dated as of February 12, 2013, is entered into by the undersigned party.
Twelfth Amendment
WHEREAS, Saul Holdings Limited Partnership (the "") was formed as a Maryland limited partnership pursuant to that certain Certificate of Limited Partnership dated June 16, 1993 and filed on June 16, 1993 among the partnership records of the Maryland State Department of Assessments and Taxation, and that certain Agreement of Limited Partnership dated June 16, 1993 (the "");
Partnership
Original Agreement
WHEREAS, the Original Agreement was amended and restated in its entirety by that certain First Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of the Partnership dated August 26, 1993, which was further amended by that certain First Amendment dated August 26, 1993, by that certain Second Amendment dated March 31, 1994, by that certain Third Amendment dated July 21, 1994, by that certain Fourth Amendment dated December 1, 1996, by that certain Fifth Amendment dated July 6, 2000, by that certain Sixth Amendment dated November 5, 2003, by that certain Seventh Amendment dated November 26, 2003, by that certain Eighth Amendment dated December 31, 2007, by that certain Ninth Amendment dated March 27, 2008, by that certain Tenth Amendment dated April 4, 2008 and by that certain Eleventh Amendment dated September 23, 2011 (as amended, the "");
Agreement
WHEREAS, on February 12, 2013, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "") issued 56,000 shares of 6.875% Series C Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock (the "," each a "") at a gross offering price of $2,500.00 per Series C Preferred Share and, in connection therewith, the General Partner, pursuant to Section 8.7.C of the Agreement, is required to contribute the proceeds of such issuance to the Partnership and cause the Partnership to issue to the General Partner preferred equity ownership interests in the Partnership (""); and
General Partner
Series C Preferred Shares
Series C Preferred Share
Series C Preferred Partnership Units
WHEREAS, the General Partner desires to amend the Agreement pursuant to its authority under Sections 2.4 and 14.1.B of the Agreement and the powers of attorney granted to the General Partner by the Limited Partners in order to reflect the aforementioned issuance of the Series C Preferred Partnership Units.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements herein contained and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt, adequacy and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the undersigned party, intending legally to be bound, hereby agrees as follows:
1. The Agreement is hereby amended by the addition of a new exhibit, entitled , in the form attached hereto, which sets forth the designations, allocations, preferences and other special rights, powers and duties of the Series C Preferred Partnership Units and which shall be attached to and made a part of the Agreement.
Exhibit H
2. Pursuant to Section 8.7.C of the Agreement, effective as of February 12, 2013, the issuance date of the Series C Preferred Shares by the General Partner, the Partnership hereby issues 56,000 Series C Preferred Partnership Units to the General Partner as provided in . The Series C Preferred Partnership Units have been created and are being issued in conjunction with the General Partner's issuance of the Series C Preferred Shares, and as such, the Series C Preferred Partnership Units are intended to have designations, preferences and other rights, all such that the economic interests are substantially similar to the designations, preferences and other rights of the Series C Preferred Shares, and the terms of this Twelfth Amendment, including without limitation the attached , shall be interpreted in a fashion consistent with this intent. In return for the issuance to the General Partner of the Series C Preferred Partnership Units, the General Partner has contributed to the Partnership the funds raised through its issuance of the Series C Preferred Shares (the General Partner's capital contribution shall be deemed to equal the amount of the gross proceeds of that share issuance, , the net proceeds actually contributed, plus any underwriter's discount or other expenses incurred, with any such discount or expense deemed to have been incurred by the General Partner on behalf of the Partnership).
Exhibit H
Exhibit H
i.e.
3. In order to reflect the issuance of the Series C Preferred Partnership Units, to the Agreement is hereby amended by adding to the end of such the following table:
Exhibit A
Exhibit A
Series C Preferred Partnership Units
 
4. The foregoing recitals are incorporated in and are part of this Twelfth Amendment.
5. Except as the context may otherwise require, any terms used in this Twelfth Amendment that are defined in the Agreement shall have the same meaning for purposes of this Twelfth Amendment as in the Agreement.
6. Except as specifically amended hereby, the terms, covenants, provisions and conditions of the Agreement shall remain unmodified and continue in full force and effect and, except as amended hereby, all of the terms, covenants, provisions and conditions of the Agreement are hereby ratified and confirmed in all respects.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned parties have executed this Twelfth Amendment as of the date first written above.
 
 
A class of ownership interests in the Partnership entitled "Series C Preferred Partnership Units" is hereby designated and the number of Series C Preferred Partnership Units constituting such class shall be 56,000.
 
For purposes of the Series C Preferred Partnership Units, the following terms shall have the meanings indicated in this Section 2, and capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned thereto in the Agreement:
"" means any date on which cash dividends are paid on all outstanding shares of the Series C Preferred Shares.
Distribution Payment Date
"" has the meaning set forth in Section 4 of this .
Liquidation Preference
Exhibit H
"" means the preferred equity ownership interests in the Partnership issued to the General Partner by the Partnership in connection with the issuance by the General Partner of the Series C Preferred Shares, having the designations, preferences and rights set forth in this .
Series C Preferred Partnership Units
Exhibit H
"" means the 6.875% Series C Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock issued by the General Partner.
Series C Preferred Shares
 
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in Section 5.2 of the Agreement, on each Distribution Payment Date, the General Partner shall cause distributions of Available Cash to be made in cash to the General Partner with respect to the Series C Preferred Partnership Units in an amount equal to the amount that is required to be distributed by the General Partner on that date to the holders of Series C Preferred Shares. The Series C Preferred Partnership Units shall not be entitled to any distributions of Available Cash, whether payable in cash, property or stock, except as provided herein.
 
In the event of any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Partnership, whether voluntary or involuntary, before any payment or distribution of the Partnership (whether capital, surplus or otherwise) shall be made under Section 13.2.A(3) to any classes of ownership interest in the Partnership that are junior in priority to the Series C Preferred Partnership Units, the Series C Preferred Partnership Units shall be entitled to a preference (the "")
Liquidation Preference
equal to the sum of (i) $2,500 per Series C Preferred Partnership Unit, plus (ii) an amount per Series C Preferred Partnership Unit equal to any accrued and unpaid dividends on one Series C Preferred Share to the date of final distribution. Until the Liquidation Preference with respect to the Series C Preferred Partnership Units has been paid in full, no payment shall be made under Section 13.2.A(3) with respect to any classes of ownership interest in the Partnership that are junior in priority to the Series C Preferred Partnership Units. If, upon any liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Partnership, the assets of the Partnership, or proceeds thereof, distributable with respect to the Series C Preferred Partnership Units shall be insufficient to pay in full the Liquidation Preference and liquidating payments on any ownership interests in the Partnership that are on a parity with the Series C Preferred Partnership Units, then such assets, or the proceeds thereof, shall be distributed among the Series C Preferred Partnership Units and any such ownership interests in the Partnership on the same parity as the Series C Preferred Partnership Units, ratably in the same proportion as the respective amounts that would be payable on such Series C Preferred Partnership Units and any such other ownership interests in the Partnership on the same parity if all amounts payable thereon were paid in full. After payment in full of the Liquidation Preference, the Series C Preferred Partnership Units shall have no right or claim to any of the remaining assets of the Partnership. For the purposes of this Section 4, (i) a consolidation or merger of the Partnership with one or more partnerships, or (ii) a sale or transfer of all or substantially all of the Partnership's assets shall not be deemed to be a liquidation, dissolution or winding up, voluntary or involuntary, of the Partnership.
 
Series C Preferred Partnership Units shall be redeemable by the Partnership as follows:
(a) At any time that the General Partner exercises its right to redeem all or any of the Series C Preferred Shares, the General Partner shall cause the Partnership to concurrently redeem an equal number of Series C Preferred Partnership Units, at a redemption price per Series C Preferred Partnership Unit payable in cash and equal to the same price per share paid by the General Partner to redeem the Series C Preferred Shares (i.e., a redemption price of $2,500.00 per Series C Preferred Share, plus any accrued and unpaid dividends thereon). No interest shall accrue for the benefit of the Series C Preferred Partnership Units to be redeemed on any cash set aside by the Partnership.
(b) If the Partnership shall redeem Series C Preferred Partnership Units pursuant to paragraph (a) of this Section 5, from and after the redemption date (unless the Partnership shall fail to make available the amount of cash necessary to effect such redemption), (i) except for payment of the redemption price, the Partnership shall not make any further distributions on the Series C Preferred Partnership Units so called for redemption, (ii) said units shall no longer be deemed to be outstanding and (iii) all rights of the holders thereof as holders of Series C Preferred Partnership Units of the Partnership shall cease except the rights to receive the cash payable upon such redemption, without interest thereon.
(c) If fewer than all the outstanding Series C Preferred Partnership Units are to be redeemed, units to be redeemed shall be determined pro rata, by lot or in such other manner from outstanding Series C Preferred Partnership Units not previously called for redemption by any method determined by the General Partner in its discretion. Upon any such redemption, the General Partner shall amend to the Agreement as appropriate to reflect such redemption.
Exhibit A
All Series C Preferred Partnership Units which shall have been issued and reacquired in any manner by the Partnership shall be deemed cancelled.
 
The Series C Preferred Partnership Units shall be deemed to rank:
(a) senior to all existing Partnership Interests;
(b) senior to any class or series of ownership interests in the Partnership, as to the payment of distributions and as to distributions of assets upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up, if such class or series is hereafter issued in connection with the future issuance by the General Partner of common stock or any other equity securities ranking junior to the Series C Preferred Shares;
(c) on a parity with any class or series of ownership interests in the Partnership, as to the payment of distributions and as to distributions of assets upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up, if such class or series is hereafter issued in connection with the future authorization or designation by the General Partner of equity securities, the terms of which specifically provide that such equity securities rank on a parity with the Series C Preferred Shares; and
(d) junior to any class or series of ownership interests in the Partnership, as to payment of distributions and as to distribution of assets upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up, if such class or series is hereafter issued in connection with the future authorization or designation by the General Partner of equity securities, the terms of which specifically provide that such class or series ranks senior to the Series C Preferred Shares.
The term "ownership interests in the Partnership" does not include convertible debt securities issued in the future by the Partnership, which will rank senior to the Series C Preferred Partnership Units prior to conversion. All Series C Preferred Partnership Units shall rank equally with one another and shall be identical in all respects.
 
Notwithstanding Sections 6.1.A and B of the Agreement, after giving effect to the special allocations set forth in Section 1 of to the Agreement, each year gross income of the Partnership shall be allocated first to the General Partner until the cumulative amount allocated under this Section 8 to the General Partner for the current year and all prior years is equal to the cumulative amount for the current year and all prior years of the sum of (A) the distributions made to the General Partner under Section 3 of this , (B) the portion of the distributions made to the General Partner under Section 5 of this (if any) that exceeds $2,500 per Series C Preferred Partnership Unit and (C) for the year in which a distribution is to be made to
Exhibit C
Exhibit H
Exhibit H
the General Partner under Section 4 of this , the portion of the Liquidation Preference payable to the General Partner under Section 4 (if any) that exceeds $2,500 per Series C Preferred Partnership Unit. Any remaining Net Income or Net Loss shall be allocated as set forth in Sections 6.1.A and B of the Agreement.
Exhibit H
 
The Series C Preferred Partnership Units shall be owned and held solely by the General Partner.
 
Series C Preferred Partnership Units are not convertible into or exchangeable for any other property or securities of the Partnership, except to the extent that the holders of the Series C Preferred Shares convert the Series C Preferred Shares into shares of the General Partner's common stock, in which case, for each Series C Preferred Share being converted, the Partnership shall convert one Series C Preferred Partnership Unit into a number of Partnership Units equal to the number of shares of the General Partner's common stock into which each Series C Preferred Share is converted. If the holders of the Series C Preferred Shares receive cash, securities or other property upon conversion of the Series C Preferred Shares, an equal number of Series C Preferred Partnership Units shall also convert into such cash, securities or other property.
 
(a) The General Partner shall have a zero percent Partnership Interest with respect to the Series C Preferred Partnership Units and shall have no voting rights with respect to the Series C Preferred Partnership Units other than the right to vote on an amendment to the Agreement if it would alter the distribution, redemption or liquidation rights of the Series C Preferred Partnership Units or any other rights or preferences of the Series C Preferred Partnership Units as set forth in this .
Exhibit H
(b) The Series C Preferred Partnership Units shall not be entitled to the benefits of any retirement or sinking fund.
(c) The Series C Preferred Partnership Units shall not have any preferences or other rights, voting powers, restrictions, limitations as to distributions, qualifications or terms or conditions of redemption other than as expressly set forth in this .
Exhibit H
(d) No holder of Series C Preferred Partnership Units shall have any preemptive or preferential right to subscribe for, or to purchase, any additional ownership interests in the Partnership of any class or series, or any other security of the Partnership which the Partnership may issue or sell.
(e) The ownership of Series C Preferred Partnership Units may (but need not, in the sole and absolute discretion of the General Partner) be evidenced by one or more certificates. The General Partner shall amend to the Agreement from time to time to the extent necessary to reflect accurately the issuance of, and subsequent redemption, or any other event having an effect on the ownership of, Series C Preferred Partnership Units.
Exhibit A
(f) The rights of the General Partner, in its capacity as holder of the Series C Preferred Partnership Units, are in addition to and not in limitation of any other rights or authority of the General Partner in any other capacity under the Agreement or applicable law. In addition, nothing contained herein shall be deemed to limit or otherwise restrict the authority of the General Partner under the Agreement, other than in its capacity as holder of the Series C Preferred Partnership Units.
(g) If any preferences or other rights, restrictions, distributions, qualifications, allocations or terms or conditions of redemption of the Series C Preferred Partnership Units set forth in this are invalid, unlawful or incapable of being enforced by reason of any rule of law or public policy, all other preferences or other rights, restrictions, distributions, qualifications, allocations or terms or conditions of redemption of Series C Preferred Partnership Units set forth in this which can be given effect without the invalid, unlawful or unenforceable provision thereof shall, nevertheless, remain in full force and effect and no preferences or other rights, restrictions, distributions, qualifications, allocations or terms or conditions of redemption of the Series C Preferred Partnership Units herein set forth shall be deemed dependent on any other provision thereof unless so expressed therein.
Exhibit H
Exhibit H
(h) The headings of the various subdivisions of this are for convenience only and shall not affect the interpretation of any of the provisions hereof.
Exhibit H

Exhibit 99.1
For Immediate Release
BETHESDA, MARYLAND - Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS) (the "Company") today announced that it has closed an underwritten public offering of 5,600,000 depositary shares, each representing a 1/100
th
fractional interest in a share of its newly designated 6.875% Series C Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock, at a price of $25.00 per depositary share. The offering included 600,000 depositary shares sold to the underwriters pursuant to the full exercise of their overallotment option.
The Company estimates that the net proceeds from the offering will be approximately $135.1 million, after deducting underwriting discounts, commissions and estimated offering expenses. The Company intends to use approximately $79.3 million of the net proceeds from the offering to redeem all outstanding shares of its 9% Series B Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock on March 15, 2013. With the remaining proceeds and available cash on hand, the Company intends to use $60.0 million to redeem 60% of the outstanding shares of its 8% Series A Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock on March 2, 2013.
Raymond James & Associates, Inc., Robert W. Baird & Co. Incorporated, RBC Capital Markets, LLC, and Stifel, Nicolaus & Company, Incorporated acted as joint book-running managers for the offering.
The offering was made pursuant to an effective shelf registration statement and prospectus and related prospectus supplement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. This press release shall not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities nor shall there be any sale of these securities in any state or jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such state or jurisdiction. Copies of the prospectus and the prospectus supplement relating to these securities may be obtained from Raymond James & Associates, Inc. by calling toll-free 800-248-8863 or writing to prospectus@raymondjames.com, Robert W. Baird & Co. Incorporated by calling toll-free 800-792-2473, RBC Capital Markets, LLC by calling toll-free 866-375-6829 or writing to usdebtcapitalmarkets@rbccm.com, or Stifel, Nicolaus & Company, Incorporated by calling toll-free 855-300-7136. You may also obtain a copy of the prospectus and the prospectus supplement and other documents the Company has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for free by visiting the Commission's Web site at .
www.sec.gov
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 59 community and neighborhood shopping center and mixed-use properties totaling approximately 9.5 million square feet of leasable area. Over 85% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore, MD area.
Statements in this press release that are not strictly historical are "forward-looking" statements. Forward-looking statements involve known and unknown risks, which may cause the company's actual future results to differ materially from expected results. These risks include, among others, general economic conditions, local real estate conditions, changes in interest rates, increases in operating costs, the preferences and financial condition of our tenants, the availability of capital, risks related to our status as a REIT, and the profitability of the company's taxable subsidiary. Additional information concerning these and other
 
factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those forward-looking statements is contained from time to time in the company's Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC") filings, including, but not limited to, the company's Annual Report on Form 10-K. Copies of each filing may be obtained from the company or the SEC. Such forward-looking statements should be regarded solely as reflections of the company's current operating plans and estimates. Actual operating results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecast in this press release. Saul Centers, Inc. undertakes no obligation to publicly release the results of any revisions to these forward-looking statements that may be made to reflect events or circumstances after the date these statements were made.
Contact: Scott V. Schneider
(301) 986-6220
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20130214160715.txt.gz
TIME:20130214160715
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On February 12, 2013, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") announced that it was calling for the redemption of all the outstanding depositary shares (the "Depositary Shares") representing interests in its 9% Series B Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock. The Depositary Shares will be redeemed on March 15, 2013 at $25.00 per Depositary Share, plus all accumulated and unpaid distributions through the redemption date, for an aggregate redemption price of $25.4265 per Depositary Share. Dividends on the Depositary Shares will cease to accrue after the redemption date.
The redemptions will be made in accordance with The Depository Trust Company's procedures. The Depositary Shares shall be surrendered for payment of the redemption price to Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, the paying agent.
The Company's press release announcing the redemption of the Depositary Shares is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
 
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: February 14, 2013

Exhibit 99.1
February 12, 2013
For Immediate Release
BETHESDA, MARYLAND - Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS) (the "Company") today called for redemption of all outstanding shares of its 9% Series B Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock represented by depositary shares, each representing 1/100
th
of a share of Series B Preferred Stock (the "Depositary Shares", CUSIP: 804395408; NYSE: BFSPrB). The Depositary Shares will be redeemed on March 15, 2013 at $25.00 per share, plus all accumulated and unpaid distributions through the redemption date, for an aggregate redemption price of $25.4265 per share.
The redemptions will be made in accordance with The Depositary Trust Company's procedures. The Depositary Shares shall be surrendered for payment of the redemption price to Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, the redemption and paying agent. After the redemption date, dividends will cease to accrue on the Depositary Shares representing interests in Series B Preferred Stock, regardless of whether they were surrendered for payment.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity real estate investment trust headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 59 community and neighborhood shopping center and mixed-use properties totaling approximately 9.5 million square feet of leasable area. Over 85% of the Company's cash flow is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore, MD area.
Contact: Scott V. Schneider
(301) 986-6220
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20130307165827.txt.gz
TIME:20130307165827
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On March 7, 2013, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2012. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: March 7, 2013
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
March 7, 2013, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended December 31, 2012 ("2012 Quarter"). Total revenue for the 2012 Quarter increased to $48.3 million from $46.8 million for the quarter ended December 31, 2011 ("2011 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before income attributable to noncontrolling interests and preferred stock dividends, increased to $9.1 million for the 2012 Quarter from $8.7 million for the 2011 Quarter. Net income available to common stockholders was $5.7 million ($0.29 per diluted share) for the 2012 Quarter compared to $3.7 million ($0.19 per diluted share) for the 2011 Quarter. Included in the results for the 2012 Quarter is a $3.5 million gain on sale of the 55,000 square foot Belvedere Gardens shopping center, located in Baltimore, Maryland, which was partially offset by $1.1 million of acquisition costs related to the acquisition of two properties located along Rockville Pike in Montgomery County, Maryland.
Same property revenue increased 1.9% for the 2012 Quarter compared to the 2011 Quarter, and same property operating income increased 1.4%. Same property comparisons exclude the results of properties not in operation for the entirety of the comparable reporting periods. Shopping center portfolio same property operating income increased 3.6% and mixed-use portfolio same property operating income decreased 7.9%. The same property results were adversely impacted by Van Ness Square, where rental income has decreased as a result of the Company entering into early lease termination agreements with tenants to position the property for redevelopment. If Van Ness Square was excluded, overall same property operating income would have increased 3.2% and mixed-use same property operating income would have increased 1.1%.
For the year ended December 31, 2012 ("2012 Year"), total revenue increased to $190.1 million from $173.9 million for the year ended December 31, 2011 ("2011 Year"). Operating income increased to $36.2 million for the 2012 Year from $34.0 million for the 2011 Year. Net income available to common stockholders was $18.2 million ($0.93 per diluted share) for the 2012 Year compared to $11.6 million ($0.61 per diluted share) for the 2011 Year. The primary sources of the revenue increase were additional revenue from the shopping centers acquired in 2011 ($9.7 million) and from Clarendon Center ($4.9 million). The primary sources of increased operating income were the core portfolio ($4.1 million) and the shopping centers acquired in
 
2011 ($1.1 million), partially offset by Van Ness Square predevelopment expenses ($2.7 million). Included in the results for the 2012 Year are gains on property sales of $4.5 million, which were partially offset by acquisition costs of $1.1 million.
Same property revenue increased 1.0% and same property operating income increased 1.8% for the 2012 Year compared to the 2011 Year. Shopping center portfolio same property operating income increased 2.0% and mixed-use portfolio same property operating income increased 0.6%. The same property results were adversely impacted by Van Ness Square. If Van Ness Square was excluded, overall same property operating income would have increased 2.6% and mixed-use same property operating income would have increased 5.0%. The increase in the mixed-use properties was primarily due to improved operating performance at Washington Square.
As of December 31, 2012, 91.7% of the commercial portfolio was leased (all properties except the apartments at Clarendon Center, which were 100% leased), compared to 90.1% at December 31, 2011. On a same property basis, 91.9% of the portfolio was leased compared to the prior year level of 90.7%. The 2012 leasing percentages were impacted by a net increase of 107,000 square feet of leased space, primarily caused by the leasing of a portion of the space vacated by major shopping center tenants in 2011.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends) decreased 3.2% to $14.6 million ($0.54 per diluted share) in the 2012 Quarter from $15.1 million ($0.58 per diluted share) in the 2011 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus real estate depreciation and amortization, and excluding gains and losses from property dispositions, impairment charges on depreciable real estate assets and extraordinary items. The primary causes for decreased FFO in the 2012 Quarter were increased acquisition costs ($1.1 million) and predevelopment expenses ($0.8 million), which were partially offset by improved overall portfolio operating results ($1.4 million).
FFO available to common shareholders for the 2012 Year increased 19.5% to $60.1 million ($2.26 per diluted share) from $50.3 million ($2.03 per diluted share) for the 2011 Year. FFO increased primarily as a result of (a) the shopping centers acquired in 2011 ($4.7 million), the core portfolio ($3.9 million), and Clarendon Center ($1.0 million), (b) reduced acquisition costs ($1.4 million) and (c) a change in the fair value of the Company's interest rate swaps ($1.4 million), the combined impact of which was partially offset by predevelopment expenses ($2.7 million).
During 2012, Saul Centers incurred acquisition costs of $1.1 million related to the purchase of two operating shopping center properties intended for future redevelopment in Rockville, Maryland. The first property, 1500 Rockville Pike, a 6.7 acre property with 53,000
 
rentable square feet located near the Twinbrook Metro Station, was acquired for $23.0 million, including acquisition costs. The second property, 5541 Nicholson Lane, a 1.1 acre property with 20,000 rentable square feet located adjacent to the Company's 11503 Rockville Pike property near the White Flint Metro Station, was acquired for $12.2 million, including acquisition costs. The two properties are currently zoned for 1.1 million square feet of rentable mixed-use space.
The Company sold two properties during 2012 and recognized a combined gain on sale of $4.5 million. In July, the Company sold the 77,000 square foot and 11.7% leased West Park shopping center in Oklahoma City, Oklahoma, and in December, the 55,000 square foot and 34.2% leased Belvedere Gardens shopping center in Baltimore, Maryland.
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 59 community and neighborhood shopping center and mixed-use properties totaling 9.5 million square feet of leasable area. Over 85% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20130430170613.txt.gz
TIME:20130430170613
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 30, 2013, Saul Centers, Inc. issued a press release to report its financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2013. The release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 hereto.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(c) Exhibits
99.1    Press Release, dated April 30, 2013, of Saul Centers, Inc.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: April 30, 2013
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
April 30, 2013, Bethesda, MD.
Saul Centers, Inc. (NYSE: BFS), an equity real estate investment trust (REIT), announced its operating results for the quarter ended March 31, 2013 ("2013 Quarter"). Total revenue for the 2013 Quarter increased to $49.2 million from $47.0 million for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 ("2012 Quarter"). Operating income, which is net income available to common stockholders before income attributable to noncontrolling interests, preferred stock dividends and the impact of preferred stock redemptions, decreased to $3.4 million for the 2013 Quarter from $9.3 million for the 2012 Quarter. Operating income for the 2013 Quarter was adversely impacted by $6.0 million of additional depreciation expense and $2.3 million of predevelopment expenses, both of which are related to the Company's activities at Van Ness Square. Without these expenses, operating income for the 2013 Quarter would have been $11.7 million, or $2.4 million more than the 2012 Quarter.
Net loss attributable to common stockholders was $4.6 million ($0.23 per diluted share) for the 2013 Quarter compared to net income of $4.1 million ($0.21 per diluted share) for the 2012 Quarter. Net income attributable to common stockholders for the 2013 Quarter was adversely impacted primarily by the $8.3 million of depreciation and predevelopment expense related to Van Ness Square and a $5.2 million charge against common equity resulting from the redemption of preferred stock. Without these items, as adjusted for noncontrolling interests, net income attributable to common stockholders would have been $5.5 million, or $1.4 million more than the 2012 Quarter. The $1.4 million increase is primarily attributable to the leasing of major tenant space in the shopping center portfolio, reduced interest expense and increased property operating income from the recently constructed Clarendon Center.
During the 2013 Quarter, the Company issued $140.0 million of 6.875% Series C Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock, redeemed all $79.3 million of its 9.0% Series B preferred stock and redeemed $60.0 million of its 8.0% Series A preferred stock. The changes in preferred stock will result in a reduction in annual preferred stock dividends to $12.8 million from $15.1 million.
Same property revenue increased 3.2% and same property operating income increased 4.5% for the 2013 Quarter compared to the 2012 Quarter. Same property operating income equals property revenue minus the sum of (a) property operating expenses, (b) provision for credit losses and (c) real estate taxes and the comparisons exclude the results of properties not in operation for the entirety of the comparable reporting periods. Shopping center same property
 
operating income increased 5.2% and mixed-use same property operating income increased 2.2%. The shopping centers were primarily impacted by revenue received as a result of the occupancy of approximately 111,000 square feet of anchor-tenant space which was vacant during the 2012 Quarter. The leasing of Clarendon Center during early 2012 was the primary contributor of improved mixed-use property operating income. The same property results were adversely impacted by Van Ness Square as a result of the Company's lease termination activities. If Van Ness Square was excluded, overall same property operating income for the 2013 Quarter and the 2012 Quarter would have been $36.4 million and $34.6 million, respectively, an increase of 5.2% and mixed-use same property operating income would have been $8.7 million and $8.3 million, respectively, an increase of 4.9%.
As of March 31, 2013, 91.5% of the commercial portfolio was leased (all properties except the apartments at Clarendon Center, which were 100% leased), compared to 90.9% at March 31, 2012. On a same property basis, 91.6% of the portfolio was leased at March 31, 2012, which is unchanged from the prior year. Excluding Van Ness Square from the same property leasing ratios, 92.9% of the portfolio was leased as of March 31, 2013, a slight increase from 92.2% as of March 31, 2012.
Funds from operations (FFO) available to common shareholders (after deducting preferred stock dividends and the impact of preferred stock redemptions) decreased 33.7% to $10.2 million ($0.37 per diluted share) in the 2013 Quarter from $15.3 million ($0.58 per diluted share) in the 2012 Quarter. FFO, a widely accepted non-GAAP financial measure of operating performance for REITs, is defined as net income plus real estate depreciation and amortization, and excluding gains and losses from property dispositions, impairment charges on depreciable real estate assets and extraordinary items. FFO available to common shareholders for the 2013 Quarter was adversely impacted by the redemption of preferred stock ($5.2 million) and predevelopment expenses ($2.3 million). Without these items, FFO available to common shareholders would have been $17.7 million, or $2.4 million more than the 2012 Quarter. The $2.4 million increase is primarily attributable to improved overall portfolio operating results ($1.4 million) and reduced interest expense and amortization of deferred debt costs ($1.0 million).
Saul Centers is a self-managed, self-administered equity REIT headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland. Saul Centers currently operates and manages a real estate portfolio of 59 community and neighborhood shopping center and mixed-use properties totaling 9.5 million square feet of leasable area. Over 85% of the Company's property operating income is generated from properties in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area.
 
  (301) 986-6220
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:BFS/BFS-8K-20130514164048.txt.gz
TIME:20130514164048
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
The disclosure provided under Item 5.02 below is incorporated hereunder by reference.
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
Effective as of May 10, 2013 following the approval of its stockholders as described under Item 5.07 below, Saul Centers, Inc. (the "Company") amended its 2004 Stock Plan (the "Plan") to:
 
 
 
all as set forth more fully in the Saul Centers, Inc. 2004 Stock Plan, as amended, filed herewith as Exhibit 10.(a), which is incorporated hereunder by reference.
Item 5.03. Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
On May 14, 2013, following the approval of its stockholders as described under Item 5.07 below, the Company amended its articles of incorporation to increase its authorized shares of both common and excess stock in each case from 30 million shares to 40 million shares. The articles of amendment are filed herewith as Exhibit 3.(a) and are incorporated hereunder by reference.
Item 5.07. Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
On May 10, 2013, the Company held its Annual Meeting of Stockholders, at which George P. Clancy Jr., General Paul X. Kelley, Charles R. Longsworth, Thomas H. McCormick and Patrick F. Noonan were reelected to the Board of Directors for three year terms expiring at the 2016 Annual Meeting. The terms of the remaining Board members did not expire as of the May 10, 2013 meeting, and those individuals continue as directors of the Company. Holders of 19,048,329 shares of the Company's common stock voted in person at the meeting or by proxy (representing 95.4% of the 19,973,598 shares eligible to vote) as follows:
 
The stockholders voted for the ratification of Ernst & Young as independent public accountants as follows:
 
The stockholders voted to approve an amendment to the Company's articles of incorporation to increase the number of authorized shares of Company stock:
 
The stockholders voted to approve certain amendments to the Company's 2004 Stock Plan:
 
Item 8.01. Other Events.
The Company posted on its web site, , a presentation given by management at the Company's annual meeting of stockholders. The presentation is Exhibit 99. (a) to this current report on Form 8-K.
www.saulcenters.com
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Dated: May 14, 2013
 
 

Exhibit 3.(a)
Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation with its principal office in Bethesda, Maryland (the "Corporation"), hereby certifies to the State Department of Assessments and Taxation of the State of Maryland that:
Prior to the amendment set forth herein, the total number of shares of all classes of capital stock that the Corporation has authority to issue is sixty-two million (62,000,000) shares consisting of (i) one million (1,000,000) shares of preferred stock without designated par value; (ii) thirty million (30,000,000) shares of common stock, par value $0.01 per share; (iii) one million (1,000,000) shares of excess stock without designated par value; and (iv) thirty million (30,000,000) shares of excess stock, par value $0.01 per share. The aggregate par value of all of the authorized shares of all classes of capital stock having a par value is $600,000.
FIRST:
: The First Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation, as amended (the "Articles of Incorporation"), are hereby further amended by deleting Article VI, Section 1 in its entirety and inserting the following new Article VI, Section 1:
SECOND
"The total number of shares of all classes of capital stock that the Corporation has authority to issue is eighty-two million (82,000,000) shares consisting of (i) one million (1,000,000) shares of preferred stock without designated par value (the "Preferred Stock"); (ii) forty million (40,000,000) shares of common stock, par value $0.01 per share (the "Common Stock"); (iii) one million (1,000,000) shares of excess stock without designated par value and forty million (40,000,000) shares of excess stock, par value $0.01 per share (collectively, the "Excess Stock"). The aggregate par value of all of the authorized shares of all classes of capital stock having par value is $800,000.00."
The information required by subsection (b)(2)(i) of Section 2-607 of the Maryland General Corporation Law will not be changed by these Articles of Amendment; and
THIRD:
The amendments to the Articles of Incorporation as hereinabove set forth have been advised by the Board of Directors of the Corporation and approved by the stockholders of the Corporation.
FOURTH:
, Saul Centers, Inc. has caused these Articles of Amendment to be signed in its name and on its behalf by Thomas H. McCormick, its President, Chief Operating Officer and General Counsel, and attested by Scott V. Schneider, its Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer and Secretary, on May 14, 2013.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
, President, Chief Operating Officer and General Counsel of Saul Centers, Inc., who executed in the name and on behalf of said corporation the foregoing Articles of Amendment, of which this certificate is made a part, hereby acknowledges, in the name and on behalf of said corporation, the foregoing Articles of Amendment to be the corporate act of said corporation and further certifies that, to the best of his knowledge, information, and belief, the matters and facts set forth therein with respect to the approval thereof are true in all material respects, under the penalties of perjury.
THE UNDERSIGNED
 

Exhibit 10.(a)
SECTION 1. PURPOSE.
The purpose of the Plan, as hereinafter set forth, is to enable the Company to attract, retain and reward corporate officers, managerial and other significant employees, directors, and non-employees who have an ongoing consultant or advisor relationship with the Company, by offering such individuals an opportunity to have a greater proprietary interest in and a closer identity with the Company and its financial success.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS.
(a) An entity that qualifies as a Subsidiary Corporation with respect to the Company, or a "parent corporation" with respect to the Company within the meaning of Section 424(e) of the Code, whether such entity qualifies as a parent corporation or a subsidiary corporation as of the initial adoption of the plan or thereafter.
Affiliate.
(b) The Board of Directors of the Company.
Board.
(c) The Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
Code.
(d) The Compensation Committee of the Board (or subcommittee thereof) or such other committee (or subcommittee thereof) as shall be appointed by the Board to administer the Plan pursuant to Section 3. The Committee shall consist solely of two (2) or more directors who are (i) "non-employee directors" (within the meaning of Rule 16b-3 under the Exchange Act) for purposes of exercising administrative authority with respect to Options granted to Participants who are subject to Section 16 of the Exchange Act; (ii) to the extent required by the rules of the New York Stock Exchange or any national stock exchange or automated quotation system on which the Common Stock is then listed or quoted, "independent" within the meaning of such rules; and (iii) at such times as an Option granted under the Plan by the Company is subject to Section 162(m) of the Code (to the extent relief from the limitation of Section 162(m) of the Code is sought with respect to Options and administration of the Options by a committee of "outside directors" is required to receive such relief) "outside directors" within the meaning of Section 162(m) of the Code.
Committee.
(e) The common stock, $0.01 par value, of the Company or such other class of shares or other securities as may be applicable pursuant to the provisions of Section 8.
Common Stock.
(f) Saul Centers, Inc., a Maryland corporation, and any successor thereto.
Company.
(g) The Participant's service with the Company or an Affiliate, whether as an employee, director or consultant, is not interrupted or terminated. A Participant's Continuous Service shall not be deemed to have been interrupted or terminated merely because of a change in the capacity in which the Participant renders service to the Company or an Affiliate or a change in the entity for which the Participant renders such service. The Participant's Continuous Service shall be deemed to have terminated either upon actual termination or the entity for which the Participant performs service ceases to be an Affiliate. The Committee shall determine whether Continuous Service shall be considered interrupted in the case of a leave of absence approved by the Company or an Affiliate, including sick leave, military leave or any other personal leave.
Continuous Service.
(h) Permanent and total disability, as defined in Section 22(e)(3) of the Code. A Participant shall not be considered Disabled unless the Committee determines that the Disability arose before such Participant's termination of employment or, in the case of a director or a non-employee Participant, before the termination of the director, consulting or advisor relationship between such Participant and the Company or an Affiliate.
Disabled or Disability.
(i) The Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder, as such law, rules and regulations may be amended from time to time.
Exchange Act.
 
(j) On any given date, the current fair market value of the shares of Common Stock as determined as follows. (i) if the Common Stock is traded on New York Stock Exchange, is listed on a national securities exchange or is quoted on an automated quotation system, the closing price for the day of determination as quoted on such market or exchange which is the primary market or exchange for trading of the Common Stock or if no trading occurs on such date, the last day on which trading occurred, or such other appropriate date as determined by the Committee in its discretion, as reported in The Wall Street Journal or such other source as the Committee deems reliable; (ii) if the Common Stock is regularly quoted by a recognized securities dealer but selling prices are not reported, its Fair Market Value shall be the mean between the high and the low asked prices for the Common Stock for the day of determination; or (iii) in the absence of an established market for the Common Stock, Fair Market Value shall be determined by the Committee in good faith.
Fair Market Value.
(k) An Option that is intended to qualify as an "incentive stock option" under Section 422 of the Code.
Incentive Stock Option.
(l) An Option that is not an Incentive Stock Option.
Nonqualified Stock Option.
(m) The interest held by the Saul Organization in the Saul Holdings Limited Partnership.
Operating Partnership Units.
(n) An option to purchase shares of Common Stock granted to a Participant pursuant to Section 6.
Option.
(o) An employee of the Company (including any employee who is a member of the Board) or an Affiliate, a director of the Company or an Affiliate, or any non-employee consultant or advisor (provided, such consultant or advisor is a natural person who provides bona fide services to the Company other than in connection with the offer or sale of securities in a capital-raising transaction or promotion or maintenance of a market for the Company's securities) to the Company (including non-employee members of the Board) or an Affiliate, whose participation in the Plan is determined by the Committee to be in the best interest of the Company.
Participant.
(p) The Saul Centers, Inc. 2004 Stock Plan, as amended from time to time.
Plan.
(q) The B.F. Saul Company, the B.F. Saul Real Estate Investment Trust and Chevy Chase Bank, F.S.B., as well as other affiliated entities and any successor entities.
Saul Organization.
(r) An award of shares of Common Stock or phantom share units described in Section 5(b) of the Plan.
Stock Award.
(s) An entity that qualifies as a "subsidiary corporation" with respect to the Company within the meaning of Section 424(f) of the Code.
Subsidiary Corporation.
SECTION 3. ADMINISTRATION.
(a) The Plan shall be administered by the Committee. The Committee shall have the authority to approve individuals for participation; to construe and interpret the Plan; to establish, amend or waive rules and regulations for its administration; and to accelerate the exercisability of any Option or the termination of any restriction under any Option or Stock Award. Options and Stock Awards may be subject to such provisions as the Committee shall deem advisable, and may be amended by the Committee from time to time; provided that no such amendment may adversely affect the rights of the holder of an Option or Stock Award without such holder's consent.
Authority of the Committee.
(b) The Committee may employ such legal counsel, consultants and agents as it may deem desirable for the administration of the Plan and may rely upon any opinion received from any such counsel or consultant and any computation received from any such consultant or agent.
Powers of the Committee.
(c) No member of the Committee shall be liable for any action or determination made in good faith with respect to the Plan or any Option or Stock Award awarded under it. To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, each member of the Committee shall be indemnified and held harmless by the Company against any cost or expense (including legal fees) or liability (including any sum paid in settlement of a claim with the approval of the Company) arising out of any act or omission to act in connection with the Plan unless arising out of such member's own fraud or bad faith. Such indemnification shall be in addition to any rights of indemnification the members may have as members of the Board or under the by-laws of the Company.
Indemnification.
 
(d) The Company shall not be required to issue fractional shares pursuant to the Plan. The Committee may provide for elimination of fractional shares or the settlement of such fraction shares in cash.
Fractional Shares.
(e) The Committee may not without the approval of the stockholders of the Company lower the exercise price of an outstanding Option, whether by amending the exercise price of the outstanding Option or through cancellation of the outstanding Option and issuance of a replacement or substitute Option; provided that stockholder approval shall not be required for adjustments made in connection with an event described in Section 8 in order to prevent enlargement, dilution or diminishment of rights.
No Repricing of Options.
SECTION 4. COMMON STOCK SUBJECT TO PLAN.
The aggregate shares of Common Stock that may be issued under the Plan shall not exceed 2,200,000, subject to adjustment in accordance with Section 8. Common Stock issued under the Plan may be shares of authorized and unissued Common Stock or previously issued Common Stock reacquired by the Company.
In the event of a lapse, expiration, termination, forfeiture or cancellation of any Option or Stock Award granted under the Plan without the issuance of shares, the Common Stock subject to or reserved for such Option or Stock Award may be used again for new grants of Options or Stock Awards hereunder; provided that in no event may the number of shares of Common Stock issued hereunder exceed the total number of shares reserved for issuance. Any shares of Common Stock withheld or surrendered to pay withholding taxes pursuant to Section 11(e) or withheld or surrendered in full or partial payment of the exercise price of an Option pursuant to Section 6(e) shall be added to the aggregate shares of Common Stock available for issuance.
Notwithstanding any other provision of the Plan, during any single calendar year, no Participant shall be granted Options which permit such Participant to purchase more than 100,000 shares of Common Stock, subject to adjustment in accordance with Section 8. In no event shall the number of shares issued upon the exercise of Incentive Stock Options exceed 2,000,000, subject to adjustment in accordance with Section 8.
SECTION 5. ELIGIBILITY.
(a) Options may be granted under the Plan to any Participants. The Committee shall have absolute discretion to determine, within the limits of the express provisions of the Plan, those Participants to whom and the time or times at which Options shall be granted. The Committee shall also determine, within the limits of the express provisions of the Plan, the number of shares to be subject to each Option, the duration of each Option, the exercise price under each Option, the time or times within which (during the term of the Option) all or portions of each Option may become vested and exercisable, and whether an Option shall be an Incentive Stock Option, a Nonqualified Stock Option or a combination thereof. In making such determination, the Committee may take into account the nature of the services rendered by the Participant, his or her present and potential contributions to the Company's success and such other factors as the Committee in its discretion shall deem relevant.
Options.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Incentive Stock Option shall be granted to any Participant who is not an employee of the Company or an Affiliate.
Options may be granted under this Plan from time to time in substitution for stock options held by employees of other corporations who become employees of the Company or a Subsidiary Corporation as a result of a merger or consolidation of the employing corporation with the Company or a Subsidiary Corporation, the acquisition by the Company or a Subsidiary Corporation of the employing corporation, the acquisition by the Company or a Subsidiary Corporation of the assets of the employing corporation, or the acquisition by the Company or a Subsidiary Corporation of at least fifty percent (50%) of the issued and outstanding stock of the employing corporation as the result of which it becomes a Subsidiary Corporation of the Company. The terms and conditions of the substitute options so granted may vary from the terms and conditions set forth in this Plan to such extent as the Committee at the time of grant may deem appropriate to conform, in whole or in part, to the provisions of the stock options in substitution for which they are granted, but with respect to stock options which are Incentive Stock Options, no such variation shall be such as to affect the status of any such substitute option as an "incentive stock option" under Section 422 of the Code.
 
(b) Stock Awards may be granted under the Plan only to directors of the Company. A Stock Award may be in the form of either (i) shares of Common Stock, or (ii) phantom stock, each share of which is equivalent in value to a share of Common Stock. The Committee shall have absolute discretion to determine the terms and conditions of Stock Awards, including but not limited to, any restrictions on the shares of Common Stock issued pursuant to a Stock Award and the terms of any agreement evidencing a Stock Award. The Committee in its discretion may establish a deferred compensation program under which fees payable by the Company to directors may be deferred in the form of a Stock Award.
Stock Awards.
SECTION 6. TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF OPTIONS.
Each Option granted under the Plan shall be evidenced by an agreement, in a form approved by the Committee, which shall be subject to the following express terms and conditions and to such other terms and conditions as the Committee may deem appropriate:
(a) Each Option agreement shall specify the period for which the Option thereunder is granted, which shall not exceed ten (10) years from the date of grant, and shall provide that the Option shall expire at the end of such period.
Option Period.
(b) The per share exercise price of each Option shall be determined by the Committee at the time the Option is granted, and shall not be less than the Fair Market Value of Common Stock on the date the Option is granted.
Exercise Price.
(c) No part of any Option may be exercised until the Participant shall have satisfied the vesting conditions (i.e., such as remaining in the employ of or continuing services for the Company and/or an Affiliate for a certain period of time), if any, as the Committee may specify in the applicable Option agreement. Subject to the provisions of Section 6(d), any Option may be exercised, to the extent exercisable by its terms, at such time or times as may be determined by the Committee.
Vesting of Options.
(d) An Option, if exercisable, shall be exercised by completion, execution and delivery of notice (written or electronic) to the Company of exercise of the Option which states (i) the Participant's intent to exercise the Option, (ii) the number of shares of Common Stock with respect to which the Option is being exercised, (iii) such other representations and agreements as may be required by the Company and (iv) the method for satisfying any applicable tax withholding as provided in Section 11(e). Such notice of exercise shall be provided on such form or by such method as the Committee may designate, and payment of the exercise price shall be made in accordance with Section 6(e). Subject to the provisions of the Plan and the applicable Option agreement, an Option may be exercised to the extent vested in whole at any time or in part from time to time at such times and in compliance with such requirements as the Committee shall determine. A partial exercise of an Option shall not affect the right to exercise the Option from time to time in accordance with the Plan and the applicable Option agreement with respect to the remaining shares subject to the Option. An Option may not be exercised with respect to fractional shares of Common Stock.
Exercise.
(e) The exercise price of an Option shall be paid in full at the time of exercise (i) in cash, (ii) through the surrender of previously-acquired shares of Common Stock having a Fair Market Value equal to the exercise price of the Option provided that such previously-acquired shares have been held by the Participant for at least six months, unless the Committee in its discretion permits the use of shares held less than six months, (iii) through the withholding by the Company (at the election of the Participant) of shares of Common Stock having a Fair Market Value equal to the exercise price, provided that the Participant attests in a manner acceptable to the Committee that he or she holds previously-acquired shares equal in number to the number of shares withheld by the Company and has held such previously-acquired shares for at least six months, or (iv) if the Common Stock is traded on an established securities market, the Committee may approve payment of the exercise price by a broker-dealer or by the Participant with cash advanced by the broker-dealer if the exercise notice is accompanied by the Participant's written irrevocable instructions to deliver the Common Stock acquired upon exercise of the Option to the broker-dealer, or (v) by a combination of (i), (ii), (iii), and (iv), in the discretion of the Committee.
Payment.
(f) No Option that is intended to be an Incentive Stock Option shall be invalid for failure to qualify as an Incentive Stock Option.
Other Rules Applicable to Incentive Stock Options.
 
(i) Consistent with Section 9, an Incentive Stock Option must be granted within ten years of the date this Plan, as amended, is adopted or the date the Plan, as amended, is approved by the stockholders of the Company, whichever is earlier.
Grant Period.
(ii) If a Participant, on the date that an Incentive Stock Option is granted, owns, directly or indirectly, within the meaning of Section 424(d) of the Code, stock representing more than ten percent (10%) of the voting power of all classes of stock of the Company or any Affiliate that qualifies as a "parent corporation" or "subsidiary corporation" under Sections 424(e) and 424(f) of the Code, then the exercise price per share shall in no instance be less than one hundred ten percent (110%) of the Fair Market Value per share of Common Stock at the time the Incentive Stock Option is granted, and no Incentive Stock Option shall be exercisable by such Participant after the expiration of five years from the date it is granted.
Ten Percent Owner.
(iii) The aggregate Fair Market Value (determined at the date of grant) of the Incentive Stock Options exercisable for the first time by a Participant during any calendar year shall not exceed $100,000 or any other limit imposed by the Code.
Value of Shares.
(iv) Upon exercise of an Incentive Stock Option, Participant agrees that he or she will notify the Company within fifteen (15) days after the date of any disposition of Common Stock issued upon exercise of such Option that occurs within two (2) years after the date of grant of the Option or within one (1) year after such Common Stock is transferred upon exercise of the Option. The Company may require that certificates evidencing shares of Common Stock purchased upon exercise of an Incentive Stock Option be endorsed with a legend in substantially the following form:
Transfer of Incentive Stock Option Shares.
The shares evidenced by this certificate may not be sold or transferred prior to                      in the absence of a written statement from Saul Centers, Inc. to the effect that the Company is aware of the fact of such sale or transfer.
The blank contained in such legend shall be filled in with the date that is the later of (i) one (1) year and one (1) day after the date of exercise of such Incentive Stock Option or (ii) two (2) years and one (1) day after the date of grant of such Incentive Stock Option. Upon delivery to the Company, at its principal executive office, of a written statement to the effect that such shares have been sold or transferred prior to such date, the Company does hereby agree to promptly deliver to the transfer agent for such shares a written statement to the effect that the Company is aware of the fact of such sale or transfer. The Company may also require the inclusion of any additional legend which may be necessary or appropriate.
SECTION 7. TREATMENT OF OPTIONS UPON TERMINATION.
(a) Except as otherwise determined by the Committee in its sole discretion and set forth in the relevant grant agreement, upon termination of the Participant's Continuous Service by reason of Disability or death, such Participant's Options shall become or remain fully vested and shall be exercisable by such Participant (or, in the case of death, by his or her estate) for not later than the earlier of one year after the termination date or the expiration of the term of the Options.
Termination due to Disability or Death.
(b) Except as otherwise determined by the Committee in its sole discretion and set forth in the relevant grant agreement, upon termination of the Participant's Continuous Service for any reason other than for Cause (as defined in Section 7(c)), Disability or death, such Participant's Options (to the extent vested before such termination) may be exercised by such Participant during the ninety-day period commencing on the date of termination, but not later than the expiration of the term of the Options. If a Participant dies during such ninety-day period, his or her estate may exercise the Options (to the extent such Options were vested and exercisable before death), but not later than the earlier of one year after the date of death or the expiration of the term of the Options.
Termination Other than For Cause.
(c) Upon termination of a Participant's Continuous Service for Cause, the Participant's right to exercise his or her Options shall terminate immediately and without notice. For purposes of this provision, Cause shall mean:
Termination for Cause.
(i) The commission of an action against or in derogation of the interests of the Company or an Affiliate which constitutes an act of fraud, dishonesty or moral turpitude or which, if proven in a court of law, would constitute a violation of a criminal code or similar law;
 
(ii) A material breach of any material duty or obligation imposed upon the Participant by the Company or an Affiliate;
(iii) Divulging the Company or an Affiliate's confidential information; or
(iv) The performance of any similar action that the Committee, in its sole discretion, may deem to be sufficiently injurious to the interests of the Company or an Affiliate so as to constitute substantial cause for termination.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if a Participant performs services for the Company or an Affiliate pursuant to a written agreement and such agreement defines "cause" for purposes of the Company or Affiliate's right to terminate such agreement for "cause," then such definition of "cause" set forth in the agreement shall apply for purposes of the Plan.
SECTION 8. ADJUSTMENT PROVISIONS.
In the event of a recapitalization, reclassification or combination of shares, stock split, stock dividend, merger, sale of assets or similar event, the Committee shall adjust equitably (a) the number and class of shares or other securities that are reserved for issuance under the Plan, (b) the number and class of shares or other securities that are subject to outstanding Options and/or Stock Awards, and (c) the appropriate Fair Market Value and other price determinations applicable to Options and/or Stock Awards. The Committee shall make all determinations under this Section 8, and all such determinations shall be conclusive and binding.
The existence of outstanding Options and/or Stock Awards shall not affect in any way the right or power of the Company or its stockholders to make or authorize any or all adjustments, recapitalizations, reorganizations or other changes in the Company's capital structure or its business, or any merger or consolidation of the Company, or any issuance of bonds, debentures, preferred or prior preference stock ahead of or affecting the Common Stock or the rights thereof, or the dissolution or liquidation of the Company, or any sale or transfer of all or any part of its assets or business, or any other corporate act or proceeding, whether of a similar character or otherwise.
SECTION 9. EFFECTIVE DATE AND TERM OF PLAN.
The Plan became effective on April 23, 2004, pursuant to its adoption by the Board of Directors and approval by stockholders of the Company holding a majority of the shares entitled to vote thereon. Unless previously terminated, the Plan will terminate ten (10) years after the earlier of (i) the date the Plan as herein amended is adopted by the Board, or (ii) the date the Plan as herein amended is approved by the stockholders, except that Options and/or Stock Awards that are granted under the Plan before its termination will continue to be administered under the terms of the Plan until the Options terminate or are exercised or the Stock Awards terminate or fully vest and are settled.
SECTION 10. CHANGE IN CONTROL.
(a) Except as otherwise determined by the Committee in its sole discretion, and set forth in the relevant grant agreement, in the event of a Change in Control, all outstanding Options shall fully vest in each Participant. The Committee, in its discretion, may also provide in any Option agreement for adjustment of certain terms of such Option upon the occurrence of a Change in Control.
Effect of a Change in Control.
(b) "Change in Control" shall mean the occurrence of any of the following events:
Definition of Change in Control.
(i) An acquisition by any individual, entity or group (within the meaning of Section 13(d)(3) or 14(d)(2) of the Exchange Act) (a "Person"), of beneficial ownership (within the meaning of Rule 13d-3 promulgated under the Exchange Act) of 20% or more of either (A) the then outstanding shares of Common Stock (the "Outstanding Common Stock") or (B) the combined voting power of the then outstanding voting securities of the Company entitled to vote generally in the election of directors (the "Outstanding Voting Securities"); excluding, however, the following: (I) any acquisition directly from the Company, other than an acquisition by virtue of the exercise of a conversion privilege unless the security being so converted was itself acquired directly from the Company, (II) any acquisition by the Company, B. Francis Saul II, members of the Company's management, or any combination thereof, (III) any acquisition by an employee benefit plan (or related trust) sponsored or maintained by the Company or any entity controlled by the Company, (IV) any acquisition by any Person pursuant to a transaction
 
which complies with subsections 10(b)(iii)(A), (B) and (C) of the Plan, (V) any acquisition by the Saul Organization as a result of a conversion by the Saul Organization of all or any portion of its Operating Partnership Units to shares of Common Stock, (VI) any acquisition by affiliates of the Saul Organization, or (VII) any acquisition pursuant to a transaction described in Section 10(b)(v) of the Plan.
(ii) A change in the composition of the Board such that the individuals who, as of the effective date of the Plan, constitute the Board (such Board shall be hereinafter referred to as the "Incumbent Board") cease for any reason to constitute at least a majority of the Board; provided, however, for purposes of this Section 10, that any individual who becomes a member of the Board subsequent to such effective date, whose election, or nomination for election, by the Company's shareholders was approved by a vote of at least a majority of those individuals who are members of the Board and who were also members of the Incumbent Board (or deemed to be such pursuant to this provision) shall be considered as though such individual was a member of the Incumbent Board; but, provided further, that any such individual whose initial assumption of office occurs as a result of either an actual or threatened election contest (as such terms are used in Rule 14a-11 of Regulation 14A promulgated under the Exchange Act) or other actual or threatened solicitation of proxies or consents by or on behalf of a Person other than the Board shall not be so considered as a member of the Incumbent Board;
(iii) The approval by shareholders of the Company of a reorganization, merger or consolidation or sale or other disposition of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company (a "Corporate Transaction"); excluding, however, such a Corporate Transaction pursuant to which (A) all or substantially all of the individuals and entities who are the beneficial owners, respectively, of the Outstanding Common Stock and Outstanding Voting Securities immediately prior to such Corporate Transaction will beneficially own, directly or indirectly, more than 50% of, respectively, the outstanding shares of common stock and the combined voting power of the then outstanding voting securities entitled to vote generally in the election of directors, as the case may be, of the corporation resulting from such Corporate Transaction (including, without limitation, a corporation which as a result of such transaction owns the Company or all or substantially all of the Company's assets either directly or through one or more subsidiaries) in substantially the same proportions as their ownership immediately prior to such Corporate Transaction of the Outstanding Common Stock and Outstanding Voting Securities, as the case may be; (B) no Person (other than the Company, any employee benefit plan (or related trust) sponsored or maintained by the Company or any entity controlled by the Company or such corporation resulting from such Corporate Transaction) will beneficially own, directly or indirectly, 20% or more of, respectively, the outstanding shares of common stock of the corporation resulting from such Corporate Transaction or the combined voting power of the outstanding voting securities of such corporation entitled to vote generally in the election of directors except to the extent that such ownership existed with respect to the Company prior to the Corporate Transaction, and (C) individuals who were members of the Incumbent Board will constitute at least a majority of the members of the board of directors of the corporation resulting from such Corporate Transaction;
(iv) The approval by the shareholders of the Company of a complete liquidation or dissolution of the Company.
(v) Notwithstanding the preceding, a Change in Control will not result from a transfer of the Outstanding Common Stock by a person who is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of 20% or more of the outstanding Common Stock of the Company (a "Twenty Percent Owner") to (I) a member of such Twenty Percent Owner's immediate family (within the meaning of Rule 16a-1(e) of the Exchange Act) either during such Twenty Percent Owner's lifetime or by will or the laws of descent and distribution; (II) any trust to which the Twenty Percent Owner or a member of his immediate family (within the meaning of Rule 16(a)-1(e) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficiary; (III) any trust to which the Twenty Percent Owner is the settlor with sole power to revoke; or (IV) any charitable trust, foundation or corporation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Code which is funded by the Twenty Percent Owner.
(vi) Notwithstanding the preceding, a Change in Control will not result from (A) the pledge of the Operation Partnership Units held by the Saul Organization or (B) the foreclosure on such Operating Partnership Units by a creditor of the Saul Organization if the creditor does not convert the Operating Partnership Units to shares of Common Stock of the Company.
 
(c) If the Company is merged into or consolidated with another corporation under circumstances where the Company is not the surviving corporation, or if the Company is liquidated, or sells or otherwise disposes of substantially all of its assets to another corporation while unexercised Options remain outstanding under the Plan, unless provisions are made in connection with such transaction for the continuance of the Plan and/or the assumption or substitution of such Options with new options covering the stock of the successor corporation, or parent or subsidiary thereof, with the appropriate adjustments as to the number and kind of shares and prices, then all outstanding Options shall be cancelled as of the effective date of any such merger, consolidation or sale provided that (i) notice of such cancellation shall be given to each Participant and (ii) each Participant shall have the right to exercise such Option in full (without regard to vesting or other limitations on exercise imposed on such Option) during the thirty day period preceding the effective date of such merger, consolidation, liquidation, or sale (the "Corporate Event"). Notwithstanding the foregoing, if no provisions are made for the continuance, assumption or substitution of Options and if exercise of any then-outstanding Options during the thirty day period preceding the effective date of the Corporate Event would not be in conformity with all applicable federal securities laws, the Participant will be paid a cash amount equal to the difference between the Fair Market Value of the shares of Common Stock subject to the Option as of the Corporate Event and the exercise price of the Option, or if in the opinion of counsel to the Company the immediate exercisability of such Options (or cash payment), when taken into consideration with all other "parachute payments" within the meaning of Section 280G of the Code, would result in an "excess parachute payment" as defined in such section of the Code, such Option shall not become immediately exercisable and shall be cancelled as of the effective date of the Corporate Event, except and to the extent that the Committee in its discretion shall otherwise determine.
Cancellation of Options upon Merger.
SECTION 11. GENERAL PROVISIONS.
(a) Nothing in the Plan or in any related instrument shall confer upon any Participant any right to continue in the employ of the Company or an Affiliate, to continue service as a director or consultant for the Company or an Affiliate, or shall affect the right of the Company or an Affiliate to terminate the employment or services of any Participant with or without cause.
Employment.
(b) No Option shall be exercisable, no Common Stock shall be issued, no certificates for shares of Common Stock shall be delivered, and no payment shall be made under the Plan except in compliance with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations (including, without limitation, withholding tax requirements), any listing agreement to which the Company is a party, and the rules of all domestic stock exchanges or quotation systems on which the Company's shares may be listed. The Company shall have the right to rely on an opinion of its counsel as to such compliance. Any share certificate issued pursuant to a Stock Award or the exercise of an Option may bear such legends and statements as the Committee may deem advisable to assure compliance with federal and state laws and regulations. No Option shall be exercisable, no Common Stock shall be issued, no certificate for shares shall be delivered, and no payment shall be made under the Plan until the Company has obtained such consent or approval as the Committee may deem advisable from regulatory bodies having jurisdiction over such matters. The Company may, but shall in no event be obligated to, register any securities covered by this Plan pursuant to the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
Legality of Issuance of Shares.
(c) No Participant (individually or as a member of a group), and no beneficiary or other person claiming under or through such Participant, shall have any right, title or interest in or to any Common Stock allocated or reserved for purposes of the Plan or subject to any Option, except as to shares of Common Stock, if any, as shall have been issued to such Participant or beneficiary.
Ownership of Common Stock Allocated to Plan.
(d) The Plan, and all agreements hereunder, shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of the State of Maryland.
Governing Law.
(e) The Company or Affiliate shall withhold, or allow a Participant to remit to the Company or Affiliate, any federal, state or local taxes required by law to be withheld with respect to any event giving rise to tax liability with respect to an Option or Stock Award. In order to satisfy all or any portion of such tax liability, a Participant may elect (i) to surrender Common Stock previously acquired by the Participant, (ii) to have the Company withhold Common Stock that would otherwise have been issued to the Participant pursuant to the exercise of an Option, provided that the number of shares of such withheld or surrendered Common Stock shall not be greater than the amount that is necessary to satisfy the minimum withholding obligation of the Company that arises with respect to the Option, (iii) have funds withheld from payments of wages, salary or other cash compensation due the Participant or (iv) pay the Company or Affiliate in cash. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, the Committee may adopt a default rule with respect to the payment of taxes described in this section, in which case the Participant shall have no election right with respect to the form of the payment.
Withholding of Taxes.
 
(f) Except as otherwise determined by the Committee in its sole discretion, and set forth in the relevant grant agreement, Options and Stock Awards shall be nonassignable and nontransferable by the Participant other than by will or the laws of descent and distribution. During a Participant's lifetime, Options shall be exercisable only by the Participant or the Participant's agent, attorney-in-fact or guardian, or by a transferee permitted by the relevant grant agreement. Incentive Stock Options shall be nonassignable and nontransferable by the Participant other than by will or the laws of descent and distribution, and shall be exercisable during the Participant's lifetime only by the Participant or the Participant's agent, attorney-in-fact or guardian.
Transferability of Awards.
(g) The Committee may require that a Participant, as a condition to exercise of an Option or the grant or settlement of a Stock Award, execute and deliver to the Company a written statement, in form satisfactory to the Committee, in which the Participant represents and warrants that the shares are being acquired for such person's own account, for investment only and not with a view to the resale or distribution thereof. The Participant shall, at the request of the Committee, be required to represent and warrant in writing that any subsequent resale or distribution of shares of Common Stock by the Participant shall be made only pursuant to either (i) a registration statement on an appropriate form under the Securities Act of 1933, which registration statement has become effective and is current with regard to the shares being sold, or (ii) a specific exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, but in claiming such exemption the Participant shall, before any offer of sale or sale of such shares, obtain a prior favorable written opinion of counsel, in form and substance satisfactory to counsel for the Company, as to the application of such exemption thereto.
Compliance with Securities Laws.
(h) Notwithstanding any other provisions in this Plan, any award granted under the Plan which is subject to recovery under any law, government regulation or stock exchange listing requirement will be subject to such deductions and clawback as may be required to be made pursuant to such law, government regulation or stock exchange listing requirement (or any policy adopted by the Company pursuant to any such law, government regulation or stock exchange listing requirement).
Clawback.
SECTION 12. AMENDMENT OR DISCONTINUANCE OF THE PLAN.
The Board may amend or terminate the Plan from time to time; provided, however, that with respect to any amendment that (i) increases the aggregate number of shares of Common Stock that may be issued under the Plan, (ii) changes the class of employees eligible to receive Incentive Stock Options or (iii) stockholder approval is required by the terms of any applicable law, regulation, or rule, including, without limitation, any rule of the New York Stock Exchange, or any national securities exchange or automated quotation system on which the Common Stock is publicly traded or quoted, each such amendment shall be subject to the approval of the stockholders of the Company within twelve (12) months of the date such amendment is adopted by the Board. Except as specifically permitted by a provision of the Plan, the applicable Option agreement or Stock Award agreement, or as required to comply with applicable law, regulation or rule, no amendment to the Plan or an Option or Stock Award agreement shall, without a Participant's consent, adversely affect any rights of such Participant under any Option or Stock Award outstanding at the time such amendment is made; provided, however, that an amendment that may cause an Incentive Stock Option to become a Nonqualified Stock Option, and any amendment that is required to comply with the rules applicable to Incentive Stock Options, shall not be treated as adversely affecting the rights of the Participant.
 

Exhibit 99.(a)
 
We have prepared a brief slide show to present balance sheet and operating performance highlights of 2012 and recent first quarter 2013 activity, and our current and future development plans.
 
During the past 15 months, we completed several equity and debt transactions which have improved our balance sheet and reduced our overall cost of capital.
We recently issued $140 million of perpetual preferred stock in order to redeem higher coupon issues, we completed $100 million of new long term financings to repay higher rate maturing debt, and we closed a new $175 million, 4-year line of credit.
 
In February of this year, we issued $140 million of Series C perpetual preferred stock which has a coupon of 6 7/8%. The proceeds of this offering were used to redeem all $80 million of our 9% Series B and $60 million of our Series A preferred shares.
As a result of this offering, our weighted average cost of preferred equity was reduced from 8.4% to 7.1%.
Preferred dividends will be reduced by $2.3 million annually beginning this quarter.
 
Entering 2012 near term loan maturities totaled just under $100 million - a pool of 7 shopping centers, with a rate of 7.67% maturing in October 2012 and loans at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue and Smallwood Village maturing in January 2013.
In April 2012, we closed on a $73 million mortgage loan secured by Seven Corners.
Also in April 2012, we substituted the White Oak shopping center as collateral for an existing loan at Van Ness Square which allows us to redevelop this building. The terms of the original loan remain unchanged, but we borrowed an additional $10.5 million at then market rates.
Then in March 2013, we closed an $18 million financing at Hampshire Langley.
These $100 million of financings were at rates 2.1% lower than debt repaid, resulting in $2.1 million in annual interest savings.
This March, we also refinanced two 3-year bank term loans, totaling $30 million, at lower interest spreads, resulting in $800,000 annual savings.
 
In May 2012, we completed a new 4-year, $175 million line of credit, which replaced an expiring $150 million line. The current 2.1% interest rate payable under this new credit line is 3.2% lower than the previous rate.
 
Our mortgage debt maturities are shown here.
Total maturities for the next five years through 2018 are $85 million.
 
92% of our total debt is fixed rate, nonrecourse debt. Throughout 2012, the favorable interest rate environment allowed us to lower our weighted average mortgage interest rate from 6.0% to the current 5.65%.
We have $140 million available under our $175 million line of credit, and have additional financial flexibility with one of our most valuable assets, 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, now held free and clear of debt.
As of May 2013, 22 of our 57 operating properties are held free and clear of debt. In our view, we think these properties which support line borrowings when combined with 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, are worth somewhere between $575 and $600 million.
 
As of March 31, 2013, our total combined debt and equity capitalization was $2.2 billion, compared to $1.1 billion 10 years ago.
Total debt is currently $828 million.
Preferred stock represents about 9% of our capital base. All of our preferred stock is perpetual and $40 million is currently callable.
As you can see here, since late 2011, our debt level has remained flat, while our common equity value has grown. As a result, our capital structure's leverage ratio of debt to total capitalization has improved to 38% from 44% in 2010.
 
Slowly improving economic conditions had a positive impact on our operating performance during 2012 and early 2013, after several difficult years following the downturn of 2008.
Our leasing percentage has trended upward, retail tenant sales have increased, and retail rental rates have improved. These positive factors have resulted in retail operating income growth in excess of 3.5% for the last 3 quarters, after being negative for the three years prior.
 
Overall leasing percentages improved during 2012, and averaged 92.9% during the first quarter 2013. This is an increase from a low of 89.9% during 2011, and is approaching our 10-year average of 93.4%.
 
Our retail leasing percentage averaged 93.8% in the most recent quarter, up from a low of 91.0% but still 2.0% below 2007 levels.
On a same space basis, retail rental rate increases over expiring rents averaged 8.7% for the 5 year period prior to 2008. The most recent year of increases was 2008, with very strong 10.1% increases in new and renewal rents. Retail rents averaged a decrease of nearly 5% for the 3-year period from 2009 to 2011. During 2012, retail rental rates turned positive, at 1.6% and continued positive during early 2013.
 
During the 5-years prior to 2008, on a same property basis, we achieved average annual retail net operating income growth of 2.8%.
Retail same property growth averaged 1.2% during 2008. During the period 2009 to 2011, retail property performance declined by an average of 2.1% per year. While modest, positive growth of 2.0% returned during 2012. The first quarter's unusually high 5.2% rate largely reflects rental commencement from the anchor tenant leasing of space that was vacated in 2011.
 
FFO results for the past 10 years are highlighted here.
The 5-year average FFO/share growth prior to 2008 was 4.6%/year. Beginning in 2008 and continuing through 2011, FFO declined each year, due to the economic downturn's impact on our portfolio and several nonrecurring events. 2012 FFO of $2.26 per share was the first annual increase since 2007.
After increasing the common stock dividend to $1.88 per share from 2005 to 2008, we reduced the annual dividend rate to the current $1.44 per share during the downturn, allowing us to retain additional cash flow during this challenging period.
 
Over the past 5 years, we paid out an average of 66% of FFO as dividends. While the dividend payout increased from 2009 to 2011, the 2012 level returned to a historic low of 64%.
This conservative payout over the past 5 years allowed us to maintain excess cash flows to hedge against economic uncertainties, while also providing capital to fund acquisition and development activities and to retire debt.
 
Our portfolio geographic focus continues to be in the metropolitan Washington, DC market.
About 85% of our 2012 property operating income was generated in the metropolitan Washington, DC/Baltimore area. This focus served us well during the challenging economic times.
The Washington jobless rate of 5.2% stayed well below national averages and that of most major metropolitan areas throughout this period. This helped minimize the magnitude of the property performance declines. Also, long-term debt capital continued to flow to Washington, DC area borrowers, while many other metropolitan areas and secondary markets found financing difficult.
 
During 2012, property operating income from our 50 retail properties produced 75% of overall operating income.
33 of our centers are anchored by a grocery store, and these grocery-anchored properties produced 82% of our retail operating income.
Total retail sales for the portfolio, from tenants who report sales, were up to $339 per square foot in 2012 and $345 per square foot for the 2013 first quarter, a 5% increase over average sales reported between 2008 and 2011.
Grocery store sales are a key driver of customer traffic in neighborhood centers. The overall sales volume reported by our 28 national and regional grocery stores averaged $491 per square foot, a 1% increase over 2011.
 
The long-term success of our core portfolio hinges largely on prime infill locations.
Saul Centers' demographics are well above the national averages.
Saul Centers' properties 3-mile trade areas have average household incomes of $114,000, compared to the national average of $68,200.
Our 3 and 5 mile population counts average 94,000, and 225,000, respectively, which are representative of very strong infill locations.
 
A diverse retail tenant base minimizes exposure to any one tenant's credit.
Only Giant Food, at 5.0% and Safeway at 2.7% accounted for more than 2.5% of our total revenue in 2012.
Our top 10 retail tenants comprise only 19% of total revenue, with 56% of this revenue generated by major regional and national supermarkets, a very stable source of income.
 
Seven Corners is a 570,000 square foot community shopping center in Falls Church, Virginia, anchored by Shoppers Food Warehouse, Home Depot and Burlington Coat.
During 2011, Syms declared chapter 7 bankruptcy and terminated their lease in December, 2011. We re-leased the space to Burlington Coat, which opened in October 2012.
The center is our largest retail property as measured both by square footage and operating income, and is our top producing shopping center with over $175 million in annual sales reported by the tenants.
An indicator of the strength of this location, the leasing percentage of Seven Corners has remained above 98% during each of the last five years.
 
Thruway is generally regarded as the leading community shopping center in Winston-Salem, North Carolina.
This 363,000 square foot shopping center is anchored by Harris Teeter, Stein Mart and Trader Joe's, and has many nationally recognized tenants such as Hanesbrands, Talbots, Chicos, Joseph Banks, Ann Taylor, Plow & Hearth and Coldwater Creek.
During 2011, Borders Books returned their 25,000 square foot store to us. We leased half of this space to Trader Joe's, which opened in November 2012.
 
We own a total of 395,000 square feet of community shopping center space in the Kentlands area of Gaithersburg, Maryland, in Montgomery County.
More than 38,000 households, with annual household incomes averaging over $128,000, are located within a three-mile radius of the center.
We recently contracted for the acquisition of a 1.1 acre parcel containing a restaurant building at the main entrance. We just signed a lease with a successful Washington, DC area restaurant operator and plan to close on the acquisition later this year.
The Gaithersburg master plan calls for mixed-use town-center development on this site. While the redevelopment of this property is many years away, this property has great potential for future value creation.
 
Our office/mixed-use space totals over 1.5 million square feet, representing 25% of our total property operating income.
The most significant of our office/mixed-use properties are 601 Pennsylvania Avenue and Clarendon Center, which produce almost 70% of the office/mixed-use cash flow.
 
The lack of clarity on federal government spending continues to depress demand for office space throughout the Washington, DC area. Demand for space throughout our office portfolio continues to be very slow.
Our top 10 office tenants produce 9.2% of our revenue, with no single tenant in more than 1 location in our portfolio, except the U.S. Government occupying 2 spaces.
 
601 Pennsylvania Avenue is 95% leased.
Of the top four tenants shown on the previous Major Office Tenant schedule that represent more than 1.0% of our revenue, two are long-term leases expiring in 2023, and two expire next year. These two 2014 expirations are at 601 Pennsylvania Avenue, and we are currently in discussions with both of these tenants.
 
We completed construction at the Clarendon Center development at yearend 2010. The project includes Lyon Place, a residential tower with 244 luxury apartment units, 42,000 square feet of street-level retail and 170,000 square feet of office space, all located on two blocks adjacent to the Clarendon Metro station in Arlington County, Virginia.
The retail space is 100% leased and anchored by Trader Joe's and the office space is 97% leased. The apartment units have remained leased at an average of 99% -100% every quarter since initial lease-up was completed in mid-2011, even as several new competitive buildings have been delivered in the Clarendon sub-market during the past year.
 
During 2012, we positioned our Van Ness Square office/retail property for redevelopment by not renewing expiring leases and entering into early lease termination agreements. As of last week, we successfully moved the final tenant out of the building.
We plan to construct a primarily residential apartment project with street level retail space as shown here in an architect's rendering.
Construction documents and governmental approvals are in process, with a final development timetable dependent upon permit issuance.
 
Looking beyond our development of Van Ness, we are currently focusing our future development pipeline along Rockville Pike near Metro Red Line stations, White Flint and Twinbrook.
Between 2010 and 2012, we acquired one and two-story retail properties in this area totaling 15 acres, and having zoning for development totaling over 2.1 million square feet of new residential and commercial space.
 
At the end of 2012, our 10-year compounded total return averaged 10.9% per year as shown here is yellow. While less than the NAREIT Equity Index, this equals the Russell 2000 Index and exceeds the S&P 500 Index total returns for the same period.
Saul Centers will cross the 20th anniversary of our initial public offering later this year. Our initial IPO investors have received an 11.3% compounded annual total return throughout our first 20 years.
 
We remain committed to, and confident in, the long-term performance of our core retail and mixed-use properties.
Our balance sheet is strong, and we are prepared for new challenges during this period of economic recovery.
I now welcome any questions you may have.
(after questions)
Adjournment
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
